PolyAnaMoose [info] 28 [F4M] Tampa Little looking for local, experienced Daddy! About Big me!: I'm 28, I live in Pinellas County FL. I play several TTRPG games a week when I'm not on World of Warcraft roleplaying my heart out or at work. I work 4 days a week 11pm to 7 am and tend to sleep in the day. I love to read and write and listen to music, I love being creative. I'm not fond of maths, as they usually make me cry past long division. I am Polyamorous, and currently live with my boyfriend who also works 11-7. He is 100% ok with my looking for a Daddy. I have undiagnosed Anxiety and I was diagnosed with depression when I was 8, its manageable. I tend to joke about my depression a lot, and do my best to take it n stride. I am an orphan, and don't do well during the holidays.  I'm kind of on the chunkier side, with curly brown hair and brown eyes. Don't come expecting a skinny mini cause I'll just cry.About Little Me!:  I am a little bit of a brat, but only until it stops being fun and I need attention, then I'm a good girl. I am very needy emotionally as a Little, I know this can be offputting to some Daddies who are busy or have multiple partners. I am very very very affectionate, physically and emotionally. I will send you DDLG memes and memes about me being sad. I age regress, to between 7-10 and 14 so I'm more of a Middle than a Little, but I will put paid to some coloring books. I love stuffies and cuddling and lots and lots of physical affection. I am shy, even when I get to know you. I like to be treated like a Princess when in little space.Big Me on Little Me: So, I'm looking for a Daddy to get that intense, intimate connection of someone knowing a side of me I keep hidden under sosososo many layers. I have health insurance now, and when all of this Corona stuff is over I'm going to get my glasses back yay! and I would like someone to be there with me and help me help me. Is that greedy? I'm not sure but having a Daddy with me when I do it would make me feel much safer and more confident. My job is working with seniors who have Alzheimers and Dementia, it can be physically and emotionally taxing, and having a Daddy to message and relax with. "Man Polyana, thats a whole lot of stuff." It is, because I /really/ want a Daddy that can work with me and my schedule so we can both be happy. "You're asking a lot."I mean I guess? I just have had a lot of time to think about what I need."So what do you need?" Well... I need a Daddy that can be affectionate and work with my schedule, that likes the same stuff  I do and lives close, proximity is a lot to me. I need someone who doesn't demand things rom me, at least, not until we set ground rules. I need a Daddy who is patient and kind and forgives me when I mess up, and holds me accountable for said mess ups. I want stability and affection and reliability. I don't drive, but my boyfriend can take me out if need be. All of this being said, please don't be rude to me when you message me, saying things like 'you better be a good girl or im going to punish you' or 'message me back with a picture of yourself or dont message me at all'. I'm here trying to find a Daddy, not be bullied or made to feel obligated. [info] None [info] 1586409215
bluefade [info] Dude, I am unemployed (not by choice/got laid off) and I have absolutely no trade skills (it took me 8 years to get to the financial level I was at with one company) so I pretty much have to start at the bottom of any job that will take me.   I have been single for a scary amount of time (I am in my late 30's) and I have been diagnosed with depression.  I am not close with my family at all and only have 2 friends.  One of which is literally across the country and the other is preoccupied with his new family (understandably so).  I am not sure why you are unhappy, and I am not trying to one up you, but it sounds like you have a pretty decent life, but haven't found that tool for ultimate happiness.  Be grateful for what you have and whatever else you want then go after it.  I don't think you are being a bitch, I think that it is a real concern.  Just look at what you have and try and find new ways to improve your life as it is already.  I hope you succeed I really do.  I have turned to the reddit community before and they are an awesome group of people.    [info] None [info] 1428700350
ReallyBadAtSpelling [info] Yeah no. I was diagnosed with depression-- by a psychiatrist, not "wow I'm sad a lot"-- and faced a shit ton of pressure to not only act like nothing was wrong, but to not open up about it to anyone.As long as I presented outwardly a strong, confident, MASCULINE persona, I was fine and accepted. People thought I knew what I was doing, rarely corrected me when I was wrong (or when I was right), and rarely challenged my interests or presence.However when I couldn't hold it together and got emotional I was treated as worthless, weak, and incapable of caring for myself. Hm, who in society has been typecast as weak, emotional, and incapable? TEH GRILS. I was quite literally viewed as feminine for exposing a side of myself that needed help. To anyone. Fuck, I can  still hear my mother's voice (sweet baby Zeus I swear I'm not Norman Bates) telling me that there was nothing wrong with me and getting angry that her boy was looking weak.Anyway, where was I?Oh right.I'm better now. I still rarely get questioned when talking about my area of expertise. I often get deferred to to provide leadership, even when I'm one of the youngest or least qualified people in a group, when I'm the only white guy in that group. Security guards still wave me through shoplifting alarms instead of eye me suspiciously. [info] self-hating male SJW [info] 1445878938
shehatestheworld [info] Mental illness is a fucking joke I've been diagnosed with depression since I was hospitalized at 15 for a suicide attempt. Since then, things have generally gotten better. A lot of my troubles went away once I moved out of my house and I've been able to start a good career and take care of myself.It comes and goes in waves, and each time it's come in my adult life has been connected to job troubles. But this time, it's been worse than ever.I tried so hard, guys. It's been at least a year since I've started feeling low again. My job performance was fucking up. I went to therapy again, I changed doctors, changed medications twice.Nothing helps. No one seems to really understand how bad things are. Every time I pushed to do something different or try something different, I felt pushback. I'm anxious and insecure and I don't believe in myself anyways, so it's hard for me to insist on these things if no one believes me or is willing to take me seriously.I quit my job. I couldn't do it because of the stress anymore. I thought, maybe I'd figure it out in the end. But I haven't and now I'm broke and fucked over.The worst part was, I felt better. I started exercising and developed hobbies. But I'm shitty and I'm lazy and not working hard enough to make the money. I did Lyft, but if I'm too lazy to do more than an hour a day, what's the fucking point?I'm in-between therapists now. My last one wanted to refer me over to another therapist, but the other therapist didn't have an opening until April 20th or something. I said to her, "Well, I'd like to make the appointment just in case, but I'm going to try to find someone sooner." And she said, "Well, you know, it's a lot of trouble for us. We'd have to open a new file and stuff."And I said, "Well, that's okay. Thanks," and hung up.I should have told that woman to do her fucking job. I'm so tired of people not giving a shit because I try to be nice and passive.Some of it is paranoia on my fault, I know, but I feel like all my mental health professionals initially liked me and grew to resent me. I feel like I pushed too hard or I didn't give enough. There's so much shit so close to my heart that's so hard to talk about.And here's the thing that hurts the most: Nobody fucking cares. I'm in-between therapists. My friends aren't actually that close to me. The one person I trust enough to talk to about this stuff is also the cause of some of my current problems (bad relationship).I've thought so much about why I'm the way I am. Things that happened to me, the ways I see the world. But what does it matter if nobody gives a shit? Even the people I pay to care don't seem to. My family sucks, my friends are distant, my boyfriend is shitty.I am never going to be able to save myself, and no one else can ever save me. [info] None [info] 1458706643
Spiritual_Bullfrog [info] I will assume (without making an ass out of you and me) that there was a certain event or a chain of events in your early childhood which you could not overcome. We are talking about trauma. When trauma isn't being dealt with correctly or ignored it starts affecting our lives more and more. This is because sometimes we don’t remember our trauma and sometimes it is just repressed somewhere in our subconscious. Or we are just fully in denial. Anything that is buried in our subconscious wants to come out. And it shows and exposes itself in triggers. If we don’t pay attention to those triggers they get louder. I would describe it as subconscious loudly banging on the conscious door. This results as a very tense and unpleasant feeling.If someone's events in life led to depression you look at the symptoms and that is a result of their subconscious banging on doors wanting to come out. Because there is something we ***really need*** to deal with and it is ***very important***. So important that it can completely disable a person from a daily routine.There is no illness. There is nothing wrong with anybody. So following your feeling to the root of it can be very beneficial. This is because you get to understand why you feel the way you feel, what happened that made an unpleasant impact on you and that you still haven't dealt with, you even get to understand others more and especially yourself.Not knowing what caused any illness and treating it only with medicines it’s like driving a car at night with lights off. You can’t see where you are nor where you are going. And you are not even sure if this is the right thing to be doing right now.I do however agree about taking medication ***if*** a person is so damaged that they are completely incapable taking care of themselves. When you are so depressed that you really couldn't care less for anything then taking medicines to lift you up to that level is still an option.***Without acknowledging and healing trauma there is no process. But medication can help you lift your mood to the point where you can start healing/curing yourself.***I suggest you to find a therapist (any therapist) that you can talk to about yourself and things that "make your backpack heavy".P.S: I only know this because I was diagnosed with depression and until I figured out what caused it, all my attempts of curing it were just a blind drive in the night. [info] None [info] 1534368978
ayferriesbelongtome [info] Can anyone here relate depression with limerence? Really, I've been diagnosed with depression but I'm starting to feel like it's not the case, that I'm just too prone to be in a limerent state. I'd like to talk to someone on the same situation, I think it'd really help.Sunday I sort of broke relations with my limerent object. It was hard, I'm not very well right now but I hope I'll be better soon. I just wanted someone to talk with about this, [info] None [info] 1462253224
GanjaminDanklin [info] I feel terrible (Sorry for the super long post) I generally feel terrible. It all started back when I started to study the first time. Everyone around me were doing fine academically. I was doing terribly. I didn't understand a single thing we were working on and even though I tried my ass off to understand. I really worked for it, but I just couldn't wrap my head around any of it. When the finals came around I started having panic attacks on a daily basis and most of the time it was multiple times a day. I had talks with a educational psychologist and I was diagnosed with depression. We both ended up agreeing on the right course of action was to drop out and "find myself" to figure out the right path of education that was for me (Education is free here so yeah that helps). So I did. I started smoking after a couple of weeks into the education I dropped out from because I couldn't handle the stress and pressure.I ended up spending 5-6 months doing absolutely nothing. I slept until 3 in the afternoon everyday, and played videogames long into the night and just repeated that every day in those 5-6 months. For some that might sound so good and that I have nothing to complain about, but on the inside I just grew more and more tired of myself. I was running from any thought of responsibility. I was scared of anyone having requirements of me. I still am to be completely honest.I finally had enough of doing nothing and started on a "production-school" that we have here. We did some interesting projects and it was actually okay for a change. I still felt terribly about myself in secret, but it was a time where I didn't constantly think about how bad everything was for me when I was at school. But I still felt mentally drained when I came home so all I could muster to do with myself was sleep until dinner was ready, so a solid 2 hours or so. I was there for a year because that's the longest time they allow a student to be there since you don't get an education or anything for being there. It's strictly for people that doesn't know what they want to do in life.I left that school about 4 months ago and during the time from then till now I have actually tried to get a job, but no one wants to hire me since I have no experience in anything and I have no education at the age of 21. I am starting on an education that focuses on people who "aren't ready" for a regular education and I don't know how I feel about it yet. All I know is that for the last couple of years I have felt nothing but terribly about myself. I have on multiple occasions had to ask for money from my mother to pay for something as simple as my phone bill and that is not helping me feel better about myself. To be completely honest I have on so many occasions considered myself a waste of life. I have not considered suicide as some people do, since I still have some wonderful things in my life. I love my family and my friends to death. My friends are always there for me and they know how I feel so they are very supportive.So all in all, I still feel terrible all the time, but it's the worst at night. I can't seem to find the right place for me in this world and I kinda feel like I don't want to die, but I don't wan't to live either. Everything since my 18th birthday till now has only done bad things for me. I can't see where I am going. Everything ahead of me is in utter darkness. I have started multiple things and given up because I am not strong enough to handle the pain and stress that it brings. All my friends have regular jobs, girlfriends, apartments and is starting their adult lives and I still sit here in my dark hole with nothing to give me the slightest of happiness. I have kinda forgotten how it feels to be happy. I don't know anything anymore. Something that has also been beating my brain to pieces is that to live you need to work. You literally work to live and I can't seem to agree with that. Money control the way you live and if you don't get any money you're doomed. I just can't fathom how people does it and I don't want to be apart of it. I see that I have to, but I don't want to. I just don't know how to live. [info] None [info] 1571610904
Matthew_YT [info] The Current Situation Recently Stagcraft has gone quiet, this saddens me greatly and I know that I too am to blame.**Why am I to blame?**Ive been away on holiday and I had a great time with great people but when I came back I was hit very hard with several things which broke me and I was diagnosed with depression for the third time in my life. I have not recorded since I have come back so I will so be getting back to that when I can.**Season 3?**Yeah season 3 may be happening much sooner than we had thought, the season 2 map has been griefed.. How? I don't know, Why? No idea Who? I do know, Im I going to tell you? No. So we have lost a lot of stuff and Im in very bad spirits because it has been done by someone I trust and Im really annoyed because this is something I have given to them for free. But I digress We may be resetting the map.**Applications** We are now accepting applications, follow this link.http://www.reddit.com/r/mcservers/comments/2b4rfg/stagcraft_vanilla_whitelist/**Its not all about Minecraft**We are hoping to much more outside of minecraft and we want to play so many different games together! some people seem to think that if they do not play on the server I will hate them and they leave I don't want that, the server is the base of our group but not the be all end all of it. What I don't like is when people are with us and say they are a youtuber and haven't made a video and forever. [info] Stagcrafter [info] 1405778412
SpoopedMyPants [info] When I was married to my previous husband, we weren't "trying" so to speak, but we weren't preventing at all. I would put it in line with the same as trying really. Anyway, we did that for about three or so years. I wanted to get pregnant near the end of the three years, but I just didn't. I thought I was infertile to be honest. Thankfully I didn't because it definitely did not work out between us. Only a few months after we split, I met my now SO. (Somewhat stupidly), we did the same thing about a month after we got together. I wasn't "trying" but you could put it in the same category. About 1 and half years into our relationship it happened. Well, about 3-4 weeks after I went on a health kick and lost about 18 pounds, I got pregnant! I always had weird cycles and because of how off they were I thought I was 12 weeks, but turned out to be 6. Ever since I was about 14 (When I was diagnosed with depression and GAD) I had terrible monthly cycles. I once had a period last 7 months. I really think this had a lot to do with it. When I met my now SO, I was a bit older. The depression seemingly subsided without the aid of medication. I was in a lot better place and as I said, I was working on getting healthy at the time. (I have gained all that back plus some... But anyway!)That's just my personal story. I wish you lots of luck and baby dust though! It's not a cakewalk but it is so worth it. [info] FTM - Adelaide Joyce 12/21/16 [info] 1477333267
Tarudizer [info] And I hate that kind of chirpy, upbeat "just go do whatever" type of mindset that is supposedly so easy to gain, especially when projected onto others. THAT is what I'd call stupid and juvenile.Maybe you're able to twist your thoughts into positive ones, that's fantastic and at that point you pretty much "win" at life, but don't think everyone else can. A lot of people's minds *just don't work like that*.I don't mean to make this sound like I'm attacking you specifically. I'm happy that you don't suffer from it, but a lot of people do. I'm diagnosed with depression, and though it's very mild, life to me is still very "gray" and tedious and I have to deal with ignorant/misinformed people who don't understand how it's like all the time.Edit: Alright, downvoted, to be expected I suppose. [info] None [info] 1468464854
Twistedcrane [info] My mental health in this time is destroyed I was diagnosed with depression last year and some of my friends have kept me alive. (I would have already committed suicide) Not being able to see them has caused me to think about doing it again. Reddit is the only way for me to really express myself nowadays. [info] None [info] 1586141922
Diox788 [info] With proper care and such she will :). Plus they are amazing coping mechanisms- I've been diagnosed with depression for a couple years now, but I've had it for several years before that, and Mia has always helped me.Pets are just awesome. [info] Mia, A lazy 15 yo Tortie/Calico [info] 1452043677
Cobra5210 [info] Similar experience, my first hypomanic episode was brought on by Zoloft. I was diagnosed with depression and actually have Bipolar I had a lot of religious feelings despite being an atheist previously. I started going to church and trying to convert my friends. This is a common reaction that Bipolar people have when prescribed antidepressants.  [info] None [info] 1483679842
stella-luna [info] My [22F] little sister [12] is pretending she attempted suicide to get attention My 12 year old sister is basically a reincarnation of myself when I was that age. She is awkward, emotional, has a short temper, and is autistic. My parents received a call today from some counselors at the Christian winter camp she is currently attending, informing them that she admitted to attempting suicide at some point by taking a bunch of pills.I did that. I was diagnosed with depression at age 10, and two years later, I took an entire bottle of antidepressant pills. I sobbed in my bedroom until the point where I was so exhausted that I literally passed out on the floor. The next morning, I had to go to my parents and tell them I'd done it; I was so dizzy and disoriented at this point, that I slammed my head into the wall on the way there and gave myself a concussion.After being rushed to the hospital, I had to have my stomach pumped. It was the worst pain I've ever felt. I will never forget the disappointed look on my parents' faces. They shipped me off to a short-term inpatient rehab center for at risk teens, where I spent a week; I was the youngest person there.When I came home, I was not allowed to handle any manner of sharp objects. They took down my bedroom door for three years. I was not allowed to go anywhere alone. In short, it was hell. I hated my life after my attempt even more than I'd hated it before, which is why I inevitably tried again at age 18.Now, this bitchy little drama queen is trying to come up in here and draw attention to her needy little self by saying she tried to kill herself? *Fuck* that shit. She's never spent an entire night crying. She doesn't know what it's like to not have any friends. She has no clue what it means to be depressed. I hear her in her room every night, watching stupid youtube videos and giggling on the phone with her friends and boyfriend (again, she's 12; I didn't go on my first date until I was 17). Our rooms are right next to each other; I have *never* heard her cry without reason, i.e. being yelled at or accidentally hurting herself. When I was 12, I would cry for hours because nobody except the teacher talked to me at school that day. I would cry because my cat refused to sit with me. I even cried while watching happy movies, because I fully believed that I would never experience that kind of happiness in my life.Fast forward to 10 years later, and I'm doing much better. Depression is still a very large and scary part of my life, but I have it under control. Now this little bitch wants to come in and fuck up my family's life with her drama? I fucking hate her. I *wish* she would die. How dare she think she can get away with that shit?I'm so fucking angry. I want to dropkick her. EDIT: a word. [info] None [info] 1423441508
pahjamallama [info] (27F4A) "Lonely girl, oh lonely girl..." Edit: I'm not here to chat all dayI'd love to meet more people and see if we click. I'm open to everyone over the age of 21 and who can handle me not being online all day, daily.This pandemic has given me a lot of time to reflect and friendship seems now more important than ever. I think I should mention I was diagnosed with depression beforehand and it definitely plays a role in my life. It's a sticky black sludge that makes it harder to do everyday things. And as most of are stuck home, it shocks I can't even try to go out to be social.So now I'm open to voice chat and mayyybe video chat, if we really click talking on reddit for awhile.If you're interested, please message me :3 [info] None [info] 1585608567
Linkums [info] I was diagnosed with depression in high school.College wasn't easy. I started out majoring in Computer Science at a college four hours from home. I wanted to die pretty much every day. I went through a year of that and then decided to switch my major for the next fall semester to basically my home-made linguistics major with Spanish, Japanese, and Chinese. This was a bit easier, but my depression wasn't any better and I ended up leaving mid-semester because of it.The next spring, I took only a Japanese class at a college I could commute to. Then in the fall, I commuted to that college and majored in Japanese, once again a full time student. It was still really rough, but I had more support / motivation from living at home and for the last year or two, from my girlfriend. I'm also the sort of person that would let my own health fail completely before I would fail to meet responsibilities.I graduated in 2012 and I haven't gotten any better. I still don't have a "real" job because of depression and just make a small amount of money from giving Japanese lessons. Don't know where to go from here.My advice: Get as much work done ahead of time as you can when you feel up to it and don't try to think about everything at once. Get a friend or family member to help keep you going. [info] None [info] 1382922484
bumpkerr [info] [TW pet abuse/suicide] my mum murdered my dog This is my first post here. I'm 34F, the "N" is my mum, who I now am LC with and who is a differnt person since getting medical intervention and medication. She still has issues and is generally racist/homophobic but she's much easier to deal with. Back during The Troubles my mum was pretty awful. She's always had mental health issues, including severe depressions, and when she got her menopause it was . . . it was so so bad. 6-10 hours of screaming fits that just would. not. stop. A whole litany of every mistake I'd ever made, read out as if from a scroll anytime she'd get mad and scream. Then nothing for a week or two, normal life. Then, the dam would build up and burst, and another round of screaming would occur. This was our lives for years.At the beginning of this story II was around 14. My mum offered to get me a dog of my own. I wanted a black poodle (miniature size). We found some pups for sale and I got a little girl poodle and called her Ebony. I was in charge of training her and feeding her and taking her out. I generally bathed and combed her, and my mum groomed her (cut her hair). Ebony would be in the car when mum came to pick me up from school. Looking back, I wonder if Ebony was a gift that was meant to make me happy in the way my mum couldn't offer me. Around the time Ebony was 3 or 4 years old I had a very deep depressive period. I can't even remember much from this time, just that I didn't want to live. It's really hard for me to even try and remember my life at this point. I've been diagnosed with depression and now I take meds for that. I've also got an endocrine disorder that can effect mood through hormone production or non-production. I've also never known my biological father and that messed with my sense of self and identity for many years.So, there I was, empty inside. Just waiting to stop existing. No hope. Life was for other people who had a chance. Me? I wanted to check out. Having been raised in a Xn household I thought of suicide as a sin, and I think that stopped me. Anyway, I didn't want to kill myself, I just wanted to NEVER HAVE BEEN. I wasn't functioning. I can't remember if I was at school at this time, I think I'd dropped out.Anyhow. There was this poor dog that loved me and I couldn't love it back. Don't get me wrong, I had loved her, up until the point where I just couldn't any more. I couldn't love because I couldn't FEEL. My mum would rage and yell at me for hours during this time, over many things, but one topic would be my dog. How I was neglecting her. Being a poodle if her hair grew too long her poop would stick in her fur. When I was capable/normal/not depressed I cleaned that up with a bath and scissors and cut the clumps of poop out, but I didn't know how to use the dog grooming clippers. Mum did it sometimes, but when I disappeared inside myself she didn't want to do it any more. She yelled at me for days, and then said that if I was going to neglect my dog she would put it out of its misery. I didn't respond, I was incapable of responding. My mum took my dog and gave her something to make her drowsy, and then put her in a plastic bag. She held the bag while my dog died. I feel so guilty about this still. I don't think about it often, but last night it came into my head when I couldn't sleep. I just want to cry and cry and cry. Ebony was gone. It was because I couldn't care for her. Ebony will always be a part of my personal shame. Even though I didn't kill her, she died because I couldn't care for her. She didn't have to die. She didn't have to be killed like that. Fuck, I'm crying so much. How do you end a post like this? I just don't know.ETA: I just remembered, once my mum had killed my dog she put it in the garbage bin for landfill pick up. FML. [info] None [info] 1428904291
prdax [info] Yeah that may be right. I was diagnosed with depression and insomnia and I would talk to the therapist then the bitch would tell my mom and my mom would tell all her friends. This is legitimately why I have fucking trust issues. Oh and the depression? It's still there. Fuck you, therapist bitch. [info] 18 [info] 1405556730
WhyYesIamBlonde [info] My nickname in college was psycho. Not to my face of course. It really hurt when i found out. I went to therapy for severe anger management issues. I was diagnosed with depression. It turns out that my body is incapable of producing enough serotonin. .I've had a couple of therapists tell me that i don't need them, just the drugs. I have lead a very charmed life.  So now my regular doctor manages my meds.  I still have trouble sometimes. My husband has physically thrown me out of the house. I am proud to say that i have learned enough control that i have never hit my kids or my spouse. Just broke stuff.  Please seek anger counseling now. It helps if you let it. [info] None [info] 1335822643
Tiny_Donut18 [info] The hardest decision I had to make was breaking up with a guy that was so respectful and polite and actually cared about me. I was diagnosed with depression at a very young age so when I was a pre-teen, this were really hard to deal with since I would soon be diagnose with PTSD and suicidal thoughts late on. But even with knowing all this, this guy stayed by my side, gave me a shoulder to cry on, and always tried to helped as much as he could. But things for me weren't getting any better and I didn't want him to have to deal with all these problems with me, so I broke up with him after 8 months of dating. What's worse is I broke up with him the night before his birthday, I still kick myself for being heartless as to do that. I never found anyone else who cared as much as he did, we lost contact but I hope he's well and is happy now [info] None [info] 1537734261
imjustyetanother [info] Im also 25. I was diagnosed with depression when i was 13. First self harmed at 15. If you don’t understand it then dont judge people and say why dont they do such and such like the rest of. Guess what honey not everyone is the same. Everyone deals with shit differently. You should learn that now.  [info] None [info] 1544153447
BuffetKillerr [info] I'm like you too. Except people come to me with their problems, and I take some of their emotional burden. Then when it comes to me having problems, no-one is there for me. Partly my own fault but its one of the reasons I was diagnosed with depression earlier this year :/ [info] None [info] 1406250740
Supernoodles7 [info] How do I talk to my parents about it? I've been diagnosed with depression about two months ago and I've been having therapy at uni. I don't know how to tell my parents or talk about it with them. I was hoping for some advice on how to approach it. I'm scared they'll say bullshit and to get on with it. [info] None [info] 1514395931
DoctorJony5 [info] I am 14 years old now, I was diagnosed with depression at 8, diagnosed with high functioning depression at 10.This story really touches me as the last friends I had (2 days ago) left me and decided to make everyone in my school hate me, since then I’ve had to spend a whole day at the psychiatrist and spent a whole morning with the headmaster talking about why they would ever have any reason to bully me both mentally and physically. [info] None [info] 1552326662
Frodis_Caper [info] Hi Rick! You do deserve to be healthy!  In addition to WW, I would honestly seek a therapist. It was around 25 that I was diagnosed with depression (not saying you have that, but saying it took me until 25 to get the help I needed). Anyway, cognitive therapy can help you realize why you reach for food. Good luck and keep checking in with us here! &amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1547125697
seank11 [info] I just wanted to let you know that my cousin and I will be seeing you perform in Toronto on March 30th. We are looking forward to it so much I can't wait.I have been diagnosed with depression and your music helps cheer me up whenever I really need a little pick me up. Vaka is easily the most beautiful piece of music I have ever heard.Keep up the good work!!! [info] None [info] 1359060858
unishmalo [info] It might be to cope? I am diagnosed with depression professionally (I promise it’s true) and I don’t try to hide it, it helps to talk about it a lot. [info] wow much deep [info] 1567249082
EquanimousMind [info] Would really love a polling function on reddit at times like this.Yea I was diagnosed with depression about 6 months ago. I got put on LExapro, which helped quite a bit. Also tried psychiatry, but quit that. I found meditation to be most useful. [info] None [info] 1320432987
VainPursuits [info] I'm in year 25 since I was diagnosed with depression.  Most the time I'm just laying on the ground with the rake laying on my face, but sometimes I can see the sky.Edit: Sometimes the sky opens in glorious Golden Showers... not sure how I feel about this. Thanks for the gold either way kind stranger.  [info] None [info] 1553053858
prehshush [info] I'm not sure if this is technically correct but I had a lot of people telling me when I was diagnosed with depression that it would "never truly go away" or that I would always have to be extra careful of my mood from that point forward. This annoyed the shit out of me at the time because that's such a pessimistic thing to tell to a depressed person. And it really bothers me now because I haven't felt depressed in years and feel like anyone could experience depression circumstantially and then never have a problem with it again. [info] None [info] 1483721133
mcesar2013 [info] Afraid of Getting Help I have a doctor brother. In 2014 he sent me to a colegue psychiatrist since he observed I was acting strange on my behaviou at home. (down, lost interest)I undertook therapy for 9 months until mid 2015. I think I never trusted the psychiatrist, beacause he was kinda friends with my brother.Later I found he was saying some of therapy to him, and I felt really mad. I quit, then. Since I was diagnosed with depression, my family started overprotec me, wanting to control when I would go out at night, etc, who I were my new friends.Now I am afraid of seeking help againa, because they will likely be that superprotective.Like, If they see me as ill, they will suffocate me.Sorry, English is not my first language [info] None [info] 1454528485
coocoobirdo [info] Purchasing a Bichon Frise (first dog ever) in Toronto. I'm looking to buy my first dog ever as a Bichon Frise. I live in Toronto and was looking up some breeders. Unfortunately I'm new to this whole experience and I've been hearing mixed advices from my friends so I decided to ask reddit.Where am I able to find a trustworthy breeder?I went on a few breeding sites and some of the bichon frise(s) go for over 2.5k. I went on kijiji and they go for 500 dollars. I'm really sketched out from purchasing on kijiji.I heard lots of advice from people about "seeing if I'm purchasing from a good breeder"; such as, going around the house, talking to other customers, etc.Is there any MUST DO's when looking for a new dog?Sorry for the basic questions. I'm just worried since it's my first dog. I was diagnosed with depression and that's probably the reason why I really want a dog. A dog can be a best friend who isn't judgemental about everything. [info] None [info] 1407781976
glossiar [info] I am exactly the same as you when it comes to school work. I've been diagnosed with depression (among other things) as a 16 year old girl and I'm only just now 17. I have been dealing with depression since I was about 11 but Although deep down I knew it wasn't normal I honestly thought 'I'm just being over dramatic, every teenager deals with this'. Nobody really suspected anything because somehow I managed to keep up my grades, and only into my first year of a levels my family noticed that I wasn't 'normal' per say, I think the stress of keeping it in so long and trying to live normally got so much I essentially had a break down, my ED came back and I didn't go into college for weeks. That was obviously the point my family and doctor took my to a psychologist. But, to answer your question, when I fully realised something was wrong, when I really actually thought 'shit this is depression' is on New Years 2013, when 10 minutes before midnight I just went to bed. My parents and friends were upset and confused as to why but I just didn't see the point in anything, and looking back I think that was a. Really sad and b. When I knew I was fucked lol  [info] None [info] 1506898715
yakakabadze [info] A question about depression and social phobia. Hello. I have been diagnosed with depression and social phobia. For as long as I can remember I was, let's say, awkward around people. Also as long as I can remember I felt the need to look everyone in the room, on the streets, in the food isle etc. It's as if I need a validation that a person — every single person who is in the same space with me — is really present. This includes, if I'm sitting with my back towards the rest of the people, turning around once in a while to check out everyone entering or leaving, staring at people in the public transport OR making effort not to.I just wanted to find out if any of you have something similar, what you can attribute it to, and to the people who doesn't have it: is it, like, really creepy?Thank you all in advance and I wish you all a way up from the abyss that is depression. [info] None [info] 1479986832
illoeric [info] [Plan] I badly need to change. After years of unsuccessful attempts to alter any habits whatsoever, I have reduced my goals to just one: use a planner every day for 49 days and complete 75% of tasks. (No zero-days+ planner) **Background:** I was going to use a throwaway, but whatever, I don't care. I graduated college about 6 months ago and without the external structure my life has become even more lackadaisical than it already was. For years I have been wanting to create healthy habits in myself and have failed 100% of the time in sustaining these habits for more than *maybe* two weeks at a time. I have "tried" everything, but persisting always wore me down, burnt me out and just ended on a whim of apathy in a moment of mental exhaustion. I've made very complex calendars that I couldn't keep up with, tried the X-effect with all sorts of different habits, and written all my goals in a quantifiable and measurable way within timelines. None of this has ever worked for me, or more accurately I have never been able to consistently repeat an action to the point of it solidifying into a productive habit.  At this point, basically every part of my life is not functioning as I would like at even the most rudimentary levels: I sleep very, very late daily, I eat awful food and believe I'm starting to gain, I drink 3+drinks a night, and I do not keep my life aims in mind because if I'm being honest it all seems a bit hopeless because I do not trust myself to act consistently. I live with my mom, and I'm a 28 year old man. Unfortunately with my degree I haven't been able to land a full-time "real job" as it were that might whip me into shape. I so badly desire to be independent and to trust myself to act consistently.  I am trying to be self-employed with some success and want to start a business. I also have a part time job. I am not looking for advice in this area of my life as I believe my plans are solid. Follow-through is another thing, however.   **Personal Issues (You can skip if you want):**As a side note, I have been diagnosed with depression multiple times, though I believe delayed sleep phase syndrome is more at the root of my mental health than anything else. My depression is exacerbated when I have a morning based schedule, but I feel fine and functional if I am awake very late. I have no difficulty enjoying the company of friends, or even just a nice moment in the day.  I have bought a sad light to reset my sleep schedule, but because I have no ability to do things consistently, I used it for a single day and stopped.  I do not have insurance.**Here is my plan**: I'm trying out the X-effect once again. I am running no x-effect goals parallel to this. I will exercise if I feel like it, continue sleeping as I do, continue eating as I do, improve my drawing when I want to **BUT** I am going to use my goddamn planner **EVERY SINGLE DAY** no matter what the hell my plans are. It doesn't matter if it is a day off, I will write "watch netflix or do things around the house" and then  cross it off at completion just so that I can say I've done **SOMETHING** consistently, daily, and have gotten into the habit of doing it.  Before I go to bed I will plan out my next day as a night routine.  I will complete **75%** of my tasked items daily (using this number for ease of mental calculation). This earns me an X for the day if I complete it without cheating, given that I give myself a reasonable task load and nothing time consuming and unforseen happens. As is usual in an X-effect calendar, this will last for 49 days starting tonight. I am rewarding myself at the 2 week mark, 4 week mark, and 7 week mark with various purchases and maybe a small trip. To keep myself on track with my life aims I will create goals for the week (complete y-drawing) and plan accordingly. And that is it.  I anticipate completing this  very basic and important goal. I'm sure you guys see that this is a bit "clever" in that I can complete many other subgoals as a result of this method. The planner is a control of the "now" while the x-effect is more long-term. **The real goal is to prove to myself that I can do things for more than two weeks at a time under my own control.** Also, I urge anyone else who has continuing struggles of consistency and persistence to try this with me.  I want to be a good OP and follow-up in 49 days with you guys and have written it at the end of my X-effect calendar, which I am hanging by my bed. And just my personal preference, but I'll go without accountability partners.  Anyways, wish me luck and good luck to anyone who wants to try alongside me!**Edit**:As leperLlama has suggested, the goal is not neccessarily 100% of days passed though I am sincerely aiming for that. I will reward myself if I have 1 or 2 off days in a reward period. If I can get through the X-effect calendar with fairly high percentage of X days and complete it in good faith I will consider it a success. I still have not completed an X-effect calendar completely through. [info] None [info] 1430369552
TheJiblet [info] I sincerely believe I am suffering due to head injuries but don't know what to do next Hello everyone reading this! I sincerely apologize if this is the wrong sub to be posting this to but lately, I just don't know what to do. So, I am a former football player and played offensive and defensive line from 3rd grade through senior year of high school and then went on to play offensive line in college. In this position, I was required to hit somebody every single play and most of the hits inadvertently had my head involved. During this time, I have suffered AT LEAST 6 or 7 concussions that were documented and countless others that were not. I specifically remember one time in high school that I got hit in the head in the first quarter of the game, and then I was just on autopilot for the rest of the game and I have no recollection of the second half of the game at all. I continued to play the rest of the game and only had two days of recovery over the weekend before I was back to full contact again. The last straw of my football career was during my sophomore year of college when I was in a head to head hit and I immediately forgot what I was doing and the concussion symptoms lasted over a month after that. I even forgot how old I was a week afterwards.Enough of the backstory. I finished my last two years of college and graduated. But, the past few years, my mental state has been questionable. I was diagnosed with depression after almost putting an end to my life and have a lot of memory issues. It's to the point where I will tell a friend a story, and then 5 minutes later start telling them the same exact story again and having no recollection of telling it in the first place. I also struggle with simple everyday things. For example, I will put an object somewhere, and then forget where I put it and spend the rest of the day looking for it. I also have trouble in conversations where somebody will tell me something and it will take me a good 5-10 minutes to realize what they meant.Overall, I have been struggling more and more with my mental focus, concentration, and understanding of everyday things and want to get help, but am afraid that I can't afford to see a specialist. It is also extremely difficult because one minute, I feel like I know for a fact that something is wrong with me, but then the next, I talk myself out of it since there isn't any actual proof that this is happening since it is literally "all in my head". If anyone has any advice or suggestions, I would greatly appreciate it!TL;DR:I've had countless hits to the head and now feel like my memory is slipping along with some of my mental prowess and I don't know what to do from here. [info] None [info] 1531792259
princessthrowaway234 [info] I finally made a decision for myself and I think I ruined my life My whole life I’ve always done things for others or to look good. I thrive on looking good to others and on being the best. I was never the *best* at anything, but I was always doing pretty well. My parents never pressured me. All they wanted was for me to go to college &amp; find a career, any kind, and be happy. I was diagnosed with depression in the fourth grade and stayed medicated and under therapy until 12th grade. I was a calm, depressed person. Never thinking I was going to make it much longer and having no interests never let me think ahead.First person in my family to graduate HS &amp; attend college. I picked a home school because my mom guilted me that without the child support from my dad, that her and my brother were going to struggle in our foreclosed home. Decision for others. I picked teaching as a major because I felt like it was a safe, stable job. I could help my parents with money someday. Really no interest or excitement. Decision for others.Graduation is around the corner; cert exams incoming. Haven’t felt deep depression in years but every time I walk into a classroom my heart is dark. I start not caring about my schoolwork being the greatest, but still good to get by. I’m miserable. I don’t want to be miserable forever. Finally make a decision for myself- I’m not going to teach. I’m going to do something else. Didn’t even finish my certs because I didn’t want to waste the money.It was so hard for me to admit to my parents, SO, and friends I wasn’t happy like I pretended, how much I hated teaching. But they all said they understood. I felt good for a bit, but guilty for being selfish. I did feel happy to finally make a decision for myself. Tried to get in an industry I like, and I can’t seem to get a leg up. Some interviews, no offers. It’s been two years since I graduated. I feel every day pass and it’s agony- I feel like it will never happen. I almost know it. I will never find happiness and I’m scared I will never find a real job. A job I’m proud of and at least a little happy in. Two years are gone and I’m only getting older. I want to cry all the time. I feel so dark. I feel like I wasn’t supposed to be here and that’s why nothing is working out. I keep putting the rest of my life on hold until I get a job I’m not ashamed of. The one time I made a decision for myself, it’s messed up my life so much. I can’t undo it. It’s my fault. I feel so horrible. Nothing good is ever going to come. [info] None [info] 1517093246
twister-rodriguez [info] It definitely could be. I’ve been trying to get him to a doctor for a few months now and I really wish I had tried harder now. I was diagnosed with depression as a teenager and have been on medicine ever since, but I do remember what it felt like before I got my head on straight and I wouldn’t have wanted to go to the doctor either.  [info] None [info] 1552966407
southwestperson [info] I feel like I need a reason to keep on living Not gonna lie its gonna be a long text, I haven't really contacted any other human being online or offline for at least 3 weeks, so I feel like this has been the peak of my loneliness, and I just wanna lay my heart bare for once.I've been diagnosed with depression since 4 months ago, but I think I've had it since I was little. Long story short, I went to elementary school without being able to speak in my native tongue. Fellow peers disliked the fact that I couldn't understand a word they said and they bullied me and ostracized me for always being that one weird kid and also for always being sad because I had no one to play with. Every day I would lock myself in my room and cry myself to sleep, asking myself if I will ever be happy. And I think at that moment that was when the panic attacks came the first time around. I always thought that crying until you were gasping for air until you feel close to death was somewhat normal , until I read that people rarely cry while hyperventilating (my family has a history of having asthma so I thought it was related to it).I guess I somewhat survived those panic attacks and depressive episodes by working myself to the bone. I never had time to think for myself. My dad hates it when I cry, and my mom thinks I can get over it by trying to better myself, so she set expectations on me, like graduate high school as one of the best, getting into a prestigious college, have at least a 3.5 GPA. So I tried fulfilling her expectations. I had no time to properly process my feelings, and when I needed to do so (like when someone close to me died, or I failed to get into my dream high school, finding out my passion) I just don't. I let everything pass me by. I never told any of my friends about what was going on in my life. I didn't go through that puberty phase of finding out who I am, what I want to be, because for me at that time it was useless. I was pretty sure that by what my mother said, it didn't matter if I had dreams or not. How many people manage to make their dreams come true anyway ? As long as I graduate college top of the class, job offers would come rolling in, i would work a 9 to 5 job, save up enough money to get married and have a family of my own and I didn't need to think more on my life.Until lately, on my last year of college, I always felt extremely tired. Whenever something stressful came up like exams I feel like vomiting and wishing that time would just stop, and panic attacks would come back more frequently and it gets harder every time to hold it back. I felt nauseous all the time, like I was feeling something but I couldn't identify what the feeling was. I didn't know if it was sadness, anger, regret, happiness, or anything really. That was when I went to my psychologist and got diagnosed. I was burnt out with my college, my hobbies, I was tired of fulfilling my moms expectations which seems like it was never ending. I even tried ending my life at one point. So I decided this semester I should take a break. With almost nothing to do and nothing to motivate me, I honestly don't know why I should keep on living at this point.I just waste away my time on the computer, sometimes I feel sad for no reason, and I try my best to ignore my excessive need to sleep. I've been trying to get into hobbies like singing and playing violin, started working out even. But part of me wonders, what is it that I'm trying to do ? Why am I trying so hard to stay alive when there isn't much to look forward to in my everyday life ? Do I get to be happy again ? Who am I doing this for ? What will all of this amount of effort amount to ? I feel bored and tired everyday and it gets harder to wake up, I just feel like If I had a reason to keep on living, it would be easier to try and heal myself from depression. [info] None [info] 1576145123
CuntyMcGiggles [info] LSD changed my life. It forced me to look deep within myself and confront all the shame and pain of my past and allowed me to move past it. It was a deeply spiritual experience and I highly recommend that everyone try it at least once (given that no preexisting mental health conditions exist). There's no feeling in the world like listening to your favorite music while lying barefoot in a field, watching the clouds break apart into intricate and beautiful fractals when it suddenly hits you that we're all connected and life really is fucking beautiful. I've since been microdosing with acid by taking 10ug every three days. I'm diagnosed with depression and ADHD and no longer take meds for either. Microdosing for me does everything adderall did without the shitty side effects.  [info] None [info] 1421092495
cndr [info] I was diagnosed with depression in 2010 at age 15. I got heavily into self harm (specifically cutting and tearing out my hair in clumps) for the next few years. I realized I had a problem when it stopped feeling abnormal. Cutting was a reflex and a habit more than anything else. And I was really picky about cutting. I would only use the cheap shaving razors without the aloe moisturizer strip- partially because they were easy to break, partially because they came in packs of 25, and- I shit you not- because the aloe strip stings when you touch an open wound with it. Let me repeat: **I DID NOT CUT MYSELF WITH THE EXPENSIVE RAZORS BECAUSE THEY WOULD HURT EXTRA.**I realized that this was literally insane to the point of being comical. This February will mark two years self-harm-free. :) I'm not out of the woods and I'm not cured. Every day I think about cutting and how easy it would be. At this point I doubt I'll ever be free of the urge. But as long as I resist, I'll be fine. TLDR if you or someone you know is considering self harm: don't. Fucking do not even think about it. Get help. There's no such thing as trying it once or just having a phase. It never leaves and it's never worth it. Please don't do it.  [info] None [info] 1421049681
chickita [info] Thank you. I have been diagnosed with depression 2 years ago. I had my therapy for 4 months and it made some difference. We were with my therapist "getting" ready for the doom but also trying to solve my past problems. There is just a lot going on not related to the death of my grandpa but every time I get stressed, it always goes back to though of him passing away. I started loosing my hair and have a lot of health/stress related issues. Being close to 30 years old, moving forward is pain in the ass after everything that happened. Sorry for your loss as well and keeping you in my thoughts.  [info] None [info] 1540488002
magnaswimgirl [info] When I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago, we realized that inactivity is what caused it to spike. I needed to be on antidepressants for a while, but I was partially prescribed them in order to give me the energy to get out and get moving. I'm still struggling with weight loss, but I've found that dragging my butt to the gym or even out on a walk on my worst days (now off the antidepressants), really does help. For me, at least, depression was all about self-hatred and feeling like I never could achieve anything. So there's a level of achievement of getting up and off my bed and rowing a couple thousand meters or taking a short walk.Good luck, keep your head up! [info]  [info] 1356477471
xTRS [info] I registered with the Services for Students with Disabilities after I was diagnosed with depression. I felt the same way about special treatment, but my therapist convinced me to register and have the letter prepared for my professors at the start of the semester. I could hand it to them and explain that it was a failsafe and I don't intend to use/abuse it. It saved my ass on classes that took attendance because there were some days/weeks that I was just unable to leave the house.This advice may be too late for you, but maybe someone else in this thread may be inspired. The University does not want to fail students that are putting in as much effort as they can. They recognize that sometimes "as much as you can" is not the same for everyone. [info] None [info] 1477473537
CaptainQuint77 [info] I have a therapist at college and a psychiatrist that I see for meds I have been diagnosed with depression and take medication for it and see the therapist every week [info] None [info] 1445880198
burn-after-use [info] Realized that for most of my childhood, I was “on my own” emotionally. I guess the title sums it up. I was always sensitive growing up and even still to this day. When I went to live with my aunt when I was 9, after my mom’s drug and drunken bullshit came to a head, it should’ve been expected that I’d develop even more emotional problems (being separated from mom, sister, and brother, AND having to deal with mom trying to guilt trip me into coming back).It hurts that no matter how obvious it was that I *needed fucking HELP* that all my attempts at talking about problems, shedding any amount of tears, hurting myself out of anger, etc were ignored. Or, I was treated as if I was trying to be manipulative, and I’d basically hear a list of reasons why I shouldn’t be sad, and if you’re sad because *this happened* at school, well, it’s your problem. You were the one being weird. It should be common sense that a 9yr old having to deal with CPS and getting removed from her home would be traumatic itself, yet every minor mistake I made (again. 9yrs old) was due to me having no common sense.I started getting bullied a lot the same year I left my mom’s, so I’d go to school and get it. I’d go home and get it. The only time I got to talk to someone about my issues was the school guidance counselor when my teacher would hastily make appointment after appointment for me after every attempt at telling her about the bullies. They never got any punishment for it, by the way. I told guidance counselor about my situation with my mom but didn’t say anything about how my aunt treated me. I never mentioned how if I lost a training bra I’d get slapped into the next room. I never talked about the sneers and snide remarks I’d get when I even mentioned being sad/upset/depressed. I never talked about the screaming. I never talked about how badly I was scared to cry because I knew my aunt would be mad at me for it. I was told that CPS would’ve put me with a whole different family if it weren’t for my aunt.So naturally, by middle school, the girl who was never given the time of day to learn how to healthily cope with emotion and stress found ways to cope unhealthily; through self harm and self hate. Granted I’ve bitten myself out of anger since before I can remember but that switched to cutting and scratching. I also eventually concluded that if this many people hate me; my family and dozens of classmates, maybe *i’m* the problem, and a bad person. Maybe people could smell that this 7th grader with average to decent grades, zero suspensions, and wouldn’t hurt a fly would somehow be another incarnation of Hitler. Maybe I did something wrong and just didn’t know it. With that being said I also have always had an overwhelming desire for justice, so maybe I deserved it. I started to believe that showing my emotions are always gonna be manipulative, and I just shouldn’t do that.I’m gonna cut the story short and skip the minor details from this point; I was diagnosed with depression at 15, of course auntie didn’t believe it. I was able to get therapy for a year (till auntie decided that therapy wasn’t helping me, when it was, and I told her this.) when I was around 18 I kept needing to switch antidepressants until eventually I gave up on them anyway because of both insurance issues and the fact that they weren’t helping. I still live with my aunt since I really can’t move out just yet. Surprisingly, the physical abuse tapered as I went into my teens, but I was still pretty neglected emotionally, and even had to rely on myself for sanitary pads out of fear that I didn’t ask my aunt “in time” and I’d get yelled at. A few times I had to cut up a diaper and wear that as a pad because I was so terrified of asking my aunt to get me pads. Thank god for my dad occasionally lending me a few dollars, and the dollar store.It’s just that now I’m 20 and my emotional insecurity has gotten far worse. I used to bury it all as a kid, but now, I just can’t take being life’s punching bag anymore. I was stronger as a kid than I am an adult, and it feels so pathetic. I’m starting to think that maybe life doesn’t get better and all of that “it gets better! :)” talk is simply anti-suicide propaganda to help therapists rake in more money. Can’t profit off a patient who already set themselves free.I have such an amazing boyfriend and regrettably I sometimes take my frustration out on him. Never physical but I have shouted and ignored him out of anger. I feel like I don’t even deserve him, and honestly I probably don’t. He’s been the only stable minded person who listens and takes the time to comfort me, but I hate being someone who has to be taken care of. It’s not fair for him.So that’s pretty much has been what’s on my mind lately. I don’t really know how else I should conclude. [info] always anxious [info] 1581861938
TougeTooned [info] Ever since I was diagnosed with depression my mom has started using depressed as a substitute for sad. [info] None [info] 1564095508
CaptainYid [info] AITA - For not wanting to do anything for my birthday? I'll try be elaborate on what is probably the most boring post on here...So every year, I tend to not actually care about my birthday and Christmas. To the point where I'd just as happy being at work than being at home on these days. Even as a kid it meant little to nothing to me.But nearly 3 years ago, my mum died the day after my birthday. And since then, both Christmas and my birthday  mean even less to me. To the point I only do stuff for other people.Which brings me to my current issue. This year I'm 30. Something my sister and my girlfriend all insist is a birthday I need to do something big for. I however, just want to stay in bed all day. Now bare in mind, I don't drink or do any drugs. So partying isn't my thing. They're trying to compromise and just go out for dinner, which again, I'd rather just stay in bed.So judgemental people of Reddit... Am I the arsehole for not wanting to go out or do anything for my 30th birthday?Edit - just a few things here...I know that everyone around me is just trying to get me out and have fun. It's all coming from a good place.I do work shifts so anytime I get at home with nothing to do I like to just chill and do nothing.Few people have mentioned it, I have been diagnosed with depression too. But even before that diagnosis I felt the same if it helps?With certain spelling i'm sure people have picked up that I'm English. And with work starting at 6am I'll replay as I can in the morning to any questions and posts! [info] None [info] 1579903690
dreamopolis [info] Just been diagnosed with Dysthymia I've just been diagnosed with Dysthymia with avoidant personality disorder. I've been reading up on them and it seems there is no cure.  It honestly feels like a death sentence as before I was diagnosed with depression and it felt like there would light at the end of the tunnel, now it just feels hopeless. Am I always going to feel like this? I honestly can't stand the daily ups and downs of this condition. I'm not currently taking any meds except for zyprexa 2,5mg which helps me sleep. A little about me: I'm a care worker in my late 30's. I'm quite fit and train 3-5 days a week. I've been doing that for years. I have a long distance relationship with a girl in the UK, we've been together for 5 months and she hopes to move here next summer. I'm a Brit living in Norway and I'm well integrated here, can speak fluent norwegian. I've lived here for 13 years or so. I have very few friends though and spend most of my time outside of work alone. Apart from that, nothing interests me. I find so little joy in anything anymore. I used to love training Krav Maga and playing video games in my spare time (when not training at the gym) but nothing can hold my interest any more. I'm just existing, but I'm not really living. I also have a son from an earlier relationship who has just started school. Academically I've always struggled. My memory is absolutely terrible and I find it difficult to learn if it's something that doesn't really interest me. On the other hand I can learn very quickly when something interests me. Even writing this is an absolute chore. I don't know how to express myself properly and honestly don't have the energy to write much.What should I do now? Any tips on what kind of meds I should be taking? I don't want to just go onto anti depressives that make me feel absolutely nothing at all. I've used Zoloft before but cut them out because I just didn't feel anything at all, sadness nor happiness. [info] None [info] 1477126518
AGuyNamedJacob [info] Every day i wake up and pray to my Neanderthal ancestors. Every day i ask them to take me up to “Neanderthallhalla” as i have called it, where my people can finally hunt the plains of the universe. I spend my day curing leather, sharpening flint, and posting on my blog about the suffering of our people. The arrowheads i make go for about $200 a set. I live in a trailer near the edge of the woods, it’s the closest to nature i can afford. I have been diagnosed with depression, no doubt stemming from my realization of my suffering.  [info] None [info] 1539996794
Mas7erD3bator [info] &gt; know what, fuck youFuck you too buddy.&gt; how dare you tell me what I do and do not haveIt's so obvious you'd have to be DEAD to miss it.&gt;  I was diagnosed with depression when I was 15 fucking years oldWah. Cry me a goddamned river. I was diagnosed earlier than you. There difference between us is, is that I don't use my mental illness as an excuse for my shit attitude and behavior. &gt; I've been in mental hospitals because I've tried taking my life more than once and spent a year on medicationsStop this "woe is me" bullshit. So have LITERALLY MILLIONS OF OTHER PEOPLE and the vast majority of them didn't turn out be toxic cesspits constantly filling themselves with garbage like you did. That is YOUR fault and the sooner you own it, the better off you'll be.&gt;  You think someone speaks and talks the way I do without having mental problems?Yes. Being edgy is a thing.&gt; I know you want to think I'm some monstrous incelI ain't gotta think shit, my dude. You are and you've said nothing else to make me believe otherwise.&gt; as far as I'm concerned, you're the real monsters.Yeah, well, we're not the one's driving vans into crowds, shooting up schools or advocating for the decriminalization of rape and pedophilia. So we frankly don't give a fuck what you think. [info] None [info] 1527627531
Scarlet-Ladder [info] I should probably go back to a therapist, you're right. I saw one fairly recently for issues unrelated to the depression. The only problem is I was using her for a psych evaluation for other treatment I need. I only saw her in order for her to say 'Your mental health is fine' to other clinicians. If I am diagnosed with depression again, the chances of getting the treatment go down considerably. All I really want to do is curl up and sleep, but I know that isn't an option here. I really need help, but I'm having to choose between the physical medical treatment I need, or mental treatment that would delay it. I suppose I have to pick the lesser of two evils. [info] None [info] 1381700839
pussy_diet [info] Second semester of school and miserable. Hey all.So there's a lot of background for this post, to give context. I'm 26, in my second semester of a Therapy master's program. Most of the info I look up about grad school is for programs that are super research heavy and that doesn't apply, so I thought I'd come here.I moved to a new state that I'd only visited once, a year ago, to be in my program. I got a girlfriend quickly and mostly neglected my social life. We broke up in December and I'm lonely as fuck, to the point of feeling suicidal (I was diagnosed with depression at 19).I made a couple friends in my program, but they say they are always busy (one is doing a thesis &amp; the other has a part time job &amp; boyfriend). I have a couple other friends that aren't in the program, and they work full time.I've read before that grad school can be isolating, but this seems ridiculous. I don't get how people that are in the same program as me are spending so much more time on homework (and-before you say it - I got a 4.0 last semester, I'm not slacking).I want to be a therapist badly but I'm starting to wonder if I can handle grad school emotionally. When I worked full time in my last city, I had a lot of friends who wanted to socialize often. Now, I'm really struggling making connections and those I have are tenuous at best. Any insight? Do other people feel super isolated and lonely at grad school? I have 7 semesters after this, and right now I honestly can't imagine finishing if it's like this the whole time.P.S. In high school, college, and working full time, I had a lot of friends so I'm not socially inept or anything like that. I'm single and my family lives far away. I've only been in this city for a year and had no existing contacts. Do I just need to give it more time? [info] master's program in family therapy [info] 1489971963
StephKlayKDIggyDray [info] I was diagnosed with depression, wouldn't really define it as sadness. But I put him on the list because Toronto won without him. [info] [GSW] Andre Iguodala [info] 1564793796
AttestedTuition [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, I have been able to manage, I've only been working at Wal Mart for a month and I feel it has exacerbated it. [info] None [info] 1534520568
mochacat [info] I helped my SO through tough times last year (including depression and suicidal feelings). This year, when I was diagnosed with depression, he told me he doesn't "need to feel that if he ever left me, I would kill myself because it's not healthy for him," and basically told me to get over what I was feeling. I've never felt the same love I had for him before, but we've stayed together. After all, being unhappy is so much better than being alone.  [info] None [info] 1388860836
figurehead00 [info] About to be fired again because I’m just too stupid and incompetent. Okay, this is my first post here and maybe I just need to vent, I hope that’s okay.    I’m 34 years old and I don’t think I’ve ever done anything right in my entire life. I was diagnosed with depression in high school and have always struggled with it, though I was just diagnosed by a PCP, never seen a psychiatrist.    Years back I got laid off from a factory job that made me miserable, so I decided to get an office job. I was so happy to have a “normal person” job, but I was just too stupid to figure it out. Everyone else learned it no problem but I was always behind, no matter how much they tried to help me I couldn’t make my numbers, constantly made mistakes, and eventually they fired me.    So then I got my current office job. Okay, this time it’s going to be different. A fresh start. I’m going to focus, ask questions, and learn it inside and out. I thought it was a perfect fit. Now a couple years later and I’m about to be fired again. I kept getting more and more work, I was totally overwhelmed and couldn’t figure out how to get it all done, and got really behind. Then last week I got an awful kidney stone and had to be out most of the week. While I was gone they discovered my secret. I was behind, unorganized, couldn’t keep track of things, I was a mess, I was letting everyone down. Everyone knew. It was confirmed my coworkers don’t like me. My boss has all but told me I’ll be fired next week.    I just don’t understand why I can’t be a normal person. I come across as fairly well spoken and intelligent, but I ALWAYS screw it up. I ALWAYS let everyone down. I have no skills, no talents, no strengths, nothing. Nothing to offer anyone. Always been single, my roommate is moving out so soon I’ll live alone. My worthless brain can’t even keep a low paying entry level job.    You know Imposter Syndrome? Where you feel like everyone else knows what they’re doing but you and eventually they’ll find out you don’t belong? Well usually that’s just in your head, but I keep being proven right and people keep finding out.    Once I lose this job I have no idea what I’ll do. It’s being proven over and over again that there’s nothing I’m smart enough or competent enough to be able to do.    This, along with everything else, has sent me into an intense and scary depression cycle. I hate myself. I can’t stand even a second of silence. I have to keep either a video or podcast of my favorite internet people (Giant Bomb, a video game site) going constantly or I just break down into tears. I just want to be a normal person and not this worthless, terminally incompetent idiot who’s afraid literally every second of every day.     Sorry this was so long. If you read it all that really means a lot to me. I guess I just needed this really bad today.Edit: I’ve never been a cryer, but the tag line to this sub is making me choke up every time I read it. It’s so nice. [info] None [info] 1514335392
Slappers_only007 [info] Can you have low TSH and have hypothyroidism? Got some blood work done last week due to fatigue. I have had chronic fatigue for as long as I can remember (10+ years), but my bloodwork has always been normal. I was diagnosed with depression at age 12 so I've always attributed it to that, but I've had a sneaking suspicion that my thyroid wasn't working properly (especially since my mom has hypothyroidism and I grew up watching her go through the symptoms).The results? TSH 0.411, indicating hyperthyroidism. I have no symptoms of hyperthyroidism and all of the symptoms of hypothyroidism- fatigue, headaches, cold sensitivity,  decreased libido, dry skin, weight gain, constipation...I could go on. Reading the list of symptoms is like reading my diary. Also, if it helps, I fasted before the test.The other result of my bloodwork is that I have high cholesterol (286 overall, 210 LDL). I am a 28 F with no family history and a fairly healthy diet. I have read that hypothyroidism can raise your cholesterol as well.What do you think? Any advice is appreciated! I have a follow up appt with my GP on Monday and I want to go in asking all the right questions. Thanks!Update: Thank you for all of your advice. I am having a full thyroid panel done and will be seeing a rheumatologist. I am also having a C-Reactive protein,  ANA, RPR with FTA reflex and sedimentation rate test done. [info] None [info] 1582242386
breadstick69 [info] In third grade, my principal came to my class and told everyone I had Asperger's while I wasn't there. When I came back no one wanted to talk to me. We don't have middle school in Australia, but High School was no different. I still had no friends, got picked on, spit on and got attacked in 12th gradeafter which my mum withdrew me from school. I never finished, never went to college or university either.I was diagnosed with depression at age 7 and that was the same age I had the first of many suicide attempts. The closest friends I had growing up were my cousin and my World of Warcraft guild mates. So yeah, I'm definitely no 'chad' and while I can scrub up okay for photos [sometimes](http://imgur.com/a/SI0vB), I still usually look like a [fucking goober](http://imgur.com/a/UEaLn).I'm also 17kgs underweight and my last girlfriend was confused about my gender, so she waited until a month into the relationship to awkwardly ask me what genitals I had. So, really, it doesn't matter if you're an autistic skeleton with no dick. [info] None [info] 1489798786
universalix [info] I need help So 31/f here,for half of my life I have been on and off of drugs. I am an addict, I love getting high on weed and I used to be an alcoholic. The past 3 years I am in recovery and life has just been so boring since, I have lost the will to live. I simply do not have the will or energy to do the things I used to love such as play video games and make art. I have been diagnosed with depression but the meds do not help at all. I don't know what to do most of the time, it's like I am dead inside. Did I break my brain....What do I do? [info] None [info] 1543175508
-kodoku- [info] I was diagnosed with depression around the age of 6. You can have depression at almost any age. You also don't necessarily know if you have depression. It's obvious for some people, while others can go their life without realizing or even suspecting they have depression. Check out this depression screening test. This is the same test that they make you fill out when you see a psychiatrist or psychologist. http://www.med.umich.edu/1info/FHP/practiceguides/depress/phq-9.pdf [info] None [info] 1512853446
somethingeccentric [info] Brain and everything it used to do now completely useless..happened to you? How do you help it? I've been diagnosed with depression since I was in 6th grade. But over the past few years, being 17/18/19, my mind seems to be nothingness. I used to always have something on my mind, I used to have ideas and be very creative, I could think logically/put things together faster than most and I had an excellent memory. But I feel now like there's literally nothing going on. I don't get lost in thought, there is no thought. I can't concentrate and I can't remember. I haven't produced something creative in years, when I used to every other day. This go over my head, holding any conversation about anything is extremely mentally exhausting. Is this a depression thing? And how do I help it, and be of some use or purpose again? [info] None [info] 1400292400
ThatLittleEquestrian [info] Anyone else experience this? So I saw a post similar to this and decided to share my experience.  So my brother bullies me and has cause me to hate myself and now possibly have BDD or even an eating disorder at worst. I have a really hard time believing my family when they tell me I am beautiful, pretty, etc. I look at myself as fat when I’m actually I am quite a bit underweight according to my BMI. My eating habits are really bad and last year when I did therapy (I don’t anymore) I was diagnosed with depression and was basically told that if I talk about what is causing the depression I’ll get better. I think that depression is what has caused my BDD or eating disorder. The only thing that really seems to make me happy anymore is horseback riding and being with my horse. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1568207498
sdhoigt [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and have been prescribed medication, but the doctor is suggesting I get bloodwork done. Should I wait till after COVID-19 situation dies down to go to a lab for bloodwork? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1586371695
NSTBH84 [info] I've hated myself with great passion for over 15 years. Inside and out. I've been diagnosed with depression, and that's why I hate who I am. But I think I may have body dysmorphic disorder, too, which is why I hate what I look like. I haven't been happy since this started, like you there are rare spurts.Sometimes I wonder if I have depression or BDD at all, perhaps I see myself with perfect accuracy. In which case the hate is justified. I hope you find something that helps you.   [info] None [info] 1469706124
DirtSub [info] &gt;I have no fucking idea what I'm gonna do then lol. Because it doesnt matter how many positive changes I make in my life, or how much I know that things have improved, I still feel like I'm fucking garbage :/ I just wanna stop wishing I was someone else, and I dont know how. Its like nothing I do matters, my life is objectively 10x as good as it was a year ago, but I'm just as miserable, if not more.This does sound like it could be depression.&gt;Hahaha I live in the US, in a state that didnt expand Medicaid. Which means that my last therapist appointment was a couple weeks before I turned 18. (Maybe 19?) Yes, I was diagnosed with depression in high school. But like I said, since I'm not rich, it doesnt really matter, I just get to figure it out myself because I dont have God knows how much money to spend on either therapy out of pocket, or insurance that would cover it. And it's so hard to talk about this, because people always think I'm "woe is me"ing for pity, but I'm not. I just want to feel better, like I'm a person who's worthy of love and not a fucking weirdo freak. I need help, and I cant seem to find it, and it's getting harder to stay convinced that it's even worth it to keep trying. I would do anything to just be happy by myself, and to figure out what I need to do be deserving of a girl's attention. In that order. It breaks my heart every day that I have no outlet for the love that I know I'm capable of showing, and hope that I'm worthy of receiving, but it's clear to me that's gonna be a looooooong fucking time from now, so I just want to learn to be happy without it, so I'm not entering a relationship for the wrong reasons.Have you ever considered focusing on your depression, venting about your depression and trying to cope with your depression instead of focusing on the things that you can't have yet because of your depression, such as girls?Let me put it this way, if your leg was broken, would you write a thread called "I hate not being able to date" and not even mention that it's because of your broken foot, or would you write a thread called "I hate having a broken foot - especially because it means I can't date yet".Do you understand what I'm saying?&gt;Sorry for the wall of textDon't apologize. We're here because we care. No amount of text is too much text. [info] None [info] 1542908737
Creepthan_Frome [info] I remember it vividly, even though it happened 14 years ago. Seeing Stop Making Sense in a theater when I was nearly 16. In school, I was a weird, generally ignored kid; but I was actually pretty cool. I really felt like I knew myself, but others didn't. I had very low self-esteem (I was diagnosed with depression a year later), and always felt a bit out of place.During the fateful summer of 2000, I went to one of those college summer programs and took an Egyptology course. And it was at the program that I found my people. Nerds - the bookish kind, the art and history-loving kind who loved shopping for weird shit as much as they loved hitting museums. I was home.I was also a massive Talking Heads fan. When I found out that, on the last night, Stop Making Sense was playing uptown, I managed to convince a small gaggle of friends, many of whom had only ever heard one Talking Heads song, to come with me. It was a 9 o clock show, and together, we teens piled into some mass-transit, and headed out.We occupied a row in the theater, surrounded by several late-twenty/early-thirtysomethings; we were easily the youngest in attendance. And then it went dark and the music started. I was transfixed.And it was when [Making Flippy Floppy](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qa98AhEVAZQ) began to play that I stood up and began dancing. Others in other rows to either side (we were in the back) looked over. And then they stood and began dancing too. Then my friends stood. Then the entire theater stood. We all danced for the rest of the song. This happened again on multiple occasions.I had found my people.And while I still had self-doubt (oh goodness did I), something changed in me. Yeah, I was a fucking nerd, and no, I'm not for everyone, but dammit, I can be pretty cool. [info] ♀ [info] 1411841572
caity5222 [info] Need advice I have been diagnosed with depression for the past 2 years. I just moved in with my wonderful boyfriend but we have been long distance for three years so this is the first time he's really experiencing being with me when I get into a depressive funk I guess. I can tell that he's frustrated but he's trying to understand. Sometimes I just get in a really awful mood for no reason and he keeps thinking it's his fault. I guess my question is what can I do to reassure him it's not his fault, or what do you think I can do to try and stop these bad mood swings? [info] None [info] 1431912568
paladin_berra [info] I'm still unhappy? I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago but it hasn't been a problem until recently. I have everything that I want right now in life. A good job thats moving me to a new city, a good girlfriend, I have my own place, a car, I have a number of good friends and a supportive family. But I'm still waiting for that sense of fufilment. Recently every day it feels like I'm just drowning in this feeling of self loathing and a mental fog. It's like there's an invisible wall stopping me from being happy with my life. I just want someone to hold me and tell me that I'll be ok. [info] None [info] 1536140687
666deeznutz [info] Well I was diagnosed with depression, had suicidal thoughts and whatnot.they gave me ssris and I didn't want to become a government zombie. Later down the line I took a large dose of shrooms and microdosed the rest [info] None [info] 1499614460
aperturedream [info] Has anyone else had a depression/mental illness experience like mine? I've been diagnosed with depression for quite a few years now, and I've had intermittent episodes of very severe depression where I can't even get out of bed, but 90% of the years since I was diagnosed, I've felt generally "okay" but as if I lacked some crucial part of myself that I allowed me to enjoy life from before, as if there's a wall between my current self and the man I was before I was diagnosed. It's 24/7, and not something anyone would notice from the outside, but on the inside I've felt as though every day of the past few years has been a waste, that I haven't been myself or able to enjoy or experience anything, due to this "missing piece". Originally the drug Wellbutrin first made me feel this way, but I have been off of it for many years as the result of a seizure it induced. It's just so strange to have such mental issues that don't seem to really fit into any category or description; the closest I can come to is anhedonia, but even that doesn't seem to encapsulate this feeling of just missing a part of myself. The thought of continuing to live like this with no remedy terrifies me and it feels as though I am wasting each day and not really experiencing my life. I haven't heard of anyone else feeling this way and perhaps no one on this sub will either, but I at least needed to get it out there too. [info] None [info] 1431715318
Woodwood_doggo [info] I used to play this. In one life I was diagnosed with depression for the 2nd time by the age of eleven. [info] None [info] 1571601808
bubblesthebat [info] Every time I have a headache or cold or anything wrong healthwise, one coworker of mine always has to chime in with, "well you know, vegan/vegetarian people have deficiencies blah blah blah."  It's extremely annoying.  The most recent time I was sick, I got a blood test done, and what do you know, no freaking deficiencies.  I was diagnosed with depression, but at least my diet is healthy.  [info] None [info] 1497682207
AxiomaticParadox [info] Why is telling depressed people "You're not alone" helpful? I was diagnosed with depression last summer and I'm annoyed and even more depressed when I hear people say I'm not alone in dealing with depression. That just makes me feel validated in thinking life is meaningless and that I should just kill myself. Like if millions of other people feel the same way I do, then my feelings could have merit. After all, even people who aren't depressed think the world is fucking miserable. Tell me how to feel better. Don't tell me other people are miserable too. [info] None [info] 1565325119
Hamza78ch11 [info] I wish I had straight A's, was incredibly good looking and a million other things, but wishing doesn't mean anything. You have to fight for the things that you want. Two years ago I was diagnosed with depression. It's been a struggle. But I'm finally at a good place in my life. I don't need drugs and I'm not constantly breaking down. I still think about death a lot but it gets better. I still don't want to be alive sometimes but the number of days that I want to live is starting to outnumber the amount of times I don't. Im haggard and weary and just bone tired but that's because being pre-med is tough and not because I haven't slept in 72 hours because for the first time in years I'm sleeping and eating like a normal person. I'm fighting my way through my anorexia and because I love my mom and she packs me a sandwich to take with me to Uni I make sure that I eat that at least and dinner. I'm getting to the point where I don't cringe when I look in the mirror anymore and because I'm going to the gym regularly sometimes, when I'm all alone and I know no one is near me, I even flex in the mirror and pose for myself. People have always, my entire life told me that they like how confident and outspoken and well articulated I am but for the first time I'm starting to feel that way on the inside too. I don't feel Insecure all the time either.I'm trying my absolute hardest to be a good older brother and a good son and a good friend and I think I'm doing a good job. I don't have a lot of time to spend with my younger siblings but I try to make the most of it when I can. I was neglecting my little sister all week because I have to study so this morning we went and got pizza so we could have our brother sister time. My little brother and I spent all afternoon working on our car, male bonding time.I have a B in physics which sucks but I know I can bring it up, on the other hand I have an A in biochemistry and Cell and Molecular Biology even thought most people are struggling with those. I'm keeping up a 3.8 even if just barely. Applying to med school is scary, and I don't know how to find those clinical shadowing hours because they just don't fit in my schedule, but I'm doing research in a lab and I just expressed a protein on my own for the first time! I know that I'm not the best looking guy out there. But I'm not constantly calling myself ugly anymore either. I'm learning to be nice to myself. No girl has ever "wanted" me but that's okay, one day it'll happen. I know I'll never be the kind of boy that makes heads turn, but I know that I'll try my best to be the absolute best husband I can ever be. I've never been in a relationship and that's because of the whole no girl ever wanting me thing but also the fact that my religion doesn't allow that. That's okay, it's my choice and I have accepted it for what it is. I'm okay with an arranged marriage. It worked for my parents! The point is, I'm fighting my way out. I might still get depressed sometimes but I'm doing better and I'm hoping I'm better every single day than I was the day before. I won't ever let those thoughts win. I won't ever let them back into my head again, that sanctuary belongs to me and to me alone. I might wish to have all A's but that doesn't mean anything until I put in the effort for it. I might want to be ridiculously good looking and I know I'm not and I know I won't be, but I can still have nice hair and trim my beard well and wear good clothes and shower and overall make an effort to be presentable. I will be happy you guys. I will be. Come December, I will have straight A's. Come June I will destroy the MCAT, I will have the absolute greatest personal statement the any American med school has ever seen. I will have these things because I earned them. Because I worked for them. I will never wallow in self pity again. I will always remember that it's not as bleak as it looks and that the power to make things better rests within me. I am strong, I am smart, I will not lose to the black thoughts that live within me. [info] None [info] 1475994196
Nihilist_Puppy [info] No Idea Where to Turn, Please Read Two years ago, at age eighteen, I was diagnosed with depression. It was hard to come to terms with, because I didn't think mental illnesses were real, but the symptoms became too severe to deny. That being said, it wasn't too surprising either. My father has some sort of mental illness and is abusive, and I was bullied straight into adulthood. Aside from that, there were definitely some strong predispositions. I cried myself to sleep some nights, which is something I thought to be relatively normal. I was reluctant to discuss my mental health with anyone because I'm male and had a notion of needing to toughen it out. At the time of my diagnosis, I was a freshman in probably the most isolating university in my country (the University of Toronto). The symptoms became so severe that I had to drop out of my program and take a year off. Starting at this time, I saw a psychiatrist for about a year and a half. During this year and a half period, I was put on a bunch of medications that didn't work (Zoloft, citalopram (Celexa), escitalopram (Lexapro), bupropion, clomipramine, abilify, venlafaxine (Effexor), desvenlafaxine (Pristiq)) until he got frustrated and tossed me on the curb. Usually the medication would work for a bit and crap out. Eventually, about 3 months ago, my GP and I settled on a cocktail of meds that's been dubbed 'California rocket fuel' - effexor and mitrazapine (Remeron). Unfortunately, despite being on the max dose of both drugs, it's not working. I'm okay for two weeks, spiral into an episode for another two, come out again, rinse and repeat.I have no idea if what's causing me to feel this way is "depression" or just shitty life circumstance. My father is still abusive (but moving out didn't help my depression), I have no friends, I'm pretty apathetic about everything. I have no real goals, no real passion for what I study either. I have no self-image, social skills, and I attach to people way too quickly. All of this sounds pretty consistent with borderline personality disorder. Not sure who to bring this up to or what I have anymore (if anything). I know the only treatment for borderline personality disorder (if I even have it) is therapy, and I've tried CBT/DBT to no avail (it probably made me worse, actually). I have no idea where to go. Currently in the middle of an episode right now. Super hard to find motivation to do anything. Can't shower, my mouth tastes putrid because I haven't brushed it in weeks, and I haven't shaved in days. I just sit in bed all day. Please help, I need some advice. Nothing seems to have worked and how rapidly my mood cycles makes me question whether I even have depression at all. [info] None [info] 1496517511
Flybirdieee [info] I’ve never been this depressed. Merry fucking Christmas to me It's been over four months now, since he ended it. Last month I was feeling a bit better, but lately I've been struggling with an overwhelming feeling of worthlessness. I'm so depressed. I was diagnosed with depression about 6 years ago but I’d been so happy the past few years I went off my meds and everything. Then he did this. I never want to do anything. I am so, so lonely, and yet, I keep isolating myself. I am not even going home for Christmas because I can’t be around people, even though I LOVE my family... I just don't want to spend time with anyone. I just can’t. I miss him. It hurts in my bones. I just want to lay under the covers in my shitty new studio apartment, with the covers over my head, and just close my eyes. I don't know how I could ever be happy again. I downloaded some dating apps and I get all sorts of guys matching with me, and instead of making me feel better, like I thought it would, it just made me more miserable, because how could anyone compare to him? He was perfect in my eyes. He was everything to me. Some days, he still is. [info] None [info] 1576797472
bussyboiiii [info] I (17f) haven’t been sleeping or eating for weeks now and I have no idea why, please help This is gonna be long, I’m sorry, but please, please stick it outSex: FAge: 17 Height: 5’0”Weight: 150-160lbsSmoking status: I smoked weed casually for a few months but haven’t in the last 2 months or soConditions: ADHD, asthma, clinical depression, suicidal tendencies (also I broke my ankle about 2 months ago and I’m non weight bearing for another month but I’m not sure if that’s relevant)Medications: Concerta 36mg, inhaler/nebulizer (albuterol) as needed, Zoloft 5mgDuration of complaint: 3-4 weeksLocation of complaint: everywhere? I dunnoI was diagnosed with ADHD when I was 14 and I’ve been regularly taking Concerta every morning since then. Sometimes, I’ve forgotten to on the weekends and the effects have never been adverse, I just get a bit more hyper and probably a little annoying around friends. Although I was diagnosed with depression about 5 years ago, it became extremely severe at the beginning of this year and Ive just recently started taking a small dosage of Zoloft about 3 months ago. In the time that I’ve been taking Zoloft, my mood has completely skyrocketed. Just to put things in perspective, I used to call the suicide hotline about 4 times a week, but I haven’t had a single suicidal thought since I’ve started taking antidepressants. The reason I’m saying all of this is because every Google search Ive done says my problem is due to severe depression, and I really don’t think that’s the case.That being said, heres my problem:In roughly the last month or so, I’ve been more stressed out than I have ever been in my life. Because of all the time I missed recovering from ankle surgery, I had multiple tests in every class to make up, 3 essays to write, a group project, the SAT, AP tests, and finals to study for; all with my mom pushing me to get good grades. I rationalized that because I only had 2 weeks to turn all of my Fs into As and Bs, I would push myself really hard and lose a bunch of sleep, and  get some rest when summer break starts.Here’s the thing, my ADHD causes me to hyper-focus on whatever I’m working on, and so I’ll work on a paper until 4 in the morning without even realizing it, and I’ll just keep going till i crash. My issue is, in those last 2 weeks of school, I got less than 4 hours of sleep every night (around 6 on the weekends). Schools been out for a week now, but I’m still not getting enough sleep. Instead of working on essays all night, Im playing video games or watching tv or down a random reddit hole. Im not crashing till like 5/6AM but I’m waking up at like noon or earlier. Im completely exhausted but I’m not sleeping and I dont know why. I don’t think have insomnia; when I close my eyes, I fall asleep instantly. Im so fatigued, it’s terrible. I can’t think straight. I forget instructions like 30 seconds after I hear them, I can’t do basic addition in my head (I’m normally really good at math), I lose my train of thought, I deadass tried to sit on the toilet the other and missed because i was too far to the left — in my own bathroom. But for some reason, I just cant bring myself to sleep. The other night, when I tried to go to bed earlier, I just laid there planning out my day. I reopened my eyes because I was still planning and didn’t want to fall asleep mid-thought. After half an hour, I pulled out my phone to start writing stuff down, but I forgot why my phone was out and then I just started looking at social media and I ended up staying up for 2 more hours until I fell asleep with my phone in my hand. Tonight is the worst it’s ever been. Its 3AM and I’m literally hallucinating. I keep seeing tiny bugs crawling on my bed out of the corner of my eyes and there’s nothing there. I see them constantly, whenever I stop focusing on my bed or blankets. My skin has been crawling for hours now, its felt like tiny bugs are running all over my body ever since i laid down. Its hell. And I cant sleep because all i want to do is finish this post. My eyes are itchy, I have a headache, and I’m freaking out because I’m fucking terrified of bugs and I just want it to stop but now i feel like even if i tried to sleep I wouldn’t be able to because of all the bugs.I also just, haven’t been eating. The Concerta already suppresses my appetite so i never feel more than just peckish even if i havent eaten all day. And for the same reasons as sleeping, i havent been eating. Not only do I not even feel hungry most of the time, when i do feel hungry Im not in the mood for anything or im doing something that I want to finish and i plan on eating afterwards but i end up not finishing what im doing till like 4AM and its not like im gonna make spaghetti at 4AM so i’ll just have a snack and call it a day. Sometimes I literally just forget to eat for like a day and a half and then I’m like “oh shit i should make a hot dog or something.” I had a bowl of cereal at 11 this morning and nothing else today. Same with yesterday.Im not insecure about my weight or anythjng though, I’ve always been a little overweight, even though I’ve always had a pretty small appetite, but im confident and actually have pretty high self-esteem, so I dont have an eating disorder. I have lots of friends, a boyfriend, im extroverted and outgoing, emotionally i’m the happiest i’ve been in like two years, I just really don’t know whats wrong.I feel absolutely fucking terrible and i just want it to stop. The skin crawling sensation is absolute hell and Im so fatigued that its miserable. I hate everything. [info] None [info] 1527496513
MCLCP3 [info] I want to have sex with the villager from Minecraft. There is something about their sweet, sultry voice that turns me on to no end. I constantly fantasize about using their long, phallic noses as a dildo and ramming it right up my ass into my little prostate. I like to think that the villagers can use their noses as anal probes. I bet when they get horny that their noses inflate and get rock hard to shove right into my little boipussy. I think the new Minecraft villager textures are sexy af. The farmer's short sleeves reveal their strong, well-built muscles and make me even hornier for their tasty villager cock. I have a custom made villager body pillow. I sewed on a big, brown dragon dildo where the nose should be so I can ride it whenever I'm feelin frisky. It is so crusty that it stands up on its own. I had a fantasy last night about the farmer villager pinning me down on his pressure plate table and rammed his rock hard pulsating nose into my ass and straight into my prostate. It felt so real I really wish it was... I have been on several gay dating sites and have tried to get other homosexual men to roleplay as the villager from Minecraft. So far no one has been able to sate my desires and it makes me very angry. Please, Reddit, if anyone out here would like to RP as a villager from Minecraft, I would love to get in touch :)FUCK I WISH VILLAGERS WERE REAL. I have been diagnosed with depression and ADHD and I know it's because I'll never get a long, lustrous villager cock rammed up my tight holes. I hope someday in the future when technology is so advanced that we can transport our conscious into the internet, that I will finally be able to achieve my dreams and have a strong, bulky villager ram his rock hard nose into my ass. Please, PLEASE OH PLEASE ELON MUSK MAKE THIS HAPPEN. If I have to go another DAY without a villager ramming his greasy rock hard nose into my ass I AM GOING TO SCREAM. I WILL HURT PEOPLE. I WILL HURT MYSELF. ELON PLEASE I NEED THIS RIGHT NOW. [info] None [info] 1567531407
Not_Your_Ham [info] This is great and all, but I'm a guy who has never been paid attention to by women. I realize porn is unrealistic, but I have a computer, therefore women who would never look my way at my fingertips. On the other hand, I have been diagnosed with depression which was mentioned in the video, but whatever. I don't think it's interfering with my life, and I'd rather be alone and watch porn than just be alone. Helps me cope or some shit. [info] None [info] 1352865341
Jackibelle [info] And I was diagnosed with depression and didn't have issues of suicidal ideation. That doesn't mean other people *don't*, all it means is that I didn't. Your N=1 experience isn't sufficient to exhaustively describe an entire condition. [info] None [info] 1454769821
dinosaregaylikeme [info] I was asked to talk about the death of my mother. So I decided to share the story of how domestic violence and abuse can kill and destroy lives. Well first thing first, I was born in South California. I was an only child to a family of Catholic Italian immigrants. Both my mother and father had family in America and decided to come here to get married. Then they had me in their early 20s. I was given an old name for first born sons.I have some memories before my mother was killed. I remember my father drinking. I remember finding beer cans by his armchair. I remember my mother trying to shield me from the violence. I remember daycare at the Catholic church. I remember how kind and loving my mother was. I remember the Italian lullabies she would sing to me while she put me to bed. My father was rarely home, when he was home he was always angry at something.I was four when my father murdered my mother in domestic violence. I remember my mom tucking me into bed and saying "I love you. Be good.". I remember hearing shouting and screaming, but it was louder this time. Really really loud. I remember getting up and looking for my mom.I know I saw my mom being murder. But I don't remember it. I know my dad saw me and tried to kill men,  but I don't remember it. I know a police officer grabbed me before my father could kill me, but I don't remember it. The next clear memory I have is sitting in the passager seat next to a police women. She was the same age as mother but was white with blonde hair. I was wearing a jacket, and I think it was her jacket.Then the memories start to blur. I have no memories of the trials. I later learned that my father avoided death row by not killing me. If I was dead, he would of been sent to death row. I have no more memories until I was six years old. I was at school, looking at the clock and a sort of reality wave hit me. A sort of feeling of "I am alive and existing" type of feeling. I wounded up in the state of Arizona and had a long road ahead of me. I was abused in foster care. The foster parents neglected me. The kids in school mocked me for having no parents and slight homosexual tendencies. I was always *that* foster kid. Always getting blamed for stuff. Always in fights. Always going from foster house to foster house.I ran away a lot. I could be gone for weeks and even months. I was 12 when a set of foster parents drugged and raped me. It went on for months until I spoke up. But men don't get raped. And I was a no good foster kid just causing trouble for a set of good Christian folks. I remember those folks use to show me off at church like a toy poodle to brag about the good deeds they are doing for the lord.I got moved to a new home. Those homosexual tendencies grew more and more until I had a secret to hide. I ran away for good before my 18th birthday. Hitchhiked from Arizona to Hollywood, California. Learn to accept my gayness and embrace it with strings of one night stands.In reality I was running. I tried to bury my grief with loveless sex, sometimes drugs, and a box cutter to my arms and thighs. I stopped running when I was about 21 and finally put a gun to my head. My neighbor heard the gun shot and called 911. I woke up the hospital with my right side of my skull shatter and a hell of a headache. After recovering I was sent to rehab and that was when I discover the magic of therapy.I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD. I had to learn to stop running and finally start the grief process.And about 6 months later I met a guy at a gay BDSM sex club. We had a one night stand and we fell in love. I was so scared of love because of what my father did to my mother. This guy had to teach me how to love and accept people.We moved in with each other soon after. And soon after that all the bathroom doors came off and anything sharp had to get thrown out. I wanted to learn how to stop hurting myself and start healing myself.During all of this I kept getting letters from my father. They always got set on fire in the kitchen sink. I would get calls from prison and I always had to deny them. I told my father's counselor/case worker that I am getting those letters but I am denying them.And about a year later, I was in a better place. My ptsd was almost gone, depression under control, relationship was strong and we were so in love, and I was feeling love and happy. I was expressing love and happiness. I made better friends. Became a better person.And then the prison called telling me my father was dead. They wanted to know if I wanted him cremated or in a casket. When I would pick him up. And since my family was Catholic and Catholic don't like being cremated. I had my dad cremated. And my boyfriend and I set off to get the bag of ashes. We made a pit stop at Michaels to get a cheap box to put him in.My boyfriend let me go alone to the prison because I needed to be alone. My father's case worker told me that he was seeking my forgiveness. He had a moment of God and wanted a relationship with me. The other inmates found out he was a wife beater and almost child killer and isolated him. Some got more into it and bullied him and sometimes raped him.I still had no remorse. I hate that man and still hate him. The inmates did too and all wanted a word with me the second I came in. I was relieved to hear the inmates telling me that look like my mother and carry the same graceful look in my eyes that my father talked about. My husband and I drove back to Arizona. Stopped in the middle of nowhere, dug a hole, dropped the box in, and set the hole on fire. I embraced the feeling of finally being free from him.Overnight my fears went away. My depression went away. My PTSD went away because it didn't have any fears to live off. I slept better at night. No more nightmares.And in the last eight years, I got married to the love of my life. We adopted a teenager out of foster care. I learn to speak up about what happened so others can learn from it.I am only one of the millions of kids that lived with domestic violence. Most of these kids will be in an abusive relationship. I was in one. I had a boyfriend that threaten to rape me when I broke up with him. I had a friend sock his jaw in for me so I can be left alone.About two women die everyday from domestic violence. I always wonder who was the 2nd women that died the same day my mom did. 3 out of 5 women will experience domestic abuse in their lifetime. The statistics for men are still not accurate because men are only now finally coming out and admitting that domestic violence happens to them as well.If you see something please speak up. You could be saving someone life. Sorry if the grammer is a bit wishy washy. I was crying while writing some of this. It happens when I miss my mom.And don't be scared to ask about anything. The more something is talked about, the less taboo the subject is. [info] None [info] 1522734274
ThrowRA-firstdate [info] Is it normal to get more depressed after smoking weed? I've been diagnosed with depression a while back now and lately I've tried smoking weed because of some friends who said it helps you relax etc. I've been high about 3 times since then and it's been great during the trip, but I've felt more down afterwards. Is it possible that the high I got from the weed was so good that 'normal' life just feels worse now? After everytime I smoke I just want to go back to the feeling I had during the trip. Does that mean I'm addicted now?Some of these questions might seem a bit dumb but I don't know if I can ask this stuff to my therapist since I'm only 16 and weed is only legal for 18+ in my country. [info] None [info] 1584195658
w4nn4_8e_sk1nny [info] Recovery Guys...Like, I've been to a psychiatrist, I've been diagnosed with depression and I'm taking prescription antidepressants.I'm taking it seriously (and I'm actually surprised myself) and I'm visiting my new psycho-therapy expert next Wednesday to treat my bulimia. The thing is, even though my antidepressants make my mood mostly normal and I actually sleep at night for once, I also caught myself multiple times emotionally eating. I am not able to stop it. It just happens and of course I abuse laxatives and purge afterwards, even though at this point it's so fucking weird, cause I see myself in the mirror (I've gained weight because of this) and actually don't give a single emotional fuck about what I see, but something inside makes me think about how fat I am and then purge. But I religiously just don't give a single fuck about how I look.I have no idea what's happening.Does anyone have an experience like this? [info] None [info] 1557665673
TroyMikealson [info] Need an advice I'm having trouble thinking of what to say so just bare with me .First of all I'm 19 year old ( gonna turn 20 in a few months )  and I'm from Morocco.  I didn't graduate from high school so I'm not holding any diploma what so ever , and never worked before in my life like never my entire life I've spent inside my house and barely left home. And recently I've been diagnosed with depression , and it came to the point where I've already planned my own death( don't worry I'm not gonna do it ... Yet..)I have absolutely no one to talk to here .. I barely have any family , my mother passed away when I was 1 year old.. my dad never cared and my siblings    well they barely give a fuck .. my friends well I haven't seen some of them for 6months and some I barely talk to anymore .... It really made me rethink about my life and made me realize I need to get the fuck out of this shithole ..So I need an advice .. I wanna go to somewhere new and have a fresh start where I can work and in a few years continue my studies ..  so I'm wondering where should I go Here a few things about me : - I'm from Morocco - I speak 3 languages Arabic French English and the latter is my fav and the one Im pretty good at - I have no work experience .. - I've always pictured myself either acting , directing or writing . - I have a little money saved (not much but hopefully enough)And I really need to leave this place or it never going to get better  I don't know if this is the right place but if someone could help me figure out where or what should I do  To get a fresh start  I would appreciate it Thanks 😃 [info] None [info] 1485358518
kayl5 [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 10 but i know it started a lot earlier than this because i had suicidal thoughts and tried killing myself around 7 or 8 so that doctor is retarted depression doesn't have an age. [info] None [info] 1561535002
BlackMoonSky [info] I'm really glad you're making this decision. I was in a very similar position a few years ago. I was 60 pounds overweight, I'm shorter so it looked terrible on me, I had really bad acne for a 19 year old, at the time I was not good at hooking up with girls I just didn't really understand the dynamics of how to "pick girls up", I was diagnosed with depression in my teens but it really comes in spurts for me and I was in a depressive episode for sure. I know exactly what you guys mean when you talk about this depression, junk food cycle.And then one day it just clicked. I was just fed up with the current state of my life. I realized waiting around doing nothing wouldn't help me so I took action. Started eating healthier, researching healthy foods, different excersises, muscle building excersises, etc. I lost about 55 pounds altogether over the course of about a year. It took a year because I had setbacks, it's tough man. You don't always make the best decisions, you give on to temptation, that's okay, everyone does. What makes a goal though, is never giving up and giving into those temptations WAAAY less than the "non dieting you".Goodluck and if you have any questions please don't hesitate to ask. I have extensive knowledge in the field of fitness now. I'm a studying martial artist, and I believe the striking martial arts (boxing, kickboxing, karate, etc) ARE incredible workouts for burning calories (because it's a fact that they do), taking out anger and stress, (it's awesome to be able to rip into something with all your might, it really helps take out built up anger in your life), and my main reason...it's fucking fun. It's so fun that it doesn't even feel like a workout. It's a sport, an art, an outlet for your emotions. Something to look into. You don't have to go to a gym or anything, you can buy a heavy bag and gloves, look up youtube videos on proper techniques, and again you can ask me about it, it's my expertise.  [info] None [info] 1485651585
adriaticpatrick [info] &gt; Are you really gonna tell yourself you don't get better because you're "depressed"? (no offense to people who are actually depressed) I have been diagnosed with depression by a trained psychiatric doctor.  [info] None [info] 1504054381
rainfallrose [info] Yes, it is **extremely** annoying and closeminded. I've told one boss who proceeded to tell me that I didn't "look" autistic, saying I was too "pretty, attractive, and pleasant". As if you can tell autism by looks and autistic people can't be attractive or pleasant. Another boss told me that I was so "competent and smart", as if autistic people are all incompetent/stupid? It seems petty, but being what people deem "objectively attractive" makes it harder because I have to try so much to fit this exterior image of pretty, smart, nice girl when I actually have struggled with autism my whole life. It's the same with depression too. I was diagnosed with depression and people couldn't believe it because I wasn't "crazy, unkempt, unattractive" whatever stereotypes people have about those with a mental illness. [info] Aspergirl [info] 1531971270
Curly_Tea [info] I was diagnosed with depression years ago and then with Bipolar2. I just started ADHD meds and they haven’t helped a whole lot. But I am still tired ALL the time. It seems like nothing they do helps this.  [info] None [info] 1548375916
muru825 [info] what gives me the right to live? I self harm (but haven't for over two weeks) and whenever im at school, especially during choir, since i cant bring myself to practice, i dont. but i always plan to and since i plan to, when im in class and she gets mad at the class as a collective for not practicing, I ask myself what gives me the right to live. I dont practice, i dont contribute, and i bring down everyone else. I use the same logic when i dont finish my work or disappoint my parents with bad grades. these climates of thinking tend to lead to urges.On a side note, I've been diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1552369330
Atlum [info] I was diagnosed with depression after drug use and working a public service job where people would yell at me all day every day, eventually wore me down and delusions took control of my regular thoughts and I was basically living a dream instead of thinking normal thoughts.I was off work for a year before I got back into the workforce.. I was much like you, spacey and stuff, and to this day things are weird for me still.. I found progressing my hobbies while I was off work was a productive way of recovering, because it takes time to recover so I decided to make art while I gave my brain and soul a chance to heal up a bit.. took a year before I was ready, even then I could've gone longer than a year, but that's all I needed.. was still spacey at work, but I just fed on information at work and learnt new things and grew as a person, now I'm not spacey like that anymore, but I have bad days sometimes where I feel like no one gets me, and I recluse and just cut people off.You and I both need time to recover, or to return to reality, your situation is probably a bit better than mine considering I made a dumb decision and you've studied something that sounds really difficult.. so you have a bit more going for you in that sense, I'm sure you're more likeable of a person than me, but similar problems I believe we experience.I'm 24 and maybe a bit dramatic.Healthy diet, keep your brain active, enquire about medication, if you don't work find something to keep you mentally stimulated, exercise (go for a run 🏃), hope things will get better, and be patient.Those things hopefully will carry you up and out. [info] None [info] 1508757804
yungli_ [info] Turning to music. It’s been a tough year since I was diagnosed with depression and I’ve had my ups and downs with it. Recently, I’ve turned to listening to music when I start to feel down or start to cry. The last song I’ve listened to like this was the MTV Unplugged version of “Take On Me”, as well as XXXTentacion’s “Jocelyn Flores”. I feel like sad and melancholic music has a powerful effect on how I feel, almost like a drug to me. Just wondering if anyone else feels the same about music and what songs you guys tend to listen to. [info] None [info] 1555512219
Cingetorix [info] I was diagnosed with depression eight months ago and am currently on anti-depressants. I checked "yes" on my application and also included a doctor's note that explains the reasons for my treatment as well as my current situation (stable). I also included a personal statement as to why I needed them and also explained that there is a doctor's note attached to my app. I'm currently in the process of getting my RPAL and so far it seems like I'm going to get it as my references were recently called, so I wouldn't worry about it unless you've got a history of suicide attempts or self-harm - which you say you don't have. It may lead to a longer processing time as the CFO or RCMP may give you a call (I haven't gotten any, yet) to make sure you're not a danger to yourself or others. Personally, I needed them for a while to stabilize my mood, and thanks to them I feel fantastic and like myself (best I've ever felt, really) and very happy so in my case, I think I'm good to go. If you feel fine without them, and have references that can vouch for your well-being, you shouldn't have any issues.  [info] Tacticool whore [info] 1465698576
jasminaaa03 [info] Ik, that's why I wanted to ask for others opinions. My parents are not supportive of mental health, they don't believe in it, I was diagnosed with depression by my school psychologist that I started seeing recently. My mom was also just diagnosed with stage 4 breast cancer yesterday, so I don't want to worry them with something else, it's just not good timing for anyone in my family. I'm planning on speaking to the psychologist again to ask her. [info] None [info] 1556994267
moneenerd [info] The post was made with a CLEARLY sarcastic intention. Any rational adult who's played the game knows how horrible the translation was. I have been diagnosed with depression, ADHD, OCD, and up until recently, post acute withdrawal syndrome. Don't give me shit about being insensitive about mental illness just because you couldn't pick up on on something that everyone else on this sub did. [info] None [info] 1566252851
jackmeawf [info] How can I stay consistent in my career with depression? I really need some advice on this situation. I cannot stay consistent in my work and attendance. I am diagnosed with depression and have been on Zoloft since August, and it worked great at first. In the past few weeks I increased my dose to 75 mg but it hasn't helped. I am supposed to graduate with my bachelor's this month, but I have missed so many classes and my assignments have mostly been turned in late or of really poor quality, even though I love what I do and have great ideas initially. I can't follow through and neglect all of my work that's due on days my depression hits and I can't bring myself to care enough to get out of bed and complete anything. I write lists of things that are due, write out a schedule, complete maybe a few days of it, then just completely stop because I don't care enough.  I dont think I can use any of my professors as job references when I graduate because I've been so inconsistent. I'm ashamed of the work i've turned in and how it reflects on me. I lack serious follow through and I don't know how to fix it. I'm not going to be able to hold a full time job like this, I can't even attend my classes 3x a week. I had an internship that I quit halfway through. Long story short, after talking with my school's career center I was allowed to get credit for it still because the work they were having me complete unpaid was illegal. They are no longer allowed to list their internships at my school. Despite this, I just got my eval from them and it's a 25/50. I feel so ashamed, I know I can and need to do better than this but I don't know how to care enough to stay consistent. I used to get great grades and great reviews from employers and now my work ethic and discipline is so inconsistent. Today I haven't gotten out of bed or eaten. I don't know what to do and I really need some advice on how to turn this around. [info] None [info] 1575857651
SkrullNickFury [info] My Mom (50f) can’t accept that I (21F) am sad because I’m depressed 6 months ago I was diagnosed with depression. It’s been a long journey to being diagnosed which only came about after the symptoms got so bad I had to drop out from college. My mom was definitely surprised with my diagnosis because she knew something was wrong but not that it was that severe, to the point I need medication. Now she won’t stop asking me what’s wrong every time I sleep in or I am sad. She thinks that there has to be something that happened. If I tell her something generic like the weathers bad she attempts to solve the problem by telling me to wake up early or take a shower. How do I get my mom to stop constantly asking me how I’m feeling or what’s wrong? [info] None [info] 1569364110
AYoungWholesomeBoy [info] Is it good for men to be stoic and not talk about things? How has that been for you if you always have been doing it? Here's my story I am 20 years old guy. Bare with me, I need to give some context. I live with my only single mother and my sister that is 3 years older than me since I was 5, when my father was deported (domestic violence, raped my mother, masturbated in front of my sister and asked her to give him a handjob, beat the shit out of me all the time for no reason when he gets home from work drunk, (even when I was a baby apparently) and forced me to tell him stories to help him sleep at around 2:00 AM when I was 3-4-5 even on school days when I had to wake up at 7am the next day, mind you, my parents never told me stories to help me sleep even when I asked them and I had insomnia most of my life) and don't even know if he's alive. I have never had any type of male role model, since all of my teachers were female up until now (weird coincidence I think). The rest of our family lives in my mother's country of origin, so I didn't have any uncles or anyone to look up to or get advice, so that is why I am asking here.When I was diagnosed with depression, I got a therapist appointment at my university. The therapist ignored me for the stories of my childhood (above with my father) I told her and told me and that what happened to me is not that big of a deal, basically to man up. She even grinned at one part, which felt like she was laughing at me. She also told me she has guys like me who come up to her all the time, who just want to have medical reasons to drop their bad grades. I had pretty good grades. It was a very humiliating experience, because I never talk about this to anyone and when I finally did, that person kind of laughed at me. In fact, because I told her about all this, I was feeling actually worse and not better like most psychology articles say it would.Every time, I express any type of emotions or try to open up to my mother or my sister, they mock me or ignore me. It feels they lose the little respect they have for me every time this happens. They also use these things to hurt me later when we have arguments, I don't say very pretty things either during arguments, but never bring up things from the past they have told me, and they always do. But, they are comfortable expressing their emotions and my mother always supports and hugs my sister when she cries.A friend I know told me recently that when a guy that she was dating for a few weeks started to cry, she felt disgusted and decided to end the relationship after that. She's a great girl that actually doesn't only go for douchebags like a lot of girls I know and a one of my great friends, so I was surprised by this. I thought that only my mother and sister were like this and girls actually liked and respected emotional guys. In the media, you always see that girls like a guy who cries during movies, because it shows his sensitive side. I asked the same girl about this, and she kind of diverted the conversation so I never got an answer. Most girls I know are not very close to me, so when the only ones that are close to me and that are honest to me, react badly to guys who cry or open up their feelings, it kind of seems like a general thing. This conversation with this girl was the main reason I decided to write this post.Even men I know do this in different ways. I remember when a guy in my friend group got a call from his girlfriend that she was breaking up with him and he started to cry. When he went home, most of the guys were laughing about him about how he cried (one of them even called him a "weak bitch") (we are not all really close friends, so that's that) and after that incident, I felt that the level of respect declined in the group towards that guy (excluding me and some of the others who didn't partake in the mocking, etc.). And some of the guys still make fun of him about that incident.I do bottle up my emotions most of the time, but increasingly saw on websites and psychology news articles that it is bad for you and that you should express your emotions and that bottling up emotions can cause depression, suicide, mental problems... When I get angry or sad, and do express myself (rarely), it is like a bomb and I do things I regret later, it's like all the anger and sadness that I bottled up comes out at once, maybe this is placebo effect, confirmation bias or can be explained differently, I don't know. Also, all of my friends think my father is an engineer overseas, lmao. So my questions are:1. For guys who had traumatic experiences like me when they were young and never talked about it to friends, is that good for you? For guys who openly talk about it, did more good or bad come from it? Sometimes, I want to talk about my problems to everyone, like I get an urge to do it, just for the sake of it, but I feel like people are going to use it against me if they get angry and hurt me later. And the one therapist I talked about it to, kinda laughed at me, so that is never happening again.2. How has bottling your emotions been going for you if you have done it long term. Is it a good strategy?3. Is being stoic make you a stronger man long term? 4. Also, for guys who were bottling up their feelings for a long time and decided to stop this, did this help you, or cause you more problems, because for me, right now, it seems that it will cause more problems, potentially turning off the vast majority of girls that I am interested in, making my sister and mother disrespect me even more, making guys think I am weak and potentially manipulated and laughed at.5. I feel like girls only say they want a sensitive guy. They maybe want a sensitive guy who cries seeing a movie once in a while, but when a guy they aren't invested in completely (not a boyfriend or husband) cries, they see him as weak and annoying which is probably a turn off, I am guessing. Do you who may have more experience in dating and interacting with girls agree with me or is this only because of my sample size (3 lmao) [info] None [info] 1586744732
SortedN2Slytherin [info] I feel the same way you do.  I have been diagnosed with depression and am an introvert.  I have to force myself to get up and interact with people, and got a second social job (Starbucks) on weekends as a means of forcing myself to get out there.  I go to the gym nearly every day after work and feel good, but once the endorphin high wears off, I am back to feeling very meh and sometimes hopeless.  I benefit from seeing a therapist because 1) I like having a completely unbiased 3rd party to talk things out with, and 2) because she is trained to see things in a way my friends and family are not.  Give it a try, maybe 3-5 sessions.  You may have more to work through than you realize.  If not, so be it.  I hope you don't feel the need to apologize for who you are, because I don't think anyone ever should.  Unless they're blatantly offensive assholes.  But living with depression is not something you owe anyone an apology or explanation for.Good luck. [info] None [info] 1503940018
of_course_i_care [info] I have the glorious (and awful) ability to ruin all wonderful things in my life. I have been diagnosed with depression since I was 16. Brother dies the next year, I got worse. Never got over that. String of terribadsuck relationships (including getting married because that's what you do when you feel like the world could end any second....then yoi realize he's still a little kid and you gtfo asap), and most recently had the joy of meeting the love of my life while I was dating someone else (this shit happens, and this time I wasn't even trying to find someone...that's a whole different story)...then I made a mess of all of that, my life feels like it is going absolutely no where, and it has felt this way for a while. I dont want this pressure anymore. I cant fix it because everytime I try, I make it worse. Really. I am basically standing in quicksand, struggling as much as possible trying to stay afloat, while just making myself sink faster. I just want it all to stop. And I dont want to feel things anymore.Also, ty for your comment. Your howdy hurt my heart a tiny bit. [info] None [info] 1438503932
confusion183 [info] Haha, no it's fine :) Not so much about him, but about my genes. When I was diagnosed with depression the doctors were always asking about if anybody I was related to had mental health issues and all that, and obviously I'll never know about half of them.Don't get me wrong, I'm glad that he did such ~~a great~~ an ok thing for my parents, but I don't know him, and I really have no desire to. Edit: forgot my modesty [info] Manchester/East Yorkshire [info] 1403954562
Swiftt [info] I really hope you don't leave dude, I love seeing you around here and you're great with sparking discussion. I don't think its any secret that I've been going through the same, so I can relate more than you'd probably think. I'm diagnosed with depression, along with a couple other things. It's changed my life cause I understand a lot more, and I think I'm a better person, but it's got to the point that I've been unhappy for so long that it's almost, comfortable? not sure if that's the word... but I'm used to it and anxious about being happy again because it will be a big leap. It was hard telling friends though. Even now, I'm always laughing and smiling and making jobs (I only managed to tell them when I was drunk and crashing at theirs) and they were so surprised. I still act the same when I'm out with my friends, just I'm unreliable as hell. When I'm laughing at joking around its not just to make others happy, but it's also to keep myself thinking of other things. Which is another thing.There's a few ways to cope which I may as well share, cause it's what helps me at least. I work in the stock room at a charity shop which I enjoy because I can listen to music the entire time, which keeps me out of my own thoughts. It's also nicer to be able to go to sleep and know you've contributed something, no matter how little. I still have days where I lie in bed all day just listening to music, but it's more about winning battles rather than the war. Also this is the most difficult thing but helps tremendously. I go out with my friends as much as I can, even if I REALLY don't want to, but it stops me from falling into a pit where I don't have anyone to talk to and means I can go out whenever I feel up to it. Once you're actually out there into the world talking to people you're almost forced to put your depression into the back of your mind temporarily which helps. &gt;I’m hoping there’s a day when mental health is taken more seriously.word to this. I actually got pretty pissed off at my doctor about it. I've been in a waiting list to get seen by therapists and such, and I've been waiting for about 4 months. I also got a 42c fever during the summer but got seen but about 5 doctors IMMEDIATELY. Mood-wise I feel EXACTLY the same between an average day and having that really serious physical fever. So I don't under-stand why I can get seen immediately for that but if its mental then it's just regarded as not important. [info]  [info] 1410112095
Vetinaris-Terrier [info] Husband struggling with low motility here.I was diagnosed with depression about 15 years ago and was on Fluoxetine for some time (which, by the way, did not help). Have managed to keep myself away from that downward spiral for the past ten years. For now, I am coping surprisingly well, in that so far I have managed to maintain a "not going down without a fight" attitude, but it requires constant effort, and with each passing month, I find myself progressively more detached and less interested in the things I used to like, such as science, gaming and photography. My productivity at work has also plummeted: over the past few weeks, I have been unable to concentrate for more than a few minutes at a time.So, yeah, I'm moving forward, for now, but it feels like every day the ground below me is getting narrower, and on some days (especially when she gets her period) it really feels rope-thin, and I honestly don't know how long I'll be able to maintain the balance for.[](/GNU Terry Pratchett) [info] None [info] 1444141770
ILikeMyBlueEyes [info] My depression. A lot of people thought I was just experiencing the teenage blues when I was diagnosed with depression. It's been nearly 20 years and it's only gotten worse. And yes, I am taking meds and seeing a therapist. [info] None [info] 1371950796
FadeJunior [info] Dude, I'm in SLC as well and I cannot agree more with the bleakness of the inversion. I was diagnosed with ADHD at a young age, around 9 or 10. Years later I was diagnosed with depression (age 16 -17 IIRC). I've recently gotten back on the meds for ADHD but I still feel this lingering sadness 24/7. So, yes. People can be both suffering from ADHD and depression as two seperate entities. I'm currently trying to get an appointment to figure out my options with the depression because the 30 minute high from the Adderall isn't getting me through the day. I feel the effects in being able to focus and speak better, but my mood dies down after the initial half hour. [info] None [info] 1422659331
Demize360 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression once , and now everyone is like "yeah im depressed" like wtf thats not cool [info] None [info] 1567281991
Grathorn [info] I appreciate that.  I'm diagnosed with depression so I do know that.  Trying to work on letting small shit go. [info] Fear the Beard [info] 1466026319
kycrane [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and i make jokes like that all the time lol. It's how i cope [info] 16 [info] 1491189360
ohdudemybad [info] I have one brother who is two years older than me. Growing up, we were both good kids, but he was better at the stuff that's more accepted, like math, science and sports, whereas I was good at creative stuff. He liked to rub it in my face that his accomplishments were "better" somehow. He liked to tease me about everything under the sun (weight, appearance, grades, hobbies) and would torment me when I would get angry about it and try to stick up for myself, saying I was only mad because I was on my period (he started using this against me when I was 7, a whole 6 years before I actually started having periods). He's been out of the house since he was 18, I'm still living at home at 23. That makes him better than me in his eyes. When I was 18, I was diagnosed with depression. His response was to tell me how his life was so much worse and that I should suck it up. His life was "worse" because he was a poor college student and "at least mom and dad still pay for your stuff". I find out later that they send him money every month, so he was basically just BS-ing me. He still berates me about how I live my life every time he comes to visit. Because I don't live like him, I'm apparently doing it wrong. Even my parents are starting to get annoyed because he's constantly telling us we're living wrong. I guess my point is that I didn't have the greatest experience having an older brother. But that doesn't mean your little girl won't love having brothers. :) [info] ♀ [info] 1462466338
princess_schnitz [info] This story really spoke to me because I thought you were literally telling my story until I you said you were *literally* cheating. I thought you meant that you felt that by using adderall for you ADHD you felt like you were cheating or whatever. I sort of used to feel like that because I used to do well in school until I started to not do well in school. Then I got adderall and it made it better and I felt like adderall was cheating a bit.I have ADD and also have significant problems with daytime sleepiness. I was diagnosed with depression (rightly so) and whenever I had bouts of excessive sleepiness my Psychiatrist would just increase my Adderall or my anti-depressants saying that it was a symptom of depression. Now that I'm an adult, I moved away and had to switch psychiatrists and low and behold, he tells me its not normal to suddenly fall asleep on the couch to take a nap for 6 hours or to sleep every night for 10 hours and be fucking exhausted every day or when my Adderall wears off at 4 in the afternoon I almost fall asleep driving home from work.He sent me to a sleep specialist and I was tested for both narcolepsy and sleep apnea. I tested positive for sleep apnea and now I have the machine which is taking a while to get used to. Anyway, what I'm trying to get at with all that is - I get where you're coming from diagnoses-wise. However, I'm not quite on the same page in understanding the issue with the cheating issue. I do sometimes wonder if I really do have ADD at all or if the attention deficit and memory issues were caused by the lack of decent sleep. I'm also not overweight and I don't snore so it never occurred to me that I might have sleep apnea.What I think you should do at this point is try to get a good hold of your health. Get a primary care physician that can help you manage all of these things and make sure all of your doctors know about all of your diagnoses and medications and stuff. Try getting a primary care physician to look at the whole picture. In the meantime, it might not be a bad idea to try to get your associate's degree part time at a community college. The requirements for getting your associates degree cover everything you should have learned in high school plus the first half of a full 4-year degree.Plus, before you start taking classes they usually have you complete some sort of test to see how well you perform. You might end up having to take some remedial math courses based on how well you do but that will get your started in the right direction. I wouldn't mention the cheating thing, they won't look kindly upon that.EDIT: It's 3 hours later and I just reread this. There are so many mistakes and its kinda rambling. I even proofread it before I hit send. I typed it up on my laptop so I don't even have an excuse of being on my phone... [info] None [info] 1470864469
Xalthanal [info] You might be confusing diagnosis with the insurance billing protocol. In the US, even if a professional can't technically "diagnose" you with something, they have to have a code for what you are being seen for so they can bill insurances. These are called "diagnosis codes" but they don't always mean that you are medically diagnosed. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 18 but my therapist used the depression code in billing for years before. Yes the system sucks. [info] None [info] 1549999354
kalpour [info] I am considering killing myself Everything just seems to be terrible right now, I don't have anyone I can turn to, so here I am. I was diagnosed with depression almost a year ago, and since then I've been on many medications, and they have really sent my cognitive abilities on a rollercoaster. I'm about to fail my classes and be on academic probation, I have tons of debt, and my fiance, the woman. I love more than anything told me this morning she's not in love with me anymore. I've tried calling the suicide hotline, but they didn't help at all.... [info] None [info] 1399315190
Rhysington [info] Had an extremely one sided, long distance relationship for 8 months which consisted of the girl attempting suicide via overdose many times, self-harm and constant other self-destructive behavior. I helped as much as I could but she was so absorbed in her own problems, she didn't care about what was happening to me (dad had cancer and being investigated by the police, grandmother has a heart attack, nan had a psychotic episode). Then last month I learnt she was seeing another guy behind my back, but I kept with her because I was terrified that she'd end it all and the blood would be on my hands and last week I was diagnosed with depression.  [info] None [info] 1388096668
bohemica [info] I've been diagnosed with depression (MDD), yeah, which affects my ability to focus and actually feel motivated, so I started experimenting out of a combination of need and curiosity.Basically, microdosing LSD puts me in a good mood, makes me feel content instead of restless, and makes me a bit more friendly and sociable when dealing with co-workers. I *think* it also helps me write more elegant code, but that's pretty subjective.Never been diagnosed with ADHD; it's been suggested by my doc, but I already have a psychiatrist willing to prescribe whatever, so there's not much point to pursuing an official diagnosis. Personally I doubt I actually have ADHD--I think my focus issues are just one of the effects of depression. I tend to get lost in my own thoughts, especially when taking psychedelics (even at low doses) so the adderall is meant to counteract any negative effects of microdosing (i.e. excessive daydreaming), and just improve focus in general. [info] None [info] 1450647312
TheRealStevo [info] I hope everyone’s feeling as well as I am :) I was diagnosed with depression about 8 months ago and didn’t feel like I had anybody, all I did was smoke and be upset all the time, obviously smoking didn’t help but I couldn’t stop myself.Within the past 2 months I’ve gotten a great paying job, and from that job found the most amazing girlfriend I’ve ever had. I have been so happy recently and found a new motivation to live again, smoking makes me feel better than ever and I hope everyone out there can feel like this someday.I know everyone says the same thing but no matter what you’re going through you will get past it and things will get so much better, I love every single one of you so much and I hope you all have an amazing rest of your life’sStay happy and smoke safe my friends ✌🏼🌲 (Sorry if I suck at these, this is like my second post on here) [info] None [info] 1566877423
EchoesInOverdrive [info] Speaking as someone who recently got into comics because of the MCU, I can't support this idea enough!  For years I kinda wanted to get into comics, but thought the sheer volume of issues and characters was very daunting.  I'm the kinda guy who likes to know every bit of information about a world if I'm going to invest time into it, and it's pretty hard to do that with a medium that has gone on for decades with innumerable retcons, etc.  So I threw myself into the MCU, having watched each movie a few times, love Agents of SHIELD, and thought Agent Carter was phenomenal.But i wanted more!  Not to dwell on myself too much, but I was diagnosed with depression in January.  Once I realized this, I kind of understood why I'd invested in the MCU so much (besides the fact it's badass).  On the surface, it's escapism, but on a deeper level, these characters are so fleshed out, so real, and represent important values and conflicts we face in life on (typically) less grand scales.  Helped me to feel again.So once I heard about Marvel Unlimited, I knew it was time for me to start.  But I needed a place to start still.  A friend recommended I pick my favorite character, and just start somewhere with them.  Captain America is my favorite character, so I still had a huge list of places I could start.  Instead I picked Ms. Marvel, a character I knew very little about. but wanted to.  Thought it was fun, then I got to her 6th issue, subtitled "Civil War" and it hit me- I should find a guide for the Civil War, and start there.  Long story long, I searched for guides on line, and found one that had several "stages," one of which was Civil War, and he claimed his [guide was (far from definitive) a good introduction into the "modern" Marvel world](http://www.comicbookherald.com/the-complete-marvel-reading-order-guide/).  I immediately fell in love with Black Panther, and couldn't believe I found Daredevil so goddamn fun and complex when I expected him to be such a class B Spidey.  Echo easily falls into place as my favorite supporting character; her story arcs are so beautifully written and illustrated.  I just finished reading Alias, and couldn't be more excited about the upcoming Netflix properties.  Marvel has done a lot for me, and I just wanted to share.  Sorry for how long-winded I got, don't blame you for not reading this.TL;DR - I love the MCU.  The MCU convinced me to read comics.  Now I love comics.  Thanks, MCU!In case you missed the link or I screwed up the formatting, this is the comic guide I've been following online, want to give him a shout out. http://www.comicbookherald.com/the-complete-marvel-reading-order-guide/ [info]  [info] 1426975816
HypertextMakeoutLang [info] my doctor wants me to get retested, and I'm not sure what to make of it given previous tests Obligatory i'm not tryina have you guys diagnose me.        I've been chronically fatigued / have had EDS since 2013. I had a PSG done in 2013 and was diagnosed with mild sleep apnea and my REM Latency was 153 minutes. I adjusted fine to CPAP but could not for the life of me get better. In 2014 I was diagnosed with depression and went on antidepressants, got the depression under control, and again the fatigue and sleepiness never got better.        At the end of 2015 while on 250mg of Seroquel, i had another PSG and this time an MSLT to go along with it. During the PSG my REM latency was 194 minutes, but we did the MSLT anyway because I wasn't having apneas. I only fell asleep during the first of the five naps, and my sleep latency was 4 minutes. There's a dash over REM latency, so I guess i never hit it. Narcolepsy was ruled out.        I was never a big napper, usually I just had to get horizontal in the afternoons, but in 2016 I found i was napping more. Towards the end of the year it became two times a day. Now that I think of it, maybe it was because I'd switched from Seroquel to Cymbalta? In 2017 I realized I was gluten and dairy intolerant, and that cut it down to one nap per day, and I switched to Effexor, which I now take at night, but I'm still exhausted all the time.        I started going through the process of getting diagnosed with CFS towards the end of last year, and the new sleep specialist I'm seeing wants me to get another MSLT because I was on Seroquel last time. Obviously he wants me to be off Effexor for it, which will be a pain in the ass.        My question is, if 5 years ago while fatigued with EDS and not on any AD's and my REM latency was 150 minutes, how could I possibly have had narcolepsy all this time? Wouldn't it have shown there if  i was already so tired during the day? I guess it's possible that I could have developed narcolepsy along the way and had/have another problem? But idk... [info] None [info] 1525555280
twelfthxdoctor [info] I have reason to believe that I'm going crazy. AMA 1. Sorry about the delay in answering.2. I was diagnosed with depression years ago. Trust me, I'd know if this was just my depression getting worse.*Edit II: Downvote fairies on the loose. Upvotes for all of you. [info] None [info] 1334333509
freethenipple23 [info] Therapy and medication!I was diagnosed with depression when I was 9 and grew up in a poor and abusive household so I didn't have the resources or support to get help.After getting beaten up, cheated on numerous times, and knocked up against my will by my ex at the age of 16, I decided (finally) that enough was enough. I reached out to a social worker at my school and began going for counseling-- I wasn't afraid of being taken away from my family anymore. Once I got my license and had regular access to a car, I made an appointment with a psychiatrist and was able to get prescribed medication. The medication helped a lot, but I wasn't able to afford therapy until four months ago. With the combination of the two, I'd like to think that now, I'm doing a lot better. I still struggle but I've got better support now thanks to my boyfriend and having a job that can support me financially. Im still trying to figure out who *I* am and what it is that I like to do, but I'm still young and now I've actually got the resources to discover myself. [info] None [info] 1528039468
CooperArt [info] :) It's a good one! I want to get to a point where I'm not punished for when my conditions do rear their head, but I'm treated well enough that they don't rear their head that often. That'd be a good medium, in my opinion.The handwriting is important to me because I want to be a teacher, and I can theoretically keep dodging handwriting--bring my laptop in and the like--and I've had several teachers with bloody awful handwriting, but I'd to just see if I can fix it. And I agree on the "old enough" part, because I was diagnosed with depression once before and given antidepressants, right before they started deciding not to give them to children. (I might have even experienced the suicidal side effect that caused them to be more hesitant giving antidepressants to kids.) Mom never explained why I had the pills, and what they were supposed to do. Then took them away when I "wasn't taking them seriously enough."My childhood is a series of "what ifs" that I've, thankfully, stopped entertaining constantly. (Once in a blue moon.)  [info] nDad, e/nMom, MDD, GAD, PD? [info] 1439302662
Kizaing [info] M/22/Canada - Things have been rough, could really use a friend Hey there people. Normally I would convince myself I am fine and wouldn't post here, but things have been exceptionally rough for me, and I'm at the point I could just really use some support.I have been diagnosed with depression for quite awhile, since high school. I am on meds for that and so far that has helped but not for the past while.This most recent bout of depression started when my girlfriend of over a year left me, it was the longest and most important relationship I have been in, and after that happened it's been a constant string of really shitty events, it's just been one bad thing after another and I'm at my wits end.I have no motivation to do anything or to try and make things better, I have no energy and I'm on the verge of tears most days. Thank you for having this place to let me vent, could just really use someone to talk to [info] None [info] 1404183827
sweetalkersweetalker [info] Depression doesn't always feel like "sadness".  In fact, more often than not it manifests as "meh".And while "meh" may be, y'know, good enough and all, it'd be a shame to waste your life on "meh" when there's awesome stuff to experience in life.  I was diagnosed with depression years ago, and I still remember the first time I really felt like my medication kicked in (it took a few weeks).  It seemed like I was really awake for the first time in a long time.  I was excited about things going on around me, I had fun making plans for the future, and I actually liked spending time with others - all things that were "meh" before.Living with depression is like working at a carnival without ever going on any of the rides.  Or resigning yourself to eating cake without the icing. [info] None [info] 1356590128
sn00p3r [info] Every man likes to get BJs.PS. I don't understand why am I being downvoted? I was diagnosed with depression and I shared what helped me. It seems people here don't appreciate honesty... [info] None [info] 1369808919
itismejd [info] Struggling alone A few months ago I finally decided to seek help with my mental health by going to a therapist. I was diagnosed with depression and at the time I mentioned it to a few friends. However, lately I have been feeling like I'm at my lowest. Within the last 2 months, I had two deep friendships end. I feel like I have nobody to talk to about what's going on. My therapist can be helpful in the moment but realizing you have nobody else to lean on makes everything 100 times worse. I have been trying to fight all of my suicidal thoughts but now that I've more people in my life, I feel like I have nothing else left. How can I overcome this alone? I don't want to bring unnecessary attention to myself by bringing it up but I just wish I hadn't messed everything up [info] None [info] 1578268906
dangerdann [info] Ok I'm gonna start off by saying this will be rather long and kind of a Rant I have needed to get out for a while and I just took this opportunity. When my mother was born she suffered from postpartum depression. She was a very normal mother for the first couple years of my life, until I was about 5 when it really hit her. Once I reached that age she became heavily medicated. Once she became medicated she ended up leaving my dad and marrying my step-father. This were rather normal for a while, at that point she became pregnant again, which made her depression worse. She ended up trying to kill herself with a knife and lost the baby. I remember visiting her in the hospital, and I remember her telling me she lost the baby. Everyone else in my family told me it was a dream, once I reached about 20 my grandmother finally told me the truth. After that ordeal she and my step-father ended up splitting up.Things were normal for a while again, I was living between my grandmother and father for a while. At this point she was in a Long-Term mental facility. Around this point I realized my mom wasn't healthy and that she would never be able to care for me like a real mother. After she became well enough I moved in with her and my aunt's family for a while. She was normal again, not normal mother, but normal by my standards. As always things were normal for a while, until she stopped taking her meds again. At this point I was playing soccer on my church's soccer team. My mother, my aunt's family and I went to the field to play a game. I'm not sure what exactly led up to this, but my mother ended up screaming at my Aunt because she wouldn't let her go buy cigarettes. It turned into a very heated fight, to the point where me and my cousin on the team were kicked off and banned from that field. While driving home the fight didn't any better. My mother opened the door and got out in the middle of an intersection. We ended up at my grandmothers house, after calling the police. My mother eventually showed up and had to be taken away by the police to another long-term treatment facility. So I went back to living between my dad and my grandmother. My dad ended up getting a trailer for us to live in, so I moved in with him. After a while my mother ended up moving in as a short-term (couple months) thing while Social Services figured out where to move her too. So we made sure she took her meds, and we thought it would be ok for a while. One day I was home alone with my mother, which was no big deal as she was doing well. This was the first day I experienced watching someone going through a seizure, I didn't know what to do, so I ended up calling 911 and they came and took her to the hospital again. After some more tests they thought one of her medications was effecting her blood sugar, so they prescribed a different drug. Again things went back to normal, until another day I experienced a new type of seizure. Transient epileptic amnesia is the best description I could find, although I don't know if that was exactly it. Anyways the first seizure really shook me, there is nothing like looking your mother in the eyes and her saying 'Do you know who my mom is?' She didn't remember me, her mother, my father or anything else. I didn't know what to do so I ended up waiting until my father got home. When he did they had a conversation that turned heated because my mother didn't think anything was wrong. She had another episode and again tried to kill herself, this time by trying to light herself on fire with a gas stove, because she didn't want to go to the hospital. After this point my family realized that she would never be able to stay out of a mental health facility normally again. So for the next couple years I went between living with my grandmother and living with my father a couple times. Things were rather normal again, my father had another trailer to live in so I was living with him at the time. We had my mother over for 2 days, it was for a holiday I think mothers day or something. Anyways we thought she was doing fine and we were on her meds like a hawk, I was about 12 at this time so I was able to help out with making sure. So that day I made sure my mother took her pills, and I ended up leaving the room for some reason, probably the phone, and I come back to an entire empty bottle of pills. Yet again another trip to the hospital. It was at this point I realized that my relationship with my mother will never be anything close to normal, and barely even a relationship. So I went as long as I could without talking to her, usually only seeing her for the major holidays, like Christmas and Easter. This was probably about 5 years later and she hadn't had an episode and had been almost normal, she would never be normal with the amount of meds she was on. So one Christmas she and the entire family were over and she ended up asking for a cigarette. My grandmother said no as the food was almost ready. She went into a rage and started yelling and verbally abusing my grandmother. At this point I had enough, I don't really remember what exactly happened, but I blew up I cussed my mother out and basically explained I was tired of this bullshit. Well oddly enough that worked. She calmed down ate dinner and then entire night went on normally. That was the last major incident that happened with my mother. From that point on I tried to have as little contact with her as possible. I would even pick up shifts at work so I couldn't be home for holidays. Once I hit about 20 years old I started visiting her rarely at the mental facility she was in. There haven't been any incidents since, but I still try to keep contact to a minimum.  Also during this point I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed anti-depressants, which hit me kind of hard, because I didn't want to turn into my mother. I went to a dark place with some suicidal thoughts for a while, but then the anti-depressants kicked in. I have lived a fairly normal life since then, I now try to look at it all as something I can work to overcome, and it makes me work hard to make sure I give myself a good future. I still love my mother very much and always will, I know it's not her fault that all this happened. I don't want to say I can laugh about it all now, but I see it from a different perspective, even though there have been days where I had a good cry thinking about it. Well thanks for listening to my rant. **tl;dr: Mom went batshit crazy, I still cry about it sometimes.**Edit: For spacing and because spelling is hard [info] None [info] 1402383267
ELONS_WIFE [info] I was diagnosed with depression just before 3rd year undergrad. The only reason I went to the doctor in the first place was because I was taking a topology course and couldn't write a single proof. I didnt have the short term memory for it. I couldn't even hold a conversation without forgetting what I was talking about mid sentence. Memory impairment wasn't the only symptom - extreme apathy, crying all the time, and so forth.Therapy was no help, but anti-depresaants worked. Nobody told me it would take time to get better. I wasted a year trying to study, only to drop out of almost all courses because my memory started to get better way too late in the year.I now know that it was burn-out related depression. For my first two years of undergrad I worked full time as a software developer and studied full time math. In my second year I had to do something to let loose so I allocated one evening per month to see either family or friends.  Only taking 12 evenings in the year to kickback (after following a similar year).....yeah, in hindsight I see why I burned out.The message I want to deliver:Depression is not always a product of emotionally traumatizing experiences or a screwed up view of the world. Sometimes brain chemicals can just break and you'll need to take the medicine and give it time to work.Taking time in the sun, seeing family and friends, and getting a good life partner got me back on track. A year after diagnosis my memory got better every day, so math became easier and I slowly rediscovered my love for it. [info] None [info] 1537885406
NuclearAnarchy [info] Just when I thought things were getting better. Hi all,This is my first post here, so I may as well give you a little information abojt myself. I was diagnosed with depression and add two years ago after my parents began to notice a change in my mood. I was never sleeping or eating (the very fact that my body didn't waste away is remarkable), my performance has shown a steady decrease, etc. Well. My reason for posting this tonight is I'm not OK. I'm 18, about to graduate and head to college. This is (by societies standards) meant to be the happiest time of my life, and I have seen considerable improvement in myself. My grades are up, I'm taking care of myself, I even managed to maintain a relationship for a couple of months! But now, in my "prime-time", all of my progress seems to have gone down the drain. I'm not motivated at all to do jack shit in school, my appetite has completely disappeared, I'm noticeablyore stressed than usual, I can sleep (it's midnight on a school night as I post this), and every time I think of the girl I fancy (who I've been head over heels for the past 3 years) all I can think of the pain that could ever come from us two ever having any semblance of a relationship. The only way to describe how I feel right now is just complete and total shit. I am a decaying heap of human waste. My insignificance is clearer to me than ever before. Does anybody else ever have these severe relapses? TL:DR I'm having a major relapse back into a severe depressive state, has anyone else experienced something similar? [info] None [info] 1368076282
TheTroubledChild [info] It won't get any better than this Hear me out. My life was fantastic and came with many privileges. My childhood was nearly perfect, my family was big and loving, I grew up travelling etc. Even when I was diagnosed with depression later, it was okay, it was hard many many times, but I've been lucky to always have supporting company. I've always been an passionate artist and even had my own exhibitions from a young age.But then I was diagnosed with MS. This is 10 years ago and I realized, it can only go downhill from now on. Even when I am getting good medication, this illness makes me so tired. I am extremely sleepy and exhausted 24/7. Mixed with depression, I lie in bed the whole day. Just taking a shower is like running a marathon. I don't feel like doing anything, nothing holds any joy anymore. I don't care for art anymore, I don't care for Friends anymore, I won't find anyone to love me "like this", and I won't be able to find or let alone HOLD a job anymore. I'm a university student who is close to finishing (that means if I graduate at all, because I am too sleepy and exhausted to do shit). I can't see a future with any dignity for me. With the condition I have and how it is worsening, I feel like it's impossible to think of a happy ending. My life was amazing, but from here it can only go downhill. All I can see for myself is crippling depts, living on wellfare and foodstamps because my illness shows good signs that I'll need a wheelchair in a few years, dying alone, selling all I own. No matter who I am talking to, people are just as helpless to come up with any hopeful ideas as I do. MS can't be cured, it can only make things worse. It is already slurring my speech and affecting my brain a lot, which is scary asf. I often fail to feel or use certain limbs. Wouldn't it be better to go now, with a smile, knowing that my life was a dream - than waiting until my illness finishes me off and I am dying in poverty and being miserable? I see no light at the end of this tunnel. [info] None [info] 1535206069
baayahoo [info] Honestly, it’s extremely reassuring to know that other people understand what I’m talking about.  I was relieved when I was diagnosed with depression because it explained why I couldn’t get out of these deep emotional valleys.  So thank you for sharing. [info] None [info] 1573353955
SomeASCIICharacters [info] I should've tried harder. I miss my Ex-Fiance. She was from Croatia. I had met her through a friend that I added on Facebook. I've known her for 4 years before we got engaged around the 5 year mark. Everything was perfect. I flew there twice. The first time I left on Christmas, and it was the first time I flew alone on my own. I spent part of Christmas and new years with her. When it was time to leave, it was so hard. I've never cried over leaving someone behind. On the airplane I cried, but tried my hardest to conceal it because I didn't want the people next to me to think I was weak. The next time I saw her we went to Crikvencia, and stayed a couple days. Then everything went downhill when we got back to Zagreb. I'll admit. At the time I thought I was perfect. I didn't need to try because me being me, I thought I didnt need to and figured she'd pick up the slack. My therapist mentions I exhibit narcissist traits, but when it was mentioned I blew it off. I am diagnosed with depression and ADHD. The combo of everything just made it difficult on her. I would forget things and she'd think I wasnt paying attention. She pushed me to get my GED for months, I just thought she was just trying to harass me. She encouraged me in everything I did/wanted to do. I treated her like shit, and now that we aren't together I feel so alone. I never ever give a shit about anyone else. This feeling is new and it's eating me alive how I treated her. I realize what I did wrong. I just realized too late. I just want her happy. I will always love her. I'm just hurting so much. The first few months we were apart I didn't give a single fuck. I didn't feel anything. I'm angry with myself. It's about time I realize my faults. [info] None [info] 1464187467
chickenfried_187 [info] My dad &amp; sister is toxic My dad and my sister are toxic give you a little inside my sister called me worthless and my dad he would yell at us sometimes hit us across the head or complain about little things and so one day I was just came back from home from school I am currently 12 I still live with my dad not my sister anymore my dad said to to these couples saying I was going to get a boat and hang myself in the closet no yes I was diagnosed with depression and suicidal all I did was cut myself and felt worthless cuz of my sister my dad however make me feel even more worse a stool and sometimes to help myself but he said to these two couples sayings I was even cutting myself and almost hung myself parent Lee I was mad and I had given told him about the time that she was very abusive to my brother and is now doesn't hit us anymore because of what happened I still don't know what to do and I feel like I should also move out of the house just when I'm young enable to live a normal life by myself [info] None [info] 1583552938
Smanddp [info] Back again I'm mostly just venting, I used to post on here a lot under a different user name for personal reasons. Anyways just venting some feelings. I had a rough go at life and figured my shit out went back to school, got medication, met some good friends. Unfortunately, depression always waits. I wish I could write and say everything is better, it gets easier, I'm better. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 13 just after my first suicide attempt. What I can say is it does get normal. Just like everything else in life it has good and bad. When I start feeling my negative thoughts, when I start cutting again, I just remind myself that if I just wait until tomorrow maybe I'll start riding this ride up again. Yes, maybe it takes weeks or months. But when I'm happy, when I feel Okay about myself I know it's wroth waiting at least one more day. I'm in a bit of a depression now, honestly set on by something I did. But I know tomorrow will come and that's basically the only thought I try to think about. Tomorrow. It's always tomorrow. [info] None [info] 1414016203
irl_annie [info] Riot's new 'direction' where they're exclusively rewarding premades is so alienating to lonely kids, and it breaks my heart. So a few hours ago I noticed the MSI rewards announcement and found that *yet again* Riot is rewarding those who play in premades while denying solo players any sort of bonus, even a smaller one. This is the most recent instance of them doing this sort of IP reward scheme in a trend of them doing this for a year and a half, and that's not even getting into the other ways playing in premades is being rewarded (dynamic queue and hextech loot, to name a few). And it's really starting to grate on me because it's unbelievable that Riot keeps deliberately alienating what I suspect is a considerable share of their playerbase like this.I've been playing Season 1, at which point I was a sophomore in high school. My entire schooling life I was a pretty damn lonely kid. For a variety of reasons, my quiet demeanour, being a small guy for my age, being gay I was picked on and had a hard time making friends. And I *was* miserable about it (didn't help that I was diagnosed with depression in my junior year, which left me more miserable and also inhibited my desire to even try to make friends) so I turned to video games, specifically league to get me through it. The game was the perfect band-aid fix for what I was going through - it was immersive enough to distract me from my frankly depressing personal life but more importantly, for a good 30-50 minutes at a time I could get matched up with a bunch of strangers who I could talk to, share a common interest with (the game) and play with. I'm not going to pretend that solo queue isn't toxic, it can be, but it didn't so much bother me because I was used to harassment in real life and honestly, it's a lot less damaging when it comes from some random in a game you'll never see again vs someone you dealt with at school 5 days a week, but it was the cool people I ran into, that gave me compliments or told jokes or just left me with positive experiences, that made league the perfect means to get by. Even if I didn't get to enjoy a 40-minute-friend in a game, it still made my days a lot better than they were before I discovered league because hey, the game is fun, the game doesn't care at all that I'm 5'2'' and have no real life friends, it still gives me something to feel good about when I win. I've since graduated my hell-hole of a high school and did finally manage to make a couple of friends and even found a boyfriend, but I think a lot about how in high school, I felt like I'd never get here and league of legends got me through that. It was a haven for a sad lonely kid like me.And I bet, I'm not the only one. It's probably not something people are willing to talk about much on Reddit because of the pressure to act unflappable, but I'm willing to hedge a bet there's tons of miserable, lonely youths playing this game because its design is ideal for people looking for an escape from that situation. Or *was* ideal - when Riot continues to reward people for playing with friends and give solo players nothing, it's a slap in the face for people in the position I was in. Now before you say "well maybe you should just go make friends then" realize that it isn't actually as simple, there's a variety of reasons people without friends have trouble making them, least of all the fact that being treated as crap makes you so untrusting of people that you don't want to bother anymore, or that when you're someone who gets bullied, others are reluctant to associate with you out of fear of the same treatment. It's an inescapable spiral, sometimes. It's not like people don't want to make friends, some people just can't and hey, if you're in that situation and you're miserable, then there's nothing wrong with finding another outlet, find something that doesn't punish you for not having friends. League used to be just that, until Riot keeps finding ways to make that game send the exact same message - "if you have no friends, your life isn't worth rewarding". And knowing what league meant to me at a shitty time, that's sort of heartbreaking.I'm not saying take out premade rewards, okay sure I get it - it's a business strategy to get more people to play league, riot is a business yada yada - but don't just slap "0%" next to what you get for playing this game by yourself. I'll bet my ass there's depressed teenagers who couldn't sleep so they spent all night grinding out games during the MSI event - or going back further, the pool party one last year - only to get zilch because they're alone. Your 'incentives' aren't going to make these people suddenly go out and magically make friends so they'll start playing your game, it's going to turn them away from something that would have otherwise been pretty nice for them. And that's a damn shame.tl;dr Riot are alienating a good chunk of their playerbase - perhaps those who need some acceptance most - and it doesn't feel good. [info]  [info] 1463500400
onisshi1807 [info] When I was diagnosed with depression, some people (complete strangers) encouraged me to turn to God. (I have never been a part of any religion.) I had never felt so repulsed; it was like they were trying to take advantage of my vulnerability to boost their own personal satisfaction of having 'converted' someone.At least, that was what it seemed like to my depressed mind.What made me really 'wake up' was the time I tried to OD last year. I failed, of course, but through that experience I found out that nobody was there for me. I couldn't depend on anyone. Hurting myself wasn't going to solve anything. Lying in bed all day crying wasn't going to stop time. Going to the therapist and taking those pills was a waste of time. The therapist didn't care; it's just his job to dole out pills to patients. And that's perfectly fine. Nobody is under an obligation to be with you, and neither are you. Once I understood that, I cared less and less. I let go. I talked to myself in public and did dumb shit. I spent 4 hours at a public park taking pictures of flowers and I rolled down a grassy hill. And that was fine. It was fine for me to be myself. If I was going to OD, I might as well enjoy myself. [info] None [info] 1494560305
iamasquidama [info] Now that you mention it, in that first house I lived in, I developed a really bad anger problem. It was and is very uncharacteristic of me. I would scream and throw fits, I would take really personal digs at people. And then shortly after I was diagnosed with depressions which is something I still struggle with.  [info] None [info] 1519933105
bm2xv [info] How does a good therapist treat depression? It's the kind of thing that I read here a lot. "If you're feeling depressed, see a therapist. Things will get better."I've been diagnosed with depression and have been dealing with it for more than ten years now and over that time have seen multiple therapists. Nothing has seemed to change as a result. To be honest it always feels like a waste of time and I'll end up stopping.I was determined to see my last therapist regularly and over a long term but even after a year of weekly visits I wasn't getting any better. Sessions just never really seem to go anywhere and it feels like every time I'll just be repeating myself.Is there something I'm doing wrong? What kind of results should I be seeing? What should a therapy session consist of? How do things get better? [info] None [info] 1367789415
Bubbly_Taro [info] How do you know if you are depressed and not lazy? So I was diagnosed with depression about 10 years ago and I have been in mental hospitals several times and tried various types of medications.I also had counseling up until fairly recently and we talked ad nauseam about the things I need to do to improve my condition. Exercise, better diet, going outside, socializing with other people, the usual stuff.I have a profound understanding about what I need to do to get better but I cannot bring myself to adhere to these ideas so I am wondering if I am not just incredibly lazy instead of depressed and that my poor state of mind stems from inaction and reclusion. [info] None [info] 1577980855
crazycube [info] To smoke or not to smoke, that is the question?(seriously, read. I need your help, /r/trees) So, I was just diagnosed with depression. I have been skipping classes and that is not gotod for me, since I lost the semester. Whenever I skipped classes, I would do anything I wanted, like sleeping, eating, internet, television, beer, and, of course, trees.I am now in treatment with antidepressants and I decided to quit trees  for a while to try and be more responsible, but today my girlfrient just texted me asking if I wouldn't smoke, even knowing that I have no classes or anything important the next day.So, /r/trees, of course I will be smoking less, stop smoking everyday, maybe just once or twice a week(if I decide to keep smoking)So, what do you think I should do? To smoke or not to smoke, that is the question.Edit: if you guys wanna help me more, please read my [post on /r/depression](http://www.reddit.com/r/depression/comments/1fw5yr/just_realized_yesterday_what_a_mess_my_life/)Also, forgot to mention, what made me seek medical atention was a sudden realization I had whilst thinking about my life at a [8], earlier this week, which made me go see a doctor right away. So, in a way, trees helped me realize what a mess my life was(depression started before I started smoking trees). If I keep smoking, I am never again smoking alone again anytime soon, just with my girlfriend, who is really great and helping me through all this. [info]  [info] 1370646770
NNyNIH [info] I had watched TableTop from time to time and was a fan of Felicia Day so I knew of G&amp;S and Critical Role. Being a fan of DnD I thought I should give it a look. I remember attempting to watch it a year ago on YouTube but being out off by the visuals, Twitch chat and the blurred out intro bits. So I didn't get more than 5 minutes in.Recently I was diagnosed with depression and had been finding it difficult to focus on series (so many unfinished Netflix shows) I decided to give Critical Role another go. Been watching it nearly every day since! Currently around Episode 50! [info] None [info] 1503846443
th1341 [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 12. I'm 19 now and wish I had found d this sub when I was 12. Dank memes may have healed me [info] None [info] 1471962727
thisisashittyaccount [info] Starting now, ending never. I am going to get my health under control. As you may be able to tell, I am young to this sub, but it doesn't shy me away from it. I am currently considered "overweight" and have been transitioning between healthy weight and being overweight. I play fall and winter sports at my high school, so in the spring and summer I don't get much exercise, and don't really watch what I'm eating. I have come here for four reasons:* To look better. I have never dated a girl in my life, and don't attract many of them. I see lot of potential in me though. I have gotten a lot of compliments from girls, specifically stating how the upper half of my face is really attractive. This is everything from eyebrows, eyelashes, my eye color, my positive canthal tilt, and my nose. I have a prominent chin, but my baby face is hiding it. I have a good shaped head as well. The only problem is that I am overweight, and I am going to fix it.* To get healthier. My uncle is very smart, wealthy, and successful, but he is obese. When I am older and I don't get my health in check, I am going to end up like him. My family has history of heart disease (none of it dealing with weight), and I want to avoid that at all costs. I get yelled at by my pediatrician to eat better, but I did not listen to him until recently. * To not get bullied. I live in a very rich part of my city, and a lot of the kids there think they are hot shit, and do not really care about anyone that is "lesser" than them. I am not that way. I did not get bullied at my old school for my weight (left for bullying, but different reasons), but my new school, I got bullied a ton. There were kids there much fatter than me. Did they bully them? No. They decide to pick on the new kid who was still overweight. I specifically remember getting mocked at, with people saying, "Look at that blimp on the soccer field." It left me in a depressive state for a while, but I have picked myself back up stronger than ever.* To be more athletic. I play soccer in the fall and basketball in the winter. During the beginning of the soccer season, I was literally dying out there, but got better by the end of it. During basketball, I had great endurance, and was considered in normal weight range by then. After basketball was over, I just didn't care about my weight.I have been very self conscious about the way I looked, but did nothing to fix it. I started getting overweight at age 11 (I believe), as I was diagnosed with depression, and was comforting myself with unhealthy foods. As a 16 year old 6'3" male, I started at a weight of 195 lbs, currently 190lbs, and my goal is 160lbs and then to build up muscle for next summer.I have started this journey on Saturday, and I would be on a strict diet. I started swapping my usual Sprite/lemonade at a restaurant for water. Every restaurant since Saturday, I have only ordered water as my drink. I have also started watching what I eat as well. On Saturday, I stopped at a Chick Fil A, and instead of getting my chicken sandwich, I got a salad. I went that Italian restaurant and got a house salad over pizza or spaghetti. I got a club sandwich with whole wheat bread, no bacon, and no mayo over a Philly cheesesteak. Does it taste good at the moment? It isn't spectacular, but is it helping me with my mood and energy? Yes.I am willing to fight this battle. I will fight to the end. No matter how hard it will be, I will win out, and make my life better. [info] 16M 6'2" SW: 195 CW: 190 GW: 160 [info] 1501650552
iamsuchagarbage [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and I am currently taking antidepressants. I quit therapy long ago because therapy or no therapy the therapist can't give me my childhood and everything I lost back to me. My only hope is that I'll find someone who will give me that spark of joy again. I am tired of being alone. But hey at least I got my father back. [info] None [info] 1570378628
Sakazuki27 [info] How should I approach going to vacation with a friend? I have a friend who is on a completely different level of awareness, he doesn't bother about spirituality and lifes an instagram life. He is one of my only friends and we were planning on going to vacation for a few days. I'm unsure if I should really go with him because of the distance I feel towards him. He doesn't know how I feel. And on Monday I was diagnosed with depression coming from the huge shift in my consciousness lately. It's a bit too much for me to handle so I'm very introverted during this phase, I process a lot. Like I'm in a cocoon. I feel like a vacation would help me recharge myself but I don't want to be a burden for his vacation. But I want to go with him since he is the only one I could imagine going with right now. He's pretty chill but I don't know how to communicate how I feel lately. I even thought about cancelling but wouldn't that be a missed opportunity to get out of my routine? I didn't go for vacation in 3 year and I feel like I need it. Any advice? Also what generall advice would you give me if I do go, like what's a good way to recharge? It would be a hotel at the beach with a lot of tourists there. I apologize for my ignorance but I recently started exploring myself and what I need, so I'm looking for guidelines. Thanks and have a nice day &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1563971654
alittlebirdy_toldme [info] I agree wholeheartedly. I was diagnosed with depression, and I've told my best friend to shame me into taking a shower because that was the only thing to get me out of bed. Made me feel like shit, being gross and having people tell me, but it worked. I am now a regular showerer! [info] None [info] 1530848843
angenew13 [info] Sometimes it's not something that you can 'get over', but it can be managed.&amp;#x200B;I was diagnosed with depression over 20 years ago. With the right treatment I am able to keep it under control, but I will never be able to get over it. [info] None [info] 1571390655
CaptainMrBucket [info] Meh it's cool. I was diagnosed with depression before. Best thing was to push through it and stop saying negative things about yourself while doing it.Good luck man. Depression sucks but people don't like hearing the truth especially when depressed. It is hard for sure. Everything in life is never easy and takes work. If you ever need to talk just message me. Love to help. [info] None [info] 1491149404
drewisawesome14 [info] I'm currently Military. I was diagnosed with depression but they ignored it at the recruiters and here I am. I don't recommend the military though. Because what the military does is puts you in even more stressful situations that will bring out the very demon inside of you. I know it hurts. PM me if you would like.  [info] None [info] 1430116294
Gideon_Drake [info] Jesus.  I know exactly how you feel - I was diagnosed with depression about 6 months ago after dealing with it for years.  I don't know if you are medicated for it, but I can't tell you how much it changed my life.  But enough about that, I need you to know how incredible it is that you managed this.  I couldn't manage what you did, and I can only imagine how much strength and determination you must have to be able to do this.  Congratulations on making good decisions and for being such a strong person - I don't know that I could do what you did today if I wasn't on my medication. [info]  [info] 1429132409
Angelousy [info] I grew up watching my mother be abused emotionally, physically, and mentally by my alcoholic father until their divorce when I was 15. I was diagnosed with depression at age 11 and had very frequent thoughts of suicide and I self harmed. When my father found out these bits of information, he locked me in my room with kitchen knives and said, "here, kill yourself."Now I never have suicidal thoughts and I almost don't remember how that situation made me feel physically sick and helpless. I will never allow a man or woman to ever mistreat me. I have graduated high school with honors and made the dean's list in my first semester of college. I feel I've done okay with my life so far and I hope to continue an upward trend.  [info] None [info] 1483245190
The_Lost_King [info] Dude, I don’t know where you got the idea that just because I said that you’ve never dealt with depression means I am talking about myself. Since you intend to bring me in on this though, yes, I have been diagnosed with depression, but honestly I’m in the best point in my life I’ve ever been despite not filling the prescription of my antidepressants. I really need to get my ADHD meds, but I’m fine other than that. You really are more of a piece of shit than I gave you credit for though with diagnosing me with all that crap just because I’m a gamer, but if you must know, I did well in Highschool and have almost graduated college just fine. I get physical activity at my job, but yes I should do more. My diet isn’t as bad as you’ve implied, but I do definitely need to change it. My goal is to coast through life because I live for the simple pleasures of reading books/manga, playing games, hanging with friends, and maybe creating a table top rpg or two. Now we were talking about my fiancée. She does well in school, watches her diet carefully, exercises frequently, is well supported by me and her family and friends and is pursuing happiness as much as you can as someone in their early 20s who has to work through school doing shitty jobs no one else wants to do because you don’t have the schooling necessary to do a job you want to do. And yet she is still horribly depressed and you refuse to acknowledge that because you’re just an asshole that makes quick value judgements on tiny pieces of information. [info] None [info] 1571254338
MilanB-G [info] My best friend's mom is the worst. Okay, time for the context. Sit tight, folks. I got a LOT to talk about.This story happened around 2 years ago when I was 15. I was diagnosed with depression and it was worst when I was alone. Naturally, I spent lots of time with family and friends. Doing homework, alone, I would have to listen to incredibly loud music to distract myself from... well... myself. It was rough.I was friends with this one girl (labeled:F for later) since middle school. At the time, I just assumed I was gay since I had no desire for relationships with girls. I was friends with the emos and the baby gays. Going into high school, everyone (including F) became more mature and comfortable with their sexualities. Not this guy. Nope. I was the opposite. I began to doubt my own thoughts, and for a while I thought I wasnt capable of affection. F was the only one who made me feel kind of okay. My family didnt get it, mostly because I told them nothing. My sister is a lesbian, and I felt that they wouldn't believe me or that they would be disappointed. Me and F hung out constantly. We would sit in her room watching netflix, eating snacks, petting her cats, etc. Normal gbf stuff, I think. Her parents, or at least her mom, were not so open-minded about sexuality. They didnt know that F was into girls, so (of course) they though we were dating. Finally on to the encounter. This is a mixture of two encounters, actually. The first one was at our local farmer's market, and went something like this.Cast: Entitled Mom (EM), Cool younger brother (CB)Entitled Mother (EM): Oh, hi OP! Nice to see you here.Me: Hey, EM. Hey CBCB (on his phone): Hey.EM: So, how have you been?We proceeded to do the classic awkward small talk awkwardly. Then... everything changed when the Karen attacked. EM: So, have you and F had your first kiss yet?Me (forgetting that she doesn't know): I... uh, what?EM: well you two have been together for so long, I'm just wondering if you have kissed yet.Me: Ohhhhh. I'm sorry if you've been thinking otherwise, but I'm not dating F. We're just friends.EM takes a second to respond. In the short period of silence, I look over to see CB off his phone with a look of pure terror on his face. It still haunts me to this day. EM: WHAT do you mean?Me (unaware of the present danger): I'm not interested in pursuing you daughter romantically. Were just friends. I'm sorry if you were confused, I probably would've been too. EM: Are you calling my daughter UGLY?Me: What? No!CB: Yeah, mom. Let's just go get the bread and go home.EM: no, CB. Your sister's supposed "best friend" (air quotes and all) just insulted her. He doesn't think shes pretty enough to date. Me: Excuse me? I never said that. And anyways, if I would date someone, it would be because they are a good person, not because they are pretty.INSTANT. REGRET.EM: Now, you're calling my daughter a bad person? You make me SICK.CB: MOM, let's go please!Me: You need to calm down, EM. Your daughter is my beat friend. EM: Well she deserves more! She has never had a boyfriend, so you NEED to be the first. Me: No. I think F is amazing, but I dont intend on dating her.EM: And I dont intend on dying without grandchildren. You can date my daughter! I insist. Isn't that just what you people want? Sex? I'm offering it to you, so do the right thing and DATE MY DAUGHTER!.CB bolts for it. He sprints away from.us, tears in his eyes. I'm on the verge myself, but I see an opportunity. I use the chaos to sprint to the bike rack and get THE HELL OUT OF THERE. That was one of the most stressful situations of my life. Now I thought it was over. I would have to avoid EM for the rest of high school and then I could forget about it. No. Of course not. A while later, I dont remember how long, Get Out premiered. I went to see it with another one of my friends. He is gay, and admitted only recently to have had a crush on me at the time of this incident. So, the encounter happened after the movie. We went to  the food court to grab some dinner, and we were chilling out. We were watching youtube videos and were sharing a pair of earbuds. Everything I've mentioned is relevant to what came next. EM was out shopping with Karens 1 and 2. They walked into the food court, and for a moment we locked eyes. She whispered something to her friends and they both gasped. They started walking over to us. At this point I sat up and my friend (F2 for convo) took his arm off my shoulder, something I didnt even realize he was doing. Then, all hell broke loose.Me, to F2: this is F's mom. F2: oh shit.EM: Hello, OP.Me: Hello.EM: It all makes sense now. You being a f**.F2: Woah, lady.Me: Hey, watch it.Karen 1: Oh, dont act so offended. You did so much harm to EM's lovely daughter.Me: And what would that be?EM: A week after we had our little chat at the farmer's market,  she told me she was gay. I couldn't believe my ears. I can't believe you could just corrupt her like that!Karen 2: If you're sick, just keep it to yourself! Don't give it to others!F2 (whispering in my ear): They're f u c k i n g c r a z y.Me (trying to gtfo): Y'know what? I have to catch the bus back with my friend over here. EM: Oh cut the crap, young man. You're obviously his boyfriend. Dont go on about how you're "just friends' and all that shit about being a "good person" (air quotes). F2: No, it's true. We're just friends. Me: And can we talk about what she just said about "infecting" (mocking her air quotes)  F? That's not how any of this works. K1: Of course, honey. Being gay is an illness. It can spread to other people. EM: And YOU spread it to my daughter.Me and F2 at the same time: But I'm/he's not gay!EM: Oh really, why is he spending time with you? (Friends exist...) Why are his nails painted? (I love colors) Why didn't you date my daughter? (Friends)Me: Ohhh k one second.Me and F2 turned our heads and whispered to each other.Me: we got to get out of hereF2: I would make a joke, but it seems inappropriate seeing as we actually do really need to get out.Me: should we just run? I think that if we walk they'll try to kill usF2: Let's---He was interrupted by a loud clank.Our food was on the ground. Soy sauce got spilled on my new-ish shoes and my friend's bag. My lo mein and his chicken were scattered across the floor. EM: Now clean it up.Me: ARE YOU CRAZY?F2: Yeah what the hell?EM: Cleaning up your mess is the least you could do to pay for the harm you caused F.Me: You spilled that!K1: if you were straight, this wouldn't have happened. It's your fault, young man.Shut up boomer.Me: ok I'm out of here.F2: lets go, before I lose it.We start to walk past them, but then EM smacked me. I have to thank my friend for everything, because he held me back. I would've decked her and beat her up. I would've been arrested and proven her point. Thankfully, it didnt happen.We ran.We went all the way across the mall and waited outside for F2's dad to pick us up, and then we left.I havent seen EM since, but F has still been my best friend. Her mom isn't around the house so much, so that's not a big problem. I was introduced to this sub rather recently through one of those reddit YouTube channels ("Redditor" is the name). I sure as hell hope there won't be an update soon. This year, I'm out. Heading to college. I won't miss high school one bit. The only thing I miss will be my amazing friends who helped me out of my darkest place.Thank you for coming to my TED Talk. Good night. [info] None [info] 1572232212
thed4rkestrose [info] I once told a doctor (not mental health specific just a general doctor) I was depressed and she told me that I wasn't. Years later I was diagnosed with depression but I will always remember her telling me I wasn't depressed and me bursting into tears.I told my counsellor I often hallucinate, I see bugs and I hear voices but not all the time, and she took me out of our room and spoke to me and my mum in a public stairwell to say I'm not schizophrenic because it's not continuous.  [info] None [info] 1533127488
frauleinlurker [info] I was diagnosed with depression about a decade ago but stopped taking an SSRI after about 3 years. My migraines had gotten really bad and I was concerned about developing serotonin syndrome. I decided to work with a therapist instead. To this day I’m still not on an anti depressant.  [info] None [info] 1539637403
Josh_Dangit [info] I was diagnosed with depression and borderline personality disorder. **Extensive** therapy has helped me manage and predict my depression, as well as recognize the symptoms of my BPD. I know when I’m being irrational, and I actively work towards correcting it.  [info] None [info] 1519905275
sad_codfish [info] I'm an ex-convert who feels lost Hello! I'm a long time lurker on this sub but I had never posted before because I didn't have enough courage to do so.I'm (18F) from an European country and was raised by my parents as an atheist. I never believed in god growing up. I was probably the only person in my class who didn't go to sunday school. However I've always loved studying other religions and when I was 10 I started reading the Bible because I wanted to understand what christians believed in. Around that same time my parents allowed me to create a BookOfFaces account and I started following atheist pages who debunked "religious miracles" and who pointed out all the inconsistencies in holy scriptures.Islam never really got my attention until two years ago (2017). It was a really bad year, a lot of things happened in my life and I was diagnosed with depression and I was put on antidepressants. After I started taking antidepressants I began having really strange dreams that made me become very religious. I decided to investigate Islam since I had a lot of dreams about muslim women. I joined a muslim chat group on Whatsapp that had people from all around the world and I started reading the Quran and hadiths. A lot of things didn't make sense to me but when I brought my doubts to the other muslim girls in the group they would give me a sugar-coated response to stop me from further questioning and even though I was always a very skeptical person, those answers were good enough to keep me quiet and obeying (I don't know what was wrong with me).I eventualy converted to Islam and that was when my muslim friends showed their religion's true colors:* They were very homophobic and used the Quran to justify their prejudice;* I love metal. I go to metal concerts whenever I can and I wear t-shirts from my favorite bands. First my friends told me that metal was the music of Satan and that I should stop listening to it. I stopped listening to metal and started listening to classical music instead. When they found out I listened to classical music, they kept sending me hadiths that proved music is haram.* Once I told them I wanted to study fine arts they told me painting is haram.* They condone rape and said that muslim men can rape non-muslim slaves.* They believe men can hit their wives (before I converted they had told me it was a mistranslation).I left Islam one year and a half after converting because I just couldn't be part of a religion which condones such terrible things as pedophilia, rape, killing of homossexuals and apostates,...I feel better now that I'm free and don't have to pray 5 times a day, don't wear baggy clothes that make me look terrible and can finally do what I love (listening to music and painting). However now I feel lost. I feel like I NEED to believe in something to feel better.Ex-converts please tell me your story. I see a lot of born muslims on this sub but I've never read a post written by an ex-convert. [info] New User [info] 1576974834
DreamSteel [info] Any time. I've been diagnosed with depression for almost 10 years now so I know how draining it can be. It's not easy to shake. For me I will say the best thing I can do if I can muster the strength is to get my fresh fruit and maybe some cottage cheese. I'm not sure why it just helps pull me a little bit out of that funk.  [info] http://www.wlsearch.com/u/DreamSteel [info] 1455888943
Polskihammer [info] Does anyone else sleep in the middle of the day for like 2 hours? I really hate this, I go to work 7am and get out 330pm, when i get home i sleep until maybe 5 or 6. When i do wake up I feel just as exhausted as in the morning. Is this a pattern I can break. I've been diagnosed with depression and take zoloft if that matters. [info] None [info] 1463698399
L4Deader [info] The most dramatic life I've ever had, a.k.a. The Incredible Life of Sarah Zaher First of all, I want to clarify that is is a **very** long read, as it is a full event log covering the whole life of my character. I feel like every little event in her life mattered. Second, it didn't actually happen in BitLife, but in InstLife. However, I know that the BitLife team has acquired the rights to InstLife, and the InstLife subreddit doesn't seem to be official, and it's also private on top of that, so I felt like posting here would be a better option. Please forgive me if you don't think it was appropriate. Third, a little backstory. I'd had some bad luck with my previous characters, so when I got to Sarah, I decided to go all out and play as a crazy rebellious gal set on the path of violence and crime. However, some things happened that made my jaw drop and by the end of it I was on the verge of tears. I'm totally sure you could make a movie out of this. I must also clarify beforehand that I'm Russian and I did, in fact, bring some of my language into this by naming some stuff in Russian transliteration. I will explain the meaning and significance of Russian stuff at the end. I also warn you that some of those "custom names" contain silly horny things and language. I'm not sure if this warrants an NSFW tag, but, seeing as there are posts about porn stars, I'm probably good? Feel free to correct me! With that said, let's begin our journey into the life of Sarah Zaher. I will never forget her.&gt;0 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;You were born a female, in Egypt.  &gt;  &gt;Your name is Sarah Zaher.  &gt;  &gt;You are the daughter of:  &gt;  &gt;Beni Zaher (Father), 50.  &gt;  &gt;Aya Ashraf (Mother), 47.  &gt;  &gt;My parents took me to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;My parents took me to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;My parents took me to the clinic.  &gt;  &gt;My parents took me to the clinic.  &gt;  &gt;1 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;2 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;3 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;4 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;5 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;6 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I started School.  &gt;  &gt;7 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;8 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;9 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;10 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;11 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;12 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I am homosexual.  &gt;  &gt;I saw a sword swallower in the street.  &gt;  &gt;I'm now in a relationship with Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;I proposed to Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;My marriage proposal was rejected.  &gt;  &gt;I proposed to Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;Sarah accepted my marriage proposal!  &gt;  &gt;13 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;14 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I decided to quit school.  &gt;  &gt;Sarah and I had an argument because I dropped out of education.  &gt;  &gt;15 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My Father retired.  &gt;  &gt;16 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I've been diagnosed with influenza.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;I no longer have influenza.  &gt;  &gt;17 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I saw a busker in the street.  &gt;  &gt;I assaulted them, but they have no serious injuries.  &gt;  &gt;18 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My Mother retired.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I had a one night stand with Rana.  &gt;  &gt;Sarah and I had an argument because I was caught cheating because my partner walked in.  &gt;  &gt;I saw a ventriloquist in the street.  &gt;  &gt;I assaulted them, but they have no serious injuries.  &gt;  &gt;I saw a mime in the street.  &gt;  &gt;I assaulted them.  &gt;  &gt;I smashed their shoulder blade .  &gt;  &gt;I grazed their face .  &gt;  &gt;19 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I saw a living statue in the street.  &gt;  &gt;I saw a homeless person in the street.  &gt;  &gt;I assaulted them.  &gt;  &gt;I scarred their face .  &gt;  &gt;I was caught fighting and I was jailed for 1 years.  &gt;  &gt;I started serving my sentence in a prison.  &gt;  &gt;Sarah Moussa broke up with me.  &gt;  &gt;I started a prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;0 people have died, and 5 have been injured by the prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;I was detained by the prison guards, and released with a warning for starting a prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by guards patrolling.  &gt;  &gt;I was detained by the prison guards, and released with a warning for trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by motion sensors.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for 2 year(s) because I was caught trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;20 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My Mother died at the age of 67 from brugada syndrome.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by microwave sensors.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for 1 year(s) because I was caught trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I started a prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;1 people have died, and 6 have been injured by the prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for another year because I was caught starting a riot.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by guards in towers.  &gt;  &gt;I was detained by the prison guards, and released with a warning for trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I started a prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;I have been attacked with a katana .  &gt;  &gt;My chest was burst .  &gt;  &gt;My shin was scraped .  &gt;  &gt;My foot was knocked .  &gt;  &gt;My nose was bruised .  &gt;  &gt;My tooth was bashed .  &gt;  &gt;0 people have died, and 16 have been injured by the prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by CCTV.  &gt;  &gt;I was detained by the prison guards, and released with a warning for trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;21 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by floodlights.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for 1 year(s) because I was caught trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by CCTV.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for 1 year(s) because I was caught trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by microwave sensors.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for 2 year(s) because I was caught trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by microwave sensors.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for 3 year(s) because I was caught trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;I started a prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;0 people have died, and 14 have been injured by the prison riot.  &gt;  &gt;My sentence was extended for another year because I was caught starting a riot.  &gt;  &gt;22 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;23 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;24 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;25 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;26 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I've been diagnosed with depression.  &gt;  &gt;27 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I was caught trying to escape prison by floodlights.  &gt;  &gt;I was detained by the prison guards, and released with a warning for trying to escape.  &gt;  &gt;28 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;29 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;30 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;17 people have died, and 37 have been affected after a storm in Chile.  &gt;  &gt;A F5 tornado has hit Chile because of the storm, with reported wind speeds of 316mph.  &gt;  &gt;332 people have died, and 89 have been affected.  &gt;  &gt;4,706 people have died, and 18,966 have been affected after a mudslide in Chile caused by the recent storm.  &gt;  &gt;31 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;32 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I finished serving my sentence after 13 year(s).  &gt;  &gt;24 people have died, and 81 have been affected after a storm in North Korea.  &gt;  &gt;4,521 people have died, and 6,613 have been affected after a mudslide in North Korea caused by the recent storm.  &gt;  &gt;I created Zaher Ya Otsidela, it's rap oriented.  &gt;  &gt;33 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;34 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;A 2.8 earthquake has hit Cuba, it has been classified as a minor earthquake.  &gt;  &gt;0 people have died, and 0 have been affected.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new EP has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Prison life sold 5,915 copies.  &gt;  &gt;35 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Musora sold 2,496 copies.  &gt;  &gt;36 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I joined social media.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a wallet that I found, it contained 78.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I took their wallet.  &gt;  &gt;I shouted at them and they got aggressive.  &gt;  &gt;I have been attacked with a rolling pin .  &gt;  &gt;My breast was split .  &gt;  &gt;My toe was severed .  &gt;  &gt;My eyebrow was broken .  &gt;  &gt;I went to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;37 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;38 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;39 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Vertuhai sold 7,570 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a safe that I found, it contained 5,024.  &gt;  &gt;40 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I started smoking pina colada vapes.  &gt;  &gt;I won 26,453,026 in the lottery!  &gt;  &gt;I started having music lessons.  &gt;  &gt;I bought a house for 468,860.  &gt;  &gt;I had a party in my house.  &gt;  &gt;The police showed up and shut down the party.  &gt;  &gt;Pictures of me at the house party have been posted on social media.  &gt;  &gt;41 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I no longer have depression.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the clinic.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;I had a scar treatment.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I had a tummy tuck.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I had a face lift.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I had a neck lift.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I had a brow lift.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I had a hair transplant.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I had a tummy tuck.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I started speaking in public.  &gt;  &gt;42 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I started smoking gingerbread vapes.  &gt;  &gt;43 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I took too long getting drinks.  &gt;  &gt;44 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Pidoras sold 9,614 copies.  &gt;  &gt;45 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I saw my ex-partner, Sarah, in the club.  &gt;  &gt;I had a one night stand with Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;46 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My Father died at the age of 96 from natural causes.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Blyadstvo sold 9,915 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;47 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I spilt their drink in the club.  &gt;  &gt;48 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Suki sold 3,036 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a briefcase that I found, it contained 4,356.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I took their briefcase.  &gt;  &gt;I shouted at them and they got aggressive.  &gt;  &gt;I have been attacked with a broken bottle .  &gt;  &gt;My shoulder was lacerated .  &gt;  &gt;My calf was cut .  &gt;  &gt;My nostril was detached .  &gt;  &gt;My lip was torn .  &gt;  &gt;I went to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the clinic.  &gt;  &gt;I had a scar treatment.  &gt;  &gt;The procedure went well.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the clinic.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a briefcase that I found, it contained 1,650.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I took too long getting drinks.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a safe that I found, it contained 901.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I fell over in the toilet.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I saw my ex-partner, Sarah, in the club.  &gt;  &gt;I had a one night stand with Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;49 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a money clip that I found, it contained 59.  &gt;  &gt;50 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Wonderful hui sold 38,935 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;51 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;India has declared war on China.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Loli v pole has drawn people's attention! It sold 29,883 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I had a one night stand with Mariam.  &gt;  &gt;I started drinking tequila .  &gt;  &gt;52 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;53 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;A peace treaty has been issued which marks the end of the 2 year China-India War.  &gt;  &gt;26,674 lives were lost, and 87,348 were injured.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sosiska in bulki sold 14,148 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Oru s vas bitches was a mainstream breakthrough! It sold 58,051 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;54 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Surprise buttsex sold 13,786 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sweet pussy was a mainstream breakthrough! It sold 35,086 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I kept a safe that I found, it contained 7,462.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I took their safe.  &gt;  &gt;I shouted at them and they walked off.  &gt;  &gt;55 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Zazhigai sold 22,863 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Appeared on the compilation Egyptian Classics.  &gt;  &gt;Made 612.  &gt;  &gt;56 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Hell frozen was a mainstream breakthrough! It sold 78,193 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dripping cum sold 13,394 copies.  &gt;  &gt;The bouncers didn't let me in the club because I am too old.  &gt;  &gt;57 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Weewee sold 51,327 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I saw a film at the cinema.  &gt;  &gt;I adopted Yong.  &gt;  &gt;58 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Pipka drop sold 91,118 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sisechki sold 73,399 copies.  &gt;  &gt;59 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;160 people have died, and 489 have been affected after a flood hit Vietnam due to snow melting.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Suck my clit was a mainstream breakthrough! It sold 101,294 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Appeared on the compilation Rap -O-Rama.  &gt;  &gt;Made 4,109.  &gt;  &gt;60 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Lesbian rap sold 82,948 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Light Moves sold 112,268 copies.  &gt;  &gt;The bouncers didn't let me in the club because I am too old.  &gt;  &gt;61 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Boobies sold 103,606 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Darling, Remember Yesterday? sold 156,088 copies.  &gt;  &gt;62 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My son, Yong, graduated from secondary school.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Brave Song was a mainstream breakthrough! It sold 306,055 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Brave Song has been certified silver.  &gt;  &gt;Brave Song charted at number 9.  &gt;  &gt;I went on a cruise for 9 nights.  &gt;  &gt;Yong got a new job as a Marketing Scientist at Naughty Network .  &gt;  &gt;63 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Tune For No One sold 113,335 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Golden Game sold 177,834 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I am homosexual.  &gt;  &gt;64 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My son, Yong, graduated from college.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Out Of My Affection sold 112,502 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Love Dreams was a hit! It sold 140,262 copies.  &gt;  &gt;65 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Fantastic Feeling sold 175,152 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Midnight Chance sold 451,913 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Midnight Chance has been certified silver.  &gt;  &gt;Midnight Chance charted at number 10.  &gt;  &gt;66 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dance With My Panty sold 319,943 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dance With My Panty has been certified silver.  &gt;  &gt;Dance With My Panty charted at number 23.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dance Smile sold 491,117 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dance Smile has been certified silver.  &gt;  &gt;Dance Smile charted at number 21.  &gt;  &gt;Appeared on the compilation Rap Anthems.  &gt;  &gt;Made 2,187.  &gt;  &gt;67 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My son, Yong, graduated from university with a 2:2 in Public Health .  &gt;  &gt;I saw a prostitute on a street corner.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Days Of Tomorrow sold 417,861 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Days Of Tomorrow has been certified silver.  &gt;  &gt;Days Of Tomorrow charted at number 18.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Joy Of His Right sold 293,470 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Played at The Weekend.  &gt;  &gt;It had a crowd of 67,484 people, and I made 4,502.  &gt;  &gt;I was jailed for 1 years for soliciting a prostitute.  &gt;  &gt;I started serving my sentence in a prison.  &gt;  &gt;68 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I finished serving my sentence after 1 year(s).  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Date Of Heaven sold 679,927 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Date Of Heaven has been certified gold.  &gt;  &gt;Date Of Heaven charted at number 11.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, I'll Never Let You Go sold 695,250 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, I'll Never Let You Go has been certified gold.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, I'll Never Let You Go charted at number 18.  &gt;  &gt;Played at Wired Showcase .  &gt;  &gt;It had a crowd of 22,553 people, and I made 10,429.  &gt;  &gt;69 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;I Love He's Bad sold 706,950 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I Love He's Bad has been certified gold.  &gt;  &gt;I Love He's Bad charted at number 13.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I had a one night stand with Veronica.  &gt;  &gt;I have contracted genital warts.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the clinic.  &gt;  &gt;I no longer have genital warts.  &gt;  &gt;70 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Brave Romance was a hit! It sold 823,263 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Brave Romance has been certified gold.  &gt;  &gt;Brave Romance charted at number 12.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Love Tomorrow sold 768,987 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Love Tomorrow has been certified gold.  &gt;  &gt;Love Tomorrow charted at number 18.  &gt;  &gt;I wrote a song with Rana Arafa.  &gt;  &gt;It sold 1,664,796 copies, and I made 464,788.  &gt;  &gt;I bought a mansion for 2,372,931.  &gt;  &gt;I sold a house for 468,860.  &gt;  &gt;I had a party in my mansion.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I caught them stealing drinks.  &gt;  &gt;71 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I've become famous for having over a million followers on social media.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Era Of Freedom sold 922,134 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Era Of Freedom has been certified gold.  &gt;  &gt;Era Of Freedom charted at number 15.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Whispers  sold 1,462,988 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Whispers  has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Whispers  charted at number 3.  &gt;  &gt;I wrote a song with Amr Wawa.  &gt;  &gt;It sold 1,881,757 copies, and I made 129,074.  &gt;  &gt;72 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I've been diagnosed with influenza.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Baby, Maybe Tomorrow sold 1,399,841 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Baby, Maybe Tomorrow has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Baby, Maybe Tomorrow charted at number 7.  &gt;  &gt;I went to the hospital.  &gt;  &gt;I no longer have influenza.  &gt;  &gt;73 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Best For A Girl Like You was a hit! It sold 1,722,310 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Best For A Girl Like You has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Best For A Girl Like You charted at number 2.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Light Of Dance sold 1,356,673 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Light Of Dance has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Light Of Dance charted at number 3.  &gt;  &gt;I wrote a song with Daniel Ezenwa.  &gt;  &gt;It sold 832,984 copies, and I made 66,812.  &gt;  &gt;74 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Whispers Of A Dream sold 1,526,014 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Whispers Of A Dream has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Whispers Of A Dream charted at number 6.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You're Amazing sold 1,545,488 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You're Amazing has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You're Amazing charted at number 7.  &gt;  &gt;I went on a cruise for 5 nights.  &gt;  &gt;Even though I'm too old, the bouncers let me in the club because I am famous.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I saw my ex-partner, Sarah, in the club.  &gt;  &gt;I had a one night stand with Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I fell over in the toilet.  &gt;  &gt;Even though I'm too old, the bouncers let me in the club because I am famous.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I saw my ex-partner, Sarah, in the club.  &gt;  &gt;I'm now in a relationship with Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;I proposed to Sarah.  &gt;  &gt;Sarah accepted my marriage proposal!  &gt;  &gt;I got married to Sarah Moussa.  &gt;  &gt;The wedding cost 8,675.  &gt;  &gt;I booked a honeymoon to Brazil.  &gt;  &gt;I had a fantastic honeymoon in Brazil.  &gt;  &gt;75 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Get Her Panty sold 1,957,919 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Get Her Panty has been certified platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Get Her Panty charted at number 4.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sure Secrets was a hit! It sold 7,434,611 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Sure Secrets has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Sure Secrets charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I've become famous for a #1 record.  &gt;  &gt;I won 73,856,140 in the lottery!  &gt;  &gt;I bought a mansion for 1,912,701.  &gt;  &gt;Sarah moved in with me.  &gt;  &gt;I had a party in my mansion.  &gt;  &gt;76 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;They Can't Hold Us was a hit! It sold 18,110,954 copies.  &gt;  &gt;They Can't Hold Us has been certified diamond.  &gt;  &gt;They Can't Hold Us charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Honey, Come Back was a hit! It sold 12,007,006 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Honey, Come Back has been certified diamond.  &gt;  &gt;Honey, Come Back charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I failed my driving test.  &gt;  &gt;I passed my driving test after 2 attempt(s).  &gt;  &gt;I bought a car for 12,259.  &gt;  &gt;I went for a drive in my car.  &gt;  &gt;I went for a drive in my car.  &gt;  &gt;Someone threw a balloon at my car.  &gt;  &gt;The balloon bounced off of my car.  &gt;  &gt;77 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;I know I Love It sold 9,468,668 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I know I Love It has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;I know I Love It charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;I'll Be There For You sold 2,369,264 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I'll Be There For You has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;I'll Be There For You charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I went clubbing.  &gt;  &gt;I bought a mansion for 2,715,408.  &gt;  &gt;I had a party in my mansion.  &gt;  &gt;I got into an argument because I caught them shouting at furniture.  &gt;  &gt;78 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sweetie, You're My Everything sold 5,986,691 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Sweetie, You're My Everything has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Sweetie, You're My Everything charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;She Will Try was a hit! It sold 12,214,286 copies.  &gt;  &gt;She Will Try has been certified diamond.  &gt;  &gt;She Will Try charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;79 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Yong has moved out.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Broken Secrets was a hit! It sold 14,452,609 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Broken Secrets has been certified diamond.  &gt;  &gt;Broken Secrets charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You're Wild sold 6,939,833 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You're Wild has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You're Wild charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Appeared on the compilation Rap 's Not Dead.  &gt;  &gt;Made 3,589.  &gt;  &gt;80 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Open Her Labia was a hit! It sold 8,863,257 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Open Her Labia has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Open Her Labia charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Forget My Bed sold 7,627,815 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Forget My Bed has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Forget My Bed charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;81 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Change Her Memory sold 3,187,063 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Change Her Memory has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Change Her Memory charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sleep In Her Voice sold 9,704,049 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Sleep In Her Voice has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Sleep In Her Voice charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;82 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Tune Of Power sold 7,584,726 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Tune Of Power has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Tune Of Power charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Celebration For You sold 8,696,067 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Celebration For You has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Celebration For You charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;83 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Sweetie, Let's Party sold 3,894,194 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Sweetie, Let's Party has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Sweetie, Let's Party charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Kiss Her Echo sold 3,820,109 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Kiss Her Echo has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Kiss Her Echo charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;84 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;End Of Lazy Days sold 5,736,423 copies.  &gt;  &gt;End Of Lazy Days has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;End Of Lazy Days charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Baby, Let's Be Silly sold 8,179,769 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Baby, Let's Be Silly has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Baby, Let's Be Silly charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;With Your Heart was a hit! It sold 7,222,288 copies.  &gt;  &gt;With Your Heart has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;With Your Heart charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I wrote a song with Sarah Salib.  &gt;  &gt;It sold 543,056 copies, and I made 23,891.  &gt;  &gt;85 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;My partner died at the age of 84 from natural causes.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Open Up To My Pussy was a hit! It sold 4,695,721 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Open Up To My Pussy has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Open Up To My Pussy charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;86 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;A pipe has burst in my mansion.  &gt;  &gt;A 6.2 earthquake has hit Costa Rica, it has been classified as a strong earthquake.  &gt;  &gt;151 people have died, and 900 have been affected.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Tune Of Fame was a hit! It sold 13,532,021 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Tune Of Fame has been certified diamond.  &gt;  &gt;Tune Of Fame charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;I Love It was a hit! It sold 8,739,903 copies.  &gt;  &gt;I Love It has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;I Love It charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I called a plumber to repair the pipe.  &gt;  &gt;The plumber fixed the leak.  &gt;  &gt;I had to pay 5,181 to repair the property from water damage.  &gt;  &gt;87 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Last Secrets sold 9,965,501 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Last Secrets has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Last Secrets charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You Broke My Heart sold 4,074,782 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You Broke My Heart has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Dear Idiot, You Broke My Heart charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;88 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;He thinks She Knows was a hit! It sold 7,713,053 copies.  &gt;  &gt;He thinks She Knows has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;He thinks She Knows charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Come With Me sold 7,810,002 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Come With Me has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Come With Me charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;89 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Dance With Her Name sold 4,497,593 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Dance With Her Name has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Dance With Her Name charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Heart Of Yesterday sold 3,173,026 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Heart Of Yesterday has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Heart Of Yesterday charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I wrote a song with Mido Tammam.  &gt;  &gt;It sold 28,979 copies, and I made 4,996.  &gt;  &gt;90 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Norway has declared war on Poland.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Best Money sold 7,557,863 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Best Money has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Best Money charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Best Of My Thoughts sold 6,506,860 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Best Of My Thoughts has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Best Of My Thoughts charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;91 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Getting Her Way was a hit! It sold 7,742,030 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Getting Her Way has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Getting Her Way charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Appeared on the compilation Legends Of Rap .  &gt;  &gt;Made 1,932.  &gt;  &gt;92 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;She knows He Loves You sold 7,812,347 copies.  &gt;  &gt;She knows He Loves You has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;She knows He Loves You charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;Appeared on the compilation InstRap.  &gt;  &gt;Made 1,932.  &gt;  &gt;93 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Zaher Ya Otsidela's new album has been released.  &gt;  &gt;Don't Need My Door sold 8,613,386 copies.  &gt;  &gt;Don't Need My Door has been certified multi-platinum.  &gt;  &gt;Don't Need My Door charted at number 1.  &gt;  &gt;I wrote a song with Omar Zaghloul.  &gt;  &gt;It sold 1,916,858 copies, and I made 167,897.  &gt;  &gt;94 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;Indonesia has intervened in the Poland-Norway War.  &gt;  &gt;The Poland-Norway War has escalated into The Polish War.  &gt;  &gt;95 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;96 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;97 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;There was a fire in my Mansion.  &gt;  &gt;Bahamas has intervened in The Polish War.  &gt;  &gt;Played at VXT Gathering .  &gt;  &gt;It had a crowd of 91,218 people, and I made 17,569.  &gt;  &gt;I managed to put out the fire.  &gt;  &gt;I disbanded Zaher Ya Otsidela.  &gt;  &gt;98 Years Old  &gt;  &gt;I died.So, you got to the end of it? Congratulations! I hope you enjoyed it. Now, let's get to some explanations. Sarah's rap brand name, Zaher Ya Otsidela, is a silly play on her surname. Thing is, there's the word "хер" in Russian, pronounced as... well, about the same way you would pronounce the "Her" in "Heracles". It's transliterated as "her" as well. It basically means "dick", but it's a lot more tame than the more famous "хуй" ("hui"). Sarah's surname, Zaher, can be interpreted as "why the heck" or "what the frick for" in Russian (compare "какого хуя?", "what/why the fuck?", literally meaning "by which dick?"). Zaher Ya Otsidela, therefore, is a transliteration of "what the frick did I go to jail for". Her songs' names are more or less a play on Russian chanson, or blatnyak - a music genre romanticizing crime and prison life, with songs written by former criminals or their friends, which became popular in the 90s with the collapse of the USSR and a surge of chaos and criminal activity. At first I wanted to play Sarah as this careless criminal girl - you can see she cheated on her lover, Sarah Moussa, and often hit the streets to beat up random people. She would've served only one year, but decided to start riots and attempt escape, which made her sentence extended more and more. I didn't have any plan in mind when I created the Z.Y.O. brand, just that it would be another fun and rebellious thing for her to do. The songs' names pretty much reflect that. Winning the lottery was totally unexpected, as was her brand getting popular. After a while I got tired and let the game's random name generator come up with some names. I couldn't believe my eyes when I saw Sarah Moussa at the club again. I was reluctant and unsure if I want to go any further, but decided to hit on her a few times. Bouncers not letting Ms. Zaher in due to old age was annoying, but I eventually got famous enough to bypass that and meet her ex-lover again. I'm 100% sure now that the mysterious "Dear Idiot" that started appearing in her albums was, in fact, Sarah Moussa. They got married, and I was so happy for them. When Moussa died, I was shocked to see that a few years later the game came up with "Dear Idiot, You Broke My Heart" for an album. At that point it was breaking *my* heart. When Sarah hit 97, she played at VXT Gathering. I decided that was enough and it would be her goodbye performance. She was getting too old for this. So I disbanded Z.Y.O. and... the next year she died. Once again, the RNG couldn't have been more perfect. I was ready to cry. And this concludes my fond memories and experience with Sarah's life. Going into this, I never expected my minor attempt at making a silly, horny and rebellious character would turn into such a strong and beautiful love story. To this day I can't believe how the stars aligned for all that to happen. Thank you for reading and have a wonderful day! [info] None [info] 1573324064
medinaiscool [info] Similar situation. Except 21 and happened this past September. I hadn’t moved from my bed the past month so my friend took me to the hospital. I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD. I thought my parents would be furious with me but they weren’t. My dad is out to find and murder him, I’m worried he will. [info] None [info] 1544127465
Throwaway34qwas [info] I'm heading to University soon, I feel like I'm going to be a complete loner. Any tips to 'break out my shell'? Hey all, so earlier in the year I made the desicion to head to Uni for a TV Production course, I've got accomodation and student finance sorted, I just need to wait on further details from the University for comformation on rooms etc.To try put it simply I was diagnosed with depression a couple of years ago when I was hospitalised after me and a few friends got mugged, after I was discharged these friends used the whole situation to publically say how much of a pathetic piece of shit I am and just left. I didn't really have anyone after that, I struggled to make friends, I just became withdrawn and for about 4 years I was just lonely, with shades of bitterness and the still ongoing depression, but I tried to keep optimistic.I ended up choosing to go to College, I studied in 3 different classes (Art &amp; Design L2, Media L2, Media L3) to try get my life back in shape, I was mostly alienated and avoided by most people because of what happened. Outside of college I somehow managed to get into two relationships, both times I ended up getting used, cheated on and thrown aside because there was always 'someone better'; this and everything else just kept building up and I became a lot more bitter, I stopped really trying to fit in or make jokes, I was just constantly angry for a really long time.In my final year or L3 Media I managed to make a friendship with a girl who was in another class, over the next couple of months my course ended and I decided to take a gap year and we just still kept talking daily, but with everything that's happened I just still felt absolutely miserable, I see her about every two weeks but just nothing in life just makes me happy as it used to.I'm hoping with me going away to University me being in somewhere new will somehow detox these shitty feelings, but I'm just scared; Scared I'll just be the same person, scared I'll end up being alone again, scared I'll fuck everything up again, scared It's going to be just like college again.If I do head there and somehow get invited to go to a party I'd go, I'm not really a fan of raves or whatever but I'd still go, I just want to be happy and enjoy my time there.I'm really sorry for the long rant, I hope someone out there understands. [info] None [info] 1464451759
Mokohi [info] Feeling Empty Lately, I feel so empty, like something is missing. My daily life is monotonous and boring, and I lack the means to change that right now. Things still make me smile or laugh, I can still feel, but there's always this feeling just below the surface that nothing I do is going to change anything, that nothing really matters. I don't know how else to put it, just this haunting feeling that something is always missing. I'm diagnosed with depression and I take meds for it. Is there anything I can do to make this feeling subside? [info] None [info] 1569264557
Mattie_Smith [info] I am always tired. I am always tired. Nearly every moment I am awake I feel the physical desire to crawl into bed and go back to sleep. I nap during the day, and that makes me unable to fall asleep at night despite feeling exhausted. Even the days when I don't nap I always go to bed at 11 only to wake up at 2am and lie awake until 5am. Because of this I have missed many 9am classes because I am too tired, so tired that I don't even reember turning off my alarm clock. And even if I manage to get a full night's sleep (which I havent in 3 weeks) I still feel tired all day.I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago and have been taking medication, but this problem persisted even before then, since highschool in fact, and I am now an undergrad. I know the depression plays a role, but I can't fight the exhaustion despite getting the proper treatment. I was tested for narcilepsy in a sleep lab and for lyme disease via blood test, but they found nothing wrong with me. They still gave me a prescription of aderall to try to stay awake, but weight loss problems had me switch to a less powerful medication which helps, but not as much.Tonight I am pulling another all-nighter to finish a project I felt too tired to do this past week. I know procrastination is a part of the problem, but I feel that it all stems from my poor sleep. I installed twilight on my phone and flux on my laptop, which helps a little, and I am otherwise decently healthy, though I do not exercise as much as I used to.I have thought of every possible reason for why I have this eternal fatigue, but I can't help but look around and think "Everyone else in my college is the same: shitty diet, stress, lack of exercise. Why am I the only one that feels this way, and why can't I just sleep normal?" It makes me feel like I am insane, to have nothing wrong with me and still be so weak as to nap everyday, skip classes I actually enjoy, and refuse to do homework on the grounds that "I am too tired to do anything (even fun things like video games or reading)".I don't know. I have been feeling more depressed than usual this past month, but I can't tell if that is a because of the constant napping, or maybe it is a symptom of lack of sleep and failure to be disciplined and do my work and attend class. Maybe I should go see a counselor again. I don't want to drop out. I love my school, and I love learning. I won't do it. But what can I do? Just live my life forever on the verge of sleeping, and then never sleep? I feel sedated from the joy I could be having in life, things I could be doing, places I could be going, friends I could be making. I feel like I am withering away, building myself up, then withering away again, almost like a never-ending cycle of one step forward and 2 steps back. I'm scared that I am doing something wrong that makes me feel this way, and even more scared of what it would mean for my future if I am not. [info] None [info] 1459327275
feelingdivorcey [info] Husband just declared divorce - this is day 2 since he left. Trying not to self destruct.... This is a [cross post](http://www.reddit.com/r/Divorce/comments/1hkmyq/doomed_from_the_start_now_feeling_very_scared/) from r/divorce.  I am just alone all day today with no one to talk to.  I keep trying to dwell on the things about him that drove me nuts:  his getting mad at me for watching shows without him even though I would always happily watch it again with him, how he felt that I was a princess, his antisocial behavior with my family, his judgements, the time I told him I was grabbing a drink with a new (girl) friend at work and how he got mad at me for not asking him first, how he would randomly go through my phone....I think the best part about all of this is that I don't have to worry about crying hysterically anymore since it was a staple in our relationship bc of the things he has said.  I am afraid of being alone.  I just went to the doctor and found out my weight - I gained 30 pounds since I met him. I have been diagnosed with depression.  I have no friends - but I am working on the friendship with the girl from work. I don't want to burden her though. And I still will see my therapist every week.Twox - what is your take on all this?  Any words of wisdom? Comfort?  Anything helps.  I feel so numb I haven't cried yet over this.Edit:  I keep replaying the last "scene" between us.  It is killing me - I was right to get angry right?  His words felt like daggers and his contention that he had done nothing wrong was crazy making.  This was the exact scene:He comes through the door to find me applying to jobs on the computer.  I am in a good mood bc I had just been to my therapist.  He tells me how he had such a nice time at his mom's house and that "everyone" was there.  This was a subtle jab at me since I told him that sometimes I don't feel like going to his mom's (he trapped me into confessing this btw).  That night I just couldn't make it due to my therapist appointment and bc I needed to apply to other jobs.  He then starts asking me what I had planned for my kid (15 yrs old) brother the next night.  I responded by saying I hadn't thought of it but it will be late when I picked him up as he is 1.5 hrs away.  I said I wasn't sure what to do at the 9 pm hr - probably just get some food and hang out st home with the new kitty (my brother loves animals and has never met my kitten).I asked if he had any suggestions since he felt I should have planned something to which he replied that he had already planned the next day and shouldn't have to plan the night before.  I replied saying I wasn't looking for plans - just wanted to know what he thought there was to do that late since I clearly wasn't thinking outside the box.  He just kept saying he didn't want to plan.  We went round in circles until he said how I had a weird relationship with my brother - that I didn't seem to want to plan anything with him.  This led to me being extremely upset and I tried to reason with him telling him that this hurt my feelings. He insisted he had done nothing wrong.  I blew up at him bc I felt the old feelings of subtle manipulation rise again.  He would often say nasty stuff to me but follow it up with "it's the truth, how can you be mad?"Through tears and sobs I told him that I couldn't take the criticisms anymore - that if he was going to speak to me that way that he knew where the door was. He took me up on that and we haven't spoken since.  I had just had enough of the judgements and guilt trips.  Was I justified? Am I nuts?Edit 2:  I just remembered a fabulously embarrassing and heart wrenching argument about porn.  I told him when we met that I watched it as a single gal.  He had "caught" me watching (and by caught I mean saw Internet history) on my computer but he had noticed it was on dates that I was on my business trips or one day it was on a night we had broken up. He confronted me when he found this on my computer, made me feel ashamed and embarrassed.  Told me that when we had kids he didn't want them stumbling on my porn sites bc I hadn't done a good enough job hiding my tracks.  Furthermore, He said he didn't feel that it should be part of a relationship - it was fine for single life nut not fine for married life.  We fought and fought and eventually I "got my way" (his favorite phrase) and he succumbed to having porn in his married life.......at which point he would declare that he was going to go watch it while I was home since it was now allowed.  I would not have had a problem with that though I never watched it except for when I was alone - but I could tell he was doing it to "teach me a lesson.". He contends that he has "changed" by allowing porn to be part of his married life.Edit 3:  none of this has really worked.  No amount of vilifying him has made me feel better.  I am finally starting to cry.  I feel so incredibly alone.  All I can think of is how it felt when he held me tight and told me everything was alright. I am breaking down so hard right now. [info] None [info] 1372977313
runey30012 [info] Help/Experiences with Borderline Personality Disorder I've dealt with mental issues for a while, and for the most part chalked it up as depression, but recently I looked into borderline personality disorder, while I was reading about something else, and I've displayed nearly every symptom of it for as long as I've been diagnosed with depression. Now I realize this isn't a formal diagnosis, and I am actively seeking help on this topic, but I was curious if anyone had advice, or could share their own experiences regarding this issue. Specifically, anything involving romantic relationships or finding some sort of a solid sense of self and purpose.&amp;#x200B;Thank you. [info] None [info] 1551316560
ThatICanTellYou [info] It was the first time that a doctor told me to drop my trousers so he could fondle my balls to turn and cough.  I was like, WTF, so I said no, then I was diagnosed with depression.   [info] None [info] 1486870697
Aluzky [info] &gt; Having read one of Aluzky´s recent posts in which he confesses his inability to connect to humans, I´m now convinced that Aluzky is suffering from a mental disorder located in the autism spectrum.You are not a doctor. And I have been with psychologists and I have never been diagnosed with autism. &gt; That would at least explain his robot-like discussion stylePretty sure that is cased by me having a high IQ. Take for example the  Big Bang Theory states how Sheldon acts, his acting is imitating the acting of some real life intelligent people. &gt; the self perceived grandezzaSorry, but if you see "grandezza" in me, that is your imagination.&gt; his total and complete naiveté Subjective opinion unless you can be more specific and give evidence. &gt;  his inability to understand "metaspeech"What the hell is that?&gt; taking everything literallyBecause everything should be taken as parody or satire? Sorry, but if you are going to use parody or satire, you have to specify that you are doing those, else, people will take your comments literally. POE's LAW.  (google it)&gt; his obvious problems to understand the moral implications of his fencehopping actions and many more of Aluzky´s trademark "perks".What problems? I'm against fence hopping and i have never fence hopped because I understand that it is unacceptable to do that.&gt; I´m quite sure there is some fundamental issue with him, strongly pointing to APD (autistic personality disorder).Again, l you are not a doctor, you can't diagnose people over comments and IO have been with psychologists and i don't qualify for any disorders or autism. &gt; To "use", to "exploit" is his only way of interaction, he doesn´t even seem to be able to grasp the concept of deeply felt love due to his emotional numbness that is quite typical for non mild autists.False attribution fallacies.You are making a version of me in YOUR IMAGINATION that does not correspond with the REAL me.&gt; Of course I´m not a studied psychologist or psychiatrist, but I´ve read quite a lot about psychoanalysis and psychotherapy and recognise certain behavioural elements that definitely hint at what I suggest here. And that´s basically all that I have left to say about Aluzky. And this is why you are not a psychologist or psychiatrist. You suck at it. &gt; He´s a poor guy unaware of the fact he has this mental disorder. Again, I have been with psychologists and I have never been diagnosed with autism. I have been diagnosed with depression and attention deficit disorder (caused by the depression) in my younger years and that is all.&gt; Promiscuity and mechanistical sexuality, Because doing those are crimes? Face it, you have a problem with sex and you are trying to blame me for stuff that is on your side. You are a sexual prude. And we don't have to be like you, we will have fun being the opposite of you, if you don't like it, cry me a river.&gt; not feeling any remorse for the owners whose dogs he fucks...Remorse for what? Is not like I'm raping/abusing their dogs. &gt; it all points straight towards my diagnosis.Your non-medical made up imaginary diagnosis. [info]  [info] 1506721425
thesexualninja [info] I was diagnosed with depression and given Zoloft. I used Zoloft for a month and quit because of the strange side effect of feeling like a zombie. So I was depressed again. I ate some mushrooms and had a fantastic 4 hours of laughter and very deep introspection. I reevuated how I treat others and how I view the world. I thought about how good my life is compared to most other people on this planet. It now seems hilarious to think that I was depressed. I have been eating mushrooms every few months for almost a decade. They are such a good life guide.  [info] None [info] 1344724805
zoom_to_earth [info] I'm so sorry you're suffering. I really wish I had some good advice. I didn't want to read and just not say anything. Know that you're not alone. I was diagnosed with depression over a decade ago (as a child) and I still struggle with it daily.Please don't give up. We are still young. I have hope that science will invent new medicines that actually work for our depression.Feeling numb feelings and even death is something I'm sure many here relate to.You are worth it. Don't give up. Things can get better, it just feels like forever. Just try to survive this moment.I hope others have some advice.  [info] None [info] 1533078894
depthandbloom [info] I believe it's not normal, but I was diagnosed with depression some years ago and wanting to punch walls when I was upset was one of the the things that made me realize I was. I didn't know why I wanted to, and knew it wouldn't make me *actually* feel better, but in the end I felt like I had lost control of my life and I just needed to do something at that moment to make me feel I was control of *anything*, even if it were destructive to myself or things I own. Obviously that thinking was completely ass\-backwards, so I went to a doctor and got help. I haven't felt that way in a long time now. [info] None [info] 1526594489
Igorcryr [info] I am diagnosed with depression but I've been through a lot of depressive reading and thinking already. I think I can do another visit to the valley of shadow of death [info] None [info] 1503687284
M_R_Hellcat [info] Breaking the cycle? I had done a little research project a few years ago for school about narcolepsy and something has always bugged me. Before I was diagnosed with narcolepsy, I was diagnosed with depression(which I did/do legitimately have). Through out the years I have had several doctors shove antidepressants at me as a cure all. None of them have worked. During my beginning research into narcolepsy after being diagnosed, I read an article that said 80% of people with narcolepsy have depression. So my question is: if narcolepsy causes sleepiness and depression causes sleepiness, then how do you/can you break the cycle? And how does a person who doesn't respond to antidepressants go about it? [info] None [info] 1508776042
shmeeshmooshmaa [info] Wait do u actually have depression or were u just saying that to find a way out of trouble. Cause don't do that. I was diagnosed with depression at 11 years old. I ran away from home twice for about 1/2 an hour and I know someone who's sister commuted suicide due to depression. Pls don't use this as an excuse if u don't have depression.Edit: Once I also held a knife to my chest and often thought of killing myself cause I was constantly bullied for the past 2 years. It's been 3 years and nothing has changed from the way the kid treats me. I've punched him in the face 2 times and punched him in the stomach once. My mum has spoken to his mum and still. No change. I do not have depression anymore but it still upsets me that this kid would give no fucks about how he affected me until he realised that I killed myself cause of him. Well at least he didn't have to find out the hard way how much he had hirt me. [info] None [info] 1459250549
beemerbenzbently [info] Thanks OP for linking this video. I was diagnosed with depression today and safe to say today was a bad day.  this video has been the only thing that made me smile the whole day. The sheer power and force of the rocket engines is just amazing next best thing to actually being thier. Thanks again  [info] None [info] 1518166521
yoshida18 [info] After 9 years of depression, i could only finally start fighting it after i went to a health sanitorium,i got out august 01 and it is the first month of my (not as a kid) life that i  dont feel depressed. I did not even know how it was. This became a HUGE POST  but i will be glad if you are interested and read it.I was diagnosed with depression when i was 15 and started taking meds. I personally think it started when i was 12.I made Age, Month, year. Ex : 13 ( YO ) , March, 201313, january - 2008 - met a girl who became my first love, and soon an obcession15 - june, 2009 - started smoking, having insomnia, i always did decent in school but i started strugling alot, sleeping in most classes, went away from my friends.16-   july, 2010- Changed schools and home ( i was in the class and nextdoor neigbor with this girl ) - i was already to fucking depressed, i beraly made it in my second year in highschool and it was completly lonely17 -  jan, 2011 - girl moves to my school, my class, i assume she is after me, get hopes up, we start something that never got of the start. By june i droped high school,  just could not see this girl everyday. After i droped highschool obviously my relationship with my mother ( my only family ) went downhill , i tried to commit suicide this year .18, june 2012- This is when i started binge drinking, moved to a tiny kitnet i lived alone and payed by my dad ( who i saw last time when i was 5 ) child suport ( i think that is called, here in brasil go until 24 if studying). Here i was desperatly trying to get over the girl, i will call her L.20 - 2014 - I had a few short relationships with woman but realized i have issues on the subject. Finally got accepted on the Uni i always wanted for history, i was already in if i did not fail the last year. went back to my mothers house because i realized i was not even close to being an adult and needed help.22- 2016- first 4 semesters in UNI i fail 90% of the subjects even tought i really think i want history. Every semester i start great, start going downhill and by the end of the semester i dont do the final exam / paper and fail. Some teachers passed me by pitty ( i did not even ask ).22 - june - 2016 - remember the girl, L? yeah she is back in my life since my 20ths when we both were in a year long relationship (with other people) that seemed stable, so we both tought it would be safe reaproaching. She studied social politics in my uni, we agreed in taking one course together ( history of extreme orient - japan, vietnam, china and india basicaly ) It is magicaly the only course in the entire uni i get a 10, i still get amused by this irony. We saw each other 2 days a week 4h~6h than spent the rest of the evening until 10 in uni just talking, it was chil until mid june when  something triggered me and i just felt everything i ever felt for her again, flooding my mind, with the same intensity.23 - from the june 2016 to january 2017, we were going out alot, realizing we are to adults now, we can make the past be the past and makes things work, i really believed i could. But it was impossible, i made hell out of her life until she decided to cut me off definetly ( first time in the 9 years we know eachother )   It was hell, did not even sign to UNI that semester, stayed from january to june in my bed, did not have energy to do anything. In june i realized i was never going to get better like that, i was  more dead than alive. I talk to my psichologist ( same for 4 years, i trusted him ) and psychiatrist ( trusted her to ) and we made the decision that the best thing for me would be interned in a sanitorium.  It was the best decision in my life. I was there from june 19 until august 01, and i could understand myself so much better, i could understand the reasons why everything happened. The sanitorium was in a rural area, had a swiming pool, ping-pong table, soccer and volley fields. The food was great, it was a beatuful place and the most important thing. The staff treated you like a human being. We spent our time working the land, doing group therapy ( at least 1x per day ), some activities like music/art/sculpture ... and in the free time talked to each other ( and with therapist, or nurses ) and everybody was amazing, when you know you are hurt and every one else there is to, you have an atmosphere that people help each other. I Learned with an crack addict, made a deep bond with a former alcoholic 53 years old, drunk driver that almost killed a man and mained him for life. I played ping-pong with him everyday, he did 1 year in prision and his wife managed to get him the rest of the time ( more 2 years ) in a mental health sanitorium, after some weeks i realized this dude was rotting in guilt from the inside. The moment i told him "You acted like a man and had your punishment, most people would just run away from the responsability. I bet even your god already forgave you, the only thing you need is to forgive yourself". I said that in group therapy and instantly realized it would fit perfectly into my life. This is way to big, But well, it has beed 42 days since im back into the world, i decided to drop uni and take a year to myself. A year to learn how to dedicate to things and to take care of my health. I made a book list of 100 books that i am reading like it is my job ( at least 30 h/week ) and writing a novel i began in january and i am actually loving it. I made 2 creative writing courses this month and the teacher liked me and suddently i am in groups with writers that make that for a living discussing ideas. It is actually the first time i realized i can maybe make a living of this.  Besides that, SPORTS, i stoped smoking 2 weeks before i got out of the clinic, went straight into jogging every day and now started a tennis class here in my uni that is really cheap.For the first time i have goals, i have what i want to do, i love life. I still fucking think of that girl every single day but it is just a feeling, i am finally moving the fuck on.Of course, all this was only possible because my mother supported me and is financially stable. I am from brasil and my health insurance covered ALL OF MY SANITORIUM FEES ( would be 300k reais/100k dollars ) and it is only possible to stay one year without work because my mother will suport me ( emotionally and economically )this became huge, if a single person reads im happy :) [info] None [info] 1505269986
alexgduarte [info] And things went south... again. So, I have been diagnosed with depression in January 2016 and have been taking Sertraline since February (likely to change this month/next month). I don't study in my home country (Portugal), rather, I study in the UK. I've passed my 1st year (with a conceded pass, but I did) and everything should be great, but it isn't. Each passing day, I become more cynical. I used to believe politics can be changed for the better (literally, thanks, Obama), but I've become cynical. I used to believe in romantic love (thanks to Alain de Botton I don't anymore) and I have been alone for the past 5 years. Either I'm ugly as fuck or... I don't even know the alternative. I've started to become more like House and Frank Underwood, i.e., pragmatical.But, on top of all this, I was happy to be back to the UK... until yesterday. A girl I met in August there was really nice and genuine, but... I found out she started dating a few days ago - there's nothing I could have done it, I wasn't there. I never had a change and it sucks.Also, I'm now starting to dislike my flatmates, as I feel the feeling wasn't mutual (I really liked them). [info] None [info] 1474034222
OldUglyHag [info] I don't like my Mother. I think I'm only writing here to get my thoughts in order, or validation that I'm not entirely rotten or, most likely, in hope you'll give me a good old fashioned talking to.Sorry, allow me to introduce myself, OldUglyHag (Please don't let the name put you off, you don't have to feel about me the way I do) and I'm WRONG. I know I'm not the only one round these here parts, my sympathies to you all.Now saying I'm WRONG is a big statement so let me tell you a little about why I am wrong.First I went and got myself conceived. That's right my JNMum didn't want a third child so it's my fault that I exist. I don't think getting rid of me was an option and I might have turned out to be another boy. Which brings us to-Second: I am a girl. She hates girls with a passion. Don't you understand she's the only female allowed in her husband/sons life.Third: I wasn't born properly, that's my fault too. I came out 'sunny side up' as I've since heard it called, and I was red from bruising on my face and I was wrong to not be a pretty baby. (No sympathy for newborn with damaged face).I could go on but the list is never ending, I was wrong for being left handed; for taking the attention away from her blue-eyed-boy, my second brother, you call him the golden child; wrong wrong wrong.I grew up and was still wrong but now much of the wrongness was due to how I'd been treated. You see, if no-one else was in the house I didn't exist. If I dared enter a room where she was the CBF (thanks for that description, it pleases me) was massive, she wouldn't say a word. If I tried to speak I was told to go and play in my room. She fed me the main meal but other meals I had to make sure I was there or I missed out. Thankfully when I was five, my Dad got reading to click for me and I would spend most my life in bed reading. We were abroad at the time, my brothers at boarding school, and I read every book available over and over, mine, my brothers' even some of hers.When people came and visited though, God forbid she wasn't seen as the perfect mother, I had to be wonderful. I would be admonished with those words written in my brain, 'Don't be silly Ugly, you're not shy.' The truth was I didn't know what to say, I was hardly ever spoken too. Anyway as I said the list goes on and on from me being the butt of every cruel joke when my brothers were around which taught them that that was what I was there for (I don't blame them) and pointing out to them that I was a girl and therefore could not do things they did, like build snowmen, climb trees, play outside.My Dad had one purpose as I got older, listen to her complaints about me and pass them on, well it's not like she could tell me herself - I didn't exist when no-one was there.That's a little the background and now to why I'm feeling confused and a bit unsure. Due to things beyond my control I lost contact with my parents two years ago (long story and this is long enough already). I was diagnosed with depression among other things and the last time I'd seen them she had slipped and made one of her disparaging comments in front of someone. My son. He'd driven me. We left the house not long after to my Dad's concern and the first thing past my son's lips was 'Coo, what a bitch!' (Hooray its not just me- he didn't use those words exactly by the way but people might be offended by the term he actually used- he's an adult and allowed to use whatever language he fancies.) I will point out that during those two years of ghosting them they had my mobile number (cell phone I think for y'all across the pond) so the fact that my land line was down did not stop them contacting me if they wanted.)At Christmas I finally received a letter with their contact details (part of that long story I mentioned is my phone reverted to factory settings and I lost all saved data) so I called. Had a good chat with Dad, we get on great he's one of those people who always make me smile despite his faults, and he tells me Mum has been diagnosed with Alzheimers. I'm not surprised, (as I said the last time I saw her she had lost her filter and spoken in front of DS). Since then I've talked to her on the phone a couple of times.She is confusing me. Now dementia is a horrible thing, and all my experiences of it so far (I worked in a hospital) had people upset about knowing they were forgetting things or frustrated. My mother is giggling about it. Not just giggling but stopping and correcting herself as she's about to say the right thing so she says the wrong thing instead. Now I'm feeling mean but she has a history of faking illness and symptoms when she wants attention (you should read the list of things she got wrong with her when my Dad was diagnosed with non-hodgkins lymphona- she is the only person I know who put on weight while vomiting and pooping aggressively as she said she was) So while I do think she has the onset of Alzheimers I do think she's delighting in exaggerating symptoms to keep my Dad running around appeasing her. Something when talking to her sometimes just feels “off” whereas other times the diagnosis seems spot on.They want me to visit. They'll pay but I don't know that I can do it without falling apart. I want to see my Dad but he pushes me onto her all the time. He knows I don't want to speak to her but hands the phone over. Two weeks ago he was asking if I liked [city] where I live and will I ever move. I didn't think of it at the time but now realise he was fishing to see if he could get me to move in with them. (Thankfully DD1 who's spine is shiny as fresh cut diamond told me NO.)I've no-one to talk to really without sounding like a bitch having a go at a poor sick old woman. I hate myself for the doubts. I want to be there for Dad but I want to tell her exactly what she did to me. It's pointless, too late, she'll not remember and be able to call me names etc without repercussions because it will be blamed on her condition. She will continue to deny, lie and defy as she has when I said things in the past.Sorry this is so long. Sorry for no happy ending. Sorry for wanting to curl up, die and leave the whole stupid mess to someone else. If you've got this far, thank-you for reading.TL:DR Left it too late to get any resolution and please sort/cut out horrible people before it's too late. [info] None [info] 1517965452
TetrisMcKenna [info] When I was diagnosed with depression, the NHS therapist actually recommended mindfulness meditation first and foremost. I went down the medicine route twice, for over a year each time, both times I felt better for a short time then got much worse. It was only when I got off the medicine the second time and started practicing meditation daily that I really saw any benefits or changes, and like the author, it hasn't reared its ugly head to date. Current medical knowledge still doesn't really understand depression or the medicine it uses to treat it, which isn't very much more effective than placebo. CBT therapy is pretty good, but it is effectively a type of mindfulness.Meditation taught me that I'm not my thoughts, and developed the part of my brain that can let thoughts just pass by. Before that, rumination was my entire life, and ignoring thoughts was impossible - they consumed me and sapped my energy and will to live. I really think meditation saved my life - I was very close to suicide and this was my last option. Yes, go to a doctor, yes explore all avenues - but my message to any depressed people reading this is don't give up until you've tried a few months of consistent meditation practice. It really can work wonders.  [info] None [info] 1422604872
MarshanInvaders [info] On the Road Back to a Better Place, Slowly but Surely So maybe someone has remembered me posting here and most probably don't. I was diagnosed with depression when I was about 13 years old. I tried therapy and medication but it didn't help so I figured I just needed to "man up" and get over it. I've been struggling with depression since then and has only gotten worse, especially considering the last 6 months. I was finally out on my own, making money, paying bills, being an adult and all at once, I had the rug ripped out from underneath me. I was being treated like shit at home, my rent was raised as my hours at work went down and I didn't have much of a leg to stand on. It forced me to move back with my parents which made me feel like an absolute failure. I thought about suicide on nearly a daily basis wondering, "Do is it really matter if I keep going at this point?" Finally one day, my mom, with her motherly instincts got the truth out of me, that I was lonely, depressed, and had nothing to live for. I made the effort to reach out and get help. I went to do the doctors and got help for not only my depression but also my insomnia which I also thought was a "Suck it up" type of problem. As someone who has lived with depression for over 6 years, I hope that anyone going through it will understand one thing. Things will not get better unless you want them to get better.You will not get better because someone will like you better, or someone is making you, or anything of the sort. You have to reach out and be better.I can't be someone who says, "Oh, I got medication and now everything is just amazing," because that would be bullshit. I am still lonely, I am still sad, and I am still scared of the world around me but I can look at and say, "I'm going to get better, all I need is time and (apologies for being cliche) think happy thoughts."So please, if you are depressed, suicidal, lonely, or otherwise just sad, make sure you are ready to change and be open to help because you can't do it on your own. You need the people around you and the people who care about you to get you through. And if you feel like you don't have anyone, reach out to me, reach out to any and all that would be more than happy to see you get better. Best of luck to you all, and hopefully, with all due respect, this will be my last post on depression. [info] None [info] 1363219890
saguarocharles [info] First time adult ADHD diagnosis for a 25y/o Male. Any experience with depression co-morbidity or can tell me about your Vyvanse experience? Hi all, TL;DR: Dealing with rumination/decent mood swings, nervous to take vyvanse as it was prescribed to me very quickly.My brain has undergone a lot of chemical changes recently. I quit smoking weed altogether, down from smoking constantly. I'm exercising and I've cut out drinking as well. I've been diagnosed with depression, which has been on and off for a couple years. Currently I'm taking Lexapro 20mg, and this time around I've decided to seek counseling, as the ruminations can get pretty bad.After just 2 sessions, a clear pattern of behavior in my past has been emerging. Here's some examples:-Hyperfocus on the courtship aspect of a relationship, then falling apart a year or two into said relationship.-Left college after 3 years for a job, would do well on tests but could never do the homework. Once I learn something I struggle to see the need to repeat it over and over (more common with high school assignments)-High scores on Impulsivity, frivolous spending of money being just one example-Inability to carry friendship over the years, definitely extroverted and love being social but very few long term friends-Constant music in my head, I mean when I'm not able to focus on something, there's is ALWAYS a song playing in my head. This subreddit actually helped me see that this is not entirely uncommon.-Hobby hopping: In the past couple of years I've been into climbing, running, hiking, guitar, biking, snowboarding, I bought a skateboard but haven't tried it, I buy books I never read or read about 50 pages of, the list goes onCan you relate to any of these?Well today, I saw a psych and his main concern was that I am able to focus on my work and then we can try to get the emotionality and rumination under control. So he prescribed me Vyvanse 30. I'm a bit nervous to take this tomorrow for the first time, so I guess I'm looking for feedback. Have you been on vyvanse? How has it affected your emotionality? It just seemed like he was very quick to prescribe and didn't even officially say "I think you're right you have ADHD". I scored high on innatention and impulsivity with my counselor, but with taking this new med I may just be looking for something to worry about. [info] None [info] 1544819432
rikrokola [info] I was diagnosed with depression, and was predicted to be a serial killer when by 16 when I was 8. I was an unstable kid, but I'm painting a picture here that is more extreme than what panned out. What got me through it was my tough skin and the pre-well defined internet. There were times where I was certifiably melodramatic and had a lot of issues struggling with seeing the brighter side of things. Through patience, asking a lot of questions, and self discovery I was able to "get over it". Doing something else to get your mind of the "meta" of life will help. Having goals, aiming for them, and learning yourself you can always beat the odds. It takes time though, lots of time and lots of soul-ache. You either sink or swim. Hang in there, don't focus on it. Don't dwell on it. Accept it and go kick some ass. To quote a favorite website of mine, "the only limit is yourself." [info] None [info] 1326550488
cxtrhino [info] I've been talking to my psychiatrist about this actually! I have a very comfortable life because my mum is a successful business woman so we have money (plus she has staff i don't have to do anything), and honestly I have everything (physical) I could ever want. I have run out of things to "want" because I already have them. This may seem like a good thing, and believe me, it is. I am very grateful for everything. However, I cannot find real, genuine happiness. I've felt types of happiness (comfort, amusement, etc), but never happiness as a whole. I don't have any hobbies, any special talents, nothing. Everything I used to enjoy just got boring. &lt;tldr: i live with my mum, she wasn't very good at being a mum&gt; My childhood was pretty non-existent, my mum was quite young when she had me and my dad got in trouble with the law (he's not a criminal, just some immigration and financial issues) and they got divorced. My mum didn't really know how to be a mum, so she wasn't a big part of my life. She would get me everything I wanted.. except her time. Any physical thing that can be bought with money, I got. But she didn't see me as a daughter, I was more of an annoyance. At the time, I didn't understand that she was being neglectful. I was young, I thought her not being home a lot meant more freedom for me. But I still wasn't happy. She also had an alcohol problem at the time, and I was stuck taking care of her every time she was drunk (pretty much everyday, 2am-ish). I was like 7, I didn't realise this was wrong. After I was diagnosed with depression, my mum changed as a person. She took parenting seriously, she spent time with me (and enjoyed it!), supported me, listened to me, I finally felt loved. But.. I still wasn't happy. Thankful for my mum, but not satisfied with myself.I ended up withdrawing from school a few months ago (i'm supposed to be in year 11/grade 10, i'm 16 this year), all because I don't see the point in going to school if there's no point to living. (i gave up on typing formally)i'm not suicidal, because even though I don't see the point of living, I'm not gonna just die lol??? I may not see the point in living, but what's the point of dying if it's painful. like if i don't want to live, i want to at least be comfortable. i mean, if i had the chance to die painlessly, i'd totally do it, but that's out of the picture.the way I cope with the emptiness is by doing things that help me feel grounded. i've been doing Muay Thai for a couple months (almost a year), 3-4 times a week, and it helps a lot. it helped my physical health, but it also works as an outlet for all my negative emotions on life. it makes me feel stronger mentally and physically. plus my trainer is really cool and i like her and we're good friends :)i also.. read? kinda?? i mean i go through sudden phases of wanting to read something and then like a month later i get bored but i still read at some point. i prefer reading short stories (preferably horror/thriller like r/nosleep) and my favourite are comedic stories or stories that talk about real life issues (especially involving mental health). the comedy stories just make me laugh, they cheer me up. the realistic stories just help me feel less alone and more understanding of myself. i also like talking to my psychiatrist about different mental disorders because human brains are so complex and interesting and i just wanna know how different disorders work so i can better understand people that have them.i also like playing meaningless games just to keep me busy and distracted like word games or rhythm games. they make me feel real and help me from dissociating lolsorry for long read, hope any of these things helped!! some of what i wrote was kind useless, i just haven't ranted in a while whoops (speaking of ranting, writing down your thoughts help a lot, at least to me!! just put your pen on paper and write anything on your mind. just word vomit on paper. or even write a story, whatever floats your boat) [info] None [info] 1553505283
darlingdread [info] I don't know what to do I am currently in Canada, I have been diagnosed with depression for a few years and it has been good and bad. I came to Canada after meeting a girl in NZ and our mutual friend also joined, while have been here I have felt like the third wheel, left out and unwanted. I had said this to the girl I was seeing and it kind of was thrown back in my face as I wasnt trying ect. I got drunk last week and told them how I am feeling, how they have made me feel and that I dont want to live. After passing out I woke up and was told that they were worried about me and wanted to go home. I dont want to leave as I spent all of my remaining money to get here and quit my job for this holiday. At the time I felt so attacked that I placed and left. This was about midnight. As we were staying with her family it was a really shitty situation for me to be in and to put them in. A few days ago I reached out and tried apologising to them for how I left and told them I was disappointed in how they approached me. There response was not one of wanting to help but to be left alone. As they have both had depression on the past I thought they might have understood. This has made everything worse and I am unsure what I am wanting to do with my life right now.I know this is long but I have tried to be as through and objective as I can. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1564167100
transkeith [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, and I'm always on social media. [info] None [info] 1558371535
SatanLordOfDarkness [info] Not sure if I want to go home. I've been living abroad for a little more than a year now, but not in one place. I did six months in Mongolia teaching English, five months studying in Australia, and a few weeks ago I arrived in Ecuador to teach English again. Thing is, I'm miserable.I've been diagnosed with depression for a very long time, and the only thing that really has ever made it better is having a solid social circle to rely on. Well, I'm living in rural Ecuador now and there are *very* few people here who speak English. My Spanish is okay but not good enough to really form any meaningful friendships/relationships. I felt similarly when I was living in Mongolia, even though I was living in the capital city there and there were quite a few more people that I could be social with. Here I literally have one coworker to socialize with and a good friend living about 4 hours away by bus whom I can see a few times a month at most. Before I came to Ecuador, I started taking some steps to improve my mental health after doing nothing about it for years. I started medication, I started talking to a therapist, and I began meditating every day. Things were looking really good, but now that I'm in Ecuador I'm seriously struggling to get by. I can't sleep, but I don't want to wake up in the morning. My job is insanely stressful because I wasn't trained at all and there is no syllabus/textbook/curriculum/anything, so I've had to come up with all of my lesson plans completely on my own (which is not something I'm qualified to do at all).It really feels like much more than just culture shock. I have dealt with considerable culture shock before, and I can tell that this is different. I feel as though I'm throwing all of my progress out the window and launching myself into an environment where I know nobody and there's little opportunity to build a real social circle.So, with all that said, I want to go home. I'm signed on for a contract until June, but I think I could get out of it or at least shorten it pretty easily. I don't know that I would necessarily be "happy" living at home right now, but I would certainly feel a lot more stable and have more opportunities to improve my mental health. It feels like this isn't the best thing for me to do right now and I regret agreeing to come here.Has anyone been in a similar situation? I would really appreciate any advice. I know that it probably just sounds like I'm dealing with culture shock but it truly feels like more than that. The majority of the things that "shocked" me when I first arrived already seem normal to me now, and the only thing that really bothers me now is the super aggressive stray dogs, but I'm slowly getting used to that too. Any and all advice would be greatly appreciated. Thank y'all so much! [info] None [info] 1580333073
dandereinabox [info] Could my depression have gotten worse? I was diagnosed with depression in middle school but I know I had it since elementary school. [It was different, back then I had to go to anger management therapy for hitting my head against the wall and throwing things.] I had always felt a lack of energy, no motivation, emptiness and suicidal thoughts. In march of this year, about two days after I took some anti acne pills, I felt exhausted. Just completely drained of energy. I stopped taking them because I thought maybe I had a weird reaction to them but I still feel exhausted, I just want to stay in bed and do nothing. Does anyone else feel like this? Could it be lack of sleep or something else? [info] None [info] 1398571196
Yelesa [info] Which makes me wonder, what’s so shameful to have depression? I have been diagnosed with depression. I don’t want to have it, but I don’t think of it as something to be ashamed of. In fact, the diagnosis and then the ongoing treatement have set me free of the shame.Since I have started treating it, I have realized that aspects of me that cause me major problems in life and make me ashamed of myself —such as procrastination, escapism, and anti-social tendencies—are not my personality, they are symptoms of my chemically unbalanced brain. I used to think that’s just the way I was for years but it wasn’t true. I’m not like that. I’m productive, empathetic and I’m great at balacing things I want with things I have to do. People want to spend time with me now because they find me pleasant and reliable. This makes me want to break down from happiness, I have lost so many years of my life to this monster. But I have found so much self-esteem now. I thought I was weak, it’s so relieving to know that’s not true.Please OP, take this in consideration. It might not be your personality what you are describing, the brain chemistry is just fucked. You shouldn’t feel guilt to do what you want when it doesn’t affect anyone else negatively. If you do, something is brewing in you and you need to question that.  [info] None [info] 1539894115
Destruktias [info] I don't know why I'm unhappy. Someone to talk to. Thank you. I'm leaving for work in a little bit so won't be able to check back for another 6 hours.I'm not sure where to post but I just want to talk to someone?I'm pretty sure I have a group of great friends, part time job, studying at Uni, got a married parents (? somewhat happily, have brother too) so I really don't know why I'm not happy at all.I don't think I've been diagnosed with depression (not even sure how that works - do you get diagnosed by a doctor? serious question/not sarcastic) but I don't know where to go because I am just sad and confused and I don't know why.I spend a lot of time playing video games - I used to really enjoy them especially with friends but for some reason that energy I had is just... gone.Sorry It's a little uninformed, I really have no idea what I'm typing I just have to rush to get this out before I go off for work.One of my best friends, to me, also feels really sad - we used to call on Skype -&gt; Discord and we used to be energetic and pumped but now whenever we're in a call it's just awkward... agonising... silence.Sorry, there were a lot of 'I don't know's', but one thing I'm certain on is that I'm just not happy in life.Please someone just talk to me later (5-6 hours from now)? Thank youPS. I've had suicidal thoughts in the past but I know I'm not going to attempt anything like that any more. I just think many people who have it worse and also I'm really weak willed so yeah I have no balls/courage to do it anyway... [info] None [info] 1509820923
pipermaru84 [info] I transitioned for 7 years including almost 4 years of testosterone, top surgery, and legal document changes. I was less than a month out from my hysterectomy and planning bottom surgery when I finally got my wakeup call. I detransitioned almost 3 years ago and have never looked back. I did have a pretty long "anger phase" where I wasn't able to be around the trans community but at this point I have a couple of FTM friends and am able to separate myself from the issue a little bit. Occasionally I feel what I used to call dysphoria, but I've done enough internal work at this point to be able to deconstruct those feelings, determine their source, and fix the source if possible or else just understand it as an external force and not something wrong with me. I have been diagnosed with depression for longer than I've been diagnosed with gender dysphoria, so of course I have my ups and downs, but in general I would say I experience no distress related to my gender any more, barring occasional insecurity about my facial hair (though not enough to actually shave more than every couple of weeks). I don't have much experience with dating while detrans since I'm still with the first woman I started dating afterwards, but perhaps that's an indication anyway--she was previously a relatively normie lesbian and never batted an eye at any of my transition related features. It can be annoying sometimes to be read as male (or more often, as a transwoman) and know that it's because of what I did to my own body but it's not something that makes me upset anymore, just a little irritated occasionally.  [info] detransitioner [info] 1546552958
Ithinkandstuff [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for years now, and I would definitely say there are aspects of my life and my personality that are driving factors behind it. The depression is always there, but I firmly believe that if I dealt with some insecurities that I have, and learned to manage stress better, that depression would be a much smaller issue for me. [info] None [info] 1438723316
existentialrobot [info] Here's a question: What do you do when things don't make you happy?I was diagnosed with depression early last year after a couple years of suffering. I am on an antidepressant that seems to have resolved the worst of my symptoms, but I still seem to struggle with anhedonia. I mean, I *do* things. I read, I do my schoolwork (computer science student). I play video games sometimes and occasionally watch something on Netflix. I am tangentially involved with my roommate's friends and sometimes go out to eat with them and whatnot. But none of it seems to make me emotionally happy. The work I do is generally intellectually stimulating, and electronics make for nice distractions, but I don't really feel happy, regardless of what I choose to do. And I'm stuck here, not sure how to proceed. [info] None [info] 1454481925
myhairsreddit [info] I have a 20 year old brother with Autism, I have been a special needs care attendant for almost 6 years now. If it's one thing I have learned about people with disabilities/special needs, it's that they deserve the same love and respect as anyone else. I wish anyone with similar diagnosis as the boy I was boyfriend/girlfriend with all the happiness in the world. I dated an Autistic boy, and I'd date an Autistic man if I truly had feeling for him. I have been diagnosed with depression and other issues, I look at them all as being on the same field. I don't want to be judged for my issues, I will never judge another person for theirs. [info] None [info] 1407725040
Humor_Tumor [info] Making other people happy, specifically making them laugh. It’s kinda been my goal since I was diagnosed with depression to give those what I cannot give myself.  [info] None [info] 1533764017
Dr_Butts_ [info] When I was diagnosed with depression I spoke to a psychologist, and rather than addressing the symptoms I was experiencing at the time we spent a lot of time talking about the difficult things I had experienced in my last. As cliche as it sounds there were things from my childhood which had lead me to think and feel a certain way and when I understood that I was able to see things from a different perspective and it was really helpful for my current issues. [info] None [info] 1479217108
JewishPengWin [info] Thanks for showing me another way to look at it, and I was diagnosed with depression this year and people have been giving me flak about it. [info] None [info] 1469586996
YourUhNater [info] .Story from: Cameron[Cameron knows Jenny](http://i.imgur.com/dRaO3ss.jpg)Let me make this clear, life is short my dearMy name is Cameron and I am 25 years old.  I was diagnosed with depression about 3 years ago. The thought of harming myself and ending my life crossed my mind multiple times but realized I had a lot more to live for.  On top of that I am a recovering alcoholic and will continue to fight this disease.  My alcoholism destroyed all of my relationships in the last 5 years of my short lived life.  I lost my best friend in a tragic car accident when I was 16 years old and never talked about it with anyone. It ate me alive inside.  Until recently, after entering an alcohol treatment facility in the summer of 2014, I have learned to talk about my problems and not let them bring out the worst in me.  It is necessary to get the help that you need, before it's to late.  We are not in this alone.  We are loved more then we think we are! This is your life and you only get one.    #iknowjenny - #nothingmore - #depression #mentalhealth - #alcoholism -  #addiction - #recovery  [info] None [info] 1429130638
danystargaryen [info] A few years ago, I would not rewatch season 6. It was my least favorite season. Now, I can kind of relate to it the most. After I was diagnosed with depression, I could understand choices made, and story arcs a little bit better. Of course, there’s still some episodes I don’t particularly care for, like Double meat palace, Hell’s Bells, Seeing Red (its super hard for me to watch). I mean, there’s great episodes, good episodes, and ok episodes in all the seasons, and by all means they’re no Bad Eggs, The Pack, or Where the Wild Things Are, they just aren’t my on my list of go to episodes in the season.As an adult, and as someone who is much more aware of the depression I have, season 6 holds a lot of moments that I really love. When Buffy breaks down with Tara, Normal Again, Once More with Feeling, when Buffy finally figures out she doesn’t want to die, Dawn finally expressing herself that she feels so lonely she doesn’t really know how to act, Tabula Rasa, I could go on and on. There are several things I didn’t like as well, but I’ll focus on the positive instead.These are just personal opinions, but I ended up really liking Season 6 much more than I did when I first watched it.  [info] None [info] 1527635267
Nivalwolf [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 15, they gave me Symbiax (Prozac+antipsycotic) and I think it left my brain never the same.. [info] None [info] 1314804316
LeadingBird [info] I'm diagnosed with depression. I can cry a fair bit but the other things are a lot like my experience. I don't want to die per se, but I think about killing myself a ton even though the thought of actually carrying out the act is dreadful. It's just an end to thinking that I find quite tantalising about it.Loss of interest in things happens often for me. That one really sucks. I feel like sleep and really intense work/workout/conversation are the only hiding places.So, to me you sound depressed but you should only care about what the doctor says when you go for the earliest appointment you can book next year.Find out whether it's depression. If it is, you will be so much better off having acted so decisevily in dealing with it. Refusing to seek a diagnosis when I knew I was depressed for at least three years will remain the worst thing I will ever do to myself and my family. Do what you know is the appropriate thing for this situation. [info] None [info] 1545729733
Alaric_Silvertongue [info] When I was diagnosed with depression I was told something interesting, that it often gets missed in men and especially young men because of the way it can manifest. It doesn't make you cry and weep, it can make you angry and volatile. Crude example: you don't need to cut yourself if your apathetic about your own life and starting bar fights to get your head kicked in. And no one would see it as depression. I hope you're getting help dude. Best thing I ever did. And for what it's worth there are plenty of famous men who struggled with depression or had depressive episodes. Plenty of normal ones to. [info]  [info] 1526932549
Eurekaaaa [info] Il give you my personal Input. I started watching anime when I was in freshman year HS. My first anime was Fullmetal Alchemist, I finished the series &amp; I thought it was really cool so I wanted to watch some more anime. As time went on I just watched more anime &amp; I become more comfortable exploring various genres of anime.  I became infatuated with a certain character when I was around 16 years old, she was the same age as me at that point in time. It just happens that I age &amp; she does not. I have never felt better in my life as I do now since I have accepted my situation &amp; I even have a lovely job so I can purchase products to support the content creators of my favorite series. If you want backstory, I was always the quiet awkward child in middle school &amp; I never developed the proper social skills to talk to the other gender in a sexual manner &amp; to build sexual relationships. Around the time I was 16 I was diagnosed with depression &amp; I found anime as a gateway to happiness. I could watch series that had love stories , sad dramas to full on action with side politics. From my room I could experience stories &amp; emotions  that I would never be able to have in real life with another person. I eventually fell for a character &amp; I would think about her every day &amp; night when I fell asleep. In my world of depression &amp; lonership I was able to experience happiness.From that point on indulged in whatever made me happy , cute anime girls made me happy. You would think I was a pedophile but I was the same age as the characters I was watching so I never thought about it. Eventually I weened myself off from having crushes on real women. This helped me see real women as actual people instead of falling head over heels for random hot chicks &amp; I could talk to them without being nervous. Being able to experience happiness &amp; perhaps even a slight feeling of what it's like to be in love pushed me forward to experience the beauty of the world &amp; I am now no longer depressed &amp; I am now building a future for myself. I even met my current online friends through an anime related subreddit &amp; I'm so happy I have accepted the fact that I like anime girls &amp; life has never been better. I hold no resentment toward anybody &amp; I hope you can accept me aswell. If you have any questions feel free to ask or PM me if it's more personnel. Trolls will be ignored [info] None [info] 1468865242
TowerNine [info] But it's not jerkish to tell someone they have real depression because they have something that makes them happy? I've been diagnosed with depression and its hard for me to find something to get into that makes me happy. And its great that I have found something, but when someone tells me that its kinda hurtful [info]  [info] 1427413997
AWarmHug [info] Oh shit, well this is a topic I could write a novel about so I'll be as brief as possible.I was raised Presbyterian from the day I was born. I bought in hard. My church youth group was like my family (and most of them still are, except now we drink together). But in high school as I went from repeating the same old shit from Sunday school to actually studying the Bible, I realized that it didn't make any sense. I mean, it was just so obvious tons of it was wrong. Cue the downward spiral of me stepping out of "indoctrination" (for lack of a better word) and realizing everything I've ever believed in, and everything I've made my life about is a lie. Soon after I was diagnosed with depression that I've battled with ever since.I remember when I was, I'd say about 8, I went to visit my uncle and Aunt who were both atheists. After hanging out with them all day, I went to bed and wept, sobbing, begging God to save them. I begged him not to send them to hell. Ironically, now my family weeps for me. I know exactly how they feel, the terror that someone they love is going to burn forever in agony, and there's nothing they can do. And I have to live with that.I have to live with that all because I can't have blind Faith in one specific god out of dozens, at least. And yes, I do mean can't. I have tried to believe, desperately. But just like a kid can't choose to believe in Santa Clause after his older brother told him he isn't real and he realizes how ridiculous the idea is, I can't believe in God.And even if I did believe in God, I wouldn't fucking worship him. What did he do to deserve infinite power? And what an asshole to use that power to create humanity, knowing it'd all go to shit, and then bail out by killing EVERYBODY in a flood. You're an all wise being and THAT was your best solution? And then afterwards he's like, "Yeah my bad, that sucked. Won't do it again, promise. I'll invent rainbows to prove it." What a dick, amiright?      [info] None [info] 1505441485
wifiwonderlex [info] I feel bad for having depression Hey, I’m 17 and I was diagnosed with depression a year ago, something that’s been a huge part of my very low self esteem has been the damaging amount of guilt that I feel for having depression, it’s making me hate myself even more then I already do. I am so privileged, my family isn’t poor, my parents are split up but I see them both at equal times and the system is pretty good, overall, at the moment I should be doing well; but I’m not. I’m having suicidal thoughts and I also have a self harm addiction which might be some form of self punishment for suffering when I should be well off, I don’t know. Its a very intrusive and detrimental feeling. [info] None [info] 1553864286
amp3rsand [info] /u/Subver5ion has great bits on perspective.    Make sure you have a log of all your projects and prioritize all tasks. You're probably already using Microsoft Project and planning out tasks far ahead of time but 40 projects is a bit much.    Just to let you know. I AM not that good at anything. I went to college and switched majors 8 times (math, business, art, music, film, english, digital media, psych). I've learned that I'm fairly mediocre at everything. It's not that I don't practice or study enough, it's that I plateau at a skill level and can never seem to be able to get beyond that plateau.    Let me just say that I worked a desk job like you for 5 years out of school. A well paying one. And I hated it. I was criticized left and right over very petty things and it was way too stressful. Especially when I was surrounded by others just as awful at my job or worse. For me, it bothered me so much that it drove me down a spiral path where I was diagnosed with depression. That's really, really bad.    But hey, I also play guitar, bass, sing, and practice art at a mediocre level. I only say that because there are so many people better than me.    So, here I am now. Working in a restaurant again, but earning tips (which often pays about the same of medium level salary jobs and is much less work) and am in back in school again. I'm studying nursing, which yes has a degree of high-level thinking and knowledge, but for me it's essentially customer service. You're there to care for the people and do all you can to make them feel better. [info] sometimes too serious [info] 1440773423
4sphyxia [info] please help- those with borderline personality disorder I am struggling a lot right now with my emotions and have really intense mood swings. In the past two days, I've felt extreme happiness, breakdowns from sadness and fear, emptiness and apathy, hopefulness, and now intense anger that I've taken out on family members. I'm still somewhat logical so that's why if anyone has any experience, advice, or information about infjs with BPD (it doesn't even have to be MBTI specific but I thought this thread would help), I'd really appreciate it. I have been diagnosed with depression but I stopped going to my psychiatrist when I got a little better. Lexipro did not really help me at all so I was considering looking to antipsychotics/mood stabilizing drugs.thanks [info] None [info] 1532843784
i_am_le_walrus [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and although I’m not in that dark place like I once was, it still lingers quite often. I work in the mental health field so I’m very much self-aware of that. I live 1.5 hours away from my family and that’s honestly what works best for us due to always butting heads. My father would laugh if I said “family therapy” (that’s what I do for a living). Being a family counselor, it’s hard to ‘just be’ when I see all the major points of what made my own family spiral down hill. Instead, I have a lot of self/hatred in moments like these (when I wrote original post) or feeling like I’m not really significant to anyone. Idk. I’m just trying to keep myself occupied while I’m alone and not go too deeply into my own BS.  [info] None [info] 1513858206
figgytrees [info] My mom worked a lot when I was really young, so most of my childhood memories of her are just her yelling and spanking me or my siblings. I also have a very distinct memory of her hitting my teenage sister in the face so hard that her nose bled. In high school I was diagnosed with depression (it runs in our family on my dads side) and she treated me so so so awfully through the whole thing that I will never forgive her for it. I love my mom, but I don't like her. She only wanted to have boys, so she treats me and my sister like shit most of the time. I'm not sure about all the ways this has affected me or our relationship, but I know that I struggle with feeling loved or cared for by anyone let alone my mom. And I'm not good with affection either. It sucks /: Me and her are pretty good these days, but I have all these things against her and she knows it. [info] None [info] 1481698391
batmanslayer [info] I was diagnosed with depression. I got the fuck over it. Thats why whenever someone tells me they are depressed I tell them to get the fuck over it.  [info] None [info] 1513933358
cupcakegrenades [info] Need advice on the next step to take. Hi all, I'm new here but I need some advice. I'm 23, finishing up my master's degree. I was diagnosed with depression in July of 2013, but I was dealing with it for about a year before that. My problem was that I would feel overwhelmed by school and completely shut down and not go to class/leave my house. I went to a therapist at my university's health center who referred me to a general physician for medication. He prescribed a low dose of Celexa. I think I did well on the medication, but a few months later, I started dating someone. This lead to me not going to class again and eventually not taking my medication.Now, I'm at a new university and I'm mostly doing ok in terms of school and being productive. The health center at the new uni isn't great. My concern is that the illness is going to sneak up on me again and cause me to fail a bunch of classes like it did before. I cannot afford to have this happen again. I also recognize that I'm not "cured" and that I can't continue to ignore my illness. I don't know if I should see a therapist, a psychologist, a general physician, or something else. I'm a little confused on the prescribing authority of each of these. I also want to keep insurance costs down.In your opinion, what type of specialist or combination of specialists should I go to? Any advice is welcome, thank you for your help!TL;DR: Not sure if I should go to psychologist vs. psychiatrist vs. general physician vs. something else. [info] None [info] 1409875074
jsi772988 [info] Crying with a gun in my hands... Today, my dad just said the most horrible shit to me... that I “disappoint him”, that “I’m a failure”, and that “I’m a loser”. Well, I can’t really take it anymore. I know something with me is mentally off because I’ve never once felt right. I think about killing myself at least once every day. And I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 4 1/2 years old. No matter how good the situation is in my life, I always get a sense of misery. I constantly stare into the past and think “why?”. I look into the future and think “how?”. So no matter how I perceive things, I always see them in a negative way because that’s how I was raised to think. I’m now sitter here, trying to decide wether to off myself with a .357 revolver or a .308 rifle. I know that either one will blow my head off and make a mess, but I want to go with a method that will eliminate me quickly. I have no need to make a final statement to my family or friends because I think my brain-matter splattered against the wall shall be a pretty obvious statement. At least then my dad will feel sorry for the last thing he ever said to me... [info] None [info] 1564117339
Manda_Meme [info] Since I was diagnosed with depression, my spelling schedule is fucked up, I sleep too much and without a  regular clock. Sometimes i sleep 2 Hours in the evening and go to bed aftwr 2 Am. [info] None [info] 1564518597
raydijk16 [info] Hey guys, i wanted to share my video with you. I've been diagnosed with depression 4 years ago..Seen therapists, take medication.. But the depression always comes back.. Now, I have recently started my journey on YouTube, and hopefully my video helps people see something good in each day!! Just as I need to do this for myself [info] None [info] 1520413460
picturespfcats [info] I would like to start talking to people again I was diagnosed with depression about two years ago and didn't seek help until recently. My main obstacle now is holding a conversation with someone and even with myself without getting sad or angry. It's hurting me to keep everything inside and I'd like some help with how to start feeling happy again [info] None [info] 1496804195
TakashiAzeileaf98 [info] Losing hope..... Hi everyone, first time posting here. I'm actually glad I found this place because now I can type my feelings out. I don't know if anyone is actually gonna take the time to read all of this but if you do then bless your heart. So I guess I'll tell my story. I dated the girl of my dreams 5 years ago at this point. I was completely in love with her and I felt like I had everything I ever wanted in life when I was with her. She loved me too.....but one day, she changed. There towards the end of our relationship, I could tell she was acting differently. I could hardly get her to kiss me or hold hands with me anymore.....but at the time I didn't know it was because she was planning on breaking up with me, I guess I just didn't want to believe that's what she had planned. One day we went to a ball game with our church group and it seemed like it was going to be a great day but when the game was over, she dropped me off at my house and that's when my life went down hill.....she broke up with me. She simply told me we weren't compatible and that she thinks we would be happier with other people.....ever since that day, I haven't been the same person. I took our breakup pretty hard that it almost drove me to suicide. It seriously didn't help that one of my friends, or so I thought he was my friend, started dating her shortly after our breakup. Granted, they are not dating anymore nowadays but it still hurts just knowing that he put his filthy hands on her. But anyway, a lot has changed these past 5 years. I'm about to be 21 in May and I have a part time job at Kohl's. I've made some friends at my job but sometimes I have a hard time calling them friends since we never really hang out outside of work. They are always super nice to me and they respect me but as I said, we never get to hang out. I spend a lot of my days alone just sitting around my house on my phone waiting for work to come around so I can see my work friends again. Its really the only time I feel happy is when I get to see them. After my ex girlfriend broke up with me, I was diagnosed with depression. And I can definitely feel it especially when I'm alone just waiting for me to go back to work. It's just really sad to see how happy I was with my life back then but nowadays I just feel so alone and unsatisfied with everything. I have hardly any friends at all outside of work. Even though my ex was my girlfriend, I felt like she was also my best friend.....but shes gone from my life now and I don't have much people to talk to anymore. We may be broken up now but I still hear things about her from time to time. Shes had plenty of new boyfriends through these 5 years and I honestly don't know how she does it. I have had exactly ZERO dates after her and it's making me start to lose hope in life. I'm scared that this is how my life is going to be from now on, me just looking at my phone all day while waiting for me to go to my job and repeat. My depression keeps getting worse day by day the more I'm alone. I wish I could meet someone new but it's been 5 years and nothing has changed. I don't think it's going to at this point.....I really appreciate anyone who took the time to read my sob story, you are a blessing. I'm just alone again tonight and I had to get this off my chest..... [info] None [info] 1555217922
Ralph_Finesse [info] Truth. I was diagnosed with depression in 5th grade. Taken off of meds in 6th due to bloody rashes. Went into a really bad period due to being off of meds. Started meditating sophomore year of high school and I've done fairly well with coping on my own. Don't get the physical feeling of being even like I did on meds, but I can talk myself out of a lot of the mental traps and sadness. [info] None [info] 1358715467
Livingmylife96 [info] I meant 99% of my life. Honey I have been diagnosed with depression multiple times and am on many pills for it. I promise you I have depression I am not some sort of over emotional teenager.  [info] None [info] 1363899365
coolpeng [info] Lgbt places Toronto For the past years I've been diagnosed with depression. I've been seeing a psychiatrist and my school counselor. Most of the time when I would see her she would ask me if I attend or have attended any lgbt activities. I said I have. The one they hold on church st every Wednesday evening. I told her how good it felt to be surrounded with people who possibly have had the same struggles as I'm facing now. And the fact that seeing them okay and well. Especially happy with their own life. It gave me hope. She told me I should keep attending those because only when I talk about it that i seem happy and at peace. Problem is, I want to. I wanna meet more people. Make more friends from the lgbt community. I want to put myself out there. I do have friends here, great friends I used to go to highschool with. But sometimes, there are things they just dont get. (theyre all straight) and im not saying theres wrong with that. But yeah we cant really connect sometimes. I guess all I'm asking is, besides the meetings, where do lgbt people in Toronto usually hang out and make friends? [info] Science, Technology, Engineering [info] 1421062878
bottleninja [info] Self-doubt Sometimes I wonder whether I'm just going through a teenage phase. Even though I've been diagnosed with depression, part of me just wonders whether I'm lying to myself and just insisting in wallowing in misery.Just needed to get this off my chest. [info] None [info] 1522328870
amourfati [info] I have seen psychologists since the age of 6, I was diagnosed with depression at 8 and have struggled with it since then. I have talked to more psychologists than I can count. Also, I was unaware that depression could be "cured". [info] None [info] 1344627755
buildmeupbreakmedown [info] I was diagnosed with depression about three years ago. The thing with intrusive thoughts and depression is that, when you're depressed, it's not just overt intrusive thoughts like seeing someone on the street and thinking "I could probably get away with punching that lady in the face and stealing her purse" even though you're not a criminal. It's like there's a tiny little news ticker in the back of you mind, barely noticeable but always there, with headlines like "I don't deserve to be happy", "I will never feel alive again" and "BREAKING NEWS: Life is horrible and there's nothing anyone can do about it". You have to fight a battle of endurance against this tiny, incessant voice. Constant dripping wears the stone, as my grandma used to say, and soon you start to beliee it even though you hardly notice it's there.Of course, there's *also* the loud intrusive thoughts that happen in particular moments, but in my personal experience, this little background ticker is a much bigger problem. [info] None [info] 1394124660
Fyrz1 [info] I was diagnosed with depression at an early age, and it became part of my identity. I embraced it as a crotch and it became part of a coping mechanism that allowed me to not improve myself, without feeling bad about it. That was just my experience, and maybe in 10 years I will think differently about the whole thing. But right now I feel like it took me years and years to pull myself out of it, and that wouldn't have been so painful if  I hadn't been allowed to wallow in it. But I'm sure there's a balance. [info] None [info] 1547854833
The3vadnBlur [info] Is depression beta? Disclaimer; possible shit postOkay, so I've been diagnosed with depression, and I've been feeling shitty for the past few months. Feeling like everything wrong in my life is my fault, even if it wasn't. Hating myself, regardless of how many girls were trying to get me. For example, when I started school late august, I was acting alpha naturally. I had yet to discover TRP. I had girls in my grade, multiple seniors, and a few sophomores who would've hopped on my dick in an instant. But I didn't want any of these girls. I met this girl who was lesbian, and I saw it as a challenge. We got along great, and I wanted her. But I played my cards right and got her to like me. I've been in a relationship with her for over two months now. I'm clearly the alpha in the relationship, but outside of the relationship, I'm beta. Does this mean I'm not really alpha in our relationship? Recently, I've been making an effort to act alpha in every aspect of my life. I've picked up athletics again (I was injured pretty bad, and have been timid to do anything since) but I've become more active, asserted my dominance, and tried to take on more leadership roles in life and school. My depression is getting better, and I'm not medicated. Is my transition from beta to alpha helping my depression, or is it purely coincidental? [info] None [info] 1417537862
malten_sage [info] What should I know before checking myself into a psych ward? This is something I’m honestly considering for the benefit of myself and others. I was diagnosed with depression and autism when I was a kid, but due to severe gaslighting from literally everyone I feel like my mental state is degrading. It’s gotten to the point I considered suicide more than once in the last few days. I don’t want to do it. But I feel like I have no other choice sometimes. I need help. But nobody thinks I deserve it. [info] None [info] 1569443025
missbanana99 [info] When you have it so good, that you know it just has to go bad In the past I've had quite the roster of toxic partners, myself in the midst of some aswell. Since I can remember dating, it's always left such a sour taste in my mouth. I was diagnosed with depression, (dysthymia) when I was 13, and have been diagnosed with borderline personality disorder when I was 18. I tend to invest heavily into those I care about, and split from those who care "enough" or too much, to the point where the vulnerability shown to me can be quite unappealing one day, or absolutely wonderful the next.. Something interesting has happened that I can't help but share though..I've been in a relationship for half a year, with a man who, quite literally, treats me like a queen.  In my mind I fell in love with him before this all came about, as we were both working together, for upwards of 12-14 hours a day for a year prior. We became such close best friends, and leading up to our relationship, it was something out of a movie.  I think it was maybe a few months after we started dating that I noticed myself losing that "spark" with him. It was almost like a shift in time, I was so in love to the next day being so turned off from his attention and affection that I wanted nothing to do with it anymore. It got so bad that I had to leave the relationship for a couple months..Now being a borderline, this never happens for me. I have idolized and centered my world and desicions in life around so many of these past men., But for the wrong reasons. This behaviour sticks out in 3 nasty relationships I've been through. I noticed a pattern, when I have a man in my life degrading me, making me feel sub-par, not good enough, like a nuisance etc, I almost feel like I fall more and more in love with  them. I don't know why. Every time I would be degraded, and emotionally fried. They would always come out days later and apologize, praise me, and the make up sex was always fantastic after.. now this would be the cycle of these crazy relationships I've had in the past. It was almost like being in love with the lack of stability, and believing these men are so powerful and honest to have pointed out my flaws and insecurities, and letting them win.. it was just awful looking back.Fast forward, I admitted my wrongs to this man and were back together, stronger almost. This relationship I'm in now, my man is truly a superhero in my eyes. Not only is he my best friend, but he really is the most caring person I've ever met, so sweet and kind and sensitive to my feelings, supportive of my life choices and encourages me with hobbies we share together. He's never said anything to hurt me, he's never put anything over my head, he's never done anything except *truly* cherish me. Even on my low days, (I usually get low days/moments more than I do good days/moments) he's always found a way to put up with every side of me, and love me through it. Enough goop, I'm happy. And hope it lasts.But I worry so much though,  especially with all of my "outbursts" (moments, hours or days where my emotions will spike to a low, anger streak , or all time high) I know I hurt him. And I know I can control it better, which can bring alot of feelings of shame and despair on myself into light.  Lately I've been stepping back and doing things like writing poetry, working out or doing my nails to help recognize when these shifts in moods happen, and what to do when I start to enter fight or flight mode. It's helped alot. But nothing could be more scary than knowing this is me and I may not always be in control of these things, he may very well have to deal with this for the rest of his time with me, if he can. I don't want a repeat cycle , I really hope we can stick this through, I feel so badly for taking his vulnerability for granted and I feel like I've learned a lesson from that. Anyways, rant over. I must go to bed. But I thought I'd just share one of the hardest parts of my mental health , being that it really does hurt people around you. [info] None [info] 1584679761
sallynguyen [info] I don't suffer schizophrenia but I have been diagnosed with depression and psychosis, which I'm not sure if it's similar to schizophrenia or not, so I can only say from my part and the people I know who take medication...You should take them. Yes, it is going to change some things in you - but the purpose is to make you feel better. When you first take medication, there might be physical changes and you might not like them, but it takes a while to experiment with different types of pills and eventually you'll find what works for you. I was completely against medication and tried to work on myself for a year long - it didn't end so well. Today, with the help of medication, my psychosis symptoms are gone and I'm a lot happier. Give it a shot, because you never know :)Good luck! [info] None [info] 1449733805
Ausmanthus [info] (content warning for suicide mention)A fight with my fiance caused this for me. We've been together for over a decade (and would be married but can't w/Adult Disabled Child benefits :\\); so he is anything but unaccustomed to my fangirling and quirks.  He even enjoyed indulging me and found my enthusiasm charming. At the time, fibromyalgia was kicking my ass and I need some help around the house: filling and pouring pots for cooking (gripping, the weight and twisting motion was murder on my hands and arms) and scooping the litter box (bending over, gripping, weight, etc).  That's it.  That's literally it.  It was summer vacation and he's a teacher: he had nothing else going on.  There was nothing else that caused the rift that would follow....I was in a really bad place (distraught about my helplessness, I already have depression, I was contemplating suicide more than ever, having complete breakdowns more than ever - in full honesty, I should have gone to a hospital), I just buried myself even more into my special interest. It was all I talked about, because it was the only thing that brought me comfort.  I talked about my special interest a ton, because my fiance was also a fan of it, but evidently, I crossed some arbitrary line he decided to draw.So, he blew up on me. I felt so unbelievably betrayed.  Initially, I'd been embarrassed to gush about my special interests, and oh how he begged me to open up.  Then this happened, this ripping me a new one over a shared interest and one that was my only escape.This was about a year and a half ago. We get along more, but I have nothing I take joy in now. :) My special interests have always been my safety net, my escape, my inspirations for all the struggles that came with Asperger's.For the first time in my life, I have no safety net, no escape, no inspiration.  Nothing to feel enthusiastic about.  I love family and pets and my fiance.  But there's no delight or enthusiasm for joy.  My depression has full hold on me and I have no special interest to hide in away from it.  I feel like I'm just not allowed to have a special interest, and the one that I'd had for years was ruined for me to the point that I feel literally nothing for it, other than the pain of this having happened.**Edit:**  I want to clarify I was diagnosed with depression many years ago.  Medication and therapy has never helped for more than brief periods at a time; I'm actually going to start a TMS treatment late this month.  But, hence why losing a special interest that was just about my only escape from it was and is distressing.  [info] None [info] 1552058144
MirLae [info] It doesn't matter what age you are. You can still be clinically depressed.I am. I've been diagnosed with depression, and I have been seeing a therapist for that past few months.  [info] None [info] 1379217300
MerigoldMachine [info] So my sleep schedule is a little erratic. Let's clear the air first, I'm a first time poster on this subreddit and so far from reading I'm very interested in everything I've read so far. I've always been fascinated by sleep patterns of different people. How some people have an internal clock of waking up at 6 and going to bed at 10 every single day and do not change it.My issue is that since I was 17 years old until now(23) I've been unable to maintain a proper sleep schedule. Even while going to school or working I have problems making sure I'm up on time and it has negatively effected my life and relationships with others. I've been diagnosed with depression and at an earlier point in my life I was diagnosed with insomnia. And over the past 2 months my sleep schedule has never been more erratic. Waking up at 7am one day, sleeping at 8am the same day, moving onto waking up at 12pm the same day, then sleeping at 7am again the next day. For a few days to end up with my sleep schedule being sleeping at 1am and waking up at 9/10am for the next few days and then it resetting. Currently it's at it's worst but it's also allowing me to work.Yesterday it changed though, I was sick and woke up at 2pm, and went back to sleep at 4:30pm. Waking up at 9pm and then going back to sleep at 12am to wake up at 4:30am. I feel energized and like I would actually be able to attend school if I can continue forcing myself to sleep at a time around 10pm-12am and waking up before 8am to get to school. I've always needed at least 7 hours of sleep a day to function, but some days I can go with 4-5 hours of sleep if there is an important event. I'm just really stressed out and worried I won't be able to normalize my internal clock before January and I'll drop out of school again because of my sleep issues. tl;dr I'm screwed if I can't figure out what's wrong with me please give me your opinions/suggestions on normalizing my sleep schedule! [info] None [info] 1449481884
StoicSaiyan [info] A lot of truth to this actually. I've been diagnosed with depression a long time ago actually but have been productive in my line of work and education for the past 7 years. I suppose it could be a mild case of depression or a bout of some sort. Working out used to be easy few months ago. But it seems when I'm not in school I dont feel productive. Perhaps could be that too.When I'm in school I feel I have a purpose. Maybe I am dependent on that. I like having these discussions though because it helps deduce what something might or might not be. Thank you for sharing your point of view by the way [info] None [info] 1560969391
Sailor_Callisto [info] I’m sure your inbox is blowing up with all the replies so I’ll keep it short. A real man, and a man worth loving, is a man who loves a woman because *she loves herself.* Take this time to work on falling in love with yourself. Try new hobbies and reconnect with your old hobbies and interests, take vacations, but most importantly, reinvest in yourself. One suggestion I would make would be to join a gym - not to change your appearance but because exercise is a good, healthy outlet for stress and has been proven to help improve your mood. I was diagnosed with depression 7 months ago, and while exercise didn’t cure my depression, it gives me a reason to leave the house and makes me feel good about myself after each workout.  [info] None [info] 1551768163
BryanMcgee [info] I didn't mix anything up.  While I have been diagnosed with depression I also know the difference between when clinical depression rears it's head and when I'm just having a sad day.  Either way I'm not always in the mood ready to drop my pants the moment it's asked of me.  If I'm in a foul mood sex will not make it better, especially if it's with someone I have sex with frequently.  There's certainly nothing special about it then.  I'm just the person they have sex with and they happen to want to have sex. [info] None [info] 1365366816
Thewinnerp [info] Guys I need help I was diagnosed with depression about a month and a half ago, the psychiatrist gave me sertraline and he said that I will notice changes 3 weeks into it. 3 days ago I got a crisis and I tried to end it all, guys what should I do, my doctor said that is "normal" and that I need to wait a little bit longer but I really can't, nothing has changed and actually I feel worse because idfk what is wrong with me.(Srry for the crappy English, is not my first language) [info] None [info] 1545178338
VespaDad [info] Today I decided to do something about my depression. Now I just have to get my wife on board. I am a married 38 year old man with a 2.5 year old and a second baby due in May.  I was diagnosed with depression since I was 17 years old,  and I probably had it long before then.  I grew up really dorky and chubby , mainly due to the fashion, haircut, and food choices that my parents made for me, as well as having parents that were somewhat embarrassing and old fashioned. I am adopted, never remember not knowing that I was, and I believe that I always carried some sort of deep sadness from not knowing who my birth parents were.  I feel that growing up feeling lame along with that sadness eventually lead to being depressed.  When I was 14-15, I started smoking pot on occasion, along with taking some acid.  I liked the acid because I could just lay in my room and get away from it all without going anywhere.  It was self medication without knowing that such a term existed.  I never got heavily into it because my parents were tight with money, and I never had more than a dollar or two at a time.  I eventually got caught by my parents smoking pot out of a soda can in the backyard.  Instead of punishing me harshly, my parents got me an old car to work on and a surfboard to keep me busy.  That worked great in socially advancing me a bit and kept me off drugs. The first time I ever realized I had any sort of issue with depression was when my second girlfriend broke up with me.  I don’t know what about that one really did it, as she was nobody particularly special, however I just could not get happy after that.  My mom took me to the doc where I was prescribed Prozac.  It seemed to work well for a decent amount of time, until another major breakup occurred when I was 19.  At that point, my behavior got erratic to the point that my best friend and my parents had me admitted to a mental health facility for about a month.  My meds were changed to Wellbutrin, and all was well for the next 16 or so years, though I went off of them after about 5 years since all seemed fine.  Life went about as normal as it could possibly have.At 35, I started feeling bummed again.  I tried to get into a new career and failed miserably, so I stuck with what I know (special education behavioral management)  and decided to peruse a teaching credential, which is now ongoing.   During all of this, my long term girlfriend got pregnant and we got married.  The first 9 months with the baby was easy, then the combination of working full time during the day, having to come home and cook for my family (wife dislikes it and just won’t) and then spending 2-4 hours a night on homework, along with other homeowner responsibilities killed all of my free time.  On top of that, My Grandpa passed away, as well as both of my dogs.  Things have just gotten to be way too much for me.  I am irritable always, I don’t want to parent, or care for anyone but me lately.  I have become disliked by a lot of coworkers, as I am not enjoyable to work with lately.  I have lost most of my friends, and my wife is nearly ready to go.  That is why I made the decision to  talk to a doctor and get back on some form of meds.  I didn’t like the side effects before, but I did at least have friends back then.  My wife is the toughest part of my ordeal, as she doesn’t recognize depression as an illness but rather just an inability to cope. Here’s to hoping she changes her mind once she starts seeing changes. [info] None [info] 1516573467
ZeroCitizen [info] Talk to someone about it. I didn't for the longest time because I worried about what would happen. If you're worried about what your parents will say, tell them anyways. If they react badly, tell your friends. If they react badly, tell a coworker or a teacher. Above all, get a therapist. If you think you can't pay for one, you'd be surprised. There are lots of discounts you can get.I was diagnosed with depression in February after I had a breakdown, and all of these emotions just came pouring out. You have no idea how amazing it feels when everything is out in the open. There's no more secrecy. No more hiding the pain. You can get support from people who care for you. If you can't find anyone to talk to IRL, I'm always available through my Reddit inbox.Life will feel real when you act real. If you put on a mask when you're with friends, that mask prevents you from seeing the beauty of life. When you stop living two different lives, you get to be your real self.I was diagnosed in February, and I got put on medication. I now feel better than I have in my entire life. (I'm only 18 though, to give you some perspective.) You can do this. I believe in you. [info] None [info] 1433993452
anomiexdoll [info] I've been in the same boat as you. I was diagnosed with depression when I was very young, and after seeing my mom self inflict with my a knife I started up when I was 7 and stopped at 18. I know what that rush is, after a few years it become the only thing I could do to calm myself down and make myself feel better. I think alcohol made it worse for me, because as a depressed person I became even more depressed drunk. If you ever need someone to talk to or anything let me know! I've got a kind heart, and good listening ears. To this day I still battle with depression and the medication I was given in my teens made me lose weight when I was pretty much anorexic or I had bad reactions to them. If you do ever end up on them becareful of the first 2 weeks, after that it's supposed to gradually get better. You really should eat at least a few meals a day. Once again, I also struggle with that. I'm down to two meals a day instead of a small dinner a day if that. If you eat small throughout the day it helps your metabolism and may help you lose weight, also try eating heathlier options. *hugs* if you want I can send you my email ? [info] http://amzn.com/w/JRSQFS6IA3K9 [info] 1366584555
cel-shaded [info] I've been diagnosed with depression 6 years ago (though i had it from beforehand, that was just the first time i visited a therapist). I've been on antidepressants for 5 years to stabilize my mood but i don't expect to feel happy or interest in anything any time soon as there is nothing that seems to satisfy me or make me feel joy. [info] None [info] 1525953626
Hocuspokerface [info] Feeling trapped and exhausted I was diagnosed with depression in college and I've dealt with it since (I'm 26 now.) I quit a stable, soul-sucking job to try to find self fulfillment and am currently working as a bartender. My boss is not great but not awful, but my hours are sparse. My parents want me to move on and find something more stable, and I do too, but I don't know what. I've never known what makes me happy in life, and in years past, I've told myself I just have depression so I'll never know what makes me happy. I went off antidepressants a few months ago (zoloft), against the advice of my doctor, and had a crisis a few days ago. I filled the new prescription I was given (lexapro) and am currently working up to the full dosage. I'm trying to get back into therapy, but it's getting harder not to judge myself for struggling for so long with such little progress. If i take a step back, my problems don't actually look that bad, but when I think about how I really feel, I have no strength to keep fighting this lack of hope. I don't want to imagine continuing an aimless life half-lived. I don't want to always be chasing happiness and love and never really feeling it. For awhile, I wanted to just live slowly and appreciate the small things I have, but it's not enough to keep me going anymore. I want more, but I'm too tired and confused and scared to feel capable of achieving it. Please, help. Having someone to talk to would be nice [info] None [info] 1535138954
TrantaLocked [info] Not exactly no advice, but working "with him" when he is in an open (Te) state, all while avoiding sounding emotionally manipulative. This may be hard to do because you aren't a feeler type, and figuring it out is the hard part. Even if you do become friendly with him again, it will always be an uphill battle. The sad truth is that the INFP is objectively the laziest type of person, who will be content as long as s/he is making money and able to use their dom/auxillary freely. For me, internet, video games, books/news/learning and music are all I need to be happy, and a lot of people don't get that. But I do want a better life for myself, and I'm hoping as I develop more I'll find more motivation. How old is your brother by the way? Does he work, go to school?I understand what you mean about relationships, and I agree. I can't say exactly what is going through your brother's head. What could be the case is that there is a want to get to the heart of issues, but he avoids it to avoid bringing out his Fi or disturbing his Si. He does want to change, but changing takes more thought and time for him, and again may be avoiding the topic of growth because growth doesn't work quite the same for him as it does for you.   This is going to get a bit Fi-ey but I want to help you understand what I've gone through a bit more.I'm 21 btw. I've had this exact issue with my step-father (ESTJ) and mother (NF) for a while now. High school was hell for me; I was diagnosed with depression in 10th grade. I grew different types of disdain for both, but because I know that deep inside it was more personal for my NF mom, it somehow ended up worse with her. I took a lot of what happened growing up personally. But not long after I turned 18, moved out and got a job, they stopped getting on my ass. I tried college, and failed due to discipline issues, but I'm still considering going back at least for an associate degree. But I still live with my dad (INFP), and I do pay rent. I think they figured out I just needed time to develop and find out on my own what was best for me. I eventually told them about this pain recently, and they apparently hadn't known how bad it was (but I'm guessing at least my mom knew, but agreed to raise me more strictly and let the pain happen once the step-father stepped in).  So I'm now in the process of trying to lose my disdain for my step-father and mother, and the process really could not have happened until they accepted that I wouldn't be their perfect child they thought they were raising, and let me come to them on my own terms rather than the other way around. After learning about MBTI, I realized it was more personal to me than to my step-father, and that I shouldn't hate them so deeply. My Ne is still developing, and I can feel the effect it has in allowing me to see and consider all possibilities and explore more. Unfortunately, as it develops, I feel like I'm becoming less and less myself. You know how kids are supposed to discover who they are in their teens/early 20s? Well, to me, the opposite seems to be happening. It's like, most people (sensors) get to discover their intuition later in life and more slowly, and it is really rewarding. I have deal with it now, and coupled with feeling, I'm a bit broken. If you're still with me, I will say that while I felt emotionally abused by my step-father at times, he was the one that I could most connect with when being given advice. The directness was comforting in a way, because it was purely logical with a touch of feeling. So, back to the beginning of this post about not being emotionally manipulative. You *do* want to be logical in your advice if he ever does come to you, but it cannot appear aggressive or be immediately demanding.  [info] [INFP] [info] 1428900143
Toasty117 [info] Is wanting terrible things to happen to me a form of suicidal ideation or simply mental fuel for my desire for sympathy? A thought I've had for a very long time, even since middle school, is the fictional prospect of an unfortunate, random accident befalling me. Before I was diagnosed with depression, I always assumed the reason I had such sickeningly disturbing and selfish thoughts was because I desperately wanted sympathy even though I wasn't suffering.I would dream of criminals killing me while I protect my loved ones with my body, of how I would fight a gun invader off while my classmates fled, or how random thugs would assault me. But, there was always something odd about my dreams I never noticed. I was never victorious in any of my daydreams. I always died. My family would grieve, in these hypothetical scenarios, but that was expected. I never pictured a big school function to honor the "heroic student" who fought off an armed assailant, or a news station doing a news article on how an innocent individual was murdered in the streets, I just thought of how it would end for me.I never thought to expand deeply on these thoughts until I sought help from a therapist and psychiatrist about my depression. My "death-dreams" had turned especially dark, with me having a gun put to my head, and instead of begging for my life, I would break down and explain my depression to the assailant, and I would beg them to pull the trigger, just so I could relish in the oddity of the confrontation.Maybe my dreams lately could be described as suicidal ideation due to my depression, but what about early in my life? Am I to say I've been passively suicidal ever since my middle school years? Or do I just crave attention in some kind of explainable freudian based psychological factor? [info] None [info] 1436248675
dva_memes [info] Pray for me I'm sad let me give some back story so I've been diagnosed with depression and when I found God I started fighting my depressing but it will come back at times So I live with my Uncle and my dad has visitation with me every other weekend and I usually get to see my grandma on the weekend my dad doesnt have me So this weekend (which was my grandma's weekend) I went to workout with him on my own terms and my uncle got very mad with me and he wont let me go to my grandma's anymore for a little while idk why it has made me sad it just has I'm very close to my grandma because my dad and my mom were gone and my uncle, grandpa, and both my grandmas raised me this has made me very sad so please pray for me and anyone else who has depression Also yes I know this is kinda a dumb thing to get sad over [info] Christian :latin-cross: [info] 1583097067
sexgorilla [info] Elaboration from OP: I just remembered something that happened to me several years ago. Thought I'd see if I'm alone in having this experience.In 2010 I was diagnosed with depression. I was put on a drug called Pristiq.By and large the drug has been incredibly helpful, if not life-saving.One of the side effects is very vivid and sometimes angry dreams. This happened from time to time in the first few months and eventually subsided.What was more unusual was that in the midst of this period of vivid dreams, there were two nights where I experienced a "wet dream". As in having a hot dream and waking up with sticky, jizzy shorts.This was not just odd because I was 42 years old at the time. It was also surprising because I had literally never had a wet dream in my life until then. Not once. (To be blunt, I figured out masturbation quite soon).Has anything similar happened to anyone else out there? [info] None [info] 1454966705
FuckBagMcGee [info] The worst part is the staff fucking blames and demonizes you for it. I once had a day where I couldnt stop crying and I was told to go to the front office. They said if I didn't stop, I would be suspended. 3 years later, I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1571744413
bingeblack [info] I understand. I was diagnosed with depression and still continued to drink. I never blacked out. Never drove under influence. Never drank more than three a night but I felt that I drank alcoholically. I've been off the sauce for 20 days now and I hope and pray that it sticks.  [info] None [info] 1548091622
babyrhino [info] Mormon here, on anti-depressants. We are allowed I was diagnosed with depression when I was 19 and likely would have hung myself by now without them. [info] None [info] 1502661754
philliphpapsmear [info] I actually have a lot to say to you. I should preface this with a few things first. You should know that I was diagnosed with depression as a child and it has been an obstacle all throughout my life. I also have difficulty making friends sometimes and get very lonely. I graduated from my university a year ago but am living with my parents again, which sucks and my work schedule makes a social life almost impossible so I am socially isolated. Did I mention my girlfriend broke up with me when I got that job? Despite that, I'm not depressed anymore. Here is some meaningful advice that should get you results. I don't promise a cure, but this will really help you alleviate a lot of this so you can enjoy life again.The first thing you should do is start exercising regularly. Lift weights about three times per week. Really learn about diet and exercise. Not that you need to lose weight, but exercise tears down your body and you need the right balance of things like carbs, protein, fat, etcetera to rebuild it. You don't have to be exact, just close, and it's not particularly hard. You should also do cardio twice per week. These activities clear your mind and give you confidence. They also increase your energy levels and boost mood.Meditate for about 15 minutes every morning. This does not really do anything until you have been doing it for a couple of weeks, so don't get discouraged after a day or two and think "this is stupid." This helps you think much more clearly and objectively. You know how some people are overly optimistic and not seeing things the way they truly are? You are on the opposite end of that spectrum, looking at the world through a shit-shaded lens rather than a clear one.Stay away from pornography. I have no moral problem with pornography but people with depression oftentimes (myself included) end up using it to regulate mood because it temporarily increases dopamine production. The result is a behavioral addiction symptomized by an overall decrease in dopamine production and hypofrontality. This is damaging to your brain--the damage is reversible by abstaining from it--but I recommend you stop using it if you already are. It's difficult to do, but you should do it. Here is a TED talk about it if you are interested in more details: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wSF82AwSDiUIf after a month of doing these things consistently, you feel little or no difference, go see a psychiatrist. It could be a physiological problem which you have little control over. I take a very, very low dose of a mild dopamine reuptake inhibitor. It wiped out what was left of my depression after doing those other things, but those other things took care of probably 70% of it.I really want you to enjoy your time at school. Careers are rarely fulfilling and what you want at your age is not necessarily what you will want at 30. For example, I got a degree in Spanish language literature and hispanolinguistics, thinking I wanted to work in international sales. Once I finally got an interview for such a job, I realized how miserable the nature of the work would really be. Now I do something unrelated for the time being but am saving money for a graduate program in Economics, which IS something I would love. Furthermore, you have a huge opportunity for a social life at a university. It is much, much harder afterward. Believe it or not, you somehow have less free time when you work full time versus studying full time. You are missing out on a huge opportunity that you will not have twice. PM me if you want to talk about your situation more. I was convinced when I was in college that having a full-time job and a structured schedule would make me happier, and the opposite was true. That's why this post struck a particular chord with me. [info] None [info] 1386749338
kitkat45645 [info] I was diagnosed with depression by 3 different professionals and was in denial about it because I wasn't sad. Any medication didn't help my mood swings or my irritability, but lifestyle changes did. Different things work for different people [info] None [info] 1511545488
tolotes [info] Am I boring/unfun/a loser for hating bars and dancing? I'm in my early twenties and I've always hated drinking and bars. Even outside of environments with alcohol I'm extremely uncomfortable with dancing - I tried joining a dance club at college but it made me very depressed and I'd rather lose a finger than have to dance more.No disrespect to people who enjoy dancing, bars, and alcohol, of course, but it makes me feel so awful and I never belong there. I was diagnosed with depression recently, which explains why I don't get much joy out of anything (including things like dancing and concerts) but even after medication dancing still makes me miserable.Does this make me boring or a loser? It seems like every girl I meet loves dancing so it's always awkward telling them that I don't. I really wish I could be like everyone else but I just never find any pleasure in it and I have to fake having a fun time every time. What should I do? Any help is appreciated. [info] None [info] 1577939280
Adassai_nova [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12, but I remember being depressed even in elementary school. I have literally no memory of what it's like to be happy. And for my entire life, all my depression has done is get worse; there has never been relief or improvement, just a constant slide further into darkness.I'm at the point now where I have no goals in life. I used to strive to better myself- even if it was self-destructive goals like my underweight GW. Now I have no goals, literally nothing I want to do. I don't have any interests. I don't even want to play videogames anymore. I stopped horseback riding which was, prior to this, my passion. Now I couldn't care less.I want to die. I have a plan. Its actually the only thing towards which I look eagerly. Death is the only adventure that interests me.The problem is that I have a husband I love, who has emotional vulnerability of his own. I don't want to hurt him. I legitimately don't know if he could handle me dying. In fact, I would bet otherwise.But I don't know what else to do. I started therapy at the age of 4. I've been through nearly all medications, tried all different types of therapy, seen a dozen different psychiatrists; nothing has worked to fix me, and I am at a point where I legitimately don't think there's a solution for me. [info] Age: 25 | BMI: 21.4 | Gender: M | Dx: BN [info] 1521750197
saro13 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression, and I have my ups and downs. I tend to be far more down when the rare, prospective long-term relationship doesn't work out (read: they stop communicating with me). I want to be wanted, and I need to be needed.  [info] None [info] 1358966382
DaddyDeathKnight [info] I'm in a very similar camp as far as depression and your chicken/egg thoughts. I was diagnosed with depression but I was still using during that time period so who knows what caused what at least in my case. We will get through it though! [info] None [info] 1489753528
limbojade [info] My heart has been broken so many times, I’ve just left the pieces where they are and learned to live with it that way. I was diagnosed with depression a couple of months ago, and it’s been so hard. I told my parents I felt that whenever I am saddened, start to cry, etc, I’m a pain to them and it’s just like “oh, here we go again.” They agreed. Sometimes, I just feel like they would be so much better off without me. I feel like a walking inconvenience. I’m not surprised at them agreeing, because I’ve been telling myself that’s what I am to them for years. The only difference is now I have validation. [info] None [info] 1556771182
TheFlyingDane [info] I wanna want to game again. Any suggestions? So I've been diagnosed with depression and for the last half year I've lost most of my interests, including gaming.And I've been looking for a game to reignite that kind of spark Skyrim once offered for me.It will be a big help if there's any games you guys can recommend.I used to like MGSV, Civ V, Saints Row, Anno, Far Cry and of course TES: Skyrim.I usually really like mods, nice textures, great storyline and single-player.Thank you for reading and suggestions :D [info] None [info] 1461779533
Mayitachan [info] Mmmm, nothing much actually. I was diagnosed with depression (and possibly BPD) and I am unable to get a job. But thank you for your concern. [info] None [info] 1539192029
5050Clown [info] I think you misunderstood me. I'm not talking about the cause of depression, I'm stating what the symptom called depression is in comes from . An inappropriate response to emotional stimulus is a very general statement.Regardless of the cause the symptom, depression, is an inappropriate response to emotional stimulus.  Whether it is the common tragedy of life, or a mood disorder.  depression is a symptom and that symptom is always an inappropriate response to emotional information.  In this case it is a low mood persists for at least 2 weeks as defined in the DSM.  As you get older you either get better at dealing with it or you don't.I've been diagnosed with depression almost my entire life and the definition has never changed but the terminology has.all you're really describing to me and your post is the kind of person that you are interested in. The kind of person that you find interesting because you feel that you're apathetic and you find your life boring. There are many other people who, should they come across you and your particular quirks and characteristics, would find you more than interesting.  The person you're describing to me, kind of sounds insufferable. You could easily be describing a narcissistic psychopath. as someone who thrives on empathy, psychopaths are the most boring human beings on the planet to me.  in my years working in different places, a lot of sales people and really fake people are the kinds of people who would say you have to be interested to be interesting.That's bullshit, you have to be truthful to be interesting as far as I'm concerned. Everyone may not agree with that but I think a lot of people do.to me the only really interesting people are the ones who are brave enough to be themselves regardless of how apathetic or depressed they feel. Regardless of how mindless or shity their hobbies are.It the traits you ascribe to yourself could easily be attributed to someone like Kurt Cobain.  If he didn't have a bunch of platinum records would he suddenly be boring?If your friends quickly retreated then you just haven't found the right friends friends, or they just need a little time.. I can say for a fact that my depressive symptoms will flare up if I try to be someone that I'm not. Then it gets very difficult to get out of bed. I embrace my apathetic times,. I try to avoid cynicism and people who reduce complex subjects to simple platitudesSometimes I'm really uninterested in everything, that doesn't make me boring. [info] None [info] 1530581568
Extef8998 [info] I don't know how to cope. [advice] I'm 20M and I was diagnosed with depression when I was 15. I've always had my coping Mechanisms and I've gotten by the last 5 years relatively unscathed. I've tried to off myself in a cry for help kinda way a few times but no ones ever really cared. My parents think it's all fake and don't really do a whole lot, my friends were never really that close with me during school. But I never had the courage to actually go through with it, I wanted to believe that there was a real reason for struggling through my pathetic existence. 5 years later and I've met the love of my life. She helps me through things like I couldn't have imagined. She also has a mental illness and understands me a bit. I proposed to her a few months ago and she said yes. I've never been this happy, but recently her depression has been getting worse and it's doing something to me. I've finally found my reason to live and I want to help her but my body and my brain shut down and I can't. I'm not getting depressed anymore, I'm getting angry. I don't know how to deal with it, it's like there's this monster in my head telling me that everything is her fault and that I should say all these things to her that I don't mean. I know that it's not her fault but I can't help think it anyway. I'm so angry, there's this tightness in my chest that won't go away and I feel like I just want to explode and destroy everything around me.I don't know what to do. Someone, please, help. [info] None [info] 1447044800
lordloose [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was like 13 or 14 but only took prozac for a year or two before i started self medicating with drugs. Haven't been to a therapist or psychiatrist since then but I'm sure it would do me some good. But with no insurance and a not so great job it's not really possible. Kind of a fucked up cycle. [info] None [info] 1572105602
LadyRedfox8 [info] I think you may need to see a therapist. I felt this way before I was diagnosed with depression  [info] None [info] 1553122952
CivilWarHoundour [info] [Vent] I'm not ready to get another dog but everyone thinks I should?!? So, last week I had to put my best friend and my baby puppy down. Her name was Scout. I had her since I was 16 and I'm 25 now, so a happy 9 years. Unfortunately over winter break she was diagnosed with lymphoma and we put her on steroids thinking it would help her go into remission. She started to vomit up blood one night and we knew that putting her down was the best option rather than putting her through more tests. My heart is still absolutely broken. She was definitely my dog. She followed me around like a fuzzy shadow and slept in my bed. She was there for me through the passing of my chubby wubby Dachshund named Annie and the passing of three grandparents. She was also there to see me graduate from high school, undergrad and start my first semester of graduate school. To say she was my rock is an understatement. It's been super lonely without her as I'm now home alone while my parents work. (I'm on winter break from grad school). I was diagnosed with depression during my first semester of grad school and Scout was my bright spot. Everyone thinks I should get another dog so I have something to focus on. One friend even offered me a friend's dog that needed to be re homed. However, I don't want another dog for a long while because Scout was so special to me. No dog will ever be like her but people just don't understand? They think I should get another dog and are asking when I'm getting another dog. It's just frustrating because it's people who knew how much Scout meant to me. Here's a picture of my baby puppy: https://imgur.com/a/rroLU [info] Scout: The best mutt ever (RIP) [info] 1483567912
TheDarkerParker [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and a few other mental illnesses. I don't know what to say at this point. Tell me about yourself? [info] None [info] 1420170239
maddymox94 [info] I can't stand my life anymore I'm 24, almost 25 y.o. I was diagnosed with depression about 14 years ago. For the last couple of years it's been getting worse and worse, when I started University I was really motivated and as the months went by I stop caring, I lost every opportunity to get my degree, now I'm too old to start another one or keep trying, I gained weight and became bulimic and nobody cared.My parents think I'm exaggerating, my boyfriend doesn't believe I'm depressed, I have no friends to talk to when I'm in a bad place.Every time I tried to improve my life it just doesn't work, I can't get a job, I've been trying so hard but they won't hire me. Due not having a job I depend on my parents/boyfriend to pay my food, meds and medical appointment, which is always something they bring up to make me feel worthless.I just can't stand this life anymore, I don't have the energy to get up from bed, shower or eat, everything I tried end in failure and it's just not worthy. [info] None [info] 1544060303
waaaffle [info] Had one yesterday after my therapy session once I got home. I've been diagnosed with depression for 4 years (soon 5), OCD/GAD/Social Anxiety for 2 1/2 years. So I'm an emotional mess haha. School is so difficult for me because of all of that- so I understand your frustration with school and teachers. If you're close to your mom, or dad, or really anyone- just talk to them. About anything, the situation that's frustrating you or not. They may be able to help, or just provide a shoulder to cry on [info] succulents, video games, dogs, memes [info] 1490146226
CrowInASuit [info] Don’t do it, things will get better.Take a moment. Breathe. Just do NOTHING for a minute or two. Think about ways you can help others.If you help others, you might be able to help yourself feel better. Volunteer at a food drive, foster an animal or child, anything that you think might help get you up and not suicidal for a bit.I was diagnosed with depression in about 2016 and everything was falling apart. After a long, long time of taking pills I realized that it was only hurting me after a while. Nausea, headaches, craving to eat rocks and glass (which was a side effect, sadly), and much much more.My girlfriend got the idea that maybe instead of hiding in random rooms or closets in the house and drinking while eating leaves, we should volunteer at a soup kitchen in a church where she could be watching me. After a while of me throwing every single excuse out there at her, she basically dragged me to the car and we drove there where she signed us up.After that, we fostered multiple puppies, ten kittens and a bird who just wouldn’t shut up, and it made me feel a little bit better for a pretty good amount of time, knowing that I could sustain a few small lives, and it eventually led me to thinking about how if I could sustain all those small lives, maybe I could sustain one big life! I started taking care of myself more, eating better and socializing with human life.Point is, go do something good for the world and maybe you can find some hope. Worked for me, and my great grandma died and she was basically the only non-abusive woman in the family... [info]  [info] 1517887378
Issues90 [info] Perspectives I have been diagnosed with depression since 7th grade. I haven't been very happy in a long time and haven't had the best childhood. I am now a junior in high school and I'm wondering if my perspective is normal or not? I always see people and their emotions and what they're doing differently I guess. For example if someone was crying and another person would comfort them I'd see that, acknowledge it and see what's happening but id think it's weird. Like "people really comfort eachother?" or when someone is super happy with someone "Are people really that happy? How can they be happy?" I feel like I am not a human and I feel like I'm studying the human race and how it works. whenever i get sad or angry i feel wrong for having it. I know my emotions are there, and they are big but i dont think im able to express it. Like if anybody else heard what i wss mad or sad about id sound dumb and mot have a reason to be mad or sad. Ill know that im sad or mad but i wont label it as such. i question what people do and why. Why are they expressing emotions in such matters etc. its weird and I'm not sure how to feel about it. I dont see myself as a human with emotins and feelings. is this normal? [info] None [info] 1502135796
rareworm [info] I'm a triple threat, but I'm all alone. (15F) In the most humble way possible, I'm funny, smart, and attractive. I'm told this often online. I have many acquaintances that I make laugh. They come up to me for conversation, and et cetera. I'm certainly not hated. I've never been bullied. I just can't see why I have no real friends and no partner.I'm a teenager, yes, so I know being lonely is all a part of it. I'm diagnosed with depression, which makes my way of thinking worse. I take pills, so that helps. Anyways, I'd appreciate it if no one bitched to me about how ungrateful I am or how I'm acting special. Any bullshit like that can be left at the door. I don't need it.My entire life, I've had no best friends-- no one I can talk to about anything. I feel like all I'm good for is a quick laugh and possibly someone to talk to, but not someone to listen to. With the relationship side of things, I'm even more confused. I dress decent and nice, I smell good, I NEVER brag or try hard, and I'm nice if someone is nice to me. Despite me bitching to the internet about this, I've never done it in real life. So, no one in real life has a reason to think I'm a try hard or upset about me being alone.Before anyone tells me to put myself out there, I have. I've kissed two guys, and it was a mistake to me. I've asked "friends" to hang out, and every time they say they're busy. No, they're not busy, because they're never busy. Maybe I'm just being a stupid bitch, but it's how I feel.I put up a tough front, and I never take shit from anyone. That's probably why I have no real friends.Anyways, are people intimidated by me? Many people have told me that no one new talks to me, because I intimidate them. No one sits next to me, and so on and so forth. Again, I'm a triple threat: smart, funny, and attractive. Does that intimidate people or am I just delusional? [info] None [info] 1547269629
Blujay17 [info] Sometimes I'm happy Most likely no one will read this. Oh well. I was diagnosed with depression about three years ago, for a while I wasn't really sad so much as never happy and couldn't find anything that changed this. A little over a year and a half ago I met my now girlfriend, I love her more than anything and when I'm with her I'm happier than I have been in years. Unfortunately this also means that a lot of the time when I'm not with her/talking to her I feel like shit. Oh yea, there's that little problem if she moved and now lives across the fucking US and we've spent 15 days in the same place in the past year. Fuck me. [info] None [info] 1481526320
JustRuss79 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression when I was younger, but made it through.  I think it is less truly blank (from what I remember) and more that nothing matters so its not worth remembering.it wasn't "truly" blank...it was more like "this sucks" over and over until it becomes meditation on how much life sucks.But thats just my experience, I do not and can not speak for 100% of people. [info] None [info] 1548788641
yrogerg123 [info] When I finally took all of the symptoms you just described to a therapist and then a psychiatrist, I was diagnosed with depression. That's just what it is from a medical standpoint. It might be from stress, overwork, exhaustion, or burn out, but let's call it what it actually is: depression. See a therapist. Sometimes diet and exercise can fix things, sometimes they can't. Regardless, you should really be talking to a professional about this. [info] INTJ [info] 1449326466
ItsPrettyUnderground [info] DOIN' IN MAH BELLY!!!!! Be witty I can't say how much of it is very high functioning one since I was diagnosed with depression and melancholy and loss of what kind of sacrilege [info] None [info] 1562265839
ACSyndicator [info] This goes into a slightly different topic. I have a varied relationship with firearms considering I have been diagnosed with depression and been put on suicide watch many times I used to hate guns, but as it stands at this point I am not necessarily an advocate for guns for I do not have an issue with most people carrying guns. But also I feel that there is no need for a central government t and that we as a community should be able to rule ourselves (I'm a social anarchist by the way). Also I'm not fully against the police force, I understand that there are good cops, I know a few, such as one of the sergeants that walks downtown (I won't mention his name due to protection if privacy) but he is a good cop who keeps his biases away from his job and I respect that and think that more officers should be trained that way. I dont think that the arming of every citizen in sight is an awesome idea because there are folks who would not be able to handle it. Like me, I have been diagnosed, therefore I can't legally buy a firearm, because the government believes that I would harm myself or someone else. There are many factors to arming the public. Also I'm not an advocate for the NRA, therefore I dont share their ideals on arming everyone. When it comes to a solution to crime, there isn't one, I work for Love and Peace, it is the way I try to live my life, the only issue that I have with cops now a days is that people don't see them as a force to protect them, they fear them, and some for good reason. So my question to you is, how do we get cops to stop being violent criminals? [info] None [info] 1557597133
gateauxes [info] He's definitely said it about fibromyalgia as well, but it kind of seems like any invisible illness is potentially fake in his opinion.I've been diagnosed with depression by two different doctors (it hasn't been a difficult diagnosis for either of them, i present almost every symptom of depression except for slow movement), and this family member is still referring to it as 'the way you think you feel', which is funny. like yes, i feel depressed. That's the problem. [info] You are now doing kegels [info] 1528252800
Seriou [info] &gt;treatment resistent depressionThat phrase triggered me. Depression is a mental thing, and the ways we "treat" it is fucking backwards, sideways and inside out. Let me tell ya something: I was diagnosed with depression when I was young. I've been horribly, almost violently suicidal and self-loathing my whole life. My death was constantly on my mind. I used to take antidepressants, tried talk therapy and counseling, even got prescribed a bunch of adult anti-psychotic meds by a shockingly incompetent specialist. That was a nightmarish year.  What helped me in the end though, was myself. It's been a very long and rough road that I'm still walking. Life still isn't very enjoyable and I have many self-destructive behaviors I'm dealing with, but I haven't legitimately felt the need to die in a long time. I'm so thankful for that. I'd love to hear more about your life story &amp; depression Bubbline. Pm or comment, maybe I can share some of my experience to give you a leg up. [info] None [info] 1567345859
rkenned6 [info] Exactly, I have been diagnosed with depression and there have been days when I just want to say that I simply can't come in to work. I just can't. And I can't tell my boss why, because even I can't really explain it. I just simply cannot get myself off the couch &amp; in to work.  [info] None [info] 1365781632
atomicrae [info] Hi! I just turned 22, so I'm not too far ahead of you in life. c: I promise it WILL get better. I was diagnosed with depression and fibromyalgia my freshman year of high school, so all the horrible suicidal thoughts and unexplainable pain I had been having since childhood finally made sense. I honestly thought I was going to die after receiving my diagnoses because I was "big city girl" who moved to bumfuck nowhere where everybody hated me and I lived on corn farm where the closed thing was a Walmart that was about 10 miles away. (For reference, my hometown had two gas stations and three restaurants practically in my back yard. It has a hard change on me.) I think what got me to delay and eventually abandon my suicidal plans was a combination of my hobbies, my goals and classic punk and classic rock musicians, haha. I read a lot of my favorite bands' auto-biographies and I really felt they understood the loneliness, isolation and sadness I was feeling because they went through it to. Just knowing that I wasn't the only one, that there was a light at the end of the tunnel plus having my hobbies to distract me helped me get through those awful times. Now, things are soooo much better! My fiancé and i just bought our first place and yeah, we're poor as shit rn but we're so much happier than we were in our teen years. I also have no one trying to control me anymore. I can go wherever I want, whenever I want.  I'm (hopefully) starting nursing next year, I'm getting calls about jobs near my new house, so I won't have to waste money on gas going to a job I honestly hate anymore. Also, I get to buy whatever groceries I want and cook whatever I want to! c: This is really important to me because my mom never wanted to try new foods, so my dad and I were stuck with the same boring dishes. The little things like these really make a difference in adulthood.Just hang in there! Only a few more years and then you're free! You can really start life then and you'll lay down in your bed, in your house/apartment and you'll think about how you never thought you'd make it this far and it'll make you excited to go even further. 💖 (Sorry if this was winded!) [info] None [info] 1511584696
lane23 [info] Well, maybe I should not have used the term "manic". Yes, I am diagnosed with depression and I am currently managing it pretty effectively. The way I treat money is one of the many things I identified as part of my depressive cycle though. Also, I do have a lot of bi-polar disorder in my family, so what used to be termed manic-depressive is a trait that runs in my family. I would not consider myself to be manic however. But, I do get into spending frenzies when I am in really good moods. The resulting debt fuels depressive episodes. I appreciate the advice, maybe I will look into help groups for this type of compulsion.  [info] None [info] 1366809520
themaekster [info] I know that I'm late but what the hell, I need to vent. When I was back in the 5th grade, my mom and dad got a divorce. And not the clean type either, it was a very rough one. Dad cheated, mom went batshit and drove me, my brother and a few other relatives 1000km north of where I live just to got bitch slap him and stuff. So after all that was done I had to sit through the proceedings of the divorce. Because my mom and dad were never officialy registered as a married couple shit got complicated. So 10 year old me sat in the district office watching my whole life slowly fall apart. That pretty much crushed my whole perception of love and just the world in general. About a year later I was diagnosed with depression. My mother brought me to a therapist because I would just randomly start crying every night. Therapist gave me some pills and I sat through quite a few sessions. I've stopped taking them for a while because I noticed no change except for the first few days I was on them or when I changed my medication. I'm still depressed and I don't know why. I've gotten over the stuff with my parents, I have decent grades, I have friends, but I also have this massive insecurity. I feel like my life right now is a lie. I feel like even though I think I have friends, they don't consider me friends or something like that. I'm insecure that my life is a lie, just like my parent's healthy relationship. But at least Reddit makes me happy. [info] None [info] 1462719647
depressedhombre [info] I've been diagnosed with depression since late 2011 [info] None [info] 1370706601
TheGamingBros55 [info] Look man, I really dont give a damn about this game and anyone who plays it, I have been diagnosed with depression a year ago and I am not mentally fucking stable anymore so really if Reto doesnt do something with this im just going to drop this game and this subreddit once for all and stop losing my nerves over a bunch of lazy developers. [info]  [info] 1529826016
Troubled25 [info] Getting better but trapped in the past: Advice on how to cope with loss needed A little background on my situation:I was diagnosed with depression when i was 18, it didn't really effect me badly until the last 12 months. 3 years ago i gained a place at a top university in the UK to study for a PhD (i was also given a teaching position) after completing an undergraduate and masters degree in Neuropsychology. Over the first 2 years I struggled but managed to produce some very high quality work and was award a huge amount of money to complete my research (functional imaging studies of how the brain changes with age). I began drinking more and more alcohol to cope with the stress of the job but fell madly in love with a friend and co worker who supported me through it. Then after 3 months we began to argue more and more and in response my depression and drinking became worse. It culminated in me having a mental break down, my partner couldn't handle how i was acting (which by now was very erratic) and she left me. Having lost her I lost my support i could no longer function, I lost my research position and now I am working in an entry level social care job. All i can focus on is the past and how much I have lost. I want to move forward with my life but feel I can't. I feel like a man who had everything and lost it all. Does anyone have any concrete advice about this, or feels in a similar situation? Thanks [info] None [info] 1373731255
Lineaddict [info] My various physical illnesses are getting too much to bear. I have vocal chord dysfunction, which is like reverse athsma. That along with mucus heavy saliva makes breathing painful and difficult. I am severely constipated, only using the restroom about once a week. This causes me to sometimes have crippling butt spasms which leave me unable to do anything but sit and wait the pain out. I was diagnosed with depression before these two things were too much of a problem, and while I am better mentally than I was, my most intense urges to off are when my symptoms are at their worse. I have thoughts that I might rather die than experience the pain anymore. I am proactive about managing my illnesses, seeing doctors and such, but appointments are few and far between for the VCD.I am drowning inside of myself and if my symptoms get much worse, I will have difficulty keeping invasive thoughts out. [info] None [info] 1462704462
Icantstandya [info] Recommendations for a therapist on the peninsula? Hey guys. Long story short, I was diagnosed with depression while in university and have been on meds (which have been great - but they're obviously only a temporary fix) since then. I recently got a job that gives me great benefits - one if which is coverage for counselling. I am apprehensive about seeing someone. I guess I feel too proud or something. I know it would help me out a lot though. I'm wondering if anyone here has any recommendations of places to check out for counselling? Maybe someone was in a similar situation before?Thanks a lot and happy new year! [info] None [info] 1420328195
arsviv3ndi [info] My dad is ignoring my mental health and neglecting treatment for my depression In June of 2017 I started seeing a therapist, and after multiple tests and many appointments, I was diagnosed with depression in October. My dad didn’t attend any of my therapy sessions so when I came to his house with a prescription of Zoloft, he refused to let me take it and told me and my mom that he would find an “alternative method” for my illness. Four months went by and he didn’t do a fucking thing, I was failing all of my classes and getting shitfaced to finish my assignment (I’m 14). It got to the point where my body almost shut down because of how much alcohol was in my system. I told my mom about what I was going through and she filed a PFA against my dad and I didn’t see him for a month, but I was put on Zoloft the entire time and I felt great, but once I went back to his house, he refused to let me take the medication. I slipped into a state of severe depression, causing me to relapse to my alcoholic state. I need to get help before my body shuts down from alcohol poisoning [info] None [info] 1529032707
z3k3 [info] This is not always the case.I have a mild case of ocd and my variant is all in the head I obsess sometimes for months over things (I still have the fucking blue giraffe bouncing around in my head over 2 yrs later) However behaviorally it has very little affect on me. I do not repeatedly do the same thing over and over.So by your definition you would get pissed at me for stating I have ocd when infarct my statement is factual.Source:- My psychologist when I was diagnosed with depression and mild OCD. [info] None [info] 1391727024
IgnorantThrall [info] I think you only get a paper if it is needed to file for a disability, IEP (special accommodations in K-12), or special accommodations in college. If Tourette's is causing any issues with high school or college (if it is vocal, then things like presentations or discussions), then you should probably get one in order to get accommodations. It's on a medical record somewhere...I didn't get a little paper when I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12. All I got was a note in my charts. [info] Trahearne-kin...this won't end well. [info] 1389758306
IHateLifeAndMyself [info] I already have professional help and medication but it doesn't work.... Btw maybe I should have mentioned it but this isn't me just feeling "depressed" I'm diagnosed with depression. I forfot to mention that, I know there are alot of teens who claim to be depressed but are just feeling down so im sorry if i confused you.  [info] None [info] 1494881130
thuthuytruong [info] How do healthy people feel in the morning? When I was diagnosed with depression, waking up was the worst, as many of you already know. I realized how big the problem was only after recovery as I finally had a healthy morning to compare with. Past few weeks I have been struggling with waking up again, but I fail to to objectively evaluate whether I am just having a morning fatigue or it's  depression knocking the door´again. I don't remember how a healthy morning looks like. Not even on the weekends. It's very confusing because I may often feel rested and happy, but I just can't / don't want to get out the bed. I just stay in forever and then I feel guilty and shitty about myself. How do I know the difference? [info] None [info] 1551795746
djdevilmonkey [info] &gt; And request politely that you don't make blanket statements about those with "known mental issues" because very likely one of your friends, family or coworkers have a diagnosis. The stigma around mental illness is revealed in these conversations when people say things like "limiting those with known mental health issues." It's unfair to limit the rights of millions of functional adults based on a diagnosis or a history.I am diagnosed with depression, and I take Zoloft and Wellbutrin, and on top of that I am in therapy. Anyway I suppose I used mental health issues too vaguely. I was referring to people with past offenses or known signs of aggression who have things such as depression, but also things like schizophrenia.I don't think people with issues such as depression should be limited when purchasing firearms, only if there are past offenses or doctor/therapist notes of strong aggression, or the person has been held at a medical facility for a fear of endangerment to others. In most cases, someone stops taking their medication for depression, they will become more depressed and more likely to harm themselves (most cases it's themselves and not others). Schizophrenia or severe cases of Bipolar disorder or types of disassociation disorder, these people may be likely to harm others due to the severity of these conditions.Like I said I used mental health issues way too vaguely, I understand that, but inside that topic there is somewhere where a line needs to be drawn, and it shouldn't be vague or drawn at depression, but more focused on severe disorders or past/noted feelings or instances of aggression [info] None [info] 1541634981
disconsolateSage [info] My father died not too long ago. Most of my family was in tears, but I sort of felt, well, numb.It might have been because I didn't have the best relationship with him, but I didn't feel upset in the traditional sense of the word. It took a while to set in, and I was diagnosed with depression.I've 'gotten over it', but I still go to therapy and take medication for the lasting depression. (Which wasn't really caused by his death as much as it triggered the reaction, I suppose.)It doesn't take too long to feel better. However, if you still feel awful after a while, I would suggest seeking help so it doesn't get even worse. [info] None [info] 1462399816
PinkieLaMandy [info] Let me first say how sorry I am for your loss, of both your mother and grandmother. As someone raised exclusively by her mom and grandma, I can't even begin to comprehend how you have to be feeling. I'm so sorry.I have to ask, but have you spoken to a medical professional about your past ( and likely future) suicidal thoughts? I was diagnosed with depression earlier this year after thoughts of death ruined my life and I can say from experience that seeking medical help is the best thing you can do. Though she isn't around anymore, you can honor your grandmother's memory by doing what she'd want you to do: live. I'm heading off to bed, but if you need to talk to someone OP, PM away. [info] None [info] 1355581496
westcovina- [info] Friendships make me feel crazy Please help me. I am driving myself crazy. I don’t know what is wrong with me, I have been diagnosed with depression but I don’t think it fits my core issues.I really struggle with friendships. I have been treated badly (mostly mentally) by every non family person I’ve ever met and the results are extreme insecurity and feelings of utter self loathing. Whenever I make a friend I drive myself crazy wondering if I’m good enough, if they actually like me or gearing myself up for the eventual hurt. I met someone online as part of a game that I’m a club leader of. We eventually came really good friends and she told me I was her best friend, and ever since then I can’t stop thinking that it’s going to mess up somehow. She is very patient with me and it has helped enormously, except we must have different definitions of best friends. Mine would be she is my priority over other friends, I would message her first etc. She doesn’t treat me like a priority at all and I don’t understand how you can call someone your best friend if they’re not your first port of call. I am just so desperately sad and now in self destruct mode. Unfortunately as I am the leader I can’t quit the game or the discord as there are many members that rely on it, and oddly enough said friend once said if I abandon the game it’s like I’m abandoning her. She is quite emotionally closed off so this surprised me.Anyway I’m rambling. I already know that I am intense so I don’t need that pointing out, I want to know if there are others that feel this way or how to stop feeling this way because it’s honestly making me not want to be here [info] None [info] 1584382200
Blendy [info] sry for your loss,thing is yea lol is a toxic game but tbh its the point where the education and parents come into play,im 27 y old and when i was growing up i couldnt imagine insulting someone irl yet alone over a video game.Atm its full of shitty kids that dont know what manners are.I was diagnosed with depression when my sister died and like video games saved my life,expecially online gaming because i could hang out with friends and talk with them about shit,that was about 9y ago when online gaming was a whole diffrent world. [info] None [info] 1394121316
davin3000 [info] I am diagnosed with depression (mild bi-polar actually) and take meds for it. It's a little baader-meinhof for me reading your post since, I've been doing those very same things for a few months and am almost completely weaned off the meds. [info] None [info] 1267158460
wenzalin [info] Everyone would assume I was taken or killed. I have an 18 month old and a 6.5 year old that everyone knows that I would never ever leave. My husband also has a lot of medical problems and I would never leave him and everyone knows it.Those who know me well might think suicide since I was diagnosed with depression last month and am on anti-depressants. However, the anti-depressants are working and I feel like myself again. [info] None [info] 1486678029
NaomiKatyr [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and Anxiety, and I am like that often.Might be like that. [info] None [info] 1461077190
c1nn3k [info] Shit, it's fucking strange how a person living on the other side of a globe can have such a similar experience in life. Long story short - I'm 2 years older than you, also have some financial problems, looking for a roommate, my job and coworkers suck, and I was diagnosed with depression about year and a half ago. Dota2 community played a huge part in my getting better, but luckily I met the greatest person in my life, whom I'm planning to wife in next couple of months (hope she doesn't see this before I propose). I'm still seeing my therapist and sometimes need to take meds which I hate, but it's better than ever before. Try to "turn off" your feelings at work. You're there to earn money in the first place, not to make friends. That helped for me. Also keep on searching for better payed job, maybe try getting some extra hours elsewhere (currently running from one place to another myself).Crossing fingers for You, keep on logging in! Also, feel free to PM me if you'd like to add me to your friend list just to chitchat or w/e.  [info] None [info] 1537336671
youreahorcruxharry [info] I'm in grad school and I've been trying to get into an exercise routine. I start working out for about 2 weeks and then seem to find some excuse to stop for a few days, which means it never picks back up again. Rinse and repeat.Your last suggestion is something I was thinking about talking through with my therapist this week, but I guess I can say a little more about it here. I was diagnosed with depression 5 years ago and have made significant strides since then, but one problem I've always had is with my self-worth. I have made progress in improving it, but it now seems too tied to my academic success and my SO. When the academic success falters (or things start becoming very stressful as they are currently), I look towards my SO for confirmation, when I shouldn't need to look towards someone else. I guess the first step is being aware of the problem, but now I need assistance in fixing it. Do you or anyone else have recommendations? And I will definitely look into that book, thank you! [info] None [info] 1468684581
godhateshayden [info] what am i All I am is a cluster of cells floating around in space with chemicals running through my body making me feel like shit. What's the point. Why was I made sentient. Why does it have to be this way. Why can't it all just end.I'm currently lying on my bedroom floor in the dark. I'm on half term break, and all I've done is lie in bed in self pity. I'm pathetic. I've been diagnosed with depression but I feel like I'm faking it. Whenever the sadness goes away I feel guilty and I start thinking of things to get me down again. What am I doing with my life. [info] None [info] 1487272464
mysteriouswayz [info] Do you know if you have a history of depression? I can really feel for you on this because I had the EXACT same story. I LOVE sex but feared it because of premature ejaculation. Feared it so much that I turned down sex with a few girls out of fear knowing id never live it down. I was diagnosed with depression after my wife and I split up so I started taking anti-depression meds. The meds help regulate serotonin in my head- and its been said that premature ejaculation has been linked to incorrect levels of serotonin. Been on meds for 2 years now and I can honestly say its changed my life. Imagine not ever fearing cumming too soon! Talk with your doc about it. Good luck buddy!Addendum: the meds im on is called Citalopram [info] None [info] 1372198260
RavinDaveR [info] I was diagnosed with depression before my wife ran off with another man, and now I am so low I can't see up. [info] None [info] 1433516434
Man_of_Meat [info] I would strongly recommend it. I've been diagnosed with depression as well and getting onto medication from my psychiatrist has made a huge difference in my life. [info] None [info] 1515618907
sneekerhad [info] But we’re not telling someone to feel better. We’re giving very simple steps to follow. Not saying “figure out how to feel better” I’m saying go outside and be more active. Those are two vastly different responses and I hate how the “you can’t say just feel better” retort to any sort of concern and help is so often used. Some people won’t be able to use the advice like that, but a lot of people COULD and SHOULD use that advice, they just hide behind the “I’m too depressed to save myself” line even though a good amount aren’t.To be clear, because there’s always someone here who thinks that I’m talking about ALL depressed people. I’m not. There are perfectly valid people who are depressed that require medication and I hope the take that and feel better and I wish them only the best. Im talking to people who just need a little motivation. I’ve been there. I thought I was depressed. I was diagnosed with depression. I was given depression medication. Being active helped me more than anything else could. I’m talking to people like me. [info] None [info] 1560538316
Scrab22 [info] I deleted my comment because of the negative rating.I experience bad moods which I assume are depression (I was diagnosed with depression a long time ago).Sorry for hurting people with my comment, but it bummers me when I get discouraged for expressing my experience.I'd love to discuss this further here but frankly I don't want to get negative karma. It hurts. [info] None [info] 1481672615
kingvalen17 [info] Tried to help my suicidal friend and ended fucking it up. This might be long, please read it. I need some advices. This is my first time writing a post here in reddit, hope it won't suck. I'm a Colombian girl living in Stockholm (Sweden), I've been in these strange lands for almost 2 months, and of course, felt the urge to meet some people and make new friends, so, I decided to download Tinder, many guys were texting me but they're the only want sex type, but one day I had a match with a hot swed guy, we started talking for about a week and then we met up, I went to his place and things happened, we continued meeting up almost every day, he's 12 years older than me, but the connection we have? or had was too amazing it defeated our age difference, it all was going perfectly well, we shared beautiful moments together and we started liking each other to the point of saying we loved each other, bla bla bla. Anyway, two days ago he had a bad moment with depression, he was saying things like "he needed to escape this place, that it was too heavy for him" and stuff like that, I've been diagnosed with depression and I kind of understand those thoughts, so, I got scared as fuck he might do something against himself, and I texted him saying "should I go there?" and he replied "you can come if you want", so I did it, I stopped everything I was doing at 10 pm in the night and went to his place (about 2 hours by train and busses), and I got to his place, it all was dark, I undressed and putted a pijama, then I went to his bed and sat there stroking his back, and he grabbed my hand and put it away, of course I felt bad, I felt rejected, but I understand that, after that he said that he didn't want to think about anything and that my voice and me stroking him make him think and I said "I'm sorry for coming here, I thought I'd make you feel better but I was wrong, I didn't know you wanted to be alone" and then he said "yeah, I should've told you that I wanted to be alone", I don't know if it's only me but that made me feel like an hindrance, I felt terribly bad, I'm a sensitive person, but, come on, it took me two hours to get here and you treat me this way? I started crying as he was laying on his bed, then I said like "I can go home, I don't mind it, I just want you to feel good" and he said "it's okay, what's done it's done, you can lay down in that other bed", we always sleep together on his bed so that made me feel like he didn't want me to be at his place at all, and I kind of got a bit pissed, which I feel guilty about, maybe all he needed was to be alone, but still, that's not the way you treat a person who went all the way down to be with you at your darkest, but whatever, maybe that's just me, after me feeling a bit pissed I told him "I'm going home now, I won't stay here, you need to be alone and I don't feel good anymore, I'm sorry for coming here, it was a big mistake" and then he said "stay, what's done is done and why is this a big mistake?, you just came from a point to this point, who really cares?", damn, that shit hurts, it's not just coming from there to here!! I did it because I fucking love you and I don't want anything bad to happen to you, after that I got dressed and opened the front door of the house, he, for the first time that night since I got there, standed up from the bad and said "please don't go, that'd make me feel worse and think more", I was holding on my tears and said with a broken voice "I'm not staying here, I'm sorry but I'm going now" and I did, I left his place and cried the whole path back to my house, I felt like shit, do I have the right to feel this way?, am I being dramatic? I honestly don't know, but whatever, after me leaving his place (about 20 minutes later) I wrote him a paragraph on messenger and sent it to him, it was basically me saying that I felt he was ungrateful to me, that I wasn't expecting nothing from him but still, it hurts, and that I came there with good intentions but it didn't came up the way I thought it would, and I told him I'd never be the same person again with him and that I'd go to his place to pick all my stuff up, hours later, he texted me saying that he needed to be alone and that he should've told me, that he was sorry, that now he know I'm true to him, that he never had a person who did something like that for him and that he wasn't ungrateful, and stuff like that, we continued texting each other saying that we didnt want to lose each other and then I asked him if he actually want to go away from Stockholm, he said yes, and that hurts me, I love him but if he needs to go it's okay, I can't say anything about that, and I texted him saying "okay, it was so nice to meet you, thank you for everything", I know I'll lose him when he goes away, I do know that, but it doesn't matter to him, he's not like me, he doesn't get attached like me, but damn, it hurts, we were supposed to meet up today at my house because I wanted to cook him some Colombian food, but I told him that I needed to take distance from him because I know this would end up hurting me and honestly, I don't need that now, my mental health is fucked now and that would kill me. Now I'm at the door of his house to pick all my stuff up. I'm scared to go in. I don't want to cry but I know I will. This sucks badly. So this is the question, what do you guys think about the whole situation? Am I being paranoid? Dramatic? Stupid?.. Please help me. [info] None [info] 1565451627
sexycnidarian [info] I confessed to someone that I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12 [info] None [info] 1524094583
q557105nwytgnet [info] Am I really depressed? I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed meds for depression and for sleep. I feel like maybe I’m not really depressed, because as soon as I took my sleep medication I woke up, and I felt fine and it’s been like that since I’ve been on this medication. And I’m questioning if antidepressants are even going to help me, like am I already as happy and healthy as I’m going to  be. Is it possible that I don’t have depression but just a major sleeping problem that has effected me in a similar way to depression? [info] None [info] 1558249634
sicassangel [info] This is so true. I was diagnosed with depression while I was dating this girl, 2 months later she dumped me. Now I'm pretty sure my depression gone completely.  [info] None [info] 1514152862
_steven42_ [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and haven't felt it in like a year. The only way psychedelics help is they let you realize this. It's a tough pill to swallow, but once I got it down I was able to feel great. I think others can too. I was insensitive and am sorry for anyone dealing with, but that is what I believe to be true. [info] None [info] 1445396230
hoskarr [info] A 5 am essay of a sad person First off I'm not sure this fits on this sub but I've been browsing it and have developed a need to vent.So, I hate myself. I was diagnosed with depression at 11 after a short life filled with bullying. I was a chubby kid with anger issues so I was easy to bully. I never had many friends but it seemed to me the supposed assholes that were bullying me had plenty. From this I assumed that I must be a worthless piece of shit destined for solitude and despair.When I was 14 I fell in love with a girl, altough I told myself I was stupid for thinking that it was love and even if it was she would never feel the same about the fat loner. We were friends though so while I was still sure she didn't feel the same I eventually told her how I felt, and turns out I ws right about her feelings. But its fine, I was promised these things will fade over time (the reason I told her was because I wanted to expedite the process). Well its been been about 4-5 years and I still love her. She's my best friend and has a boyfriend and yet my dumb brain keeps making the happy juice and then making way too much sad juice when I start thinking about it. I cut myself a fair bit and often think of how stupid I am to still feel this way and how weak I am to not cut my best friend out of my life in the hopes of feeling better.The pain I feel related to this and my feelings of self hatred mean I have never asked a girl out. Even if I like her and think they might like me, its a no go. Similarly I don't have many friends (2 I've met face to face) and I fear attempting to make more. Partly because I don't know how and partly because I never seem to make lasting friendships with people who actually care about me and would initiate contact ever.I often joke to myself that I'll die at 40, blackout drunk and a noose around my neck because I don't see myself ever feeling happiness. I do the things people tell me to, I go to theraphy (have done for about 5 years now), I take my meds, I don't think I look horrific (not anymore anyway) just a normal guy, but human contact and actual contentness evades me still.It took a while to decide to post this because I often see the help in comments (especially in terms of suicide) being kinda empty and pointless. Has anyone gotten help from a forum? It always seems impersonal, you don't know this person how can you purport to care about them really? But subs like this exist so I guess It's just one of those things I don't get, a category in which life has shafted me.Im very sorry if this is in any way innapropriate for this sub and also for any errors in the wall of text (tbf english is not my first language). [info] None [info] 1578205608
efeeney [info] I don't practice Buddhism but I do meditate frequently. I have been diagnosed with depression and PTSD. I took an antidepressant for about 5 months and then stopped taking it, it was all the boost I needed and now my practice of meditation and yoga keep me going! [info] None [info] 1366688065
softpeachie [info] That's very odd. When I was diagnosed with depression, one of the first things they tested for was thyroid levels. I think it's pretty common?  [info] None [info] 1498227285
BesideASouthernSea [info] I wish I knew! It's believed to be a response to certain stimuli, and maybe even just an inherit thing for some people. I think I reacted to going to private school as reinventing myself, and from there it spiraled out of control.I have been diagnosed with depression, but I suspect I also have borderline personality disorder. [info] None [info] 1460037802
gooeymarshmallow [info] This exact thing happened to me with nmom except we had gone to real therapists for a while. The reason why she tried to make a pastor our therapists was because any actual therapist thought my nmom was insane. She needed someone on her side and who better than a pastor? She even said something along the lines of 'none of these therapists on my side, they care too much about children and not parents'. I don't care how badly this guy has had it, if someone punched me 1000 times it doesn't make it okay for someone else to be punched even once. His life story is irrelevent to what your are going through *because* you are still living in it. I would highly suggest seeing a real therapist that is qualified, even if its just at school. I guarantee they will understand you and try to help you through this, and even try to come to terms with your moms behavior. I was diagnosed with depression in high school that I thought was genetic/chemical inballence but the moment I left my nmoms house I found it was more based on my circumstances. It could be the case for you or it could be genetic, I don't know. But if there was one thing I could tell myself then was that I needed to hold out for the future. Try to take care of your self and if possible try to finish high school early so you can leave and go to college, I made the mistake of not preparing options myself for when I turned 18 and ended up getting kicked out and homeless Even if your depression is genetic at the very least you can be in a place where you don't have awful people like your mom making it worse.  [info] None [info] 1499554789
kozmikushos [info] I was diagnosed with depression, took meds for it for almost a year. Now I’m being weaned off it since I’ve done enough psychotherapy that I can be on my own, like how treating depression is supposed to be, and it’s proper hell. The only reason I’m not begging to go back on it is because I want to see if I’m in fact better.But being on SSRI has made my life bearable when nothing else worked. I really don’t think I would have made it this far without meds but at least my corpse would have smelled so nice thanks to the essential oils. [info] None [info] 1530912051
BAH2011 [info] 1st off, people like you are awesome. Now, so I was diagnosed with depression when I was in a psych ward. Now, I've seen 3 separate therapists. All of them after a point said that I should take antidepressants. Is that just the therapist's  way of saying "We tried therapy and it doesn't seem to be working. Let's try drugs" basically as a last resort? I find it kinda weird they didn't offer it until 3-4 sessions in, knowing my past and all.   [info] None [info] 1321962844
RockVonCleveland [info] I hate this comment for a lot of reasons. For one thing, it's entirely possible to view something or someone in your life as a treasure even when you feel like trash. For another thing, why do you assume people with depression hate themselves? I was diagnosed with depression when I was 8 years old, and not only have I been fighting it for an additional 22 years, but I've helped other people fight theirs as well. I'm awesome. And Sayori is awesome. [info]  [info] 1510858492
Anti-Grav [info] The idea of even diagnosing prodromal schizophrenia seems problematic to me. I can’t imagine it’s very reliable as prodromal schizophrenia is similar to other mental illness. For instance I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD. It’s more of something you realize in retrospect, which is probably why it’s not used in the US. Anyway, I guess my point is that maybe they aren’t totally sure that he will develop schizophrenia so they don’t want him to obsess about it.  [info] schizophrenia [info] 1521664316
TheMysteriousHera [info] I had to stay at a mental institution for a week I had suicidal thoughts so my parents sent me to a hospital where I was diagnosed with depression and was sent to a mental institution. It really sucks because it didn’t help whatsoever. Life really sucks right now [info] None [info] 1582493242
barakabara [info] I can relate to how you feel about not understanding what a healthy relationship looks like. There are many things that are helping me heal: 1. Going to my local Coda meeting (or you can join the Skype meeting). You don't have to share, you can just listen.2. Reading Pia Mellody's Facing Love Addiction 3. Since I had the impulse of hurting myself, I seeked psychiatric help. I was diagnosed with depression and medication has helped me face things easier.4. Talking to my therapist. Whenever I'm faced with a situation where I don't recognize healthy, I seek their advice on what healthy should look like and try to adjust for the future [info] None [info] 1563539034
360noscopeMLGdoritos [info] I decided enough is enough. Adiós, r/ForeverAlone No, I didn't get a girlfriend or anything like that. Nor is this a post about suicide. This is a post about making the decision to get off my ass and fix whatever is wrong with my life once for all. And for that, I feel the need to say goodbye to this awesome community.A little background story may be appropriate, I'll make it as brief as possible: (You can skip this whole paragraph if you feel like it) I was the ugliest fuck you could ever imagine until about 13-14 (when I started to notice people were not creeping out because of my face any more). During that first stage of my life, I had to endure being bullied because of my appearance and being made fun of because of my extreme awkwardness (comparable to that of someone with severe autism). Teenage years came and I got addicted to videogames. Fast forward to more recent times, I was diagnosed with depression and that led me to fail my first university year. Still addicted to videogames, I stumbled upon this community focused on pc gamers (some may know what sub I'm talking about) on reddit. I lurked for months until I decided to create a reddit account with a satiric username (related to that gamer culture) with the only purpose to communicate with others with the same interests as me.Now this is were the true downfall begins: not long after I created a reddit account to post mostly in a sub not related to this one at all, I read a discussion (I mentioned this part in my previous submission to this sub) that mentioned the existance of a subreddit called /r/ForeverAlone. I found it funny but very interesting at the same time. Visited out of curiosity, and thus my "journey" began. At first it was exciting, I could finally feel identified with others, I could feel empathy for most of the people who posted here. I was, however, oblivious to all that pessimist "energy" that resided in this sub. I turned into a bitter person (way more than before) and started to blame my FA status as a cause for my depression, forgetting about the fact that I didn't even care that much about being a forever alone kissless virgin before my arrival at /r/ForeverAlone. Most of the time, the posts I read are about failure, pessimism, defeatism, etcetera. That made me want to give up on life several times while thinking to myself "mate, you are worth nothing, you'll never get out of this hell".I decided I'm done with this. I don't care about getting a SO nor do I care about having a huge social circle. This is not about breaking out of Forever Alone. This is about being in peace with myself, about earning my own respect. I woke up yesterday and thought about all this, about my depression, about being extremely underweight, about waking up everyday at 1 or 2 pm, about not doing anything productive with my life and just lurking the subreddit, playing videogames for several hours and wallowing in self pity; I realized that staying here won't take me anywhere. After this epiphany, I decided to change my life for the better, to get organizized and be productive. University is starting this incoming week for me, so I decided to set up an alarm to get up everyday at 5 am starting on Monday (actually I started today because I'm so fucking pissed now and won't wait till the next week to make a change). [I set up lots of annoying alarms](http://i.imgur.com/zpsc0QU.jpg) just to make sure I get shit done, I may add more of those in the future. No procrastination, I'm too pissed for that. I'll reduce my gaming time to three hours or even less. I'll spend most of this day doing something more productive than playing videogames, I ~~may~~ start reading a novel (I was always interested in metro 2033), ~~maybe~~ I'll practise playing the piano just like I used to do with a passion, I ~~may~~ work out or I'll ~~probably~~ learn a third language (English is my second). I'll spend the weekdays studying at least 8 hours a day to compensate for that first university year I failed horribly. Because I'm not a failure, but the opposite. Even as someone socially awkward, I was always characterized for getting my shit done and that's what I'll keep doing from now on, depression can kiss my ass. And I'm doing this not because I want/feel like it, but because I must, because I'm tired of being a bloody manchild at 18, and it was about damn time to grow the fuck up and take life seriously.It's likely the last time I post something here. It's been a pleasure, I swear I love you all people and wish you all the best. But for the sake of my own sanity and becoming a better man, I must leave (I'll probably answer to comments in this thread tho). From now on, this will be my motto: "Nothing to lose, much to conquer".**And lastly, here is my message to you:** I'm not going to say this subreddit is devil and you should stay away from it, as this has been my only shelter for the past months. But I'll tell you not to to make this place your definitive home. It's nice for a few months, let's put it 3 months; after that time has passed, there must be a point in which you ask yourself "Do I want to end with this never ending torment?". If your answer is no, then you can stay here all you want, let's see where it takes you (hint: not that far). If your answer is yes, then why the hell are you here? Stand up, get out, do something, don't dwell in this place any more, take your life seriously, **get discipline**. You may think that of course this is easy for me because I'm only 18 and have a lot of time in my hands. But my advice goes for everyone in /r/ForeverAlone. Doesn't matter if you are on your 20's, 30's or 40's. It's never too late to make a change. It's never too late to grow the fuck up and get some discipline. And that's it, my friends. I needed to vent this all before leaving. I wish you all the best. Peace. [info] kill me pls ;-; [info] 1421513064
armillanymphs [info] Sorry to hear about your challenges of late. Considering medication for psychological issues still seems socially stigmatized, though even if that front is improving it can be challenging to not see one's self as weak for considering and / or taking them.I started SSRIs and counseling after taking on TMI practice two years ago. Initially I had hoped that meditation would carry all of the weight, but though I was making progress in practice life was very challenging and heavy.  I had initially sought counseling to clarify problems in a former relationship, but the process opened up to the entirety of my life.  It was healing and necessary but also overwhelming at times. At one point I was diagnosed with depression, which was a tremendous blow. I was hoping that meditation and counseling would be enough. I was afraid that I would become dependent on SSRIs. However, I voiced my concerns to my primary care physician and we worked out a plan to go off of them when the time was right.  It became clear that the various systems of well being were synergizing well; despite my initial reservations I consider medication and counseling were essential.  Potential pitfalls include relying counseling / therapy solely for catharsis without using the process for self exploration and insight.  Dependency on medication might have arisen without meditation and therapy, as they can make life more tolerable to the point where one doesn't address fundamental issues of their life. Let me know if you have any other questions and I'd be happy to answer them. [info] Dharma Ocean [info] 1534263729
IgorSMaliniak [info] I think I would go through several phases when I was diagnosed with depression. At first, I would think that everybody else seems to have their life together, and that I was the only one who was in such a dark place. Later on I started to realise that even though people make out their lives to be good, they most of the time aren't.I guess that now, I usually go under the assumption that everyone I know has something horrible they're struggling with in their life, it's just that most people don't talk about it and/or hide it away enough to be acceptable as a "normal life". [info] None [info] 1552494005
dispwned [info] In the first few weeks after finding out I was pregnant, I was terrified I would miscarry. I remember how many times my Brother and Sister-in-law miscarried before they had their first baby. So, I did some research - online and a little offline - and what I found was reassuring and validating.The basic summary of everything I read was this: As long as you're eating and living healthy (no recreational drugs, no alcohol, no smoking, no reckless activities, you're taking your prenatal and/or supplements etc.) and following your doctors' orders, but you still miscarry, it's okay and it's not your fault. If a miscarriage happens at that point, I found it's typically because the pregnancy itself isn't viable - either not genetically (for a multitude of reasons), the egg didn't attach properly, and other scenarios I can't remember at the moment. But none of that would be your fault.I had a rough first trimester, and I thought for sure I would miscarry because I couldn't take good care of myself:  * My diet was mostly force-fed V8 juice, cottage cheese, milk, water, and the occasional bowl of plain cereal, because the thought of anything else usually made my nausea even worse. * I was utterly exhausted, often sleeping for over 2/3rds of the day (there was more than one weekend where I slept almost the entire time, and it worried my Husband)  * I had such brutal vertigo, I couldn't walk from one end of our house to the other without holding on to something. * I had severe cramping that I was *sure* was a sign of a miscarriage. I was so worried that I scheduled a last minute appt. at my OB's office to check before my actual 'first' appointment the following week. But, it was just my uterus starting to grow to make room, and the OB assured me everything was fine.Now, here I am at 21 weeks of my first pregnancy, and our little girl is feisty. Any movement is a flurry of jabs, she'll react sometimes when I talk or sing after being quiet for a bit, and if she finds herself being squished (like one of the last times I wore pre-pregnancy jeans or when I eat far too much) she will not have it and starts kicking up a fuss.It's okay to worry and be cautious, but also keep in mind it could be your hormones making your worry even more, I know mine did. Hell, they still do lol. Just keep talking to your husband and be open with him about it, and talk to your doctor and/or OB about your concerns. It might also be a good idea to see a therapist, if you don't have one already, because it's possible to have depression with your pregnancy, not just postpartum, referred to as antepartum depression. I was diagnosed with depression years ago, and am currently taking Zoloft 100mg for it. (Under close watch of the prescribing nurse) So, make sure you're listening to your doctor, take your prenatals, eat as well as you're able, and keep talking it out and be open about your concerns especially with your Husband and Doctor. =) Plus, you can always come here again. This community is full of amazing, supportive people (mostly moms, but some dad's pop in for some advice and such on occasion) who have so much insight they are willing to share freely to those in need, myself included. Okay, done rambling now! That became longer than I anticipated, as usual lol. Probably full of typos, too. Oh, well.Have a good night, and congratulations! =D [info] FTM, April 2019 - Lil Girl, En Route :) [info] 1545291786
zeldaspimp99 [info] I've been in this exact situation, it gets better.My gf of 3 years (dating from 15-18) cheated on me 2 months after I was diagnosed with depression, I'm sure you can assume the kind of feelings that might come with such an event, but I think all I can say is just do you, don't be afraid to move on, no matter how quickly. The pain subsides trust me, and I'm sure you've heard this but you **will** find someone better.My brother in law said, and I quote, 'just go out and fuck some hood rats' and while this may seem a bit much, man did it help, I'm not a player by any stretch of the imagination but hooking up (maybe not because of your age) or even just talking to a couple of girls really helps you rediscover your confidence and get back to loving someone, I'm now with a girl who is leagues better than my ex, it's just the way life goes. Best of luck to you man, stay strong.  [info] None [info] 1543540269
UnbridledAutist [info] I think you have a valid point, that for someone genuinely on the verge of committing suicide, telling them that their families will miss them, or that it'll hurt the people around them, isn't going to work for everyone. But, I think you're oversimplifying the whole thing into "He didn't do enough."Five years ago, I was diagnosed with depression(Major Depressive Disorder), after I broke down and admitted to my family that I wanted to off myself. I had the plan, I wanted to, and I didn't want to keep hurting. But I didn't want my little sister to grow up hurting from that, and I definitely didn't want anyone to bear the scars of finding my body. I would have done it eventually though.I went through therapy, and got help. But I still get these incredibly low spikes, every now and again, and I can't help but to just end it. What keeps me going, is that I know that as much I'm hurting, it's temporary. If I kill myself, there's no coming back from that, and there's a black void of nothing awaiting for me(not the religious type.)My girlfriend, of almost two years now, is going through a lot of the same things that I went through, and I finally convinced her to look into therapy, which she starts next month. But just this December, on the 23rd, she almost did it. She had her dad's pain medication, and a razor-blade in case that didn't work. I had no idea at the time, and was home, waiting for her to call me after she got out of the bath. What stopped her, was guilt, because she knew how much it'd kill her parents to find their only daughter dead. And she knew how much it'd hurt me, to never get that phone call from her. But to instead get a call from her parents, or her friends, that she was gone. Not to mention that the guilt of knowing that if I'd just fucking known, I could have helped, would have eaten me up inside.My point is. the guilt trip method isn't malicious. It can help some people. No, it's not going to help everyone, and I'm not saying that even a large amount of people are going to be helped by it. [info] Dan Era, 2014 [info] 1501963068
istanbobross [info] I want to die because I am actually useless I got no talent whatsoever. I got nothing I want to do. I tried hard to search for what I can do and what I'm good at, just to find out I'm actually hopeless. That I have no fucking talent whatsoever. No motivation for anything as well. I'm a huge disappointment to everyone around me and it hurts. I love my friends and family, I want them to be proud of me, but there is nothing about me to be proud of. Until recently, I have tried my best with everything. Studying, socializing, classes I was taking, everything. I had the motivation of making my parents and friends proud. Of being a useful human being so they can love me. So I can be loveable. I lost that motivation recently. When my parents said that I am not good enough, said my younger sister is better than me and laughed. I got pissed and told them I was trying my best and they told me that I wasn't and that my result grades were the evidence. (I got 2 B's in math and social studies by 0.1 and 0.2 difference each, otherwise all A)They called me dumb and that they regret spending so much money on me if I was going to be this way, not working hard and not getting the best results. They said that I was acting depressed for no reason and I am whining about my life because I am spoiled. To break me completely my father said he is losing motivation to go to work and earn money because I am wasting it. Then my mother said I disappoint her. It is my fault that I couldn't get straight As on everything and I admit that I could have done better if I pushed myself harder, I admit that I should have done that but those words did hurt a lot for me. At that point, I still wanted to impress my friends but then my parents told me they won't want to hang out with me if I keep this up and continue being dumb, useless and not helpful. That made me feel like every effort I'm making is useless. Nobody ever told me I was doing a good job, my parents didn't compliment me whatsoever. I am done. I was diagnosed with depression and even then my parents never took me seriously saying that I lied. I want to be a loveable person and be loved. These days I have no motivation to do anything. I just want to die. May sound like I am whining, but my parent's validation were all I want and what I lived for until now. I don't know what to do and I dont even know what I am writing here but I just really, really want to die, disappear so my parents dont have to waste their hard earn money on me anymore, and could support my talented younger sister instead. I hope they could use the money to go on vacations and do something useful, instead of wasting it on me. I am a burden to people around me and I hate it. I want to die and I hopefully will soon enough [info] None [info] 1583479608
magnificent_chaos [info] Study ideas when depressed and being in your 30's So I decided to go back to school for engineering and I noticed I cannot retain information as I use to back in my 20's. I try to reread notes, write, talk about it but it seems like I forget the very next day. And it's pretty frustrating when you look an idiot in front of hundreds of students who know what they're talking about. Little back story, I was diagnosed with depression for awhile now but it really hit hard when I lost my boyfriend little over a year ago. Because of this, I have temporary short term memory loss which apparently is normal when depressed (I had no idea). I'm on medication now which does help but I am still having a hard time just remembering. Also I think age is part of a factor as well. Has anyone who is under a similar situation (depressed or not) have any tips on how you've studied. I wanted to know whether someone else tried something a little more "out of the box" ways of studying and hopefully it can help my situation. Thanks guys! [info] None [info] 1510081903
szrelemr [info] My first reddit activity in a while. Man, it's been a week since I've been diagnosed with depression and started medication and frankly I'm not feeling that much better.I still have trouble motivating myself to finish my mountain pile of past assignments before the final deadline before my Finals start in two weeks. At this point I'm not confident I can even pass this semester. Extending my degree will only cost my parents even more on top of the cost of my therapy and that makes me feel bad that I'm being such a burden to them in their retirement even though they themselves have absolutely no problems with it since we are on the wealthy side. I'm embarrassed to face them this coming raya knowing I haven't been able to make full use of the opportunities and support they have given me all this while.  [info] PASEMBOQ LAKSA HAMEEDIYAH [info] 1528319865
Ruby1414 [info] Well that could be me today. I was just diagnosed with depression and I now have proper medication. I'm kinda excited. [info] None [info] 1559695811
UrsulaSings [info] I feel almost exactly the same. Before I was diagnosed with BPD I was diagnosed with depression, which the consultant who diagnosed me with BPD said is a pretty common mistake apparently. But when I was diagnosed with that and having treatment for that, I always felt like it never quite fit. Sometimes I would be in a really really good mood (mood swings) and I would think 'well I'm obviously not depressed - there must not be anything wrong with me', but then I just kept on feeling so awful it's not even possible to explain, and obviously the other symptoms as well.When I finally got diagnosed with BPD, even though I rejected it at first, I did feel like 'finally! I know what is wrong with me! I knew it didn't feel right!'And I know what you mean about it being weird because the day before was the worst possible day, because I got diagnosed when I was IP in a psych ward - which was the worst time of my life.Although I don't really feel like I'm 'living' yet, I definitely am grateful for having the proper diagnosis and being referred to a personality disorder unit to get the specific treatment I need.I'm glad things are getting better for you :) [info] None [info] 1400942070
Aki-Lui [info] Rather than asking a question, I saw your other replies, and I’m sooooooooo glad and relieved that your mum believed you and took action, and that your dad got jailed. I hope he was treated like shit in there, and when he dies he’ll rot in a special hell. There’s sure a long way for you, but I hope therapies help you, and in time you’d feel (even though slightly) better. You have strength more than you think you have, bit by bit you WILL get better, kudos to you! I am a victim of childhood sexual abuse as well. By biological dad tho. I told my mum once when I was like 5/6, well she didn’t believe me, then accused me of making things up. In addition to my dad’s threat of killing me if I tell anyone and that nobody would believe me anyway, I never told anyone for another 8ish years. When I was 14 I was super suicidal and got admitted into mental hospital, in there doctors finally found out, and I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD. I got interfered with the police and all, but my dad never received any consequence because he denied everything adamantly, and mum of course supported him. In where I live people are innocent until proven guilty. When I finally got out of the hospital I attempted suicide yet a few times, but anyway now I’m doing *better*. [info] None [info] 1545956577
moses_the_fragile [info] Scared of what's happening. When I was four, my parents began taking me to various doctors and eventually I was diagnosed with depression. In 6th grade, I was put on Prozac and took it until sometime in 9th grade. All seemed to be well and good (aside from the occasional bout of sadness, but who among us doesn't go through those?). Anyway, I'm 18 years old now and in the past few weeks things have been getting bad again. Starting last spring, these major depressions lasting anywhere from a day or two to a few weeks have become increasingly commonplace. Recently, however, they've begun to alternate with the manic episodes I also experienced as a young child. Not full blown mania, mind you, but definitely something out of the ordinary. I have no idea what's happening, and I am terrified, if we're being 100% honest here. Just need some support right now. [info] None [info] 1383446957
bassgirlford [info] I know how that is. For me, it used to be every night. Mornings and days were fine, but evenings were always awful. I don't think you're overreacting. There are a few types of depression, I think. (I was diagnosed with depression last year after knowing about it for several years before.) I'd say talk to you SO, see if they recognize any triggers that cause it. [info] None [info] 1383968006
landgirl81 [info] No - thank god! I am so angry with him. I've known for a little while and it's made me feel like such a fraud around my family. It has had a real impact on my mental health and I have been diagnosed with depression.  [info] None [info] 1500027243
totallyworkinghere [info] I think my mom might be a narcissist and I don't know how to feel about this. I started lurking this sub because my fiance's mom is N and I wanted to learn more so I could deal with her, or help my fiance out when needed. As I read a lot of stories, though, I found myself thinking over and over, "huh, my mom did that too."It really hit me this past weekend. My fiance was mad at the TV for some reason and I was totally on edge. I didn't know why, but out of nowhere I suddenly remembered being a young kid, my mom being mad at something not going right in the kitchen, and me being terrified that her anger would turn towards me. I was tensing up because I knew if I said something, anything at all, I would be screamed at.I kept thinking about my relationship with my mom over the weekend, and started seeing some other memories in a new light. I was diagnosed with depression, and she told me she thought that I was just moody. Every time we'd visited my grandma, my mom's mother, my mom was constantly worried about me embarrassing her. When I was a teenager and my dad was in a coma, I rarely went to see him because mom would be there during the full visiting hours and couldn't drive me after school, so I spent a few months never seeing my parents (and not knowing if dad was going to survive. he did though.) I don't know what to think or feel about any of this. I love my mom, and I want to like her and forgive her as well, but that's the complicated part. On the one hand, it is nice to be able to know why I feel like shit for things that aren't my fault, but on the other hand, I don't want to ruin my relationship with either of my parents.I know this all is a little jumbled up, but so is my mind right now. [info] None [info] 1457985715
disenchantedguy [info] I was wondering if you guys could yelp me figure out what my moms deal is? I'm not really sure where to start...I'm in my 20's and I was diagnosed with depression over a year ago and didn't get much, if any support from my mom. I cut her out of my life after we had an argument and she said "You're confusing depression with laziness" earlier this year (there was a build up of other things, but that was the final straw) and I've been reflecting a lot on my childhood since. After reading posts here and talking to a few people I know for sure my childhood was anything but normal and I'm pretty sure I've been depressed since I was 11 or so.My parents split when I was 4, from what I've been told my dad was very violent and angry when he was younger and only really calmed down later in life so my mom and I got kicked out in the middle of the night and never went back.My mom took me everywhere and did loads of stuff with me when I was little as it was just us but things changed as I got older. I'd be looked after by my nan (who smoked around me constantly or took me to a pub where there were other people smoking constantly) and I was left to my own devices a lot of the time too, home alone. When I was 9 both my parents met new people and this is where things get crazy on my mom's side, my mom got pregnant, married and moved in with my new step dad very quickly, she moved my school which made me start to hate school, to the point where I got moved back to my old one again for the final year, but by then it was too late and it wasn't the same. In secondary school I got bullied a little bit in my first year, this time my mom's reaction was to go overboard and pull me out to homeschool me for a year, the absolute worst thing she could have done and a complete overreaction, she barely taught me anything and she was caught up in emigrating to Canada (never happened) at the time so funnily enough the little I did learn was about (or should I say aboot? 🙃) Canada... The rest of that homeschooled year was spent watching daytime TV with my step mom. After that any kind of education was just a write off for me, I got through secondary school just barely, sixth form? Drop out. College? Drop out. Uni? Drop out. My mom didn't support me through any of this, just kinda watched on as it happened and told me I need to do something with my life, get a job, stop being lazy etc. Never tried to figure out why I was so unmotivated and unhappy. I remember when I first started uni and I told her I was aiming for a first (which I was on my way to achieving) she laughed in my face.My step dad and I didn't get on at all, she wouldn't really step in when he shouted at me or stop him from doing it more and as a result was included with family stuff less and less through my teens as I either avoided it or wasn't invited. As a result I spent most of my time in my room by myself.There are all sorts of different crazy things my mom did though my teens and I don't want to think about and list every single thing right now so here are a few highlights:- Poisoned my relationship with my dad by telling me horrible things about him and always saying things like "you don't want to end up like your dad"- Insisted I called her a name under my breath in a super market once and punished me for it even though I said nothing.- Broke down crying saying she can't handle me and that I'm such a difficult child and that I say horrible things and put her down (when the opposite is true)- Came to me insisting one of my closest friends had stolen from her despite the fact she lets countless shady people into her house.- Shouted at me and told me to go away in the middle of a city I'd only been to once before when I was 14 or so then stomped off without me, frantically called me 20 minutes later saying I shouldn't have ran off.There are plenty of other things I can think of but I'd be here all day.The worst stuff has happened most recently. When I left home for uni I gave my oldest sister my old room so that she wouldn't have to share, I left my desk, laptop, bed, pretty much the whole room as it was for her to use. I was happy to do it at the time but I always had the expectations that my mom would buy her her own stuff, she didn't. When I asked for any of the stuff for my own place I got guilted into leaving it for my sister's sake.When I ended up dropping out of uni I had nowhere to stay, my mom only really spoke to me once a month if I was lucky and less most of the time at this point, just seemed to stop caring completely once I was gone. But I tried asking her if I could move back in anyway, she had said something along the lines of 'you'll always have a room here' and stupidly I'd believed her. I got a 'it wouldn't really be practical' answer back and so had to stay with friends. Over a year later things took another bad turn. I lost my job due to depression and had nowhere to go, this time she said I could move in and she'd turn the living room into a bedroom. I bought a single bed and mattress with what little money I had left and was ready to move in when she turned around and said 'you can stay but it can't be for long and you can't set a bed up, you have to sleep on a mattress on the floor and put it away in the day as I'm having guests over the Christmas period'.The last argument we had was where she said the worst stuff, I'd asked her for help with appointments and different letters I couldn't keep track of and money as it's all very overwhelming when I'm depressed but she told me I have to learn to take care of myself and that I'm confusing depression with laziness, when I called her out on it and said as someone who's studied mental health and also gone though it herself in the past she should be able to tell the difference she turned it all back on me played the victim and said I'm always horrible to her. After that I just blocked her on everything and stopped speaking to her, she's tried to talk to me a few times through my dad but still acts like she's done nothing wrong. Even wrote a status on Facebook about how 'heartbroken' she is that I've 'decided I'm better off without' her just to get a ton of sympathy messages from her friends, not once did she mention why I'm not talking to her.I just feel crazy sometimes and have to keep checking with other people that what I went through isn't the norm.I look at my step mom and step brother who are super close and call each other almost every day for a chat or just to check in and can't help but feel envious... my mom's never called me just for a chat or come and asked about my day or just checked of I'm feeling ok, not for a very very long time at least.Sorry for the wall of text and thank you if you've stuck through and read till the end.The tl;dr is, is my mom a narcissist? how do I get through to her and make her realise how she is towards me? Or should I just continue not letting her be a part of my life? Who do you go to for support of you can't rely on your family? [info] None [info] 1565101244
iltra3200 [info] You might be, which sucks because you're so young. It might be that you've lost your sense of purpose which can lead to negative thinking. Ultimately the best thing you can do is seek some kind of help from any number of sources. If you have one, a school counsellor might be able to point you in the right direction. If you're in the Glasgow area then [Florence Street](http://www.nhsggc.org.uk/locations/mental-health-resource-centres/florence-street-mental-health-resource-centre/) can provide you with support, counselling, psychiatric help (if that's what's needed), that sort of thing. If you're not in Glasgow then your GP can absolutely recommend similar services to you.When I was diagnosed with depression my GP was amazing, providing support, medication, recommendations on counselling services, and so on. I guess my point is that there's loads of help out there for this sort of thing. I'm sorry you feel so shit, but there's light at the end of the tunnel.If you want to talk about any of this then just PM me. [info] None [info] 1456257768
Beasag [info] I knew.  At 14 yo I knew.  The problem was that I couldn't get anyone else to agree.  Always excuses.  Doctors told me it was stress.. biofeedback.. it was big in the 80''s (kinda like yoga now).  2 suicide attempts.  Goodness knows how many just breakdowns where I would just sob for hours and then not come out of my room except to shower (and sometime eat) for a few weeks.  Every 18 months a new job.. it was a cycle that usually ended up with me quitting... but I have also been fired.  2 divorces.  I couldn't explain why I couldn't stay with them.. I just couldn't stay another day.  I had a ton of psychosomatic illnesses.  If it could be caused by stress... then I probably had it.  Near daily migraines, ulcers, IBS, asthma, horrible PMS, worse periods (although that turned out to be adenomyosis not stress like all the docs said).   Finally at 30 yo I was diagnosed with depression.  Therapy.  Meds.  23 years later I'm still here.  But some days it's a close call.   [info] None [info] 1498367934
TheMightyBattleSquid [info] I'm not who you're responding to, but apparently what *I* was lacking at general motors was experience in *depression* which, funny enough, I got after years of being told how much of a failure I was by not being accepted for a job anywhere. :DThey didn't even interview me, just told me I had the job on the phone. No resume either to show all the volunteer work I did. Nope, just adding that I was diagnosed with depression in the last half year did the trick (it mentioned it under handicaps so I figured why not). [info] None [info] 1459230231
CivilisedKitty [info] I can kind of get what you're talking about. I too happen to be quite young for someone who visits psychiatrists, psychologists and counsellors, but unlike you I didn't really have a rough childhood. For me it all started around when I was 11 I guess; I think I just happen to have a negative personality. Though I have been diagnosed with depression, I don't know exactly what it is that I feel. If I had to choose a word I'd say 'empty' more that sad or depressed. Edit: There to talk if you need.  [info] None [info] 1484273643
keysarecool [info] No I have bi polar disorder and depression. I was diagnosed with depression due to PTSD at a young age, the bi polar disorder and manic episodes came a lot later in life. Tried to take my own life a couple of times and have done a lot of self harming. I cant really remember the way my doctor explained it to me when I asked the same question. [info] None [info] 1328194214
weaselcorp [info] [21M] Haven't seen my SO in 3 months, finding things tough at the moment. My partner and I have been together 10 months and haven't seen each other in 3 months. We go to the same university and study the same course, but I've just started my year in industry away from uni, and she's just going into her second year. Before we went LD, we talked about our relationship and came to the conclusion that we both wanted to stay together and make our relationship work long distance. This is only my second relationship, my ex and I were together 4.5 years and things fell apart within 3 months of us both starting university.The problem is, in the last 3 months, she's initiated contact with me twice, every other time we talk has been because I've called her. When we do talk, I feel more like her friend than her boyfriend. I'm scared that things aren't going to work between us, despite us both saying we want them to work. I dunno, I just want to know that she cares and wants things to work out.What makes things harder is that 3 months ago I was diagnosed with depression, which I've talked to my partner about. She does try to be supportive and she's told me to talk to her if I do need to talk, but she's also a very logical person and has said that she struggles to understand how I feel, because she finds it hard to understand problems that don't have a cause, because she's so used to being able to help people through things that have a cause behind them.I just want to feel like I'm not alone. [info] None [info] 1347218525
383CI [info] I was just diagnosed with depression two months ago. Trust me.....go and get help. You will be amazed how much better you will feel. It’s like a weight has been lifted off your chest. My depression came out as anger and confusion and not being able to comprehend anything when I was going through a phase. Everyone is different. [info] None [info] 1573239311
wischmopp [info] Thank you for your advice! I've already tried therapy but was extremely unsatisfied with my therapist. I'm diagnosed with depression and bulimia and he didn't seem to know anything about these illnesses. To "cure" my Bulimia, he just told me that I look good and don't need to worry about my weight and that I should "eat in moderation instead of binging and purging" (lol if it only was that easy). For my depression, he recommended exercise even though I told him ONE SESSION AGO that I compulsively overexercise because of my bulimia. In addition, he sometimes just didn't show up for a session without notifying me. So yeah, that didn't really work out...I've been trying to find a new therapist but that's REALLY hard in my city. I've been on several waiting lists for more than six months now. [info] None [info] 1496226967
anotherthrow2895 [info] Joining and mental health history. To start, I’m 24 and interested in joining. I did originally speak with an AF recruiter and he said I was disqualified but said I could reach out to another branch or another recruiter. I reached out to my therapist out of curiosity to ask about my records and my records no longer exist because it was so long ago, so there’s no proof of my diagnosis or anything. When I was 16, I was diagnosed with depression and saw a therapist until I was 17 when I graduated from therapy and also stopped talking meds. Ive been stable for nearly 8 years now.My question is, I do have some self harm scars... will those automatically disqualify me? Would it be wrong to get a tattoo to cover them up, if so? I know I need to reach out to another recruiter and I actually placed a request to be called/emailed on the ANG website last night. It said I should head back in 24-48 hours. I’m absolutely willing to pay any dollar to get medical clearance from a doctor to prove I’m stable and not, and willing to do what I can for a waiver. I’m just looking for others experiences. [info] None [info] 1564150522
SerafinaDllRose [info] There's  just those of us that have that kind of chemistry - is all I can figure.  I absolutely HAD to read your post with a headline like that.  I mean, all I can say is "Same here!"At first, I was almost like ashamed or something because I got the feeling people thought I was making it up.   Now I'm trying different stuff to see if it makes a difference. For instance, I haven't been the healthiest eater so less meat, more veggies. Complained to my Dr about it - he had a full blood panel done. Way low in potassium for one thing is what I found out.  The other thing I'm trying to do is increase my activity level - bike riding, swimming, going to the gym.  Nothing crazy - just gradually. Lastly, I was diagnosed with depression and take an antidepressant.  I wondered if that had anything to do with it. Thanks for asking the question - I'll be watching this thread closely. [info] None [info] 1574918467
heylookatthatgirl [info] As someone who was just diagnosed with three mental disorders, this x1000. I had no problem complaining of feeling depressed until I was diagnosed with depression. A diagnosis changes everything.  [info] None [info] 1451462431
Natla [info] Hey I'm sorry your going through this. I don't know if this will help but I understand. I've been diagnosed with depression for over 2 years now (but probably depressed for over 10 years now). I too feel like I'm not living life, just waking up, go to school, home, sleep. I want to get out and do things and then I just decide it's better to stay in bed. It sucks. I really hope we both get through this.  [info] spazedout601 [info] 1487715097
icegor [info] As someone who is in the same situation for a long time all I can say is to do your best to stay positive in some way.Just to be sure however try to get an appointment with a psychologist. What you are describing is the same way I was feeling before I was diagnosed with depression (it was a few years of feeling bad and incapable before I was diagnosed).While you may not be at that point yet I  would still suggest you have a talk with a professional (and try to avoid self diagnosing as it won't do you any good). [info] Dragon [info] 1552817248
cheldeedee [info] Making a decision to quit job while depressed? I've been in my current job for 3 years now. A year ago I was diagnosed with depression (not the first time in my life, though), took a month off from work, completed a round of medication, and then went back to work whilst on talking therapy which I've continued in the past year. In the past few weeks, I noticed the signs of depression again, decided to see my psychiatrist for the first time in a year instead. He prescribed me some meds, assigned me a new counsellor (claims the previous one specialised in reality therapy, which he thinks I'm "too sensitive for". Wow thanks for telling me this now after one whole year!)He also advised me not to make a decision to quit my job in the current state of mind. However, I have been thinking about quitting for the past year...i feel like my job is the no.1 source of my stress at the moment even if my depression stems from life-long and self-esteem issues. am too thin-skinned to ask for more time off work this time round, and too scared of my boss. I have trouble pulling myself to work every day and once I get to work, I burst into tears throughout the day. It sucks. I just want to stay at home.Anyone been in a similar experience? How did quitting your job to heal yourself first work out in the end? One thing that has stopped me from quitting my job in the past year is the fear of yet another unexplainable employment gap on my already splotchy résumé. [info] None [info] 1433861740
dylanfurr246 [info] I hate my life, what do I do? First off: no, I'm not suicidal, I'm too much of a coward, I have thought about it though. Anyways, let's begin. Everything was fine when I was in high school, then graduation came, everyone was going off and they knew what they were doing, and I stayed home all day. I can't drive (eye problems), the girl I love dearly thinks I'm a creep (I have a tendency of coming on to strong), everyone's moving on, and time is passing every second (I know you can't give advice about that XD.) Naturally, with all of these problems, I was diagnosed with depression. On top of that, I have no friends. My life sucks. If I wasn't so afraid of death and a coward about killing myself, I'd do it. Honestly, I see no point in living. Also, I can't go to college because I'm poor. Life sucks.EDIT: plus I'm fat and ugly (I have a baby face.) [This is what I look like.](http://i.imgur.com/3Tp0mJd.jpg) Albeit, that picture is about a year old but nonetheless. [info] None [info] 1455321389
ShanePolly [info] Helping with Depression Backstory about my situation followed by my questions. Looking for help and thought this would be a good place to ask. A while back I was diagnosed with depression and back then I was on some traditional antidepressant medication. The past year I had gotten off the antidepressant since I didn't need it anymore. The past month my life has sucked a lot and for the first week when I went back in the antidepressant I completely lost my appetite. Even getting the munchies wasn't the same. I decided to stop taking the medication since it was fucking me up really bad and started to just smoke a small bowl in the morning or whenever I was feeling depressed. I was wondering from anyone here smokes to help with their depression if there is any type of micro dosing you? When you smoke during the day/how many times? Best strains for helping with depression? [info] None [info] 1507652175
IncompleteBagel [info] I thought I had moments/activities that I enjoy. Turns out I had addictions I couldn't see and haven't actually felt happiness in a long time. I've been diagnosed with depression for 4 years now, and I rarely enjoyed doing anything.  I did however want to get out of bed (after a 30 minute stare at the ceiling) to eat, jerk off, play some sort of online game, ect.   I thought those things made me happy, even though I had no friends to do anything with.  As it turns out, when trying to stop, I found I couldn't.  I tried as hard as I could to stop anything I thought I liked doing, but I was stuck.  Now, after my addictions ruined the rest of my life I still had, I find I enjoy nothing, have nothing, and spend time with/talk to absolutely no one.  Not even my family (parents included).  I am stuck in isolation, and can't think of anything I want to try and live for anymore.  How am I supposed to cope?  Am I supposed to just live so others don't get "triggered" by another suicide?  So others can't put on a fake tear display when saying how much they miss me/how great of a friend I was when nobody spent any time with me at all?  What is worth living for anymore.  Cause I am sure nothing is out there. [info] None [info] 1493337244
000ghosting [info] Yes, a few years ago when I was in college I was diagnosed with depression. I went to therapy a few times and then went to a group therapy session which terrified me so I never went back. Really the only reason I went in the first place was a roommate made me go to the counseling center. I don't think I really want to be fixed, to be helped. Otherwise I'd have worked towards that already. [info] None [info] 1325782899
Ohnorepo [info] How do you keep going? I've been a lurker on here and almost all of reddit as a whole for a long time, this sub has been helpful in the past and didn't know where else to go.I guess summarising the bad would help. My grandmother, an aunt and my father all past away within a year of me being diagnosed with type 1 diabetes when I was 12-13 little over 10 years ago. I was taking boxing and martial seriously already at that age but the loss of my dad who was the most important person in my life and my diabetes killed any motivation I had. I was diagnosed with depression not long after. I gave up on all sports and friends and spent all day in bed doing nothing. I started to get out more and try and "be normal" again after 4-5 months but just as I started getting back to school my mum started disappearing for long periods of time with a guy who would eventually beat me regularly. The worst was when he broke two of my ribs one of which cannot set properly ever due to abnormal internal organ locations because of a genetic defect I have. I started to hide away again but managed to find a job that lasted a little while until my mum abandoned my sister and I. I gave up school and the job to look after my sister who has Ocd (severe OCD, almost pulling all her hair out severe) and adhd. I tried to take my life and was admitted to hospital by a friend who found me Od'd on painkillers. I got the help I needed for a while and other than a few bad things like getting stabbed and getting robbed I managed to hold it together. I met a girl who treated me like crap and manipulated me to stay with her with threats and suicide and I turned into a mess. I finally ended it with her after almost a year and met someone who I've been with now for over 5 years. We live together, have a cat and dog and are in a pretty okay position financially. I feel just as bad now as I did back then. I can barely sleep, I over eat, I have no motivation and I tried to take my own life just over a year ago again. I have a crap job but I know it's better than nothing, I struggle to be bothered to even care for my diabetes and I've recently found out I'm infertile. I'm 99% sure my gf slept with a friend of hers last year due to many lies she has told me involving him and I can longer think as to why she is still with me if she has problem fitting and fooling around with other guys. No one knows I feel this way still, I only have a few friends and no family and those who still like me would probably leave to after some time. It's getting harder and harder to keep pushing on, and I'm thinking more and more about ending it. No one would miss me, no one. [info] None [info] 1452626566
one_year_on [info] /u/Waluigi763Exactly one year ago, I asked what you wanted to achieve by 31st Dec 2016 and I said I would message you to see if you achieved it. Well, today is the day!Your goal was:&gt; Over this past year I have been diagnosed with depression. My goal for 2016 is to not kill myself [info] None [info] 1483198525
Elos707 [info] I push people away and isolate myself too much Well I was diagnosed with depression a long while back and things were fine but today my girlfriend had broken up with me. Although that’s not what upsets me. It’s how with every girl I’ve talked to or been with I’ve always pushed away. I’m also a guy that’s never been a fan of physical affection and have stated that to every girl I’ve talked to or been with but no girl can seem to deal with that and be patient enough for me to choose when to warm up and be affectionate. I also have a bad habit of fearing them leaving me so at times I’m slightly distant as well. I’m aware I do this to myself but I just don’t know how to deal with it. I just want a girl that’s more in a relationship for the mental understanding as I’d probably feel more comfortable then. Being there for each other, being able to comfortably break down in front of them, helping each other. That’s what I really want. I don’t want kisses or anything like that. Just someone to truly understand me and someone to understand... [info] None [info] 1557894413
libelulas3v3n [info] I've struggled with tinnitus since I was 17, the time I was diagnosed with depression. I'm now 24. Honestly, I as well thought I was eventually going to kill myself when it all began. I thought it would never disappear nor get better. Truth is, from e to age of 18 to 24, I didn't notice it. I didn't even remember it. Recently, I became very depressed again, and tinnitus is back. It scared me a lot, since I had almost forgotten about it. I panicked all over again. But I'm trying to get used to it again. There are so many people with this condition that are still able to live their lives. Even me, with more or less struggle. And so will you, believe me. Right now, it's all very new. Eventually, your brain will have no option but to get used to it. Just remember, it's not a threat, you'll be okay.Try to see a doctor. They can help, in case your tinnitus is caused by some underlying condition that may be treatable. There are also hearing aids that can help, if you're eligible. You can search for exercises on the web, that might ease tinnitus.At night, leave the fan on, or a white noise machine. Or even a soft background music, something soothing like rain or other sound of your preference. It will help mask the ringing.Stay strong my friend. We're here for you. Your not alone in this. We all felt like you at once. [info] None [info] 1569492723
Simply92Me [info] Going through the montions I'm sure if this is the right place to post this, but here goes. I've been diagnosed with depression for a few years now and I'm seriously wondering if the medication is helping. I feel like I have no motivation to do anything. Due to my mental health I quit my last job, that was 2 years ago. Originally the plan was for me to get my GED and get my mental health sorted out. I was working on my GED and the stopped. I don't feel motivated to do anything. Not cleaning the house, or taking care of myself physically, or looking for a job. I feel so useless but have no idea how to get out of this cycle [info] None [info] 1571558702
reverie_ [info] I suffer from both, although the depression is more mild and consistant. I was also on Vyvance for two years when I was initally diagnosed with ADHD. I was diagnosed with depression about two years afterwards. I would HIGHLY reccomend not being on Vyvance. Please talk to your doctor about alternatives. Secondly, I've noticed that many of my "ADHD" traits/symptoms seemed to clear up when my depression was treated first. Although they can go hand-in-hand, symptoms of both ADHD and depression are very similar, and if you treat one, many of the more severe symptoms of the other go away too. Get your depression treated FIRST, then your ADHD if symptoms are still severe enough. [info] None [info] 1329640544
UltrasonicHumidifier [info] It’s the most painful time of the year. I hate December now yay. Years ago I’d be dying from excitement and I’d be so happy. I wouldn’t even sleep from all the excitement.  All the decorations, the joy everything I loved it. This has turned from my favorite month to my most hated month since I was diagnosed with depression and other mental illnesses 3 years ago. Before that I started losing interest but I’d lie to myself like “yay December...” but I completely despise it now. The decorations, lights, joy, songs, everything, **I hate it**. Everybody is happy and getting together and having fun while I’m still alone in my dark room lonely, broken, isolated, depressed, scared, stressed. I hate it. I’m supposed to be so happy. Instead I’m sitting in my room hating myself to the point where I want to watch myself die slowly. All I want for the holidays is for me to die. It would be better for everyone. It would be better for my family. It would be better for the atmosphere. It would be better that I wouldn’t have to go through this everyday. Thank you for reading and sorry for wasting your time with my dumb rant. Have a nice day. [info] None [info] 1575856969
distinguished_dong [info] I was diagnosed with depression, GAD, and panic disorder. GAD and panic disorder are still there. I have been on the following and had the following effects:Fluoxetine- helped greatly with panic but made me soooo irritatedCitalopram- I wanted to sleep all the time. I'd go home after work and sleep and just stay in bed.I took some other shit that I don't remember, and most of them made me very sleepy and/or irritated.  [info] Mental Skillness [info] 1446433906
stealth57 [info] Do my symptoms point to an overall disease or are the symptoms unrelated and I'm just getting old? I am a 29 year old female. I'm very healthy overall. I'm 5'3" and weigh 110 lbs (lighter side, I know). I don't drink or smoke. I'm not taking any prescription drugs.Since Jan 2016, my interest in my hobbies began switching off one by one as you would a light. Mar 2017, I've been diagnosed with depression. Not suicidal and I won't hurt myself. I have trouble making decisions and can't focus at work. I straight up haven't felt like myself since Jan 2016. Geez, few months prior to Jan 2016, I was teaching myself physics and calculus for the heck of it. It was a fire inside of me, I HAD to learn physics, biology, chemistry... The same for surfing, I HAD to surf and I was surfing every weekend. I haven't hung out with friends in ages. I feel guilty whenever I don't go out. At the same time, I don't feel guilty after firing someone just a few weeks ago. In 2016, I began to notice that if I turned my feet a certain way, that foot and my leg would cramp up.In 2016, I began to get teeth stains. Mind you, I haven't changed how I brush my teeth and hadn't gotten a filling in 4 years, until now. I still floss. I don't drink coffee or alcohol. I very rarely drink soda. I drink smoothies maybe a couple times a month. I eat chocolate maybe a couple times a week (chocolate is awesome), but again, my diet hasn't really changed.Again, in 2016, number 13 tooth began to get sensitivity to where dentist initially thought it was internal resorption. Guess maybe it's sensitivity only, but I still occasionally feel it flare up.In Mar 2017, I was riding the Hulk rollercoaster at Universal Studios and when it shoots you out at the beginning, I experienced a "gray-out". When I rode this rollercoaster a few times in 2015, let alone any rollercoaster including ones at Six Flags, never experienced a gray-out. In Sep 2017, I rode the Hulk again and I was graying out almost the entire ride. So not normal for me.Last couple months, I've noticed more and more hair falling out. I know we're supposed to lose 50-100 strands a day, but I've never pulled out more than 20 at a time when I brush through in the morning, during the day, and at night. It probably doesn't count as hair loss yet, but honestly, it's odd for me. Should probably mention my mom has alopecia. So are these symptoms related or unrelated? Am I just getting old?Thank you for reading this far! [info] None [info] 1506303317
_hannahbelle_ [info] Christianity and anti-depressants I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed anti-depressants about a year ago. It was pretty serious and I ended up having my dosage increased. The medicine was extremely beneficial, but I have a hard time continuing to take it. I feel like there's something almost immoral about relying on medication. Aren't Christians supposed to rely on God during hard times and receive joy from Him?TL;DR Is it against Christianity to depend on anti-depressants? [info] None [info] 1381809359
Mysterious_Drifter [info] Hey! My parents took me to the ER last night and I was diagnosed with depression. Could you pray for me and my family? We're having a lot of trust issues and stuff because of it. My name is Josh.Thanks! It means a lot. [info] None [info] 1418325388
drfunk [info] I get that. I come from a Caribbean background and my siblings and I were pushed through university by our parents. My sister and I have been diagnosed with depression and we're pretty sure my brother has it too. But FFS, we can't be blaming the school for this. Parents, the students, everyone that plays a part in the student's life should be held responsible. The school, as an institution, has a minimal responsibility. Offer students services or accommodation, but really we can't blame UofT or any other university for that matter. [info] New Toronto [info] 1569854863
Blueheat [info] My parents. Let me put some backstory on this. Not so long ago, I was diagnosed with depression, and I had to stay home, and not attend school. They (my parents) cared for me deeply during this time and took care of me. I was unable to go outside, or even see people because I was simply scared of them, anyone really; family friends, strangers or even coworkers of my parents. Soon after four months of staying home, I gained the courage to come back to school, all was fine but I wasn't able to finish that year. All my parents wanted me to do is progress in my life.Now, let's fast forward to now. I'm really trying my best to not go back into my depression state, but it's hard when the only thing my parents are telling me 'you should've never went to school, I knew you were going to fail', ' you are probably the worst child I've ever seen yet', 'I don't think I'll ever see you accomplish a single thing ever in your whole entire life, etc.  [info] None [info] 1415729563
wibblett [info] I started with an SSRI before a stimulant because I was diagnosed with depression. It wasn't until later, after seeing a therapist that she realized I might have ADHD so I started stimulant treatment.  [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1481064603
Chiaretta5498 [info] Yes, Christmas time is depressing..I am 20 yo and I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago, Christmas time is terrible for me. I am lonely. No friends, no boyfriend. I have never had. My life was terrible, I have been bullied so bad at school because of my look. I know nothing will change, I know i will always be alone during Christmas while other people enjoy staying with their own families and friends. I want to die. Sorry for my english. [info] None [info] 1545590928
Not_An_NSA_Employee [info] I was diagnosed with depression 14 years ago as a young dude. Went to therapy for a few months, felt a little better just talking to them no head meds or anything like that. Went again 5 years after that. Same thing, depression no drugs etc. Fast forward to now, literally a week ago, went to my first therapy session doc told me I have depression and PTSD and immediately prescribed me anti-depressants and anti-psychotics without even asking me about them. I feel like this is now becoming a trend to push pills. A lot of my friends take some sort of head meds, even most of my family. [info] None [info] 1564542121
evenstarauror [info] During my first year of college I was diagnosed with depression and wanted to quit school-ended up changing my major to something that would be "easier" and "make me happy" which was music (which I was passionate about).  I did graduate, but had absolutely no idea what I wanted to do to turn that into a job and there are hardly any jobs in that field anyway.  Felt completely crushed and yes, like I wasted my parents money and felt no feeling of accomplishment for it.  Went back to school for an associates degree in IT (am decent with computers and thought it would at least get me a foot in the door at literally any job that isn't retail) and still can't find a job so now I wasted my parents' money on one degree, my own on another, and still have no goals, no job prospects, and no idea what type of work I would actually enjoy and be good at!Don't be me.  Leave school and find a job that you don't hate while you work on getting better so that you at least are getting healthy and saving up some money for when you are able to figure out how you want to live. [info] None [info] 1494523038
MisterCoffeeDonut [info] In a relationship that feels pretty hollow and empty. Girl is crazy about me, but I just kinda feel meh about her.Life is running to fast and I spent most of my time just screwing around. I'm 30 now and trying to figure things out, but still a part time worker with no future prospects and barely made a dent on anything. I'm back in school though.I feel just drained, lonely, and overall exhausted. The idea of working where I currently am for 8+ hours a day terrifies me and I've thought of just quitting and tossing myself off the nearest bridge multiple times a day. The only thing that is even keeping me going anymore is my pet cat and he's getting pretty old. I don't get along with family, I don't have any friends, and I feel empty almost all the time. I have been diagnosed with depression, and I was on medication for that for awhile. I have attempted suicide in the past, and according to my therapist I have, "Major trust and abandonment issues."I just don't feel positive about the future, and if anything I'm just tired of trying when the reality is I'll only end up answering to someone else and being reminded about how worthless I am to everyone as a whole. I just wish I could quit life or something. [info] None [info] 1564794936
Ariochxxx [info] What is my mind doing? A quick background: I am almost 30 y/o. I have been diagnosed with depression since I was 16. Medication and therapy have had its ups and downs. Currently pretty stable and happy.A lot of times when I am about to go to bed, my mind does something weird. It's hard to explain, but my mind starts "rushing" thoughts and images a million a minute. Sometimes I start playing a "movie", or I'll start recalling all I can of my life; from my earliest memories to right now. Other times it's just stories, like the voice you hear when you read.It's scary sometimes when I feel I can't stop it, specially when it's fucked up things I'm thinking about. However, when it's something cool I just let my mind wander. Last night it happened again, I can't recall correctly what I was thinking about, but it was a pretty cool "movie", I ended it and got upset I did because I was enjoying it. I just became too self-aware of what I was doing, which always leads me to belive it's something wrong and I should stop it.Edit: Forgot to mention this has been happening all of my life. Not every night, maybe a once or twice a week.Does anyone know what is that is happening ? Has is happened to any of you?Thanks!p.s. English is my second language, so let me know if something is cofusing or wrong. [info] None [info] 1486530221
iuseoxyclean [info] I've lost friends because their go-to response is "snap out of it". 22M, I was diagnosed with depression this past fall, though I've been depressed for as long as I can remember. The past 6 months have been a struggle, and I do try and reach out to my friends for help.And almost every time they try to tell me to snap out of it. Or to get out more. Or to change my mindset. And at that point I just make a decision for myself, that I can't count on them to be there. [info] None [info] 1436325051
wintersass [info] Depression medication, depression and sex. 19 y/o, female, caucasianI was diagnosed with depression about 3 years ago and I've been on lamotragine and fluoxetine to help me function. About a year ago I got into a great relationship with a male, and we've been sexual for quite a while.I have a pretty high sex drive, which works out well between us, but my vagina just doesn't self-lubricate. We use a good water based lube since going dry is just not an option, but it'd be nice if my body could just do it on its own.Looking at my favourite porn doesn't work, neither does giving oral. Receiving only works because his saliva is slick enough to use, and teasing/edging doesn't help. It's got nothing to do with how aroused I am (giving oral turns me on a lot and playing with my clit doesn't summon any help from the pussy).When I spoke to my boyfriend he mentioned that it was a common side effects of antidepressants, and I want to know if that's true, and if there's any way for me to get wet without help (aside from going off my meds). [info] None [info] 1534829042
Ouroboros612 [info] Not sure if awesome covers it, maybe just sad, but I feel like sharing this one.    I worked an important evening shift (16.00-00.00) and we are only 2 people on that shift. So not showing is a big deal. Overslept so much I came in at 21.00. My boss was furious and I told her the reason was because I overslept - and the reason for that was because I was depressed, and how when you are depressed it leads to complete apathy.    Instead of firing me, she paid for a therapist. I thought I had delivered a flat on lie. But I was diagnosed with depression. I was actually depressed but I had been in denial, so I wasn't self-aware of it.     I thought I was lying to my boss, but I subconsciously told the truth.     Edit: I never showed late for work again a single time the remaining 2 years I worked there.  [info] None [info] 1542326866
melancholysea [info] No stop it, my heart. I got my dog when I was diagnosed with depression, he was only two months and he's now going to be 8 years old next month, he's my everything and I can't imagine having to do this. He really has and still does help me a lot on my bad days. :'( [info] None [info] 1504382862
tw231116 [info] I was diagnosed with depression when actually I have ME (also thought to be autoimmune, but we don't really know due to insufficient research). It should have been a clear indicator that I had tested positive for Epstein-Barr, but it was ignored. I was absolutely exhausted and was struggling to function as I was studying full-time and later working full-time. My body was just not working anymore and producing all kinds of strange symptoms like fainting frequently, constant sore throat, cognitive dysfunction and strange tingling sensations. They told me the exhaustion was caused by depression and told me that if I refused to take antidepressants, there was nothing else they could do for me. This is despite the fact I was telling them I was *not* depressed: I was suffering with low mood resulting from the exhaustion because I was no longer able to do all the activities I usually enjoy. I was also referred to a psychiatrist. After more than two years, just by chance, I was seen by a locum who finally referred me to an ME specialist, where I was diagnosed. The bad news is the condition is chronically underfunded and underresearched, so there is still no treatment available. I can no longer work full-time and have to manage the best I can without any medical care. [info] None [info] 1531995082
willux [info] I was diagnosed with depression. I was on medication for a while because of it. I was suicidal most of college, and when I say I start to crack again, I mean I start to think about cutting my wrists, or jumping off a bridge.And I'm still neurotic most of the time.Don't start talking like you know what my medical problems are. [info] None [info] 1331966434
makingusernamesisnot [info] Are anti-depressants actually useful? I bet this question has been asked many a time.I was diagnosed with depression about two years ago. Gave some pills and told to check back in. Never took the pills. The side effects seem to massively, massively out weight the positive. Mostly I’m fine, but I have weeks where I get into a slump, don’t see the point in anything, drink too much, don’t do anything etc. I seem to have a lot of normal highs then massive lows. Think about all the usual stuff in the lows. But right now I’ve just come out of a low into a high. And when I think about the lows I get massively ashamed, it’s just not me. I’ve just read an old diary from a couple of years ago where I just have that drive and belief in myself. As a person I was at my best. Will anti depressants help or do I just need to get better coping mechanisms and get my life in order? The main thing deterring me is that anti depressants aren’t something you can take for a month and be done with. It has to be continuous. What are your thoughts? [info] None [info] 1580511376
seaglitter [info] I was just diagnosed with depression 6 months ago. My boyfriend cheated on me and then dumped me, I just graduated school and couldn't find a job . The psychiatrist gave me tafil 3 times a day and 10mg of lexapro . For me it didn't work I felt numb and anxious about the future, what would happen to me when I stop taking medication? One day I just quit everything and started exercising a lot so I could sleep, I also meditate and read a lot. I still feel depressed but days are getting better. [info] None [info] 1452969668
cchandleriv [info] I was diagnosed with depression and ADD as a child. Then, while on medication for that (which took the edge off but didn't make it go away at all) - I was in a severe car accident. Permanent nerve damage and severe chronic pain. Became suicidal. As a last ditch hail mary effort, I tried meditation. Really saved my life. I was so deep in depression and suicidal and meditation worked for me, so I do not believe that it can do any harm no matter how bad your depression is, speaking from experience here.I also went and got a masters in psychology and studied the biological mechanisms involved in depression. It is important to note that while biology is indeed involved, it is not the root cause. The root cause is unhealthy thinking and we normally only see the tip of the iceburg of this. The majority of thought is sub-conscious, meaning, we are not aware of it. During meditation, these sub-conscious thoughts can be seen. This is perhaps why some people think meditation might be dangerous, because these sub-conscious thoughts can be seen for the first time and shock you. But it is important to note that these thoughts are there whether you see them or not, and are hurting you whether you see them or not. So, while shining the light of attention on them can be shocking, it is in no way going to make you worse. With simple breathing meditation, if you practice with discipline, you can free yourself from these deep-rooted patterns of unhealthy thinking and view. You will then be back to your natural state, blank and happy. It is important to note here that happiness is actually everyone's nature. It is the depressive thoughts that in turn suppress your nuerotransmitters. Not the other way around. This is also why severe treatment-resistant depression is finally met with electro-shock "therapy." After all the drugs dont work, doctors electrocute your brain to force the patterns of thought to stop, giving you a blank, fresh start again. A lobatomy works similarly. Destroying the prefrontal cortex destroys ability to think about yourself negatively, and so the lobatomized person is kind of a vegetable now, but happy. We live in a very confused, materialist world. Where doctors treat the mind with drugs, electrocution, and destruction of brain function. Meditation takes time but really does work, and is the ONLY way to free yourself from depression completely and without harm. This is, of course, disputed by many, because they have not experienced it. For those of us like myself that have, we know beyond a shadow of a doubt. Life still has its ups and downs, of course. My brother died and I was very sad. I fell in love and was very happy. My lover can also hurt me. These things are normal. Don't expect perfection. In fact, depression is often created or made worse by feelings of things not being as they should, not being perfect or good enough. These thoughts and feelings must be dismissed and not allowed to fester and grow.Think of your mind like a garden. Negative thoughts and emotions are like weeds in your garden. And the more you focus on them, the more they grow. Dismiss them, forget them, dont ignore them - see them, and then let them go. Focus on something positive, some silver lining, anything. You are alive. You are breathing. You are here. Be thankful and know that there is a way through this. There is also in buddhism what is called the conditioned and the unconditioned. The conditioned is the material world, including your body, biology, thoughts, everything you normally think of as yourself. These things are actually not-self. The true self is UNconditioned. Pure clear light of awareness, blissful and radiant. You just need to get rid of the clouds of darnkess to see the clear blue sky, to reveal your true nature. If you believe this it will help you. You can find peace and comfort by taking refuge in your inner buddha. Of course, belief is not really necessary, as with consistent meditation practice, this will all be revealed to you directly by first hand experience. Also, check this out, I really love this short video. Try to stop identifying and holding onto your depression as if it is a part of you. Start seeing it as not-self, like everything else in the conditioned world. Breathe and let it go. Start joking with people. Change your patterns consciously. You can do it, takes practice and time, but worth it.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pKOxp2q2lss  [info] None [info] 1412803757
SirBaconFace [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 10 and I have had to deal with this shit for the past 6 years... People who do stuff like this really piss me off, I mean sure... Sometimes it's true but it really gets on my nerves. [info] None [info] 1556919138
meizhong [info] You make a good point, and it was just a rant, but I still disagree. It is just my opinion, take it for what it's worth, but I feel like the noticeable traits of autism that make us in whatever way different from the neurotypical, stem from the underlying fundamental way I process information and think. In contrast, I was diagnosed with depression in my early 20s and I took medication and it worked and it was helpful. Treating depression did not change how I think. Maybe I can explain it like this, if I didn't take medicine for depression I see a glass half empty, with meditation I see it half full, but this doesn't change how I process that there is a glass of water in the first place. Also, don't misunderstand me as being against a cure, I'm saying I don't think there can be one. If there can, and you want it, great. Many people would benefit. But I think autism is a deep subconscious fundamental thing. [info] None [info] 1558357121
Deathmedical [info] A reddit for people recovering from depression and loneliness. I was diagnosed with depression the year before last and have  been undergoing treatment since which has helped tremendously. However because of the long time prior I've never developed any kind of social skills/life, hobbies, or made friends and figuring out how to do so might as well be brain surgery. Is there a reddit that i can chat with others like me without coming off as weird, awkward or desperate. I legitimately just don't know how to people out side of the internet. Even then it's kind of nerve wracking. [info] None [info] 1582733538
Rhisper [info] I knew I'd get hurt Over the summer I was diagnosed with depression after a suicide attempt. My depression, suicidal thoughts, and self harm built up for years before it finally came out. I've been getting help now, but still not doing the best.Through therapy I found a lot of my misery and anger comes from my family. I have been talking to them less in the months after my stay in the hospital.I'm in the military so I dont go home a lot. But I decided to for christmas. I thought it'd be a good idea. My coworkers all advised me against it and when they asked where I was going on leave, I lied and said i was going to see a friend that lives in my home state. I got home today and I dont expect a huge greeting but at least a hello, hows life? Let's go chat in the living room for a bit. I got none of that. I sat in the living room by myself, hoping one of my parents or siblings would come speak to me.Later on I was talking to my dad about my car loan. I didn't know what gap is,after telling me he goes "so you better pay it off before the end of your contract because they're not going to let you reenlist with those coo coo games you want to play. Acting crazy so you can get off the ship. Yeah you're not going to last much longer."And that there ruined my day. So now I'm curled up in bed with my dogs, staring blankly at the wall. Part of me wants to just get up now, take my dogs and go back home. [info] None [info] 1545260389
MichaelWithAOnTheEnd [info] I tell truly hilarious stories. Or at least, before I was diagnosed with depression, I did. I would literally have people crying with laughter telling them about (for example) the time I went home from a bar with a member of the British Air Force and fell naked onto their friend whose room we were in, who they had drunkenly kicked out of the bed. The friend told me not to apologize because me falling naked onto his face was the most action he’d seen in months. Swear to god, verbatim quote. Once I developed depression and PTSD from dark and twisty things i won’t go into here, I lost that spark. I haven’t made anyone besides my SO or my family members laugh in a long while. My depression has been in remission for a little bit here, though! And I recently was able to discontinue my meds. I’ve just gotten out of the habit of being funny. OP, you’ve inspired me to share my comic experiences again. Maybe not the one about falling naked onto someone’s face. But i have lots of others!  [info] None [info] 1532018614
incapablepanda [info] So over the past few years, my company's CEO has personally paid for the increase in our health  insurance premiums as they pile on. The last year was apparently quite a bit higher than previous years to the point that his generosity was tested. So he made the choice so cut everyone's sick allowed sick time in half but he'll pay the increase. I'm not complaining. It's very generous for him to be paying the increase at all. He doesn't have to do that. But its still kind of a bummer that we lose sick time. Makes me wonder what they'll be taking away next year, or if they'll tell us to suck it up and pay the increases ourselves.When I was unemployed I didn't qualify for medicaid in my state and it was still cheaper to just pay the tax penalty. I work in an industry where you work 40 hours a week so you get health coverage anyway. I don't need Obamacare now, and it didn't help me at all when I was unemployed. The only benefit to me from the AHCA is that they can't increase my premiums because I've been diagnosed with depression and epilspsy or outright deny me coverage. [info] None [info] 1477435452
SeleneNyx [info] &gt; This has actually been something I've learned from  Awesome. :) I was diagnosed with depression and on meds years ago, I was fine for a long time but last year due to a medical issue that caused chronic pain every single day the depression slowly crept back in. It's awful. The feelings aren't something that the person can control and hearing the words "just don't think about the negative stuff" is absolutely *maddening*. If only it were that simple! Like, you wouldn't just tell an alcoholic, "Hey bud, just put the drink down, it's that easy!" I'm glad you guys worked this out and both learned something. Happy happy. [info] None [info] 1415405392
Aeneon2 [info] Awh :( I'm very sorry to hear about that. :(I've been diagnosed with depression half a year ago, and can confirm, it's truly awful, it sucks life out of you and enjoyment out of you. I would have been in deep shit (probably not even here anymore) if I didn't have very supportive friends. But hang on tight there, buddy, I'm rooting for you! I'm sure you'll get much better in the future, as unlikely as it may seem right now. Trust me. C: [info] None [info] 1515405405
Shyguy1119 [info] 25 years old, each day is a chore. So, I'll be honest here, I don't know why I am writing this. Maybe I'm looking for help, maybe I just want to tell someone what I am going through. I don't know.So, as the title states, I am 25 years old. My name is Nick. I live in an ok apartment with my boyfriend of 4 years and a friend of mine from college. I am currently very under-employed. Just a bit of background on me for you.Each and every day is hard. I struggle to get out of bed, and usually only do because my stomach starts to hurt because I am hungry. After that I sit at my computer, and stare at it. I keep telling myself to work on my app so I can get a better job, but I can't bring myself to do it. I am constantly thinking about the gun in the other room and how easy it would be to simply get it and end all of this.Immediately after those thoughts, I always think of my boyfriend, and all my other friends and how much they would hurt if I did it. That stops me.But the struggle continues. I feel like I have some weight tied to my mind. I've been diagnosed with depression, and was on meds for a time. I was ok doing that time but felt numb, like every emotion was dulled to the point that I felt nothing. It was worse than the pain I feel now. I think was on concerta.So, here I sit, typing out this massive 'I-don't-know-what' post. Not even sure how to end it, so I guess *this* is the end. [info] None [info] 1479632361
riplox [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 14 (I'm almost 26 now), but I can remember back farther than that to around when I was just starting kindergarten. Looking back on it, I was socially awkward and had depression at the age of 6. So essentially, I've had depression for as far back as I can remember. [info] None [info] 1319064900
graziadoon [info] When I was diagnosed with depression at 11, I read this book to try to find some sort of help, and it has formed the spine of my psychology ever since. If I got a quote tattooed on my body, it would be “The last of the human freedoms — to choose one’s attitude in a given set of circumstances...” and Victor Frankl has always been one of the dead greats I’d choose to have dinner with. I literally cannot say how important this book, and the theories of logotherapy have been to me. So glad to see it getting so much attention! [info] None [info] 1522984573
FracturedSublimity16 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, but have never had any other issues of that kind. While I appreciate the suggestion, this is a thing that is 100% happening in my life, a few different people have been around when weird shit happens and confirmed my thoughts. [info] None [info] 1561625542
constipatedshitting [info] [Advice Request] Anger Management Sorry I don't know how to flair. Anyway, I need some help with anger management. I was was raised by my mom and nGma from a young age. Things were petty nice because I usually wasn't with my nGma, but with my mom. We went to the school she taught at, and it was good for me. My brother and I were really close. However, it was decided that we go to the school we were zoned for, and our gParents would take care of us until our mom picked us up. Around this time I began having issues. My self-esteem dropped, I started getting sick (I hadn't been sick since first grade, now I was in third), and I got into "fights" (read, nGma shouting at me) with my nGma. I then began having short depression episodes. I often considered suicide, but usually chickened out once I got to the knife drawer. I didn't talk to anybody about our "fights" because I thought they were normal. It usually started over homework, then my nGma would raise her voice, and tell me to stop shouting, all while screaming her head off. ( I now know that this is a deflection tactic). It got worse in sixth grade, where there was more work, more complex, and my grades dropped. My self-esteem dropped with it. Seventh grade went decently, and I started feeling better. Eighth grade however, was bad. Most of my classes consisted of me being made fun of, even by a teacher. (He made me hate performing music, something I really enjoyed). Then, I went to a state funded counselor. I stopped spending so much time with nGma, and it got better. However, I ran out of state funded visits, and had to stop going. I was diagnosed with depression, and knowing that doesn't really effect me. However, now I am extremely easy to anger. I can go from happy to wanting to hurt someone in an instant. My breathing exercises stopped working, and I don't know how to control my anger. Does anyone have some tips?Looking back, I didn't mean to throw down this wall of text. Sorry. [info] None [info] 1441112130
WhyIsThatOnMyCat [info] I was diagnosed with depression without *any* birth control.  Still had it on the Pill, Ring, and now with Mirena (which has stopped my periods).It's almost like they're not related. [info] None [info] 1525580785
gambinosbambino [info] If you don't mind please explain what you mean by "normality." I was diagnosed with depression at 13, my parents don't really believe in mental health issues (they're African) so I've never been treated/attempted treatment. I go through episodes of severe depression where my mind become a literal prison and I'll suffer from mild panic attacks as a result. I'm 21 now and I've made the decision not to settle for a normal life (I.e. Kids, marriage) but instead be somewhat detached from everyone/everything with the reasoning that if at any time shit gets real I can kill myself without worrying about my actions impacting those around me. With all that being said I'm afraid of planning a future with someone and instead I'm a live in the moment-type-of-person.Any thoughts, advice would be appreciated [info] None [info] 1494993678
stalpno [info] You have an awesome jawline dude, mad jealous. Good on you for at least seeking therapy, if your parents don't cooperate don't be switched off from it as an option in the future. I was diagnosed with depression at 17 and got therapy at 18 and it really helped me turn my life around and find ways to like the person that I am.In the mean time, a thing that really helped me when I was in a bad way was a technique I was taught where every night before going to sleep I would think about 3 unique things I liked about myself or the world. It could be as simple as liking that paint provides colour to the world, or the atmosphere of a rainy day spent indoors next to a fireplace. It is amazing when you take the time to try and be present in the things that are good that you begin to notice how much good there is in life, and helped me be a little less pessimistic and get out of a negative depressed cycle that I felt trapped in.I hope you have a good week and that your parents can be supportive! Take care. [info] None [info] 1573026892
hatreq [info] Male teenager needs help. I'm sorry for posting here for a second time (I believe I posted here 2 weeks ago), but I got few questions.I'm 16 y/o male and I'm concerned that I have hypothyroidism. I did a blood test and the result is following:       TSH - 4.09.Based on the lab's reference values (0.27 - 4.2), my TSH is pretty normal, but yet I'm still experiencing those hypothyroidistic symptoms:- Extreme fatigue- Hair loss and hair thinning, none of my grandfathers were bald, neither was my father, plus I'm just sixteen years old, I doubt that I should experience hair loss at this age.- Severe brain fog and memory loss, this happened suddenly, my memory became so bad that its snapchat-like, and my brain fog is so severe that it feels like I can't even think anymore, it's pretty scary.- Cold hands/feet, even though I'm wearing two pairs of socks.- Dry and pale skin.- Constipation to the point where I can't even fall asleep because my stomach hurts way too much as a result of not going to toilet for couple of days.- I'm diagnosed with depression.- I sleep 12-15 hours without alarm, there were some days where I slept over 20 hours during the summer.On my last post, people encougared me to try very hard to get my medication, but I got few questions:- Once I start taking levothyroxine, will my cognitive abilities come back? Is the brain fog going to disappear any will my memory improve and go back to where it was before?- Will my hair loss stop?- Can you please share some success stories.I had more questions, but yeah, my memory is shit and I just forgot them. I apologize if there are any grammatical mistakes, it's not my first language. [info] None [info] 1508118568
ienjoyeatingsoap [info] Does age actually dictate on if I could be depressed? Basically, I’m 15 which is considered peak ‘lying about depression’ age. I do think it’s relevant to mention I have been diagnosed with depression officially since I was 14. One of the main issues with my depression is that I constantly feel like I shouldn’t be depressed since I’m so young and people have it much worse than me. Every self harm and suicide attempt has made me feel like such an attention seeker, due to my own family labelling me as such. Due to feeling like I’m lying to myself, I quit all therapy that I have been doing. I now have no official help, and can’t bring myself to get any to avoid looking like an attention seeker. I don’t know what to do. [info] None [info] 1575768146
Salemsmeowmix [info] I'm BPII but for many years I was diagnosed with depression because I rarely get hypomania, and it's pretty easily controlled. Except that whole not sleeping for multiple days thing. Anyway, I'm pretty sensitive and tend to cry a lot. Sometimes I don't even realize I'm sad until I start randomly crying. It's like my brain gave up on me feeling things and just went straight to crying. The meds help control the random crying but I'm still more sensitive than most. My SO is awesome and will often watch stuff before me or research shows to make sure there's no triggers for me. It's ok to cry sometimes, it's just not ok to cry all the time.  [info] None [info] 1501093453
madeofstars3285 [info] You're actually the irresponsible one here. I've been diagnosed with depression for 16 of my 32 years and it absolutely is a mental disorder. Research serotonin and brain chemistry. You sound like a 10 year old trying to be right when in fact you are terribly, terribly wrong. I hope no one close to you ever struggles with depression.  [info] None [info] 1535586788
rapunzl129 [info] My husband works for a family business of less than 5 employees. I have my own small business. We pay for our own health insurance and receive no assistance for it. I was diagnosed with depression in 2005 and asthma in 2012. These 2 preexisting conditions prevented me from having health insurance before the affordable healthcare act. Since I've had health insurance again (got it in January 2014), I've been diagnosed with 3 additional conditions - all require regular doctor visits, blood work, and prescriptions. If the health care act gets repealed I'm afraid I'll lose my health insurance again and I have no idea how we'll pay out of pocket for my medical expenses.  [info] None [info] 1484536436
GwenCocoUgo [info] This won't be the best advice here, but this is what I did regarding the first part of your issue - your parents not wanting to take ADHD seriously. Take from this what you will. I was diagnosed at 17 as well. Exact same situation, and I was sent to a doctor by the school GC and so what followed was that I wasn't allowed to have sessions with the GC anymore either. What I did was stopped giving a fuck. I spent hours doing what I wanted to, which was watching TV. I didn't attend any classes first semester of college, and failed 3 of my 5 classes. I hated that, but I was still not caring. I wasted so much time it's unbelievable. Second year, I was put on academic probation and I was eating 200 calories a day (ED). went into treatment for ED after nearly fainting twice a day after 2 months of eating 1000 calories a week. Nobody had any choice then. I was either going to take antidepressants, or be dead. The doctors talked to my family. The treatment continued. I was 19 at the time, and had just survived an almost dangerous ED. Doctor visits continued, at the school clinic and for the first itme ever my family was spending money on my mental health because it was physical health as well. There I was diagnosed with depression, Anxiety, OCD and ADD. An entire year on drugs was not fun, and I don't even really remember it... but guess what, I was going through the motions of life. Getting up, going to class, etc. I finished uni in 6 years, but I finished ffs. It's been a struggle. It'll be a struggle for years to come I'm sure. Anyways, what's that got to do with you? Well, you could start by letting your mind take over. Just let all the horrible shit happen. It's kind of good to get all that out of your system young. LOL. BUT, do you honestly want to go through this? Do you want to wait until you're almost dying to get help? Dude, you're a kid and you already are more self aware than half people twice your age. You deserve to have a little help here. That help is either meds or a therapist. Do whatever you can to either convince your parents, or just go after it yourself. About the job; it's a communication issue. Make it a game for just this one day, see how bad you can actually get! Like actually try to be bad. Then don't try. Compare the two. Count how many blonde people you see. write it down! You're not a cashier now, you're just playing around. After you're done, go to your boss and compliment him on something. Thank him for giving you a chance. Butter him up. Then tell him you feel like you'd be a better fit somewhere else, and you'd like a chance to prove that to him. Make sure you know what you're signing up for tho! You've got this [info] None [info] 1570473378
DocLeWolfe [info] I work 10-12 hours for 6 days a week and I was diagnosed with depression. Am I still a part of the lazy crowd?Edit: Am a Building Contractor [info] The Star Wars Prequels are Good [info] 1519228944
Guinness2702 [info] Hmm ... you seem like you have it good ... but yeah, if you feel "empty inside" then maybe you are suffering from depression.  I have a good life ... good job, I'm secure and happy and yet I was diagnosed with depression too.  (I missed a bit ... I am single and lonely, and that contributes probably ... but what I'm trying to say is that I don't have it bad at all, not like some other people who don't even know where their next meal is coming from .... so yeah, even though things sound good .... you are not immune) [info] None [info] 1511407703
Rehumanize_Yourself [info] Does anyone else have problems with their anger because of depression/antidepressants? Hey guys,So every since I was diagnosed with depression, my temper seems to have greatly increased. The slightest thing can make me massively angry, which prior to my diagnosis was completely out of character for me. I'm not sure what the cause of this is, but can anybody relate? [info] None [info] 1439162772
crazydarklord [info] Indeed. I've been feeling that way since 2016, when I was diagnosed with depression. I've told my wife that I feel like I'm shutting down, that my brain is no longer the awesome machine it was years back. Being considering to go back to a doctor to see how can I stop this problem  [info] None [info] 1529737024
lurklark [info] I was diagnosed with depression in 2011, and it was relief to know that I wasn’t just wanting attention or was a bad person- a professional listened to my physical and mental symptoms and came to a conclusion. I suspect I had depression since middle school (probably around 2003-2004) but always thought I just couldn’t cope. It was way more powerful to be assessed by a doctor than by my own biased self. Six years on and after being able to take a break from meds I’m trying to find the right one again. All these morons running around thinking they have BPD and shit. Hell, PROFESSIONALS often misdiagnose that, and from everything I read it is hell to live with.  [info] None [info] 1512148161
SimpleRosty [info] Upcoming diagnosis - anxious and don't know what to expect I was diagnosed with depression, but this diagnosis was a little rushed, because it was made after a failed suicide attempt. I was speaking with a psychologist back then and this diagnosis is based one one conversation in the hospital. In a few days I will have a proper diagnosis with a psychologist (or something along the lines). This meeting will be made via video call because of this virus thing going around. If you guys have experience what I could be expecting of this diagnostis meeting, please share it with me. I am very anxious about this meeting and can't stop thinking about it.Thanks in advance! :) [info] None [info] 1588016359
TrustMeImMagic [info] I was diagnosed with depression years ago and took to drinking some years after that. Now that I'm getting sober and trying to do the whole "thinking positive, nature will help" thing, my depression has lifted. Not saying that will work for everyone, or even most people, but for some, yeah. Exercise, volunteering, eating healthy and shutting the fuck up for hours at a time (some call it meditation, but I just sit there thinking about Pokemon most of the time) can make all the difference. [info] None [info] 1538275792
IndieCredentials [info] 25 and it's been 4-5 years. Full disclosure I'm diagnosed with depression, GAD and OCD. For me the issue is exactly what you said, feeling unwanted, stuck in a quagmire, not having any real agency due to shitty brain wiring. Feels like quicksand real quick, especially when you don't have anyone to go to. That being said, I'll take it over cancer. [info] None [info] 1472532378
LethalAngelx [info] I once had a therapist that told me I could lose my daughter if I was diagnosed with depression. I lost out on a couple of years of getting the proper help because I was afraid to talk to anyone else. Eventually I met a fantastic woman who got me on the right path. I do hope you can find someone like I did. It definitely saved my life.  [info] None [info] 1554228020
potetoshio [info] [UPD] Permanent Disqualification? Hello. I was diagnosed with depression last summer. I thought I could get through this sem... but I was wrong. Almost halfway through the semester, I ended up missing all of my classes and exams. None of my professors know about my condition. I haven't told/emailed them yet because I'm afraid of what their reaction might be. I thought of going to the OCG, but I had a bad experience there with one of the psychologists.    I still really want to finish my studies here. I was hoping you guys could share your experiences or share advice on steps that I should take to get readmitted to the University. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1544493063
Gelasia [info] Recently Diagnosed Recently I was diagnosed with depression from my therapist. The day after this was one of my worst days and I just couldn’t stop crying - no real reason why. Ever since I was told I’ve felt all of these symptoms intensify. Did anyone else experience this? A weird intensity of your symptoms after you were told why you were having them? [info] None [info] 1579381369
BetYourBottomDollar [info] I'm having a hard time saying no right now This might be in the wrong place, just let me know.I've been diagnosed with depression and I've decided not to take meds for it, opting for healthy eating, dieting, and journal writing to channel my thoughts and what not. I've been battling this since I was about 10 and have since then, on and off, been prone to self mutilation to help deal with my emotional pain.I nearly OD'd off a full bottle Tylenol and half a bottle of vodka when I was 13, and used to cut myself on a regular basis from 10 to 17, then I met a really great guy and restricted myself to doing it when things got too hot to handle. Fast forward to deepening of my depression when he hit me hard enough to break my face, put me in the hospital for 4 days with emergency surgery, then blames me for pushing him to hit me.I self medicated with pain killers, alcohol, promiscuous sex, and more cutting. not too mention I had an abortion because I was carrying his child and was 18/19 and couldn't handle the responsibility to take care of myself, let alone a little person. I went back to cutting quite often for a few months then met another guy about 6 months after and fell straight into love and haven't fallen out of it in the last 2.5 years.Right now things are hard and I'm in school with 21 credits right now so I'm stressed to the max, we fought all day V-Day and he left the house to stay at a friends house.Now my problem.. I haven't hurt myself in years now, and I really don't want to go back to doing but yesterday I caved and burned myself with a lighter multiple times... I don't want to get back into this habit but I'm scared I might now be able to stop. Quite frankly, I just need someone to tell me things with be A-OK and that this is a  phase that will pass.**TL;DR: I haven't hurt myself in years and did it last night and this morning, i want someone to tell me everything will be okay****EDIT: Thank you. Even though I haven't responded, thank you!** [info] None [info] 1329326296
InstitutionalizedOat [info] Not the person you were replying to, but I was diagnosed with depression 12 years ago and I’m pretty sure I was showing signs of it a few years before that. I’ve stopped myself from trying to commit suicide for stupid reasons like my dog or because I really want to see how the new season of my favorite show ends. There are always some days that are better than others. It doesn’t just go away, but there are things you can do to try and help. Sometimes it’s relying on someone else, but for me, I try to focus on just living my life for me. The best thing my therapist ever told me to do was start each day by asking myself what I want to do. And not beating myself up if the answer is just staying in bed and not doing anything. It takes getting used to and I’m not saying it will cure everything, but your attitude is really concerning. Maybe if you looked more at yourself instead of thinking that people who do have more good days don’t suffer as much as you do, you might actually have some good days yourself. [info] None [info] 1531717471
msaign [info] am i really depressed About 2 years ago I was diagnosed with depression and was out on medication for it i cant remember at what point or even why i stopped taking it but I did. Last sunday I overdosed I don’t think I actually wanted to die i just wanted to stop. I went to the doctor and was prescribed new meds but now I can’t stop thinking if i’m really depressed.I feel happiness, or at least i think I do, and I feel anger and irritation and sadness but a lot of the time I don’t know what i feel.. Do I feel nothing? I don’t look forward to anything in the future. I have no goals, no aspirations nothing. I just do what I do to keep the days going.Some days I wake up feeling what I think to be happy but then within a few hours my mood is drastically different sometimes for no reason and sometimes for the smallest most insignificant reason.. That’s another thing I get upset extremely easy and it’s very hard to control. I cry very often but sometimes i don’t even know why.. am i crying out of anger?? sadness?? stress?? sometimes i wonder if i really feel emotions or if i’ve just pretended long enough that i’ve convinced myself i do.I find it extremely hard to make friends, I’m not too sure why. I do have difficulty building up courage to talk to people, and keeping a conversation going.. what do i talk about?? When I do make friends i seem to cling to them in an almost obsessive way getting jealous if they get close with others and if someone i was once close with somewhat drifts away I assume it was because of something i have done.I go between sleeping 12+ hours and still being exhausted to sleeping less than 6 and feeling super energetic. I go between eating maybe once a day to eating multiple times. I go between wanting to leave the house and go out and wanting to sit in bed all day. Sometimes I sleep because i can’t find anything that excites me enough to make me feel not bored. I try to play games i once enjoyed but I can’t find enjoyment. Even the thought of playing bores me. I get waves of nausea and headaches I almost always have back pain.I feel like there is something wrong with me but i don’t know what it is. Is it really depression it is just my personality?? i feel like i don’t deserve therapy for my depression i feel like i’m wasting everyone’s time because i’m not sad all the time i feel other emotions but I also feel nothing. no emotions. [info] None [info] 1558625407
mooseluver4life [info] I did go! I may have been late but I went!! He was very nice and we even talked about other things than being sad! Unfortunately I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD from a past relationship. I cried alot but made another appt. So ya know, steps forward! My homework is to look for a dr. so I can get medication. I don't want to be sad or angry anymore... [info] None [info] 1436227578
svenskarrmatey [info] I was diagnosed with depression. [Depression does not mean "emo"](http://dl6.glitter-graphics.net/pub/774/774216m4mqx34vjc.jpg). [info] None [info] 1437747014
maskredd [info] I really have to say that it harmed me. I was always the smartest kid in the class in elementary school and was told so by teachers, my parents etc. The only problem was this also brought on unending teasing from other kids. By sixth grade I had had enough, so I stopped trying. I would fake sick all the time, not do homework or hand it in late, just to feel somewhat normal, have normal grades, and feel accepted by my friends. I would still ace tests so my grades ended up being average. It was around 7th or 8th grade that I was diagnosed with depression and started antidepressants and therapy. While this may have helped me emotionally, it also gave me a crutch in school that allowed me to slack off and blame it on depression. I became exceedingly lazy and uninterested in school. I didnt have to try anymore as tests were still really easy for me. I got a 33 on the ACT without doing any special classes or studying, but i never did any homework. As a result I finished high school with a nonexistent worth ethic and ended up dropping out of college twice. Now I've been working for almost 3 years and just now feel like I have a good enough work ethic to succeed in college. **TL; DR**: was "gifted"and teased for it. Ended up with a shitty work ethic that has been really hard to fix. [info] None [info] 1367782658
CaedesOfTheSkies [info] [Need Advice] Second year of college, just got placed on academic probation and don't know what to do. As the title says, I'm a sophomore and just got placed on academic probation. My study habits are shit. My entire life routine is absolute shit. I don't really have a routine or discipline, or anything. I was diagnosed with depression and started getting help about half a year ago, but I feel that it's up to me to get my life together now. I've finally come out of the life has no meaning so why try rut, and want to get things together. I want to stop blaming depression for what is my own fault. How do I start actually getting disciplined and actually achieve something worthwhile with my time each day? Any advice and tough love will be appreciated!Thanks so much! [info] None [info] 1485175873
eSome437579438869 [info] Well, that's a long story. If your people were taken from you and you thought you might be able to get them back, what would you do? I have been diagnosed with depression, but you can definitely see why I would be diagnosed with that there captain. This world is not what you think it is. If a swarm of bees was flying around you constantly would you stand there in the cloud, or try anything to get out? See where I am going with this?  [info] None [info] 1457134553
Catzfordayz [info] Recent diagnoses, Seroquel an Zoloft question Diagnosed last week with Bipolar 1. Was prescribed Seroquel, which is knocking my ass out. I’m struggling with that a bit, because I have a 3 year old who gets up at night. Anyways! I had been taking Zoloft for an incorrect diagnoses, but stopped when I started the Seroquel. It has definitely been making me cycle faster and worse.But now I’m wondering if stopping it was a mistake. I’m feeling a little better, but still very emotional and angry. I just am so unfamiliar with any of the medications related to Bipolar, I was diagnosed with depression for 6 years. Should I give just the Seroquel until my follow up appointment? Or call my doctor and have her refill my Zoloft for me. She hadn’t been very clear on if I should stay on it or not. [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1534035594
kdubbstep [info] Yes!!! I remember writing a letter to the advice column of Highlights for Children like “what should I do if my parents keep blaming me for things my brother did?” I never sent it because I was like... 8 ish? And I had no idea how to send a letter lol.God, so I’m an emotional person. An empath. And I’m really emotional (but now I’m fucked up in that department because I was conditioned to suppress my emotions. Suppressing my emotions kept me “out of trouble.” Like the child’s version of grey rocking (or whatever it’s called.) I remember one time I stole my dad’s vodka (it’s easy to block out emotions when your numb on alcohol). A few days later, my dad asked me if I stole his vodka. Me, I think either drunk or stoned this time, I can’t remember (I used substances a lot when I lived with my parents), just replied with a simple “no.” Apparently (my brother overheard this), my dad told my mom that he “knew” that I didn’t steal his vodka because I “didn’t bring on my usual ‘theatrics’, so because I was so causal about it (aka really just emotionally numb from drinking or drugs),  I  ‘obviously’ didn’t do it, that he probably just misplaced it somewhere.” See, showing emotions didn’t get me in trouble.Go back a few years, I was really depressed and cutting and stuff. Once my parents found my arm slashed, they took me to the ER. I was diagnosed with depression. My dad responded, “I thought it was just teenage, female hormones.”Plot twist, my dad isn’t the BPD, my mom is. But my dad was a huge enabler when it came to mom vs. me, and he would use “logic” to basically confirm whatever she would say. Or something, idk, i can’t even make sense of it TBH. [info] None [info] 1566146327
yungcabbages [info] (23m, started smoking when I was 15) My dad was a stoner and alcoholic for all of my childhood (smoking at least 2-3 joints every day after work as well as 2-4 beers, much more on the weekend). We never had a good relationship and I don't know if we ever will to be honest with you. He stopped drinking last year and stopped smoking 2 weeks ago coincidentally around the same time as me (I say that because before we both quit he didn't speak to me for about 2 months even though we live together). He knew I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago and maybe spoke to me about it once or twice just to tell me that I should stop taking my medicine because he thought I didn't need it. He was never a very supportive role model and I can count on one hand the amount of times he said he was proud of me. I am optimistic that our relationship will get better now that he's making these lifestyle changes but who knows. What I'm trying to say is you've made the right choice mate, good on you. Your son deserves a father who is emotionally present and supportive. It's very noble of you to think of your family like that, I can see that your priorities are in the right place. Best of luck to you and your family and keep us posted on your progress :) [info] None [info] 1562680868
2mutt1ng0n1 [info] I'm to ashamed of my self harm scars to have sex with anyone. I have been diagnosed with depression, and I'm very open about it, but I have scars from past cutting incidents on my upper and inner thighs, and on my boobs. I'm afraid of having sex with anyone because I think that once I take my clothes off, all they'll be focused on is the cuts, especially they're on body parts that people focus on more during sex. It makes me ashamed to wear any short shorts, or low cut shirts because I've gotten States and comments before, when my shorts started riding up. [info] None [info] 1565193372
AccioSomePizza [info] I can't afford to live on campus, unfortunately. Even the classes that seemed interesting to me before feel like so much work now. I was diagnosed with depression about a month ago, so I'll have to keep the disability thing in mind. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1420786551
shizzyMeetsReddit [info] Lost every motivation. Hi, I'm a teen and I basically lost any motivation. I have been diagnosed with depression when I was 12. I have been bullied since I was at elementary school, but this school year has been "fine" I can say. The last months were really painful for me. I feel like I have a big weight on my shoulders. I have never had a girlfriend and I barely have friends. Suicidal thoughts are always on my mind. I feel like I'm a failure and worthless for everyone around me. If I died, I think nobody would miss me except my parents. [info] None [info] 1496176898
thunderkid267 [info] Hey i just wanted to come here for help. I know this probably isn't for this sub but i have been struggling with cutting myself, attempted suicide, and depression, most of this because I have been diagnosed with depression but also my parents are homophobic and we'll im gay. My cat died this morning and im heart broken this is my first post here and i just want to find a group i can find comfort in. Edit: thanks for all the support the worst thing is i live in school zone which I used to go to, it just scared me too think if some one is fast enough to hit a cat and not give the cat time that person is breaking the law but also endangering other kids loved including mine when i went there. [info] None [info] 1527874883
Hansen5852 [info] That's funny that you mention that because before I knew I had a sleep disorder, I was diagnosed with depression. None of the SSRIs or SNRIs that were prescribed to me did anything. No good side effects or bad ones. I was so excited to try Wellbutrin/Buproprion because I had heard that it gave people energy, but It had no effect. My doc had me on 400mg of it and all it did was made me a little bit irritated! [info] None [info] 1546991654
ByeByeFlutterPie [info] I'm not psychotic, but I was diagnosed with depression by a therapist, and my N-mother either makes it worse, denies it, or both.If you have state insurance, a therapist is easy to find. If you have to pay out-of-pocket, it may be more difficult. Either way, I highly recommend seeing a therapist. They can help you a lot. [info] Autistic DoNM [info] 1510700662
FenrisWolf83 [info] Only way to know for sure is to try. At a guess being that you don't smoke too often I can't see an issue, but it depends on the person. From a personal experience I was diagnosed with depression about 4 years ago. Gave the medication a go, but personally find trees more helpful, in that it helps me to keep things in context. Also I recommend to try and channel positive thoughts as much as possible too. Best of luck either way, hope things work out for you. [info] None [info] 1336740575
4GHOP [info] I want to leave. I'm probably just going to write my life story here, although it would be very scrambled and unorganized as I'm just vomitting words here.I was born in New York City (I'm not sure specifically where) on September 23rd, 1997. I am currently 16 years old and I am diagnosed with depression and aspergers. I got bullied and abused at lot at my school from kindergarden to eighth grade, after which I transfered schools to a more friendly school, but during my time at the old school, I would be mocked for being autistic, made fun of, excluded, left out and was never able to do anything about it. As such I live a life almost soley on my computer. I have been known to frequent 4chan and because of which I feel enlightened after brushing aside the racism, sexism, and porn. It opens me up to a whole other world that really opens my eyes. Aside from school and the internet, I live with three other people and their pets. My father, a nice caring man; my mother, who can be a little cray cray sometimes; any my brother, who is completely cray cray. He is very spoiled and so am I, but he acts a lot more spoiled than I do. When he isn't scaring me with his threatening demeaner, he is very annoying and won't listen to anybody leading me to be extremely embarassed to be his brother whenever I'm in public with him. When he's not annoying, like I said, he is somewhat aggressive. I remember one time I was playing Counter Strike: Source on Halloween day when he walked into my room, threatening me with a knife, and told me I was going to carve pumpkins with him or else. Our parents weren't home but when they came home they ended up grounding him only for a day, but he did get a verbal beatdown from my mother who later told me not to tell anyone about the incident. Jump forward some five years to where I start telling my online friends about the incident. Almost all of who I tell only talk like I shouldn't be scared because a person with a knife is easily disarmable, but I was in no position to agree seeing how I was scared shitless at the time. However, one of my friends I told the story to told me to tell my parents I felt scared and uncomfortable and that they should do something about it. This has lead to nothing good. My father, despite me telling him repetitively to help me live with my uncle in Montreal, tells me that I'm only exaggerating things since my brother has been, quote, "doing considerably well" after being prescribed drugs for his behavoir, and that his outbursts weren't as common as they were back then so thus I shouldn't be scared. My mother thinks I hate both him and her as I cited I was afraid of her, too. And I haven't said anything to my brother. Furthermore, I do not have much experience in francais, making me unable to live in Montreal. This sucks because I don't trust any other family members except my francophone ones. Lately on my online endeavors, I posted an ad asking for pets (a sort of RP thing), but what I really wanted was good friends. Instead, I got family, and it was the best goddamn family I've ever had. It was better than the family I'm physically living with and I'm proud to be part of that family. Unfortunately, my physical family is a lot more demanding than my RP family and so I have to do shit every day that I'm not fond of doing. Where am I now? Currently, I'm still in my home. I'm trying to get enough money to live in my own apartment and pay my own rent by the end of the school year, and I'm trying to get that money through voice acting. Unfortunately, the "professional microphone" that I have has static and thus I cannot make my voicework professional sounding. Thus, no money. I am also seeing a therapist but I have no seen her for months now. The only thing stopping me from having suicidal thoughts is my online family, which I feel like I can't live without. I'm sorry I posted this. I'm sorry I wasted your time with this shitload of a post. If anything you can report this for my complaining. [info] None [info] 1409538264
DimArtist [info] The first day was not great but not terrible. I had some cravings but nothing too severe. I used to have in the past severe cravings around Day 2. One thing I noticed it was that this morning was difficult because I always within 5 minutes when I wake up I used to smoke my first cigarette and I was pretty sad and I was not in the mood to talk to my colleagues at work. Also I was feeling sleepy, never understood why this happens every time I try to quit smoking. I was reminding myself of the mantras that Allen Carr says in his book and I was reading a list of the reasons why I am quitting. This seems to help. I am a bit afraid of the next days and I am feeling weird about changing my daily routine. Now I don't go to the smoking lounge when I take a break but to a different place and I will need some time to get used to. This is even harder for me because I am diagnosed with depression and panic attacks. Now for the Day 2. [info] None [info] 1565463091
eherwin [info] I was diagnosed with depression after losing someone very close and ended up going on medication which helped a little. Other things that helped where forcing myself to do stuff, whether it be to take a shower, go talk to somebody, whatever. Even if I didn’t feel like moving from the place I was at, getting up and moving around always helped. Having a daily routine helped, because my days have meaning instead of doing nothing all day. It may take a while for depression to go away, but it really truly does get better. Remember, when you hit your lowest point you can only go up from there.  [info] None [info] 1521422569
Semicolon_Expected [info] It's a shame that even today mental health issues are still such a new thing and there is so much we don't know.I would like to share my own personal experience, because I believe myself to be one of those few. I had a great childhood, my family loved me, I had almost everything. I was a carefree child, I didn't have that many friends, but I didn't really care, life was great! Then around the time I hit puberty my moods started going downhill, and I started to not enjoy anything anymore; I didn't want to go to school, which I use to love, read books, I even started eating less. But the thing is nothing really changed for the worse; my family still loved me just as much, and in fact I had a lot of friends! This is when I started engaging in stupid behaviors because I didn't care anymore. I even attempted suicide and I still don't actually know why. It was then I was diagnosed with depression (obviously they would) To this day, i still cope with it and I don't know how it started and why I still have it.Life right now is pretty great from the outside looking in; I do well in school, I have an SO, I have a pretty good social life, and I don't engage in "high risk activities" such as drugs anymore. In essence, the onset of depression led me to a downward spiral rather than the other way around. In all honestly, I wish I had a reason to be depressed because it means I can fix it without taking medicines that have weird side effects. This is one of the reasons I feel the misconception that all depression comes from an unhappy situation is so damaging, because it's almost blaming someone for continuing to be depressed since if it comes from coping with a situation, they just aren't trying hard enough to get over whatever it is they have to get over and sometimes there is nothing to get over. It also makes it seem like depression so simple as someone can "just get over it" which doesn't help anyone.Sorry for the TL;DR [info] None [info] 1420486742
7-SE7EN-7 [info] I had one of those lying in bed before I was diagnosed with depression. I was 15 and wasn't used to the lack of free time that came with being on a team. I realized how pointless it was to repeat the exact same schedule every day for such an extended period of time. A few months later I went to a psychologist and was prescribed bupropion [info] None [info] 1387251886
RadicalLocke [info] Hey OP, I'm sorry to hear that you are going through a rough time.I definitely agree with the other users on making a routine, finding hobbies, etc. but I understand that it is easier said than done. I was diagnosed with depression a while back, and I find that exercise has been a huge help. Maybe it's the release of Endorphin? I don't know for sure but the only time I feel "normal" is right after a run.Including a workout in your routine will give you something to focus on as well as giving you a sense of wellbeing from the hormones released. Once your "mood" improves, you can start thinking about other changes you might want to make. Maybe finding a new hobby or meeting new people just might be what you need to get back on track! It's hard to think clearly when you're feeling shitty.PM me if you need someone to talk to. [info] None [info] 1527663195
warmramses [info] 18 year old male, alcohol has finally lost its grip on me. I’ve been drinking exessively since I was 15. At one point I would body 10 shots easily everytime I went out. Once college came, I drank everyday for 8 months. I was diagnosed with depression 6 months ago as well as alcohol use disorder. I had withdrawl symptoms, especially hallucinations for a while too. That was awful, terrifying, and damaging. Every weekend I relapsed, I felt it was only a matter of time before I had a seizure. It’s almost miraculous that I’ve been sober without cravings. I have literally no desire to drink. I’m free. I thank God, a Catholic seminarian I know, and my psychiatrist. My friends are still all steeped in alcohol use, one of them is severely depressed. Please pray for them. I’m so glad I beat this while I’m young and the damage I’ve done to my body and mind can mostly heal. The posts on this thread helped me a lot. God bless you all, fight the good fight. [info] None [info] 1561525268
intoxicatedbarbie [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 14. Still have it! [info] None [info] 1568662394
Appropriate_Mine [info] I'm 45, I was diagnosed with depression 20 years ago. I am slightly better than I was back then thanks to medication. [info] None [info] 1554381498
catsancats [info] New symptoms after 6 years? Not sure if this is the place to post this or not but I'm just looking for someone who can relate and maybe share their experience? I was diagnosed with depression young (15) and have been managing with medication and therapy (I was on varying doses of sertriline/Zoloft until 2 months ago when I switched to escitalopram/Lexapro) for 6 years now. I've been experiencing worsening and new symptoms however, which is why I switched medications but I'm still having symptoms. I've been feeling increased loneliness and moodiness like I've never felt before and I don't know why. I was fine managing my mental health the way I was but it's like as soon as I get comfortable it has to pop back up again. Does anyone else who has been dealing with mental health issues for a while now feel this way? Like you can't escape or even get comfortable with your illness? [info] None [info] 1500877707
destroymysweatr [info] I'm not sure who I am, who I am supposed to be, or who I even want to be. (25/m) This could end up being a long one, I don't know yet. So strap in!I've worked quite a handful of dead-end jobs. I flunked out of college because I quit caring and now owe them too much money to go back. And even if I do pay them back, I have to pay out of pocket for my tuition until I get my GPA above a 2.0. Ouch. It sucks, because I know EXACTLY what I want to do, but don't have the resources to go back to school. So wander on in the limbo that is pennies above minimum wage, I will.I have a five year old son. I'm not with the mother anymore, and I've struggled staying consistent in his life. I see him once or twice a week, if that. I love him so goddamn much, but I simply don't know HOW to be a dad. We play video games together, go to the park, go for walks, play with his toys, wrestle, watch Pokemon together, and we both love every second of it. But when it comes to actual discipline, teaching, mentoring, I am simply lost. I'm lost because I don't have those qualities in myself. And it breaks my heart every fucking day. He's actually cried when he saw me crying because he wishes he could spend more time with me, and I feel like the biggest piece of shit.And then I see my friends. The ones who have graduated from college, the ones who have moved away from here, the ones who are really quite happy with their lives. This place fucking sucks. I want to move to Pittsburgh. Or Virginia. Or New York. I want to move away, get myself established and build myself up. But I can't leave my son behind. I won't. As little as I see him, I love the crap out of him. I want to be in his life. I want to be a positive influence because he's surrounded by so much negativity and stupidity on the other side of his family. But he needs a happy, whole, and structured father in his life. Not this man-child he has now.I don't exactly know what I need to do. I've been diagnosed with depression and I've struggled with it for ten years. I don't have insurance so I can't get back on therapy and medication. When I was, I was a boss. I had my stuff together. I was motivated. Also, my younger sister was diagnosed with Aspberger's a long time ago and I've always wondered if I have it as well. I don't know if that's hereditary or what, but I've shown a lot of symptoms of it.I'm not exactly NOT motivated right now. I just feel like there's no getting out of this situation. In the meantime, I've moved back home with my dad and I'm paying off a crap ton of debt. I'm hoping to be One Hundred Percent debt free by January. That would be awesome. But then what? I don't fucking know.I want to move away. But I can't. I want to be in my son's life. But I suck at actual parenting. The kid starts kindergarten this week. That just breaks my heart. I've wasted so much time.Let's hear it. I'm open for whatever criticism or advice you guys have for me. [info] None [info] 1409350097
helps_using_paradox [info] I know its something you may not say, in my experience, simply saying this to my clients has allowed them to get out of the vicious cycle of feeling depressed, feeling depressed about being depressed, and feeling depressed because other say that they should feel better.  It opens a possibility for a world where depression isn't a *thing* that happens to them or that their brain is *broken*.I was diagnosed with depression and have been free of it for almost 5 years now. *Being undiagnosed is one of the best feelings ever*  It is one of the reason I became a therapist in the first place.  [info] None [info] 1453376425
c_marier [info] Here's my take on it - I started cutting during a point in high school that I was experiencing emotional abuse.  Everything was being controlled for me - how I dressed, how I was supposed to act, who I was supposed to hang out with, curfews etc. etc.  Cutting was the only thing I could control (also had issues with restricting food back then).  Also it was a way of physically acknowledging the emotional pain I was experiencing and that I was not allowed to express.Since then, I've been diagnosed with depression and on/off meds.  When I cut now (less and less often, thank God), it's sometimes due to this being a reflexive habit of dealing with emotional issues.  Sometimes I feel so sad and stuck that I need to knock myself out of it and cutting sounds like a good option.  Sometimes I actually crave it - the feeling of being in complete control when it comes to my body and by extension myself.Also the act itself of harming yourself releases endorphins and adrenaline as the body's way of trying to rush relief to combat the alarm.  If this is your only way of getting serotonin (for example, if you're depressed), then it can quickly become a crutch.  Even without serotonin thrown in there, it's easy to become addicted to the easy access to endorphins and adrenaline.  Bam.  Science.  What up.Hope that helps a bit. [info] None [info] 1435121695
karlrowden [info] &gt;Back in the 1990's I was diagnosed with depression. I was literally just angry about some unpleasant life circumstance.So you should hate psychiatry because they slapped label on you, not invalidate people who can't work or care about their loved ones because they can't function, and hate themselves *because of it*.&gt;Now the word "depression" has a different criteria. What you are describing was not what I experienced when I was given that label.It has the same criteria, it's just that psychiatry overdiagnoses it and makes it worse instead of helping, which we all agree on. It's like having a broken leg and being given painkillers instead of mending it, of course it's bullshit. You enemy is psychiatry, not people who have depression.&gt;If its anything like my own life it has to do with not having enough personal power (if that means social, financial, freedom).What you're describing looks like range of normal emotions still. It's not depression. I'd agree with everything you are saying if that'd be definition of it, but as I said it's not that.&gt;If that's not the case then what is lacking?That purely medical conditions can cause it should tell us something. Maybe people were broken in childhood just like a tree can be broken when it's small and stop being able to function. We don't know all causes, only how it manifests, and that it's not simply range of emotions. I recall reading that in developing countries people with depression don't even complain about emotions that much (and it means that emotional part might be indeed a cultural phenomena), their complaints were primarily physical. I understand that this word is abused by pharma companies and medication commercials and all that bullshit, but doesn't mean that what this word describes doesn't exist. I agree that we might need a better word. I'd use something like behavioral shutdown with possible emotional manifestations, but it looks unwieldy.  [info] None [info] 1522566590
silltz [info] I was diagnosed with depression while I was in the hospital for an injury and they even have me pills for it but I never felt depressed. After I left the hospital they didn't prescribe any sort of medication. [info] None [info] 1437022607
Gazpacho_Catapult [info] One night stand with a girl I did kickboxing with.  I found her quite attractive, but I couldn't for the life of me enjoy the sex. Tried several positions, hard/soft, fast/slow, nothing worked (and I was in the best shape of my life, I was going to fkn town on her!). I remember her riding me and all I could think about was what I needed at the supermarket. I ended up not being able to finish, which noticeably bummed her out, so I made up a story about supplements and told her it wasn't her fault, and then left (which I felt terrible about, but I was embarrassed as well).  I was diagnosed with depression 3-4 months later, was told sexual dysfunction was a common symptom, so chalked it up to that. [info] None [info] 1543992646
MeryCherry77 [info] I’m completely lost Hi. I needed to share this because I don’t know who to talk to (friends don’t understand, sadly).It’s Saturday and I’ve been in bed ALL day. I can’t bring myself to do anything. My house is very clean but my room looks like a mess. I didn’t shower even tho I know I need to, I can’t do anything else than lay in bed with my cellphone and it’s so sad for me... even if it doesn’t look like it, it’s sad to be like this. I don’t feel like doing anything, it would be the same if I had to be in bed just looking at the ceiling. I canceled a date with a guy because of this state of mind I’m having today.I was diagnosed with depression December 2017 so I’ve been taking fluoxetine/Prozac since that moment with ups and downs on the dosages, and my psychiatrist told me to lower the dose to half because he saw me in a really good state and I’m doing that but I feel so bad right now that I’m thinking to keep taking one like I used to.I’m also so tired of fighting with my mental body image. I’m a chubby girl and I hate myself so much because of it, but I can’t bring myself to do excercise. I am eating healthy tho but sometimes I don’t (like today) because of this feeling of nothingness I have.I haven’t been able to see a series, watch a documentary o read a book because I always have this feeling of “I’ll waist my time with that” but I’m actually wasting my time doing nothing. I need help. I need supportive people who know the struggle. People think I’m lazy. It’s not laziness. It’s just emptiness in your heart and mind... nothing makes me happy anymore. [info] None [info] 1569101255
daftingenuity [info] My mother was a certified substitute teacher, but in high school most of my classes were online. We basically just did school at home. The Board of Education requires monitoring and reports as to what we do education-wise. I feel like I am an educated person. I'm no genius, but I did make it to college on full scholarships. I'm currently a sophomore at a large college. Most of the time I was very unhappy. I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 16, but I haven't had any problems with it in the past year.  [info] None [info] 1352835523
Metalmaster7 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and have now gotten help. It has made things better. I still don't have a girlfriend but that's because i don't want one. ^^Or ^^at ^^least ^^that's ^^probably ^^what ^^I ^^keep ^^telling ^^myself. [info] None [info] 1371778862
slothiesz [info] [Update] I got diagnosed yesterday. It's not easy being the child of an N. Hi again everybody. I posted in here earlier in the week scared out of my wits that I may have a schizoaffective disorder. I want to say thank you and I apologize if I over-reacted a bit. My NMom always told me that people with a mental illness are bad and deserve to be institutionalized. Even when I was diagnosed with depression, she mocked me and made me feel as if I was crazy until I threw away my Lexapro. Anyways, I met with my therapist yesterday and was diagnosed with Dissociative Identity Disorder (DiD). I guess I'm still not having the easiest of times with it but I'm doing my best to accept that these people in my head are just another part of me and that's okay. I declined medication for now (not that medication is bad, I just want to get in touch with my mind) but I don't think I'll be telling my N about this. Thanks for listening/reading. [info] None [info] 1475153487
I_Love_Biscuits [info] I was diagnosed with depression at the beginning of the year, suffered from it long before. I hang out with friends, have picked up hobbies, and made my job my biggest concern. Well there lies the problem, I became obsessed with work to deal with my depression. Since then the 4 year relationship with what I thought was "the one" ended, I stopped contacting close friends, and basically became an introvert. I'm happy being alone, not bothered, or "pestered" to hang out, but at the same time I know that the reason this happens is because I'm sad and miserable. Nobody wants to be around that person who only has one thing to talk about. I'm happy and incredibly sad at the same time, it's a weird place to be.  [info] None [info] 1378695574
ItsCameronSP [info] Lost/Confused I'm currently 17, in my senior year of high school and I have no idea what I want to do with my life. I've been telling people I'll probably just go to college for marketing or some other business related field because it comes easy to me, although I don't entirely enjoy it from my experience in high school with it. I was diagnosed with depression, although I don't take my meds because I feel significantly happier without them. I just have no idea what I enjoy aside from being with friends, rap &amp; street wear culture. Any guidance or advice to help me find my way? [info] None [info] 1537926155
BmbSqd [info] I was diagnosed with depression based PTSD due to extremely high stress of disarming roadside IEDs, my dope-amine levels are out of wack.  I internalized all of my experiences high stress / traumatic events and talking out my actions, as well as having conversations with my followers seems to be relieving some of the mental pressure built up in my head.  Not really sure if this makes sense or not. Everyone handles PTSD differently.  What works for one, may not work for the other.   If your brother's PTSD is the anger route, it may not be such a good idea. [info] twitch.tv/iron_sightz [info] 1423857269
FrostedPoptart [info] Prozac dosage increased two days ago. Are these new feelings happening coincidentally or is it the new dose? I was diagnosed with depression three weeks ago and put on 10mg Prozac once a day. I hadn't noticed a different at all for three weeks. If anything the last few days up until the third week I just didn't give a shit, I had no filter with anyone basically. I could had just been having a couple bad days though.I told my psychiatrist this and three days ago she increased my dose to 20mg. Since then, I have felt better and been lot more positive and just generally in a better state of mind. But since its only been a few days Im afraid that this is coincidental and I'll feel bad again soon. Can an increase in dose do something that fast or would it take a few weeks to get in your system like it does initially?I don't believe its a placebo because obviously Im skeptical. [info] None [info] 1431747112
RayningAcid [info] As an expat, sometimes...I keep waiting for them to give me a bill.  I keep thinking if I tell them that in X year I was diagnosed with depression, that they might call it a pre-existing condition and not treat me for it.  I still have paranoia when I go.  So silly.  I'm just *waiting* for the hidden co-pay! [info] Logan 7/25/2013 [info] 1367513491
Ashes-Athanasia [info] I need your help I am currently very emotionally upset with myself. I am diagnosed with depression and go to counseling. Doctors are trying to find the right medication as my medication that worked stopped working in October. Those meds worked for a year. The reason I am upset and need to hear your responses: a friend of mine pointed out to me today that at times I am manipulative. I am suicidal and have thoughts of death. I don't right now, well besides wishing I was dead as i feel like a terrible person. I often feel like I shouldn't exist. Anyway, today, I asked if she thought anyone would miss me if I died. I asked because I wanted to feel like my existence meant something, or that I meant something to people. If it doesn't, then I am not sure why I exist and why I should continue to exist even though my faith won't let me commit suicide. She said that she would not be manipulated. I asked her husband, who is more straight forward, to tell me all the ways I am manipulative. He wants to discuss it in person. I have never threatened suicide as a means to use people like "do this or I will kill myself." Mostly, my question is if you guys get manipulative too from your drive to mean something or have your existence mean something? Do you think that maybe the doctors diagnosed me wrong and I have a personality disorder? This is my first time ever trying this kind of online thing. I don't know who to turn to. I already emailed  my counselor to see if I can see him as soon as possible. [info] None [info] 1461368459
behemoth9 [info] Does depression cause memory loss? Three years ago, I was diagnosed with depression but got better pretty quickly through therapy, it wasn't that bad of a case. I was fine for about a year when it sort of hit me again. For the past two years, I've been feeling depressed again but it's seemingly brought memory loss with it as well. For example, I can't tell you what I did this morning, I forget things all of my friends remember, what I ate for dinner last night, who some of my friends are, what I'm supposed to do tomorrow (I've actually been keeping lists so I don't forget), etc. From my limited knowledge, there's some sort of loose association between memory loss and depression so it could be that but could this be something worse? [info] None [info] 1474174464
CheapDimeStoreHood [info] Is this a comedown thing or a depression thing? So I recently got started on Adderall XR, 20mg per day. I feel totally awesome for the first few hours, but at a certain point I just start feeling depressed for no good reason at all. Stuff that seemed really fun earlier in the day now seems like a bore, chances I wanted to take turn into missed opportunities, and I again find it hard to enjoy anything at all. I have been diagnosed with depression for a long time, so I guess I’m wondering if these comedowns are related to it, if the medicine amplified the depression so to speak. If that’s the case, is there any way to mitigate those effects? I’ve been drinking a ton of water and trying to eat as normal, but things just sort of go downhill anyways. Please help me, I hate feeling this way and I don’t want to stop taking Adderall since I also have pretty bad ADHD. [info] None [info] 1561062179
BarbasPT [info] Thank you for your words.I've been diagnosed with depression last year. I was on meds but it didn't help at all.Not being motivated sucks, but being angry almost all the time is even worse. [info] None [info] 1433280099
BlueRobin19 [info] Will the diagnosis of depression as a minor prevent me from joining? Hey everyone I am 19 and currently enrolled at a community college. I have decided that joining the Marines is truly something I want to do. However when I was 15 I was diagnosed with depression by my doctor. I was on medication for about half a year. Depression was then removed from my diagnosis. I was still 15 at the time. Also when I was 17 my doctor thought I may have adhd and put me on meds for it. I was only on that for about a month and told him I did not like taking them and was able to show I did not need them and got it taken off my diagnosis. However, I shortly turned 18 before adhd was taken off my diagnosis. All of this greatly concerns me. I have been getting in shape to prepare to try to enlist. and it will be a MASSIVE blow if I wasnt able to join. What are my odds of being able to join? I heard some people say to just not mention stuff from when you were a minor. But I am not sure if that is smart. Any help would be greatly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1501097905
zxinsanebloodxz [info] I'm gonna backpack off this post, and post here, so it's at least guaranteed you'll see it: Thank you for making me smile for (what feels like) 2 years now. I was diagnosed with depression a bit before I found you. Once I found you, I started smiling daily. You deserve every subscriber you have and more. Also, another note, your Minecraft online videos were some of your funniest videos you ever uploaded, so thank you for that, and everything you've done. Especially your NV mods.  [info] None [info] 1431519459
Sacktchy [info] I don't know what to tell my parents I (17 F) am an atheist while my whole family of 5 are prodistant Christian. I stopped believing around 6th grade, that's also when I was diagnosed with depression. My whole family knows this and once my mom found out about my beliefs she dove deep into Christianity (going to o church more, reading the Bible, being more involved in church activities) at first I was made to go to youth group, Bible studies, and church, I was mad because it took away lots of my free time after school. Eventually I was able to stop going to bible study, last year I stopped going to youth group. I sometimes bring up not going to church, but my mom always says "it's family time!" Because we go out to eat after church. I have tried to compromise, I offered to make lunch or meet my family at the restaurant, but they always say no. I think I would be fine with going to church if I had a choice, but I don't. My parents make me, and if I don't then they threaten to take away my phone it my laptop. This past year I've been sitting down during worship (singing religious songs) to a. Protest, and b. Not worship. I have also slept during the services, witch is I admit, a bit rude. 2 weeks ago my dad told me to stand up during worship or he'd ground me. His reasoning was "it's rude to the the band and it's disrespectful to him." So I walked out of the sanctuary. For context the band cannot see me because of the stage lights that are nearly blinding, I think my dad just wants to look good in front of everyone. Since I sat outside if the sanctuary last week I figured I would sit out this week to, since it's my only way to protest without being mean to my parents (besides this we get along really well). I thought I could get some summer homework done instead of wasting my time in a sermon and I actually did get a lot done today. My mom came out and asked me why I wasn't in the sanctuary and that I was being disrespectful. I told her that I didn't want to go in because I didn't believe and if they didn't respect my lack of belief then I wouldn't respect theirs (though I've never said anything to them about their religion, personally I think it's fine for others to believe in a God, it helps. But I just don't and that's ok) after church we went out to eat as usual and my dad brought up the whole sitting outside the sanctuary thing, he told me that I was very disrespectful and that I was basically slapping them in the face. I couldn't control myself and started crying quietly, whenever my dad even raises his voice slightly I start to bawl. They kept asking me why I was so offended by their religion that I had to sit down during worship and sit outside of the sanctuary. Why I couldn't just spend one hour a week sitting next to them listening to something I don't believe in. I'm stumped honestly I just don't want to go to church, I like the free time in the weekend and I like to sleep in especially during the school year where I already have to wake up at 6am every morning. Not to mention I recently just got a job so I will have even less free time once school starts up. I love and respect my parents and I'm greatful for what they do for me, but I just don't want to go. I probably sound childish, I don't know. Can someone help me out here? Tell me if I'm doing something wrong or what I should say? My dad wants me to tell him why I don't sit with them. Sorry this post was so long, thank you for getting this far. Bye. [info] None [info] 1564338492
NeilHelf_ow [info] I fucked up. I don't see a point anymore My whole life has been a big depressive episode. I was diagnosed with depression a while back which confirmed my belief but nothing happened anymore. I have a horrible relationship with my family. I have very little friends and am all around in a shit situation. I have a couple of friends but 2 more specifically close friends. I broke both of their trusts today and I don't think I can go back to them now. I don't see any point in being alive anymore. I've been sitting at my desk cutting my arms for the last half hour [info] None [info] 1569449087
fading__blue [info] When I was diagnosed with depression, I didn’t want or need the people around me to “be strong”. I wanted to know that they had people to talk to about their fears and concerns, and that this wouldn’t end up destroying them.You obviously love your partner, and are trying to do everything you can to help him. But don’t forget to take care of yourself too. He knows this is hurting you; he needs to see that you’re finding a way to cope with what’s happening. [info] Asshole Aficionado [15] [info] 1566250246
Narcissism23 [info] A new chapter of my life. Hello all,I've had a really good day today. I wanted to share it with you all because I feel I am finally making the steps towards beating my depression.After a recent break up, today was the day I finally realised how toxic my ex was.We wanted to plant vegetables in our planter outside. She wanted parsnips so I made sure I found the seeds. She never watered it. I always did. I gave up because she showed no interest. She wanted something but didn't want to work for it. When I raised this she got very defensive. We had a cat, she brought with her when she moved in. It was a present she got from her Dad and step mom. We let him go outside and he got ticks and fleas. We had to bug bomb the house twice and wash him twice before I took him to the vet and got his vaccinations and spot on treatment. She never went to pick up the top ops for it. I always went. Again, she liked having the cat but not the responsibility of caring for it.Doing washing up, I would be standing in front it the cupboard under the sink. If she wanted something out of it, she never said excuse me. When I raised this with her she flew off the handle. How hard is it to have manners? The first time I was diagnosed with depression, I went in search of all the help I could get. I took the medication, I paid for private counselling. I did everything I could to get better. When she got a diagnosis of depression to, she refused the medication and didn't search for any help. She got on a waiting list for telephone counselling but never follow it up. I put all I could into trying to tackle the way I had been and get better, she never did. Instead she kept a hidden stash of painkillers ready for overdose if she needed it. I couldn't find them and felt held hostage to prevent that happening. I felt that if I expressed my feelings to her, it would end in an arguement. My feelings were being held hostage too. I talked to her ex before me. He received exactly the same treatment. I realised now that she had no capacity to change. Didn't want to take responsibility for anything. Wanted to take but never earn it.I am done with her and ready for the new chapter of my life. Wish me luck! [info] None [info] 1562882954
Kitchen_Moose [info] I'm 14. I was bullied by old classmates last school year. I was diagnosed with depression about two weeks ago. I was discharged from the psychiatric hospital one week ago. I went on a walk about three days ago, and I happened to see them as I passed by. One of them caught up to me on a scooter. Lucky for me, they never liked to be physical, and I knew more than likely I was going to be harassed to try and make me and easy target again. They asked what I'd been doing for the past month. I said "therapy" they asked "Why?" I simply said "depression" They responded with "That shit is fake. grow up." On the bright side, I'm now going to a different school then them, and the kids there seem much nicer. [info] 14 [info] 1565406535
Arrow156 [info] I kinda get that. I was diagnosed with depression at 10, was on meds for awhile but I didn't notice any difference except for a few bad reactions. Whenever I have a real shitty day my thoughts turn to death, maybe no so much suicide but just the longing to no longer exist.  Often I just feel so tired of merely existing, the day to day grind and the complete lack of meaning behind it all.  I see death and the cease of my existence as a relief, like the feeling of finally sleeping after days of being awake.  I've had these feelings for decades, it's now just a part of who I am. I don't worry that I'll ever commit suicide or put myself in danger or anything like that, I lack the energy to do anything; I just have no motivation, to live or to die. Anyway, the way I see it I just need to patient, death will take me eventually so I just gotta wait it out.  [info] None [info] 1351310248
mkb1208 [info] Nothing too excited. A family member took his own life, I struggled greatly my first semester away at college, and I was diagnosed with depression. Hoping the depression was only seasonal I weened off the medicine (doctor's idea), but it came back. Coping with the loss of a loved one in perhaps the most horrible way and accepting that I need medicine to enjoy life has been difficult [info] Random [info] 1467821421
leakaf [info] What do you do when you become so unmotivated? Ok so I am almost done with my degree. My GPA was almost perfect until last semester.I am not sure what happened exactly, but a bunch of events happened back to back.First I was diagnosed with depression. Then I changed thoughts about my major. I also realized that my college years are about to be over and I had not even socialized a bit. Also some other personal things happened.Halfway through last semester I suddenly gave up. My grades dropped from A’s to B’s.Now this semester did not even start well and I’m on the verge of failing two classes only because I don’t study.These are hard classes, but I am sure I can manage them. But I just don’t feel like studying. I feel like there’s a lot of pressure on me and I’d rather sit on my bed and do nothing!I need some help to deal with the guilt and maybe some help to change the state of my mind.By the way these words are coming from a student who never got a B until last semester. I’m not saying I’m smart but I think I have the potential. [info] None [info] 1583906029
sayfromage [info] I can't sleep anymore It's 5:30 in the morning and I can't sleep. I just lay awake thinking about how I used to be happy. I was diagnosed with depression in college, about 8 years ago now. I've been on medication ever since then. For a while I was happy. I was in college, college was awesome. But now I'm in the real world and I'm just so miserable I feel like giving up. After college I tried looking for work. Couldn't find anything. Went to grad school, dropped out. That was a year ago. An entire year I've been looking for work. I reapplied to school. I'll be starting in the fall, but that feels so far away. Every day I wake up with no reason to get out of bed. All I do is play video games all day. I can't leave the house. I live in nyc and all I see is people going about their lives, and it just reminds me that until August I have nothing. I am nothing. I don't even know why I'm posting this. I guess I just wanted to vent. My therapist tells me that depression isn't permanent. That people have 'beaten' it. I don't think that will ever happen for me. I've tried different medications, pretty regular therapy, trying to work out and stay active. But I'm just dead inside, I don't enjoy anything and I just wish I could go to sleep until my life actually starts. [info] None [info] 1430472674
Ink-Stains [info] I was diagnosed with depression. I've had it for years but never realized it. Now that I know I have it, I'm on medication, and I didn't realize it was possible to feel cheerful so often. I used to walk around in silence and struggle to get off the couch. Now I smile at random intervals and have caught myself singing in the shower, which I've never really done before.Edit: Realized I had a much more significant before &amp; after event than what I originally thought of. [info] None [info] 1471195375
somuchviolentglitter [info] Service dog laws in your country? Hi there, I really hope I can get some advice/help or simply somebody to talk to. I am kind of desperate already since my country has horrible laws for service dogs and their handlers, especially since they were just "legalized" 2 years ago. Cutting my story as short as possible, I was diagnosed with a hemiparesis at age 3 and was bullied for 11 years since it was very visible until I got a surgery to help with making it a bit more subtle. After this I was diagnosed with depression and panic attacks which a few years later turned out to be PTSD. My doctors and therapist suggested that I should get a service dog so I can start leaving my house again (I haven't really been out for about 2 years except for my therapy/doctors appointments, even grocery shopping is impossible for me). I have already found an amazing trainer who helped me pick out a breed and write down all the tasks we have to teach my service dog. The only thing standing between me and a service dog are the laws in my country. If you want a service dog, you need to have a disability ID (I have no idea if this exists in other countries or if it is the right translation into English). Even though my doctors say I qualify for one, the ID would bring me a lot of disadvantages (you can't get a drivers license, businesses can't fire you easily which is why they don't hire you in the beginning and insurances turn you down/drop you). So even if my dog is done with training, has an official certificate of going through training by a professional, helps with my disability and having a note from my doctor, we would be denied public access and get treated like a normal person with their pet. I just don't know what to do and if I want to invest all that time, money and training to still having no help when going outside. After all my main problem is still being in public. Is my country just weird with their laws for service dog teams or is this no exception? Is the situation better in your country and what are the service dog laws there? Thank you already so much just for reading, I really hope to be able to talk with someone here. [info] None [info] 1500765825
Thunnsar [info] Well so far I've been diagnosed with depression from it, sooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo [info] None [info] 1472024056
throw_it_lejos [info] Can somebody help me? I've had suicidal thoughts ever since I was diagnosed with depression when I was 14 years old (I turn 26 on the 30th this month). I feel like almost nothing has improved in my life either socially, professionally and all. I feel like I'm dissapointing my family everyday and my relationship with my boyfriend is starting to erode because according to him, this Just isn't real and need to try really hard to think positively. He was my rock and was trying to do everything better but I'm definitely falling behind and I feel like everything would be better if I just offed myself. I think about It hard and besides my family I don't think anyone would be too broken up about it, I've consistently fucked up all my relationships this way and can't take it anymore, I wish everything would stop and It would be easier but lately can't see through this. I feel ashamed and disgusted thinking about this but maybe it'll be for the better. If anyone could talk me out of this or has felt this way I'm here to listen. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1576402747
LiquidStrychnine [info] Well to start, I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 14/15ish, so I'm not sure if being diagnosed really matters? I don't believe they can diagnose you, either. I was sent to a psychiatrist to get evaluated and diagnosed by the recommendation of my therapist. I have no idea if that's typical or not.As for going to the therapist at your college, depending on your college, you'd just walk up to the desk and explain that you'd like to see a therapist to deal with some personal issues. The way mine worked was I went up and got an appointment set up, walked in at my appointment time, talked to him for about an hour or so, and at the end, because I explained that I have depression and really no outlet for it and what not, we set it up so I'll be seeing him every week. At my previous college I just had to fill out some forms and go in every week. No one but my therapist asked why I wanted to be there. They just assumed I had a reason and let it be.If you have specific questions, feel free to pm me and I'll answer them to the best of my ability. [info] None [info] 1409722200
Acrus_ [info] I agree, but the symptoms you listed above just aren’t the criteria, they are more examples of what someone might experience. they may be how you personally experienced this but I was diagnosed with depression but I do not meet the “criteria” you have made in your original post, I have not experienced most of the things you listed personally. I’m just saying that you implying that you need to have experienced all of that is just not completely true.  [info] None [info] 1553071328
LG93 [info] Lifting for 5 weeks since I was diagnosed with depression, noticed some stalling. Currently cutting because. Should I be eating more? /w pics [info] None [info] 1416608361
Would_YouKindly [info] More power to you! I had recently gotten more into nail art after I was diagnosed with depression, and it along with the medication keeps me going day by day.Best of luck in both overcoming your depression and enhancing your nail art skills! [info] Nail art &amp; gaming makes my money fly away [info] 1365096073
Garcity [info] Through Hell &amp; Back I just finished reading "Born Again," after some of recommended it to me.I blazed through this story faster than any comic or graphic novel I've ever read.What I just read is the very reason why Daredevil is and always will be my favorite super hero.In 2013, I was diagnosed with depression, though I'd been experiencing it since as far back as 2007. I'd been seeing a therapist since then, who helped me work through different psychiatrists as they tried to find a medication that suited me.In September 2015, I was hospitalized for a 51/50; the police were called because I was spiraling out of stability. After that, I was able to find an anti-depressant that helped give me a floor to stand on.Everything changed a year later. On September 9th, 2016, I was laid off from my job. Suddenly, I was cut off from my healthcare, and was scrambling to find a way to figure out my situation. I was able to switch to something relatively cheaper, but that didn't last long. I jumped from unemployment to temporary jobs as I worked through what has been the harshest winter of my life.As 2017 dawned, I felt like I was barely hanging on. During this time, I had reached out to my friends, who were gracious enough to be there for me. Sometimes, it was as simple as letting me lie motionless on their floor, so long as I had their company. I had little energy for much. But when my therapist informed me that she could no longer help me, I felt like I lost it.I purchased a length of nylon rope from the nearby Home Depot, which surprisingly, no one batted an eye to. I readied a stool and planned my suicide for the coming Sunday. My psychiatrist had called me to check in. I couldn't lie to her, so I tried to be as vague as I could. However, this would lead to my second hospitalization.After getting some access to meds and an evaluation from the hospital psychiatrist, I was released into my best friend's custody. I was on shaky ground for the next two months, though I was able to get another temporary job.I got as far as March when my job ended. I had hoped to gain unemployment benefits, but complications prevented that. I watched as my remaining funds dwindled in the month of April.Come May, it came to pass that I would need to leave the city I called home. I moved back in with my parents and looked for whatever work I could find. During these tumultuous months, I started reading Daredevil. I gained in interest after watching the Netflix series, which I immensely enjoyed. So I decided to started with some light ones: Yellow, Season One, but then moved into Brubaker's run. Eventually, I made my way to Mark Waid's iteration, which was very enjoyable for me. It showed me that Matt could get through adversity and still come out smiling.From May to November 2017, I jumped from a part-time job to another temp job. After waiting six months for an appeal, I was granted healthcare access again. I was able to find another therapist and psychiatrist. In short time, I got my meds again and was feeling right as rain.As December drew, my assignment with the temp job ended. But this time, I wasn't upset. I was ready. I mobilized and did what I needed to stay afloat. I've since managed to get another temp job and am working on finding stable employment.So, as I started the Daredevil Omnibus companion I was a little hesitant. I'm not much of a fan of Frank Miller's, considering he seems to have a fascination with overly-gritty tones filled with women as either prosititutes or strippers. But I was glad I was wrong about his Daredevil work. Every page I read, I wasn't just reading Daredevil's struggle, I was reading my own.I saw someone watch their life crumble before their eyes, to see themselves pushed to the deepest depths, and not only survive, but come back even stronger. There was a line that I muttered to myself while I struggled: Never Give Up. And lo and behold, a few pages into the Born Again issue, Matt talks about a lesson he never forgot: Never Give Up. Never. I'm not done with the Omnibus yet, but I'm sure I'll enjoy it. For me, Daredevil has become a personal hero of mine; in the way I'm sure he is for may of you. For me, it's not just because his name is also Matt. It's that I know what he's been through. And seeing him go through that made me feel that I can do it too. I'd only gotten back into Daredevil after a 8 month hiatus. But now, more than ever, I'm back into it. So much so, that I'm going to commission someone to make a Daredevil suit for cosplay. I want to don the red, become the hero that inspired me.For we both wenth through Hell and back. And likewise, I wouldn't have gotten through this without the help of my friends: my Karens, my Bens, my Foggies, and myself.Thanks,Matt G. [info] None [info] 1516841774
AngryLibrarian3 [info] I kinda know how you feel. I was diagnosed with depression like... 3 years ago, after feeling like an empty shell for 6 or 7 years. But now I am medicated for 2 years. I study university, have a GF, a job, many hobbies and I love my life. My point is-go talk to someone. A friend, a family member you trust, or just call a suicide hotline. They will all try to help you. I don't know where you live, but in my country, there are special psychiatry offices for urgent cases like these. Just... Don't give up yet. Try something mentioned above. I know how hard is it, but trust me, in the end it will be worth it.  [info] None [info] 1548844215
red_spooks [info] I was diagnosed with depression and Bipolar (type 1) about 10 years ago.  I've been on several medications with varying degrees of success (and total failure in one case).  Recently, one of the mental wellness facilities in town has started offering Transcranial magnetic stimulation as a treatment for depression. What do you think of this kind of alternative treatment to medication?  Is there any legitimate research behind it? [info] None [info] 1407802399
graceless95 [info] I was raised with my mother and two half-siblings. My mother is currently in her third marriage (with a plethora of boyfriends between), is a recovered alcoholic for about 4 years, and I suffer from middle child syndrome.I was sexually/physically abused by the first stepfather, though my brain has blocked most of the abuse and my childhood out. I met my biological father when I was 8, and though we have a good relationship I don't see him often. I was verbally abused by my older sister and mother for a while, even if my mother didn't realize it (and that's really the worst kind of abuse).I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12, and have been struggling with it, anorexia, and cutting for the past years (16.5yo now). My mother/family doesn't know about the anorexia. I go through periods of either, but the depression is pretty much constant. I don't really have solid friend base and my relationship with my boyfriend probably isn't going to last much longer. . . . so, that's me. [info] None [info] 1340087563
shoyu0905 [info] I was diagnosed with depression but here they wouldn’t actually send you to a psychologist, they’ll just try and talk you out of depression. I’ve had my appointments with my doc, but I don’t think he took me seriously [info] None [info] 1550917169
WithStylez [info] Writing this while crying in the bathroom at work I have no idea how or where to start. I don't want to make a post too long, but at the same time don't want to spill it all out in two sentences. &amp;nbsp;I'm 30 years old, and about 30 kg overweight. My mother died of cancer, my father is in jail. I live with my mother's boyfriend, who I have good relations with, but consider him more of a roommate than any sort of a family related. I've been diagnosed with depression and even took meds. I've been feeling up &amp; down with or without them, so I stopped taking them as there wasn't any significant correlation with my mood. I wake up, go to work, go home to watch TV or sit on the computer, hoping someone's online to play games with, or that one of my favourite twitch streamers is online so I can watch them until I fall asleep. &amp;nbsp;I feel tired, I feel lonely, I hate everything about myself, mainly the fact that I can be very emotional, and even that I feel like this right now, crying my eyes out while I should be working instead. It makes me sad and I hate myself even more for that because, there are people that have a lot less and are in a lot worse situations than me.&amp;nbsp;I have nobody to talk to. At work I am surrounded by strangers who I greet twice a day and thats about it. I work alone, eat lunch alone. Outside of work I have a few 2-3 good friends I try to spend most of my time with, but they usually dont have time as they used to. There were more of us, maybe 6 or 7 but as we got older, our lives changed... at least their lives did... Now I can't even get 2-3 people together at the same time to do something. We had troubles playing a single game together, because the usual max number of players was around 5. Now we all end up playing a different game, because we can't reach a minimum of 3 players required for most games we used to play.&amp;nbsp;That's where my problems start... I simply can't do anything alone. I don't want to do anything alone, because I feel terrible afterwards. I can't motivate myself to do something alone. I love going to the cinema but very often, even if there's a movie I'd love to see, if I can't find anyone to go with me, I simply don't go, just so I don't feel bad because of it, so I don't feel like a reject, like a failure, that I was unable to find at least ONE person to go with me... I rather pay for my friend's movie ticket, or sit next toa stranger, just so I don't have the feeling of being there. Same with computer games or concert tickets or basically everything in my life. Last month I bought a coloring book, not because I wanted to, but because one of my friends bought it as well and told me it's fun and that I should give it a try. I can use this example to everything that's related to me.  &amp;nbsp;My whole life I was there for others. Being there for others, friends or strangers alike, gives me purpose in life, it makes me feel valued, it makes me feel worthy of what they did and do for me... spend time with me. I feel like I need to work to deserve them as friends, because if I don't they simply stop caring. Or at least that's what I keep telling myself.&amp;nbsp;When I'm alone I don't see a point of doing anything. Go to a movie, play a game, buy something, travel ? What's the point... Whenever a friend of mine asked me if I wanted to visit other countries, go somewhere, do something I never hesitated and went for it. I had a purpose, a +1 reason to do it, to go for it, instead of just "me" which I consider a +0. Me wanting something is simply put not enough of a reason for me to do it.&amp;nbsp;I have a crush on my best female friend who I adore the most in this whole world. She is in a bad relationship. Always arguing with her boyfriend, who is one of my 3 good friends, to the point where he even hits her... He doesn't care about her and she's just a maid and a cook for him. Problem is, she tells me she'd rather stay in this abusive relationship, hoping, that he will change one day, "grow up" and start to respect her, to value her, to do everything for her, the same as she does everything for him, than to have nothing, saying she invested way too much time and energy into this relationship. &amp;nbsp;I feel so sorry for her and it breaks my heart when she thells me she is fully aware of how bad he's treating her, how unhappy she is sometimes with him, mainly because there is nothing I can do to for her... Whenever I tell her to stop doing the same thing over and over hoping for a change and that how bad he's treating her, I feel bad for her... I feel like kicking her when she's already down when I do that, even though it pains me even more hearing about how he did the same thing he always does, while she keeps doing the same, and only replies me with a sad "I know.. but I don't know what else I should do"... Everyone else told me to simply stop caring, let her do as she wants to, instead of repeating the same stuff to her over and over expecting different results (Hello Far Cry 3).&amp;nbsp;I am happy to have her as a friend, she helped me through a lot. Sometimes, even I myself can't believe how powerful a simple "i wish you a nice day", "thank you being here for me" or "text me when you get home" from her can mean to me. It hurts me whenver we're out having a great time together, with her smile that brightens my day and makes me forget everything that's wrong, only to see her leaving... with him... I hate him... even though he's my friend. I hate him for what he is, his horrible personality, how badly he behaves to other people, especially her, how greedy and selfish he is to everyone around him, how he doesn't value nobody inlcuding her and everything she does for him... but I still spend time with him, because I simply have nobody else to do with...&amp;nbsp;My past friends stopped caring about me, or at least thats what I keep telling myself. We used to meet, talk, travel, but if I dont make the first move, invite them somewhere, initiate conversations, they never do. I blame myself for that. Reason for it was that I refused meeting with them, when I was having a bad mood, just like now, and I didn't want to bother them, being a "downer", I didn't want to be a burden to them with my "problems". And even if I did, they kept repeating the same "well then do something about it" over and over and probably got tired and fed up with it... with me.&amp;nbsp;I keep telling myself they had enough of me, because of how I was, boring, sad, not happy... and that's what scares me most, whenever I meet someone new, whenever I spend time with my current friends... it scares me, that the same will happen to them, that it's just a matter of time that they'll simply leave... &amp;nbsp;I used to organize group rides on bikes, group visits to the cinema, parties in clubs, tours abroad, trips in our country, I did everything I could just so wasn't alone, just so I didn't had to be alone... and now... I don't have the energy or motivation anymore for that. I'm tired and exhausted of trying to do everything myself... of being alone...  &amp;nbsp;**TLDR: I feel sad for being alone and blame myself, my sadness for it, because nobody wants to spend time with a drag/depressed/emotionally exhausted person like me and I hate myself for being like this.** **The one person I care about the most is often the cause for my sadness, as I feel bad for her and am unable to help her in her abusive relationships in other way than being there for her as a friend.****I can't, or don't know how to force myself to do stuff alone, because I often feel worse than before due to the fact I had nobody to go with/do stuff in the first place. I'd travel the whole world and move mountains to make a person I adore smile, but I'm unable to do even the simplest things for myself.**&amp;nbsp;I thank everyone for spending the time to reading through this, I know it's a long post and I'm sorry for that. I also apologize for any grammar mistakes. [info] None [info] 1484564901
AB49K [info] Time to debunk.A few years ago, I was diagnosed with depression, at the time I never left the house, I ate exclusively takeaway chicken/chips and coke. my weight ballooned, I was alone and depressed/bordering on suicidal.Then it was one point I got asked to leave the unit I was in and I said enough was enough, I got a job within a week as a battery tech (that was fun) on top of that I was cleaning up and moving out, but every day I was working, getting to the unit, working until 1-2am, sleeping for 5 hours, waking up and getting back into it for a few hours before work, all while suffering depression.After I moved out I started walking, (not to lose weight, I was still eating *waay* too much, I weighed just close to 300lb) but to keep my ass moving and not fall back into a depression.It's really not about motivation, or foods available, It's about taking control, and owning up to the shit you do. Waking up every day, feeling the depression hit you in the face and still just power on through it, because you know you can beat it.Stop making excuses./shitlord out. [info] Known Troll [info] 1441756781
EquisC [info] I was diagnosed with depression in 7th grade and am now a senior in college.I have honestly never seriously contemplated suicide and a lot of people are confused by that because most people equate depression with suicide.  I do however go through periods of extreme apathy which is sometimes a struggle for a college student. I don't care enough to get out of bed, shower, eat, or take care of myself. Even on good days I'm pretty bad at taking care of myself. What keeps me going is knowing that I have people who I truly care about and who care about me. If I let myself fall into that apathetic pattern it isn't just neglecting my own needs but also letting those people down and to paraphrase something my mom once said when she found out my boyfriend didn't wear a helmet when riding his motorcycle,  "It's disrespectful not to take care of yourself when someone truly cares about you". [info] None [info] 1397445931
Puite [info] "He (the man she cheated on me with) said that depression isn't even that hard to deal with."We were divorced 2 days after I was diagnosed with depression, because she 'didn't want to take care of someone' (her husband) the rest of her life. [info] None [info] 1565700719
izzyjubejube [info] How do you cope with bad things from your past? Throughout my early teens I dealt with a lot of emotional and physical abuse from my school peers. I don't want to go into much detail but some instances were pretty bad. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 14.I'm just entering my 20's, I have amazing friends now and a good support system, but as of late, the thought of all the hate I got as a youth has been following me around and the feelings of thinking I deserved horrible things to happen to me have been hanging over my head. I feel very stuck, and very lonely. It's been a hard few months.What was your experience in working past difficult baggage? How has it affected your relationships now, both platonic and romantic? How long did it take to get better? [info] None [info] 1415849789
ichorren [info] My own mom. She used to spank me when I was a kid when she got angry at me for being a kid. Anything from not practicing my violin to not wanting the furniture in my room moved around—if it made her mad, she would spank me. It was never to teach me a lesson, always to let her anger out. She went from using her hand, to a slipper, to a wooden spoon, which hurt the worst. My dad was usually at work when it happened, but when he was home he had to literally pull her off of me several times. It got really bad once when she took a broken metal broom handle (so without the bristles on the end) and tried to break down my bedroom door, which I had locked because she was trying to spank me. My dad came home and was watching her like a hawk for the next several months. You can still see the cracks and dents. If I was older, I think I would have called CPS, but I was only seven or eight, and didn’t know there was a place I could call. Later, she claimed I was threatening suicide and she was trying to break in to save me, which was bullshit. (I was diagnosed with depression later, but I wasn’t suicidal at that age).I’m nineteen now and still live with my parents, but my mom continues to disrespect me and ignore my needs, I’m glad I have a dad and fianceé who can support me. Needless to say, I have almost no relationship with her now aside from small talk. [info] None [info] 1516253780
MHimo3 [info] "my mum" tells me you're English. I am too, my name's Matt. Pleased to meet you. I was 22 when I was diagnosed with depression (right after uni). Realistically though I have definitely had it since my early teens; something I recognise now but was too far in denial/listening to my family at the time. Adults tend to dismiss young people like yourself as you mentioned. But you are definitely not too young at all. It was very hard for me to tell my family. They're small C conservative - Labour voters but with attitudes stuck in the past. I reached out initially to a doctor and later to a professional counsellor. The sad fact is that the NHS is so badly overstretched the Mental Health services they offer are decades behind America; when I was initially diagnosed the waiting list for 6 sessions with a counsellor was 9 months.I went private, which was expensive. But now I feel much better.Maybe you should take a trip to your doctor and talk about how you feel. They will listen and proscribe medication if appropriate. Also as you're under 18 your prescriptions will be free so mum and dad need never find out.Best of luck. If you have questions please ask - don't suffer in silence. [info] None [info] 1465385055
5thEditionFanboy [info] Not sure if my parents are emotionally abusive or not Title says it all, as far as questions. This isn't a "should I call the police" situation, I just want some input on whether their behavior is healthy and normal. My parents have always been very controlled, and I've always accepted that its somewhat normal, despite all of my friends parents being more lenient/forgiving/accepting, etc. A few years ago I was diagnosed with depression, and since then they have surveilled me near-constantly, in what I hope is a misguided attempt at helping me. They've forced me into many therapist appointments and hospital visits, even once calling the police (my father works for the department, so many of them are his friends) to force me to be institutionalized (unnecessarily, and without any positive outcome for me). They limit time on pretty much everything I do, don't let me keep a computer in my room, they shut down our internet after 10PM, and anything I "own", they claim to own, as its in their house, their reasoning has always been "If you're under 18, you have no rights other than to be fed and not physically abused". I came out as bisexual recently, and immediately upon learning, they demanded an immediate Skype conversation with my boyfriend where they asked him personal questions without any formal introduction, or even illusion of respect or care for him. They assured me that this was normal, and that they were just looking out for me, but I doubt it. Their homophobia has not only caused me to drift away from their religious and political views (which has resulted in many shouting matches with my father after I make a comment about ICE, capitalism, or any of many current political issues), but also has made me aggravated constantly, and in lieu of a healthy way of venting it (since they don't tolerate any steps out of line), its caused some relationships with my friends to become toxic, as well as essentially destroying my relationship with my boyfriend of almost a year (same one they terrorized almost 6 months ago). I've always assumed (or hoped, rather) that this was just "teenage angst" and "a phase" and all the shit they told me, but I don't know if I believe it anymore.Quick edit: if something isnt going my dad's way, he'll often call me "loser" "punk" "idiot", or accuse me of having a persecution complex, anything demeaning in regards to brainpower or intelligence/wisdom, just thought that might also be a tad relevant in someone's analysis [info] None [info] 1566449877
I-Am-The-SquidQueen [info] Is it possible to feel sad when you are depressed I am diagnosed with depression.  I guess I'm asking this because most of the online community describes depression as numbness, but that's not my experience with it.  Sure, I feel numb a lot of the time.  I don't have the drive to get out of bed or go to classes or work, and I drag myself through each day like a robot, but... I'm *sad.*  So damn sad.  For no reason.  Sometimes I can forget about it for a little while but it all culminates every few hours or so and hits me all at once, and I shut down completely and just cry for awhile.  I feel like my illness isn't "legitimate" because of this.  Maybe I'm just a crybaby and need to get over it, the sadness means I'm not *really* depressed so I shouldn't be wasting the resources that people with more severe issues need.  I'm afraid to seek help for it - I'm afraid I'll be turned away or disregarded because other people have it so much worse than I do [info]  [info] 1520655933
Jiml0rd [info] This whole album is really personal to me and id like to share my story. I was diagnosed with depression around august of 2013 and i had no idea how to deal with it, then i found this album. I listened to it all the way through and i actually cried over how much this speaks to me. It didnt stop playing off of repeat for the rest of the day and whenever im feeling really alone or really depressed i listen to this album and and i start to feel myself again.  [info]  [info] 1391487062
TheBeastAtTanagraa [info] I am a woman and I have ADHD-PI and I've been diagnosed with depression twice. The second time I was diagnosed with depression I was actually trying to find a new psychiatrist to restart my ADHD treatment and the doctor completely ignored it and instead wanted to focus on the depression. I've read enough to know that that women are often overlooked as having ADHD and are treated merely for the depression which is often considered to be  a symptom of the overlying ADHD. Because I knew all of that I didn't let this deter me and instead I found a different doctor who actually met my needs. [info] None [info] 1501059919
AliceHouse [info] I was diagnosed with depression. I have no healthcare to see a therapist. I have no income. And the funky thing about depression? It makes it so you don't want to better yourself.Oh sure, you might be able to out lift me, or outspend me, but let's have a lay in bed for as long as possible contest.  [info] None [info] 1360259617
hellothere749 [info] Can depression effect your ability to orgasm? I know that antidepressants can cause various types of sexual dysfunction, but I'm not on any so I'm mostly curious about just depression. Google only pointed me towards articles involving antidepressants.Extra info for anyone that's curious, I've been diagnosed with depression and a few other mental health disorders for years, but I don't have any physical health problems that I'm aware of. My depression has grown worse these past few months as I've also dealt with multiple deaths, but the main point is I've basically always been depressed and the inability to orgasm is new. I do have a sex drive, it's lower than it was a few months ago, but it's still there. I never had an issue orgasming before, in fact I usually orgasm quite quickly and easily. Like when self serving, I can be done in less than a minute. I've occasionally had an issue with becoming extremely depressed immediately after an orgasm, but now it's that I just don't orgasm at all (whether it's with a partner or myself) and then I feel more depressed and like a failure. I guess I'm just wondering if this is normal, likely due to the depression, or if I should be trying harder to find the cause. [info] None [info] 1581927736
victorthepenguin [info] Long and inconsistent.I started architecture school in 2007. At around 2011 I was diagnosed with depression due to the feeling of constant failure. I dropped out for a while. In 2013 I came back to finish in another school. I had to drop out again in 2014. In 2016 I came back to finally finish. In the best mind place I've ever been. Still was a struggle. Still failure triggers deep rooted memories and negative emotions. As of right now. I finished all my classes last month and all I have left is my graduation project due to June-July. [info] None [info] 1551186434
mary_watts [info] I have depression, can you recommend a book for me please? Hello, everyone. I used to read a lot. My favorite authors are Orwell, Kafka, and Haruki Murakami. I really love their works and used to read them everyday.Last February I was diagnosed with depression. I am a lot better now. I can normally function in my everyday life, and I am gaining back my interests in painting and running, However, I find it hard to finish a book. I decide not to read anything stressful (like Orwell, Kafka, or Murakami lol), but I find it boring half way to any book. Can someone please recommend me a good book? Something not too heavy but enjoyable. (I don't like romance tho)Thanks in advance :D [info] None [info] 1574412613
gorkx [info] " Are you looking to add kava to a regimen of anti-depressants and therapy  " &lt;-this BUT before I do I wanted to ask if that'd even a good idea!   I have been diagnosed with depression.  You nailed with depression. It's really hard for me to say with any certainy what triggers a depressive episode.  Basically I thought since I tend to like heady, and balanced heady leaning kinds. Before getting some to ask if anyone knows if that'd  good idea, or if it'd help.  Thanks for the thoughtful reply  to. [info] None [info] 1566091022
skyfreeze113 [info] I have dropped 400 mmr, 4.2k straight down to 3.8k mmr. I was diagnosed with depression. Help me. [info] (4.2k) Even the Arsenal Magus falls before my magic. [info] 1506423762
intensely_human [info] I've been diagnosed with depression. I took meds for depression for a long time. Also went through a whole bunch of therapists and psychiatrists because I was using cheap government provided care and was being switched constantly from one therapist to another.  As for FTF it's intermittent and random.  Shortest I've ever done between rounds is 1 week.  Longest is six months or more, but that's more laziness than deliberate choice. [info] male over 30 [info] 1550138545
LadyShuffie [info] Rollercoaster Is it normal for me to feel like a roller coaster? I'm diagnosed with depression and am taking a full dose of effexor, but I'm going through recent bouts of extreme, unwavering confidence and detrimental, pitiful lows of suicidal tendencies. I can feel one way for days to weeks.Im successful at work, very successful, especially when I'm feeling confident, but it is difficult when I'm low.I guess I just want and expect some normalcy. [info] None [info] 1581225148
Vauldr [info] I'm so sorry you are feeling that way!I'm diagnosed with depression, but I've found that wedding planning has helped me TREMENDOUSLY.  However, I'm still over a year out, so the financial burden hasn't hit yet.  Everything is still in the 'fun' stage of making decisions, where I don't have to implement them yet but I get to be creative.  Making my guest list?  Felt like 2,000 bricks were lifted off my shoulders.  I'm enjoying things now, and hoping to get things out of the way before it flips.Is there anyone else with this experience?  I'd love to hear your thoughts! [info] None [info] 1551121221
hauntedmosaic [info] Yup it's all I've been doing since I've been diagnosed with depression (3 months now). I'm going back to college in Feb but I don't feel like I'm ready. I'm only going ahead with it because it's something that should be done. How I'll perform academically is another issue. In many ways, I feel like I'm giving a chance to life, to give me life, if that makes any sense.  [info] None [info] 1452554662
Vanillexhope [info] Had a Breakthrough I've been diagnosed with depression for about 20 years, but some also say Bipolar 2. I have some 'episodes' where I'm super depressed. I'm in what I would consider the worst of recent memory. My husband wants to move us to Bolivia for 3-6 months. I don't want to go and it's causing strain on the marriage. I came into therapy today explaining that I'm so depressed that I can't even properly support my husband and his needs right now (he really needs support from his wife on this move and also our future). We've been talking about possible divorce ever since this Bolivia talk came up.      It hit me hard when she pointed out that maybe it's not that my depression is simply affecting how I'm responding to the situation but that the situation is affecting my depression. I know that seems obvious now, but it was still big. And then she said, "It sounds like you are facing a huge decision -- move to a country that you don't want to, or face divorce which means losing your 16 year relationship." Then it hit me -- yeah. That's true. I've been suicidal for the past couple weeks, I couldn't bring myself to tell her that but I know she understands that I'm at my lowest I've been since we started over a year ago. But it makes sense -- I'm facing moving to this country temporarily or what feels like a death in my life -- losing my best friend and life I've made.   I thought my depression and this move were completely unrelated. I guess that's why I pay her the big bucks to make connections that seem obvious after the fact. [info] None [info] 1533581614
marc2377 [info] Tinnitus louder when opening mouth - does that mean the cause is Temporomandibular joint dysfunction, or not necessarily? Hi.I am diagnosed with depression and ADHD, and have had tinnitus for about 8-9 years now (that I remember). For the longest time, I linked tinnitus to depression in my case, since with some medication it appears to get better with time, while other meds make it worse. It also appears to be related to how anxious I feel and how well I sleep.**However**, I recently found I have bruxism (sometimes during the day, sometimes at night), and possibly TMJD as well. I found my tinnitus gets much louder when I open my mouth or yawn. I do have pain on the temporomandibular muscles on most days. My upper and lower jaws don't quite fit, and as a result, my teeth don't tipically sit in a well rested position.**What I'm wondering** is just how likely it is for tinnitus to worsen (momentarily) when someone opens their mouth, and still their tinnitus NOT be related to TMD or bruxism.In other words: if T gets louder when opening mouth, is it a surefire sign the cause is TMD?Note: I'm 25 and for all I know my hearing is quite fine and always has been.&amp;#x200B;Thanks [info] None [info] 1570507182
chaoticmessiah [info] God, other than the fractals, that sounds like me to a tee. Like, I was diagnosed with depression 14 years ago but I knew that couldn't just be it because of all the other stuff you mentioned that I also experienced but never mentioned it because I just thought it was normal. [info] None [info] 1456031797
tamingthemind [info] 4 months. I was diagnosed with depression and broke it off because I felt I would be unavailable for a long time. In retrospect, it was a good decision, because we were not compatible.  [info] Female [info] 1476889254
Sassypants775 [info] Thank you for sharing. I understand how you feel, I was diagnosed with depression at a young age. I'm glad to see that you want to get better. The hardest part for me was taking the first step towards getting help. Keep trying, NEVER GIVE UP! My inbox is always open if you want to chat, or just straight up vent. 🙂 [info] None [info] 1574983546
KeyofDestinyXVIII [info] Everything is overwhelming. My depression has returned. HARD I was diagnosed with depression several years ago. I managed to overcome it at the time but it has returned with a vengeance. I feel hopeless, everything feels empty and pointless. I have lost all motivation and drive to do well, even though I was a top student at my high school. I thought I would enjoy where I am attending, but it turns out I hate it. It's in NYC and the building is tiny and feels so cramped. I've lived in NYC my whole life but I've realized I can't stand being in Manhattan(Where my school is located). Even though I live in NYC, I went to high school in Port Washington, Long Island and it's pretty difficult getting used to the city again after going to a town where I could actually breathe fresh air. Many of the things that I found enjoyable now feel completely vapid and uninteresting. Every morning I just want to stay in bed and every night I cry myself to sleep. Last time I felt like this was 3-4 years ago. At times the pressure and workload feels so overwhelming I have seriously considered ending it all, the only thing keeping me from doing it is my family and knowing how horribly my death would affect them. Should I drop out?Should I take a gap year to get my bearings straight and then return? Should I transfer to a school not located in Manhattan?Am I just being a whiny little bitch? [info] None [info] 1539188026
DefinitelyNotArya [info] Starting outpatient therapy tomorrow I was diagnosed with depression about 10 years ago. I had a great support group back in the beginning, but for the last 9 years I've tried various drugs, doctors, &amp; counselors. Some have helped, some haven't.My current doctor (actually a PA) has helped immensely, getting me medication that works &amp; doesn't have bad side effects. But sometimes, life's negative influences are stronger than your efforts to combat them.On Friday, my boss essentially put me on probation, handing me a performance improvement plan I have to complete or else be terminated. I've not had a good relationship with my boss, and this has been the cause of most of the stress in my life over the past couple of years. Friday's meeting was the final straw.I spent the entire weekend depressed, crying, feeling tired &amp; having constant intrusive thoughts. I went to see the PA on Wed. in hopes she could tell me some way to combat this, either by changing my meds or who knows what. When I was honest with her about the direction of my thoughts this past weekend, and previous bad episodes I'd had over the last few months, she asked me to sign a document promising not to hurt myself and immediately referred me to the mental health wing of the nearby hospital (literally right behind her office) for an outpatient assessment.After meeting with the assessor, they admitted me to the program. I begin tomorrow. It will take 10 days and, as much as I am not looking forward to facing the crud clogging the pipelines in my brain, I am looking forward to not going to work for 2 weeks. Considering the things I was imagining doing to avoid having to go back to work, I guess I got off easy.So I'm here tonight finishing work for my boss so he can't complain I didn't finish things properly before I left. I'm hoping the outpatient therapy will finally give me the courage and confidence to look for a new job. [info] None [info] 1488501761
Dissentient [info] I have been diagnosed with depression by reddit today for saying that I don't like working. [info] None [info] 1568149594
throwaway812567 [info] How did you deal with the prescription part? I've been diagnosed with depression and I was on medication, but it's been a long time since I've been to the therapist. [info] None [info] 1570903674
orgyofnerdiness [info] Background: I'd been seeing a psychiatrist for 5 years. At 13, I was diagnosed with depression and put on prozac, and at 16 I was diagnosed with eating disorder NOS. My family life is fairly shitty, and my psychiatrist was aware of this. My first semester of college, I became friends with someone who has ADHD. She was like me: mediocre grades in high school, really high ACT score, always considered smart but "not living up to her potential." Everything she said about what ADHD is like just clicked with me. She had gotten diagnosed her first year in college. A lightbulb went off in my brain. After a lot of reading, I was certain I had ADHD.I went to the school psychiatrist and explained this. He told me that they won't diagnose you with ADHD there because of all the med seeking behavior, and didn't really seem to believe me. Granted, it was the first time he had met me and a lot of college students do that.I then told my mom I thought I had ADHD and wanted to talk to my psychiatrist about it. My mom was open to the idea, and I went in to see my psychiatrist over Thanksgiving break when I was home, and explained this to her. She agreed and told me that she'd considered it as a possibility with my grades in high school, but that she thought it might just be my home situation. Now that I was still experiencing the same problems in college, living in a dorm away from my family, it was more likely ADHD. She asked me some questions from a questionnaire, asked my mom a few questions about me, and then diagnosed me ADHD-PI and prescribed me Adderall that day. She said there was no point in waiting, especially since finals were coming up and she was pretty convinced it was ADHD. The Adderall worked, and all was well. That was a little over a year ago.Then this summer I decided to go in and get the testing done because my school's disability accommodations center won't accept an ADHD diagnosis without it and I needed extra time on chem and math exams. It came back definitely ADHD, but they diagnosed me combined type. I think I'm kind of on the line between PI and combined, but slightly more combined. When I first got diagnosed and prescribed Adderall in college I was 17 (I skipped a grade in elementary school). My parents are divorced and have joint custody. My mom was aware of my diagnosis and medication, but I didn't tell my father until a few months later because I knew he would disapprove.  [info] ADHD-C [info] 1389044566
remembersarah18 [info] Serious- I take this too!!! Sis it works. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12 and I've taken several different things and this one worked for me so I'm so so happy its working for you too!! You're amazing for fighting this and KEEP PANNING AND REPURCHASING HUNTY!!! [info] None [info] 1546795787
Baaaadtimesahead [info] I've been diagnosed with depression in the past, but the meds didn't mix well with my drugs so I gave up on them. The doctor also recommended I visit an ADHD specialist, but I know myself well enough to know that a steady supply of amphetamines would be a disaster, I would abuse the shit out of them. It's been so long since I was last sober that I'm not sure if the depression is due to the drug use, or vice versa. Sounds like a question for a therapist. Hopefully I can find someone specializing in addiction that doesn't just want to throw meds at the problem . [info] None [info] 1534450219
gooyouknit [info] I swore at God today. I never had a terribly religious background until I was in high school. Then when other people found drugs or alcohol to deal with the stress of life, I found Jesus. It was great, this moral therapeutic deistic belief that God wants the best for me and will give it to me. Until depression.I was diagnosed with depression 5 years ago. I went through meds, counseling, the works, and it got a little better. I learned how to manage it. But then last year, the year to end all years, happened.Up to this point I have been at a Christian University in the midwest studying to become a missionary so I could share the religion that gave me so much hope when I was younger. Now, because of depression I have all but failed out of school. Last Christmas I begged God to take this pain and misery away from me. If he could only give me a goal to work toward, I could make it through the rough times. If only he could give me a light at the end of the tunnel, I can make it through this dark night of the soul. I remember kneeling at the alter telling God, I need you to save my soul, or my body may die. Fast forward to April and here I am, driving home from a 10 hour bender cussing out God. "Fuck you," I said "I don't need you, you pompous piece of shit!" I have never been more angry, but I continued. "You promise eternal life, but your dumbass forgot to make life something I wanted to do in the first place, let alone forever." I punched the steering wheel, tears running down my face in anger at the God who betrayed me as I swore at God for the first time in my life. How can a "loving" God allow me to live, hoping every day that a semi would T-bone me, or fantasizing at work that instead of cutting fruit, I am cutting my wrists. I don't think I'm a danger to myself, because I am far to apathetic to take steps like that, but I do also believe the Elie Wiesel quote, "the opposite of love isn't hate, it's apathy." And that's now where I am at. I have turned my back on the god I once trusted, not because I don't believe, but because he can't possibly be who he says he is, and is instead, an asshole. I am on my own to forge my way through this shitty life and make something of it, independent of this god I came to know. [info] None [info] 1428300473
LittlePetiteGirl [info] She might have clinical depression? I have been diagnosed with depression and that sounds exactly like me. I stress out endlessly at school and then I just come home and collapse.  [info] None [info] 1446337713
TheOkayJasmine [info] Reddit might not be the best place to ask about this but I can’t afford counseling so... I have an issue that has been effecting me my whole life but now that I’m an adult and have a solid source of income it’s starting to be a real problem. You see, whenever a bad thing happens I will crack jokes and laugh it off and do literally whatever I can to distract myself from feeling bad about the situation, including blowing all my cash impulsively even though I have bills to pay still. Meanwhile when I good thing happens I get super anxious and depressed because I feel like I don’t deserve anything good and am worried that someone or something else is going to see that and take it away from me. I was diagnosed with depression when I was thirteen but I haven’t been on medication since I was 14. I’m just wondering if  this is a normal thing for people with (or even without) depression to do or if there is something else going on. Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1573360566
SporksFlirty [info] It in and of itself is not depression, but does cause depression, sometimes in very hefty doses.  I'm in therapy, and slowly working through things, but all things take time.  You're not sure how to help me?  That makes two of us.  An ear lent is far more useful than some might think.  I have been diagnosed with depression, but nothing else as of this moment. [info] None [info] 1505726944
MadQuixote [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was a child. When I look back at high school I can see a lot of situations where I was probably (hypo)manic. Rapid cycling hit in college when a bunch of unforeseen circumstances exacerbated my stress level. By sophomore year I was cycling at 2 week intervals.   [info] BP2, Rapid Cycling, OCD, PTSD, ADHD, treatment resistant [info] 1487085992
JASN_DE [info] &gt; I have been diagnosed with depression (not on any medicine for it) and have a good therapist who is helping me sort out things, which is working well. She has taught me how to deal with a few issues about myself and I find it enormously helpful but it is not enough and I'm not sure she can help me anymore.Sounds like the root problem that needs to be sorted out. [info] SW 140kg GW 108kg by the end of 2018 [info] 1527843563
justgoodenough [info] I'm not sure about what I regret not doing, but I regret spending so long being so angry. High school was a very angry time for me due to my parents and their fucked up relationship, and it's something I'm still dealing with now. At the time, I didn't even realize how angry I was. At the time, I thought it was normal, but I hated myself, my peers, my family, and I would flip the fuck out at everything. I was diagnosed with depression, but when you're a kid, you think depression means "sad." Sure, I was sad a lot, but not nearly as often as I was angry, and I didn't realize that they went hand in hand.I'm almost 30 now and I'm still dealing with my anger a lot. I have to consciously think about how to let things go and not focus on my RAGE. I think if I had been less angry, I could have focused more in my classes and had more positive social experiences.  [info] None [info] 1360101670
Depressed_Rex [info] Well, it sucks ass. They only care about each other when it's convenient to them or to keep up appearances. If one of them pisses the other off, I (being the oldest) gets the flack from one or both of them, cause they are unable to talk things out. I have been diagnosed with depression, which I believe is from their "relationship." So, TL;DR: It sucks [info] None [info] 1463160546
paperaeroplane6 [info] Is it "normal" to feel a constant sunken feeling in your chest area? Does anyone else feel this? I've been wondering for awhile now if this is what an average person feels. I've been diagnosed with depression by my doctor and a psychiatrist, but, I've been wondering if anyone else feels this or if I'm overreacting. Thank you.I'm sorry if this falls under rule 4. [info] None [info] 1575130504
Uddham [info] Struggling to get out of bed I have been diagnosed with depression for 2 years and I've been on anti depressants and I don't feel like they helped. And I struggle every single day of my life to get out of bed and get on with my day even if it leaves me hungry because I don't have any motivation to get out of bed and find something to eat.Then not moving out of my bed and getting out from under my covers leaves me more depressed as I'm just shutting everything out and I can't deal with anything properly. Then no leaving my bed ever doesn't give me any motivation to do anything with my life either. This vicious cycle just repeats consistently and it hurts and I don't like feeling this way but I feel as if I can't get better.. [info] None [info] 1552738523
k6mryn [info] Feeling Sad on Vyvanse 40mg Good morning guys. I’ve been on vyvanse 40mg for about two weeks for my ADHD. This is the first medicine I have been prescribed for it as I have recently been diagnosed. I also should note I am diagnosed with depression and take meds for that as well. Ever since starting vyvanse, I notice as the medicine wares off I feel so sad and helpless. I don’t know how to describe it other than I feel sad for no reason. Nothing in my life has been bad or triggered my depression in over a year. But all of a sudden with the new medicine I feel the same way I felt when I was majorly depressed. I really hope this post does not get removed because I need advice. Is this something that will go away as my body adjusts? How do I manage and overcome this feeling? Anything helps. Even just being acknowledged that I am being heard and understood. Thank you. Sincerely a struggling college student [info] None [info] 1580572190
Ballistic_Introvert [info] I didn’t know this could happen, but it does make sense. I was diagnosed with depression and hospitalized after my parents found out I self-harmed (12 at the time...now 13). The hospital was horrible. I’m traumatized and since I’m a child, people don’t listen. They instead say I’m “too young” to face anything serious and that I’m being overdramatic. Now, it seems hard to focus at times and I tend to have to ask my peers what we are doing because I get lost in my thoughts. I also feel as if my intelligence has decreased. I’m very grateful I have my group of friends. They are always here for me since my parents aren’t.  [info] None [info] 1541994022
definitelynotSWA [info] I have several similar experiences, a couple with young women doctors as well. I feel like they see I have depression and so that discounts everything else about me. Like yes depression can cause chronic pain, but I don’t think it’d be causing how if I bend a certain way my back feels like it was either struck by lightning or I just go numb and fall down? I’ve once had a GP who was a woman tell me that all women have sex issues and that it’s normal to experience zero sexual pleasure. Before I was diagnosed with depression lolI don’t distrust my doctors per se, but I’ve had enough issues with doctors not trusting _me_ that at this point I just do a lot of research and bring up possibilities when I go. Having to advocate for myself is tiring when dealing with mental illness, chronic pain, and the insurance system. I’d rather just push for tests when I go than keep coming back because the doctor misdiagnosed me with something without doing any testing and telling me it’s all in my head. :/These aren’t even small town doctors either. They’ve been at Boston or LA! [info] None [info] 1524917025
SynergisticSuccess [info] I know what you're going through. I was diagnosed with depression and nihilism, however I never seen a therapist or went on medication. If what you really want is too spend the holidays with family, even if you think they may not want too spend it with all their family - Ask them if you can join them for the Holidays.    Last year, I went through a pretty brutal breakup, and I called my parents before Christmas, asking them if I could just come spend the Holidays with them. I was very hesitant at first, and I had too check my ego at the door... But I don't regret it at all. It was good too just see them again.     I realized I ranted a bit. I hope this helps even a little bit. [info] https://amzn.com/w/1WX7E969BK8UD [info] 1450452278
Waaaza107 [info] Confused on my own emotions So I'm diagnosed with depression, and I know when I'm depressed. But sometimes it's not so obvious idk if im being lazy or its depression, am I bored or am I depressed? What are issues I have to work on and what's the depression? And how is being sad compared to having a depressive episode in individuals with depression? Thanks ahead of time [info] None [info] 1567960604
Gothbot6k [info] Just sinus stuff. I can't afford psychiatric stuff like I want to. I used to be on my fathers awesome Health Care plan but then when I graduated from High school he dropped me from his health care plan even though he could have had me on till I was like 25-26. I applied for Medicade and was turned down. So now I am on my colleges health care which means I can go to the nurses office for health concerns. I have been wanting to see a psychiatrist/psychologist for about two years now but it's just too much money sadly. I have been diagnosed with depression and a few other things from when I used to go years ago but I just can't afford it right now. It's one of the main reasons why I want a job so bad. [info] http://amzn.com/w/3HW8234K47MA1    [MULTIPLE LISTS] [info] 1348790297
dabolympian710 [info] Who said? I went through a near death experience and it completely changed my life. I was diagnosed with depression at age 11, and it took me the better part of a decade to find peqce but I did. I have a very supportive family so that helped. But again, it is possible, and there is a light at the end of the tunnel.But please, make some assumptions about my life. [info] None [info] 1425511659
csyrett [info] I absolutely agree. I was diagnosed with depression about 10 years ago. "I can't have depression, I'm a man" was my response.It took a good few months afterwards to realise and acknowledge I was actually sick.In December I had suicidal thoughts and am now not at work, pending a medication review. It's tough. I am normally a fully functioning articulate person who now finds basic life really frustrating. I struggle to speak to family about it but it does help to know people out there.It has annoyed me that some attitudes towards mental health in sports is "they have everything, what have they got to be depressed about?". Paul Lake (Manchester City footballer) did a brilliant job writing about his experiences. Depression can be, and is, indiscriminate.I hope that more people talk about it and we do get rid of the stigma. It might have helped me come to terms with it sooner. [info] None [info] 1517425312
redditisforfags3 [info] I was diagnosed with depression/dysthymia a while back.  Every day is a meaningless slog that I wish would just end.  I have a pretty good life comparatively, but it doesn't feel good to me at all.  I'd give all the "good" things up in order to no longer be.I've tried a number of medical options and none of them have had any positive effect. [info] None [info] 1394821271
shankie13 [info] It's occurred to me that this has become more of a rant then a question but I have been diagnosed with depression before (I'm on medication) but this isn't like anything I've felt [info] None [info] 1485905108
BrosephRadson [info] I don't understand why \*lists all common symptoms of depression\* is happening to meBy the way, I'm diagnosed with depression [info] Autism Level 29/50 [info] 1550648462
mellabellah27 [info] Discuss the possibility of depression or an eating disorder with her. It sounds like she is either eating to cope with her feelings of low self esteem (likely stemming from struggling with body acceptance and weight loss), which can be a very big sign of depression as she is self medicating her feelings with food (food hits the same pleasure center in your brain as sex and drugs/alcohol, shopping, gambling, etc), OR she is at the beginning stages of developing an eating disorder, likely binge eating or bulimia. I have both a history of depression and bulimia, and once I was diagnosed with depression and received treatment for it, the bulimia stopped. I still occasionally use food to deal with feelings, but nowhere near what I used to, and I’ve developed a much healthier relationship with food. Don’t be too quick to give up on your girl, especially if she’s given up on herself. She needs you. Just don’t let it get to a point where she is becoming toxic for you. Doesn’t sound like it’s there yet, but be mindful.  [info] None [info] 1529032342
Turdcervix [info] And why I need to get the Fuck out of Alabama. Seriously, 6 months in Alabama and I was diagnosed with depression and on medication. Christ it sucks.  [info] None [info] 1493251940
arachnophobia-kid [info] Yeah I'm not concluding anything, but I've been diagnosed with depression time and time again, and it's been ongoing since I was 13 or 14, way before Kratom, way before any drug use. I exercise everyday and I eat well. I hope where I'm at currently will improve but I'm not counting on living a happy life just cause I've been able to improve this one thing. [info] None [info] 1492094130
dwarvenbeard [info] How do i reply when people ask me if i'm okay I've been diagnosed with depression for about a year now and I am doing a fair bit better, however, it still comes back quite strong and I am left debilitated quite frequently. What can I say to my family when they ask me if I'm alright during this time? I don't wish to lie to them but the truth seems to just worry them, is there some middle ground maybe?Edit: thanks for the advice - it's given me a lot to think about for when this situation arises next. [info] None [info] 1546641920
Jokerthepoker [info] Is it ethical as a depressed man to search for love? It's been 10 years since I was diagnosed with depression and I've come to terms with that this is something that might stay with me and, while I accept this, something struck me recently, the times I've felt most fulfilled has always been when I was mad in love. This condition can definitely take a tull on you and I'm certain that it's extremely difficult for a partner to be a part of.What I'm asking is, is it possible to provide a loving, caring, fun and happy relationship to someone or will my partner (if I were to find one) suffer if I have difficulty expressing genuine happiness at times?I know it's a strange question but, while I am in control, I understand that it can be intimidating to others, so I'm really unsure how to approach this, I hope you understand what I'm trying to say. [info] None [info] 1482603037
revlisJ [info] Some time ago I was diagnosed with depression, several years ago. I’m quite sure I still have depression because I’m not motivated nor have I cried for a long time, feeling like a robot, you know? I didn’t even cry at my fathers funeral, some were telling that I was strong but I didn’t feel strong, I just felt more empty, more pain. I do laugh and make jokes with some of my friends but when I’m alone, I am just empty.I had a dad like you do. He was always thinking of himself and disrespecting me, at least that’s what I believed. After he passed, I learned of all the mistakes I had made, all of the wrong assumptions and all of the bad things I had said to him. Our unknowingly last words weren’t bad but not the best either. I learned so much from him and because of him I am the man I am today and I never took the chance to thank him.I understand that your dad might not be like mine but as I learned, they usually just want what’s best for you, at less what’s best for you in their heads and sometimes they don’t really know how to show it or teach it. (Sorry, I just have do defend fathers in some way because I’ve lost mine, and I’m regretting it very much that I didn’t do what’s right. So I’m just sharing a point of view to think about.)I’m learning something I like doing. But there’s so much classes that are not related to my specialty and I cannot make myself do them right now. And my PC can’t even play a YouTube video without crashing sometimes, so learning on my own is kinda hardened right now. I’m not quite sure what I would love to do..  It’s true, money shouldn’t be the thing that makes me happy. But What am I without it? No clothes, Poor diet and a shitty PC that doesn’t even play the videos. [info] None [info] 1513085635
Hime_Takamura [info] Ever since my older sister moved home, I've come to realize that my family doesn't like me. They love me like a family should, they care for my well-being and take care of me, but they don't like me and it's my fault. This is gonna be a long one. I'm sorry. I've never talked to anyone about any of this so it's just kind of all spilling out now. I'm not a very good writer so this may be very disjointed, I'm sorry.To make things easier:I am a female, currently aged 24 and my family and I live in Texas.My oldest sister is 6 years older than me and I'll call her E.My second oldest sister is 1 year older than me and I'll call her M.My youngest sister is 9 years younger than me and I'll call her R. She has Downs Syndrome.I was diagnosed with depression when I was in 5th grade after years of already struggling with it. The first time I tried to kill myself, I was about 12 years old. I took a bunch of pills, both mine and my mother's. It didn't work. I tried laying in bed waiting to die but I got scared of some wasps outside my window right next to my bed so I went downstairs. I sat in me and my sister's play room and watched a movie (I think it was Romeo and Juliet with Leonardo DiCaprio). I got hungry and I stumbled into the kitchen to make a sandwich. I got really dizzy and couldn't concentrate and I asked my dad to finish making them for me. As I was walking back to the play room, I blacked out for a few second sand came to lying on the ground. My dad and my oldest sister were next to me and my parents ended up taking me to the hospital. I recall laying in the hospital bed and my mom sitting next to me with my dad. She said "She'd better not be faking this." My dad asked me if I took all the antidepressants because I thought taking more would make me more happy and I lied and said yes because I was scared of getting in trouble for purposefully trying to kill myself. The second time I tried to kill myself was when I was December 21st, 2010, when I was 18. My recent ex-boyfriend had cheated on me with one of my friends and all the friends in that group didn't think it was a big deal so I isolated myself from them. I lost my best friend because he would rather hang out with the girl my boyfriend cheated on me with and left me for. It was half way through senior year and everyone else in school had already grouped off in the months and years before so I had no one. I was alone and I didn't want to suffer anymore while also getting back at my ex friends. "This will show them" I thought, "They'll have to live the rest of their lives knowing they drove a girl to suicide." I took 40 sleeping pills while my family and I were staying in a condo out of town for Christmas and visiting family. When I survived, I was embarrassed. My mother was mad at me again and yelled at me in her room loud enough for the rest of the family and cousins to hear. Everyone had to take shifts watching me for the next few days making sure I didn't fall asleep and die. My cousin had to clean up when I vomited up all the pills. I remember my late grandfather telling me that throwing up was good and it was my body getting rid of all the bad things. When I graduated from high school (I didn't go to the ceremony since I didn't have any friends anymore) my parents forced me to go to college despite my protests. I always hated school and I still didn't even know what I wanted to do with my life. I chose the school that E went to, up in New York. I had always been an underachiever. In high school, I took the borderline remedial classes so I could get straight A's and barely have to do anything. All my school and homework would be done within minutes in class and I would spend the rest of my time drawing. In college, I was immediately overwhelmed by everything and ended up flunking out after about 2 months. I had to call my parents, sobbing and explain to them that I was a failure and had flunked out of a very far away and expensive college. They let me come home and move in with them. For the past 5 years, I've lived at home with my parents and disabled sister. I have a part time job getting paid to provide respite care for R although I'm practically her mother at this point. I'm ashamed to say I haven't been very kind to her at all and on occasion in the past, I've taken out some of my anger on her. Not in an abusive way, but I've screamed at her and on a few occasions years ago I hit her. When I was a child, I was so excited to have a little sister. My friends had little sisters and I thought it would be so cool to have someone to teach about new things and have fun with. Unfortunately that never happened. After the first few years of her life, I realized she would never grow up. She'd always be a baby, she'd never be normal, and she would never be able to take care of herself. I resent her. I wish she had never been born. I hope every day that she'll get in some sort of accident and die so no one has to deal with her anymore. After she was born, my parents had no time for the rest of us. We didn't get to go out and do anything because of R. I hate her.Lately, my mother's health has been declining. She almost died last year because of surgery complications and this year she's gotten one of her knees replaced. She needs a walker to get around. So I stay at home and take care of her and R. A month ago, M moved back home. She's hardworking, determined, and outgoing. My polar opposite. I'm lazy, depressed, unmotivated, and a shut in. Ever since she came home, she's been helping and doing way more than I have. Rather than get motivated and try and keep up with her, I just wallow in self pity and cry in my room. M is also very mean sometimes. We used to be so close when we were children; we were like conjoined twins doing everything together. Now, she'll yell at me and berate me for being lazy. This morning, she put a bag of maggot infested garbage in my room because I neglected to take out one of the trash bins on trash day. My parents didn't even care. Now that M is home, they don't need me anymore. I'm just in the way. But I have nowhere to go. I have no one to turn to. I wish I could blame all of my faults on my depression but I feel like I'm just using it as a crutch. All I ever do is make excuses. I'm not a good person. I'm lazy and childish and selfish and I'm not making anyone's lives better by being in them. I'm just bothersome to everyone and I feel like I'm bothering everyone just by posting this. I'd be better off dead but I'm too much of a coward to pull the trigger. I'd just make a huge mess and then everyone would hate me for making them have to clean up after me. The worst part is, I don't deserve to be depressed. I have all of my finances covered, I was never abused, My family is upper middle class, and I have a wonderful boyfriend (albeit one I could never say any of this to). Other people have it much worse than me and yet I'm the one wallowing in self pity, cutting my arms and sobbing into my pillow. I'm the worst. [info] None [info] 1477857579
TheRealNEET [info] I have Crohn's Disease. I have genetically tight muscles so my body aches most of the day and I'm more injury prone. Since I have Crohn's, I'm very frail. I'm 6'4 and only 158 pounds. I consume about 4000 calories a day but I still lose weight. I even lift, but nothing. I'm autistic too. I can't tell if someone wants to run away from me or want to talk to me. I've been diagnosed with depression before. I got psoriasis on my scalp and I'm balding too. I hate myself for it. I blame my parents for conceiving me at 40+ years old, but then I realize they are all I really have. They love me to death. It's not their fault for having me, but they feel a sense of guilt to know that I'm not a healthy person by any measure. I revolt at myself and know that I will decline even further soon, but I try to make the most of it. I probably won't make it to 45 or 50, but I try to just not care anymore. I just say "I'm a shit human being, but who gives a fuck?" I've taken up shooting as a new hobby, makes my life a little bit better. It's a risky hobby, but I don't care. I want to reproduce, who doesn't? But, I know realistically as soon as a girl found out about my health, she'd walk away. She'd feel bad for probably a minute, then not care anymore. So, why should I? [info] None [info] 1499572827
Jopretz [info] My [17F] controlling mother [47F] wants to be closer to me and it’s my fault that she isn’t? I do love my mom, and I too want to be closer to her. But the thing is I constantly feel like she’s trying to manipulate and control my life, and she doesn’t care whether I’m happy as long as I’m successful and lead a good life in the way that she wants me to. There’s been a few times where she told me she’d support whatever I want to do, but I don’t actually feel that way. I’m well aware there is the possibility it’s just the “teenage phase” that Asian moms like to talk about which is why I want to be open to other opinions about this.I know these sound like little things but it makes me feel like she doesn’t actually care about my opinion. For instance, I would tell her I don’t want something (e.g. a food or a snack) and she’d tell my father to get me it anyway. And when I refuse to eat it, she tells me “I bought it for you, how could you be so ungrateful?” Even though I specifically said I didn’t want anything. She doesn’t hesitate to make me feel like shit over the things I can’t control. Over college, she constantly tells me that she’ll support wherever I want to go, but every other day she gives me all the reasons I shouldn’t go to that exact school (I had already told her my college in mind, and she seemed very welcoming at the time), and suggests some other school (close to home, medical-related) because she thinks I should become a nurse like her. She’s one of the reasons I want to go to college out of state.I don’t enjoy talking to her at all, about half a year ago I was diagnosed with depression which I did reach out to her about (which was how I got diagnosed). And everyday she’d ask me “why are you depressed? We all care and love you so much.” I don’t doubt the last part but i felt like to ask me why I was depressed like it was my fault was just plain insensitive. I don’t feel safe talking to her at all, every time I cry and she comes in, yes, I do feel like she genuinely cares but she hasn’t really given me the emotional safety I need to open up to her after all the times she’s blamed me for being upset or sad, not understanding that they’re just human emotions. Have I mentioned that when I cry at the dinner table, everyone just bursts into laughter? Including my brother, the only one in my family I trust more than them.She then complains that I “hate” her and “never talk to her”, like it’s my fault even though I have never said the former. Basically, trying to guilt trip me. She walks into my room and just lays down on my bed, staying silent and looking at her phone for god knows how long and I don’t do anything because I don’t want to talk to her for obvious reasons. She then comes up to me, rubs my shoulder affectionately like we’re close and says good night, and this just pisses me off. It’s like you’re starting at level 0 and you want to jump to level 100 without passing levels 1-99. How is she going to be affectionate with me when she can’t even take my feelings into consideration? I genuinely feel like she doesn’t deserve anything from me.She also shits on my boyfriend, whom I “talk to more than them” Honestly, they’re under the impression I love him way more and care about him way more than I do them, which actually wasn’t true (but now is starting to be) because he listens to my opinions and actually shows that they matter. I feel safe with him emotionally, and it wasn’t always that way. I used to never tell him anything either, the fact that he was patient and went to lengths to earn that trust from me says a lot about why exactly I talk to him more and would prefer spending time with him. I know that family relationships and romantic relationships aren’t the same, but I feel like to earn trust from someone you still have to put in that effort.I feel like my mom is crossing the line between caring for me and trying to control my life and she doesn’t see it. Am I just being a teenager or is this actually what she’s doing, and should I confront her about it?(The last time I told her it felt like she “could never hear what I’m saying” she just ignored me and walked out of my room. When I talk to her I feel the need to go back to self harm again.)TLDR; Mom does controlling things and I don’t talk to her because I don’t feel emotionally safe enough when I’m with her, but she blames me for it. I don’t know if I’m just being a rebelling teenager or if this is actually something that moms shouldn’t be doing, and need some insight from you guys. [info] None [info] 1569161733
onceuponasnap [info] There are trustworthy people out there, you too are a human being. At 5 months you are still deep in process of healing, at that point I was diagnosed with depression so I know being alone sucks. At 7 months I got a pet with who I could talk to and who is happy to see me. Somehow slowly I started truly recovering. [info] None [info] 1574586882
MasterMarksman [info] I flat-out refused to take any form of medication when I was diagnosed with depression. Don't ask me why, I honestly couldn't tell you, but I wasn't having it.I've since "recovered", but I count refusing anti-depressants as one of the biggest mistakes I've ever made. They could've cut my suffering short by many years.Take the meds, bro. If not for yourself, do it for me, a random dude on the internet who knows your pain. [info] None [info] 1362998321
treesanais [info] I am too stupid, ugly, etc. for life. I cannot function like I should be. I’m a 20 year old female. No job. Living with parents. Full time online college student who cheats on all quizzes and exams. I online schooled my last three years of high school, also cheated. I never took SATs or ACTs. I am a pathetic lame loser with no friends, no future, no intelligence. I might as well kill myself because I don’t want to live a life that has proven to be too difficult already (I am aware that sounds dramatic). I have seen 7+ psychologists over the years. No diagnosis (which is actually frustrating when I feel like something is wrong with me). The reason I have always cheated on tests is either because I’ve always wanted an easy way out (which is probably the reason), or that I am never able to focus (this is also true). I cannot follow conversations most of the time, even if someone is talking straight at me. I am always distracted, thinking, and worrying about other things. I always feel like I am having a “mental breakdown” and that I’m in crisis. I’ve thought about suicide for so long now and I just found out that a good friend of mine from the past just committed suicide. We were alike in some ways but she was a MUCH better person. The truth is, I am “cursed” with stupidity, ugliness (inside and out), indecisiveness, mental torment, etc. I’m not sure how much of it is my fault, but a lot of it is probably my fault because I wreck everything I go near. I am having horrible thoughts like wishing death on people who I’ve known from the past who are better than me and who are surpassing me (I would not harm anyone). I know you’ll probably say get a job or get a license. I’ve never been a lazy person, but everything feels wrong and I feel like I cannot function. I feel overwhelmed by everything all the time.Edit: Thanks so much for all your replies. I really appreciate you taking the time to read and reply. I have been diagnosed with depression a few times over the years.Seriously, thank you all so much for commenting. It means so much. [info] None [info] 1543872735
bigblackthing84 [info] I Feel Like I' Slipping Back Into Depression I guess I'll start with saying that I was diagnosed with depression my freshman year of high school. It took me a while to recover but I never really felt like I had gone back to being normal. It is now my junior year of high school. Even though I haven't been happy for a while, I still feel like I'm falling back down into the rabbit hole. I've dipped low like this before but it usually goes away after a week or two but this time it feels like its staying for a lot a longer than usual. I've been getting more and more headaches and losing my appetite as well as getting a heavy feeling on my chest.  I don't know if it's just because of this whole quarantine thing but I feel like I'm gonna fall right back into the way I used to do things and I don't think I'll be able to make it out this time. Anyone have any suggestions? [info] None [info] 1584952609
JiffyFrose [info] Oh God. Your mom sounds like she's from the generation where you "pretend it doesn't exist and it'll go away". Depression doesn't work like that. In fact, it gets worse if you ignore it. I'm sorry, but if you tried to commit suicide twice, and your mom still thinks that there's nothing wrong, she's really got her head in the sand. It's good that you went to therapy, even if it was for a few months. However, only going for a few months isn't enough to make a lot of progress. It sounds like you're having "crashes" as I call them. It's when you get so upset that you cry your eyes out and you lose control of yourself, to the point where you either cut yourself, or you have to worry about an attempt. I have has those before, and they're extremely scary.The fact that your mom is emotionally blackmailing you is disgusting. She sounds very emotionally abusive. Maybe it would benefit you to visit r/raisedbynarcissists It's good that you recognize that you need help, and it sucks that your mom is being a complete bitch about it (I'm sorry if this term offends you, but this really pisses me off). Physical illness is NOT a choice. Mental illness is NOT a choice. You know what is a choice? How you treat people. Your mom chooses to be a bitch. I can't believe that she would go above and beyond for her animals, but she couldn't give 2 shits about her kid. What kind of mother does that? I'm so grateful that my parents did their best to be supportive of me when I was diagnosed with depression.Also, you didn't self-diagnose yourself because you were diagnosed by a psychiatrist. Number 2, it may be true that you have nothing to be sad about, but depression is a brain disorder. You could be the richest person in the world, with the most wonderful spouse, children and have the most envied life, and you would still have depression. It sounds like yours is genetic rather than situational, which means that there ISN'T a reason to be sad, it's because your brain is telling you toHave you ever heard of [Kati Morton?](https://www.youtube.com/user/KatiMorton) She's a therapist with a Youtube channel and talks about ALL sorts of mental illnesses, and dealing with parents. I'm sorry if I offended you by calling your mom a "bitch" or a "narcissist" It's just that your story is so similar to mine in certain ways that I can see from your shoes. I can't imagine going through this without support and it upsets me that your mom isn't supportive. I really hope things change for the better. [info] None [info] 1476567528
Keirall [info] Years ago when I was struggling with grad school, I was diagnosed with depression, which I now believe was the result of undiagnosed ADHD. After bad luck with a few SSRIs, I was prescribed Wellbutrin (bupropion), which worked pretty well for me - it works on dopamine rather than serotonin and is sometimes prescribed for ADHD. Since an ADHD diagnosis and treatment don't seem possible in your country, perhaps you could suggest to your doctor that you'd like to try bupropion. [info] None [info] 1537563713
Djangofreeman21 [info] I was diagnosed with depression last year. Deleting all my social media and not even carring a smartphone with me was one of the best things I did. It is hard to get used, but it really helps you to see who are the people that really worth keeping close to you. The problem of the social media is that is counter productive, the time people spend there just scrolling and the bullshit people keep posting that doesn't have shit to do with you end up sucking your energy [info] None [info] 1490625179
lnvicto [info] I've always been like this to a lesser extent, but only recently I've been struggling hard with it. I have access to a psychiatrist at my university, so that may help.&gt;Just an aside--is anyone in your family diagnosed with ADHD, or has that condition ever been brought up to you before?I remember hearing something about my brother being diagnosed with an hyperactivity disorder, but that was about a decade ago and hasn't been brought up since then. May also been worth mentioning that I've been diagnosed with depression, I believe that this may have something to do with my inability to focus on most tasks.I've never looked much into ADHD, but it seems like something worth checking out. I may talk to a professional for proper diagnose. [info] None [info] 1491851340
owl1150 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, PTSD and GAD. My family thinks i was just being overly dramatic. They put me on house arrest because they told me that i am a mistake and i just needed to be fixed. I had to be awake at 6 am everyday to clean the entire house and cook so i "can be active and well". I did all that but they still cut off my allowance and didn't let me see my friends who were the only people who supported me. But i don't live with them anymore, thankfully.  [info] None [info] 1536596113
dexterduck [info] A 'Thank You' to this community I started having symptoms about two years ago, mostly fatigue and brain fog. I was diagnosed with depression and tried about 6 different medications over the course of a year. After that, I started to suspect a hormonal problem, but after several visits to the endocrinologist, that was ruled out as well. Out of ideas, my psychiatrist tried to treat my symptoms using ADHD medications, which actually worked for a while, but pretty soon I was feeling even worse than before.I eventually stumbled onto POTS and the umbrella of autonomic disorders, and everything seemed to click. One day when I was feeling particularly terrible, I decided to buy a gatorade and suddenly felt 80% better, which made me pretty confident that I had POTS. Unfortunately, that was back in May, and it would take over a month before I could see a cardiologist, and several months after that before I could be seen for a tilt table test. I finally went in for a tilt table test just a few days ago, and although the experience was miserable, and the results were inconclusive (hospitals and needles make me very anxious, so my 'resting' HR was 90 and my blood pressure was spiking like crazy), the administrating doctor still felt that the results were enough to diagnose me with 'some kind of autonomic disorder.'------------------------I have an appointment for next week to be put on beta blockers, and I just want to thank everyone on this subreddit. This is the first time I've actually posted here, but finding this community convinced me that it wasn't just in my head, and really helped me find information as I moved forward with trying to finally get a diagnosis. [info] None [info] 1505404665
jay-eye-elle-elle- [info] It's totally possible! I did it. Almost two years ago I went through a really acute period of depression that I fought my way out of by getting into therapy, going on medication to stabilize, and eventually getting off that medication. Things are worlds better but I still have some bad days. When I started dating my current boyfriend I knew it was something that inevitably going to happen again and that I needed to tell him. Before, with friends or family, I hid my depression and would always make excuses but realized he could be (would be) a lot more involved in my life and make it harder to hide.We had been dating for about a month and a half and things were looking really good. We went to dinner and I told him. It went something like this... "Hey, I need to tell you something. It's not a big deal but I think you should know... About a year ago [at the time] I was diagnosed with depression. I'm feeling really good now but sometimes I still feel a little down and I wanted you to know why... This is how I usually act when feeling depressed, these are some strategies I've found to help myself out, this is how I communicate when depressed, etc..."And then you let him ask questions. Just answer calmly and honestly. Most people don't know how best to react or how to help and just have a lot of questions. Ever since, my boyfriend has been nothing but awesome and supportive. He's better at spotting when I'm feeling depressive (or heading that direction) and he's gotten really good at helping me out if it, even if it just takes time.Just be honest and upfront. I would tell potential partners sooner rather than later, because then you give them the chance to opt out. Which, honestly, might happen. But that's ok. But starting the conversation when you're happy and healthy let's it be about how responsible and proactive you are about your own health. You come across responsible, considerate, and honest. Most people will respect you for it. Good luck!  [info] None [info] 1404059721
beanaby [info] This is my baby, she is 7 months old. I was diagnosed with depression this year and really struggled. My dog was the biggest help in that battle, and continues to be every day. I honestly don’t know where I’d be without her. [info] None [info] 1578253363
Create_Delete [info] I only just found out what DP was and the unnecessarly long story of what made me realise I had it, how do I go about telling a doctor? So when I first looked into this I thought it was very similar to what I was feeling, or had been feeling for like 3 years.A lot of the online stuff explains it to usually be from some sort of trauma, but when I think back none of it was specifically traumatic. However the more I think about it, the more little things that happened that I never quite forgot and stuck with me. I had no idea that they were traumatic until I realised that I remember every detail when I think to one event. This was pretty confusing and a big thing, I've been diagnosed with depression and I accepted that, done and dusted, plain ol' depression. End of story.But I think it is depersonalisation most of the time, and when something really shit happens it can go into derealisation, where I'm walking and can't feel my legs and often even if I take a different route home, I look up and I'm there in front of the Door with no concrete recollection of the walk. And that is like a catalyst for my depression as sometimes I find myself watching a car drive past me and thinking about walking out in front of it. Not that I would its too selfish of me, to my family and to the driver, and to the hospital and shit.But yeah, anyway, I noticed that depersonalisation is accountable for a lot of my behaviour and thoughts, and I didn't even know it was a thing, like honestly, I'd still be in the dark if my friend hadnt recognised the symptoms I explained to her as DP. This post is all over the place, but I also saw a video with a singer dodie, where she had a therapist woman and they explained that it's not always from a big trauma but It can be a build up of tiny traumas over time which I believe is what's happened to me, and now I find myself blocking out the bad emotions, and it's gotten out of control to where I'm blocking everything. When I'm talking to me friends I zone out and can't come back and they think I'm disinterested in the topic,  and I realised that every day I look in the mirror and I look not different but like I don't identify it as me, like I recognise my eyebrows and nose and can see its clearly me, but I don't know who that is. Sometimes I look hot af and I can appreciate that but often I see a tired, greasy haired uneven girl that looks she has no style and lives in pj's. My thing is how do I talk to the doctor about this and do I need to? A part of me wants to know for sure, get the sense of clarification a doctor can give, but I have already had 2 of my 6 counselling sessions with the uni so maybe I should talk to her? She didn't seem to recognise it in the last session as a disorder when I was explaining how it felt. My fear is going to the doctors and them telling me it's nothing, and that I've read up online too much which has happened before or at least the disbelief from a doctor has, and it is not fun. Any thoughts on what I should do next? [info] None [info] 1514856261
MucusLukas [info] Some kind of dissociative disorder. I don’t live my life in a dream state or anything like that and I’m not on full auto pilot but I just don’t feel quite present. Plus something that might result in a lack of emotional depth? I feel like a nothing person, like when I try to be introspective there’s nothing to actually look at. I was worried about sociopathy or psychopathy for a hot minute but I do still have some emotions and guilt and stuff like that. I have a hard time empathizing with people or caring about things in general. I have been diagnosed with depression though which probably doesn’t help things. [info] None [info] 1547555283
Jiuholar [info] Not suicidal at the moment, just need to get this out.  Not sure how to start these things. I'm 16 years old and I was diagnosed with depression about eight months ago, but the effects of depression and suicidal thinking I've been experiencing for much longer, I'd say about 2 and a half years. I've had suicide "attempts" but I view these only as testing the waters, seeing just how close I can get to death before I back out. The most recent one was the most frightening. When I do this stuff to myself an intense clarity comes over me. It is quite literally a calm before the storm: everything is crystal clear and in those moments I swear I knew the answers to the universe. I was ready to die that night, but again I backed out. Each time I get ever closer. Right now I'm the happiest I've been in a long time; just gotten out of hospital and I'm on new medication, making huge strides in therapy. Yet I cannot shake this feeling of utter dread. This feeling of knowledge - the simple plain fact that my time is limited and when I die, it will be by my own hand. I am my own worst enemy. It feels like trying to hold up the sky - I can fight as hard as I can but eventually, the time will come when I break and the sky crushes me. I am loved. I can see it, feel it and experience the joy that it brings. But it feels worthless. I am unable to dredge up any meaning from life. I know I should try harder in school, but I just don't - I don't see the point in it. I want to make it clear that I am very happy, content with my life how it is at the moment. But similarly to how a terminal cancer patient is enjoying their last days, I enjoy my last days with those that I love. I know that people will be hurt - my family, friends, girlfriend will be absolutely crushed. But I feel like its not up for me to decide - the darkness within me is too powerful. It is relentless and I am its prisoner. [info] None [info] 1337164614
Kruegenking [info] I was diagnosed with depression when i was 17. Laat week i worked 66 hours. Probably exhaustion and loneliness [info] None [info] 1452533887
ShenziSixaxis [info] If you wanna take it that way, sure. I've been diagnosed with depression myself along with a couple other issues I don't feel like bringing up and that's how I saw that sub.I looked at a subreddit and came away with my own impressions from skimming the posts in it. That's all it is. No need to take it personally. [info] None [info] 1450832344
throwaway998977 [info] I was diagnosed with depression and given 5 different antidepressants. I've been searching for an answer for a long time. How old are you if you don't mind saying? [info] None [info] 1490122636
Maestrohanaemori [info] Therapy has been working, might end in a few months. I’ve been going to therapy for a few months now. I was diagnosed with depression last year and it made me feel like life was over.But now I’ve been applying to programs related to my career of interest, my grades and study skills have been picking up this semester. I can sing and listening to music like normal. I can crack all the dad jokes, puns and (appropriate) dark jokes that I want. I have confidence in myself now.I seem to be demonstrating a positive response in my recent sessions. I feel happy right now and I just want to share it with everyone.I’m grateful for the friends and family that have stuck it out with me and were supportive in this season as I toughed it out. [info] None [info] 1553930913
mysteries1984 [info] Ex boyfriend now, and sure. I was diagnosed with depression almost 11 years ago. The main thing was that he kept in touch with me regularly. I was very needy, and he'd call me, text me, email me to make sure I was ok. He'd say it was just to say hi, but it was really seeing how I was feeling. He encouraged me to get out of the house more, take up new hobbies and brought me to social events. Introduced me to new people. He made me food when I didn't feel like eating. When I couldn't get out of bed he brought DVDs and magazines. Tried to distract me. Read up about the meds so he'd know the side effects. One of which was loss of libido, and he didn't hassle me for sex when there'd be months I barely touched him.That's a starter. But that worked for me. She's not me, obviously. I think the first step would be seeking professional help. [info] None [info] 1359147018
Vertigo17498 [info] Pv=nrt.The dude gave us values for r in multiple units so that for example I can calculate a missing volume in atm if it is liter or calculate missing pressure and another one for multiple units an told us to memorize them.I am like what the fuck. We know each unit and their conversions and can get the pressure and volume in any fucking unit I want.The pressure of a fixed amount of ideal gas at constant temperature is inversely proportional to the volume according to boyle’s law or by pv=nrt and change it to p=nrt/v and nrt is a constant so if v doubles p halves.No we dont do that here we use a longer more stupider method.Yesterday I had a panic attack and I have been diagnosed with depression and wanted to lay down and do nothing.But then I remembered that I want to change the world,do something instead of being slaved off in a company like elon musk.I then snapped out of it and continued to study.This is to put into prespective how important this is to me.Without this determination I would continue to feel this “emptiness”.But this determination is slowly fading especially since today a professor gave me 0/10 in the physics lab for no reason whatsoever even though I calculated all values correctly.I feel like this college is eating away at my sanity.What would you do ? [info] None [info] 1540849272
-johnstamos- [info] Is something wrong with me? I grew up popular, with nothing but friends and people around me all the time. I loved the attention, in fact I craved it. I played sports, was in plays, band, etc etc. i did all kinds of things. Anyway, now that im older, married for 13yrs with a small family pf 2 kids, i think something is pretty off with me. I was diagnosed with depression about 5 years ago. The biggest problem though is that im not popular at all. I have close to no friends anymore. I love my wife, but ive noticed that im talking less and less to her lately, and thats not fair. We have frequent family parties, and at least once during all of these things i notice myself in this little bubble. Im sociable, but i dont ask a lot of questions, dont really engage much, and find myself not really giving a shit what my BIL, SIL, etc are doing, how their work is, etc. I usually end up "outside" of whats going on, if that makes sense. It doesnt really bother me that much, but i feel like it could be hazardous to my family. Even at work, i have a respectable job, am well liked, and have advanced quite a bit. I have zero interest in coworkers issues. Id probably he friends with most of them, i just dont care enough to make friends. We can be work friends. Dont know if any of this makes sense. I love alone time. I work graveyard, so nights i'm off are great, i can read or watch a movie, or whatever the hell i want, because everyone else is in bed. Not sure if these are actual issues, i guess im just an asshole, and my growing isolation keeps pushing me farther away. Its hard to explain. Im open to any insight or questions are out there. [info] None [info] 1487472208
aloofus [info] &gt;When did you start drinking?I guess the first time I drank was only about a year ago, but it's increased pretty substantially since then. I've been drinking heavily since I got a solid connection, about a month ago, but I drank as much as possible until then.&gt;How much do you drink?Well, I try and keep it down, but maybe a gallon or two of 80 proof vodka a week.&gt;Well, my reasons are generally petty and small. I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago, is probably the correct answer. I also have a very strong family history, if you buy that sort of thing.&gt;How does it affect your life?Not at all, is the reason I haven't forced myself to quit. I wait until my parents are asleep, and anything I have to do is done. I'm very good at preventing/dealing with hangovers. [info] None [info] 1253599869
Stavie131 [info] 19y/o Male Recurring throbbing tension headache cause? For about three days now, every 4 to 6 hrs I get this intense headache at the top of my head. It feels like there is a weight there.  Any time I move my head or my body fast enough it becomes throbbing and feels like it's beating and sometimes causes dizziness. Especially in my lower neck and shoulders I feel pain and generally throughout my body I feel achy when this happens. I am a 19 y/o male college student, 6'2" 275 lbs if that helps. Tuesday January 9th I had my wisdom teeth taken out, A general anesthetic was used and I wasn't knocked out, I really hope this isn't the cause. I don't believe I am currently stressed about anything, I am diagnosed with depression and take Prozac (Daily) Albuterol (As needed, mainly for allergies) for that but I don't believe that is causing it either. Any help is greatly appreciated! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1516517306
PM_ME_TEENIE_WEENIES [info] I have depression and most of the time I'm not even sad. I just don't have feeling at all. Which might also be something else but I'm diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1510873761
MissMarionette [info] &gt;What's wrong?/What's the matter?I am diagnosed with depression, mother/grandma/friend, I think you can come to the logical conclusion that it's *everything* and *nothing*. [info] None [info] 1407874122
Rilmawen [info] Dear Reddit, I need your help. My friends seem to have abandoned me. How can I move on if I'm shy? I was diagnosed with depression in April. I won't go too much into the reasons. But it was a shitstorm. Now I am better, in therapy, etc. I try to ask them to hang out by calling or something, but no response. Granted, both are busy. One a newlywed working full time. The other works full time and is doing some school, but has a bit of time. These are people I consider my best friends. I have other friends, I think, but they are the ones I lean on. Should I give up?If so, I need friends. I am extrovert, but extremely shy. [info] None [info] 1352959864
MrZane113 [info] Ok so get a 2nd opinion and be totally honest with them don't hold back idk if u have BP I'm not a doc but if u think/know something was wrong then u have to be honest to get the help u need. I will now sum how not being honest affected my life (it's kinda long)Ok so at 17 I was diagnosed with depression I had the thoughts of suicide constantly (never really told them that cuZ I was ashamed just said I was sad)  they gave my Zoloft. at 21 I had back surgery that turned in to a drug addiction for a few years(not really sure how long) I snapped one night slit my wrists and thankfully called my lil bro to tell him I loved him I passed out with him on the phone (from blood loss).  Thankfully he could tell something was wrong and called 911 24 Staples later I was diagnosed with major depression disorder I moved back to my home town spent 9 months in and out of the hospital (not sure how many it was more then 6 though) every time I held back I was not totally honest I told them what they needed to hear I did not follow up with therapy I did not take my mental health seriously.  Then my cousin on his 15th bday hung him self I honestly can't explain what it did to me cuz it was so uncontrollable and just down right unbearable (I wish I new him better cuz I new how he felt but never really told anyone) 2 night before the funeral me and my bro get in to an all out fight (we are both 6'2 and work out it was a battle Royale) once again I tried to kill my self by slitting my wrists but I did it in front of everyone (it was really just a cry for help) I spent that night in jail naked in the suicide Ward.  Thank God they did not press charges I got home flipped out again and once again the cops came but this time I got sent to the exit in a mental health facility.... honestly this sounds horrible but the only reason I was actually honest for the first time was cuz my cousin killed him self it gave me motivation to get help cuz I new I was fucked in the head.  So for the first time I was totally honest I told them everything the sex the drugs the suicidal thoughts the paranoia fucking everything I never visually hallucinated but I awalys had my own voice in the back of my head telling me to kill my self.  That being said I hit the 2 year anniversary of my diagnosis about to weeks ago I got a fulltime job that I'm kicking ass at I'm mostly stabe when I'm not I fake it till I make it.  I still live at home (which sucks cuz I'm 28 and wanna date but its only temporary)  the worst part is it took the my cousin suicide to be honest.  Sometimes I think if I would have just been honest with the family in the beginning I would have been diagnosed earlier he might still be alive maybe I could have been there for him...but u can't change the past u can only move forward and learn from the past. My point is if u want to get help u have to share your deepest fears your most personal feelings u have to be vulnerable it's the hardest thing I have ever done I wish I would have had the strength to do it sooner maybe things would be different.Happy new years my friend I wish the best for u and truly hope the best for u.   [info] None [info] 1546310305
ImperatorJustinian [info] Possible discharge from NS? Hey all, I need some advice.I was diagnosed with depression a few months back and it's been getting progressively worse. I've seen both private and public psychiatrists that diagnosed me with major depressive disorder. I've been put on a long term mc that's lasted for about two months now. However, I recently was called to see my formation psychiatrist who insisted I just had adjustment issues and said that if I take 3 months of mc or more, they have the option to discharge me from ns.Is this true? And if it is, will being pes f affect my employability and chances of getting insurance? Please help. Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1548999371
throwawayprince123 [info] Periods and depressive episodes? Hey, everyone. I seriously think I have Bipolar II, as I've been diagnosed with depression but I'm sure I have hypomanic episodes as well. However, I've never discussed these with therapists since I always thought this was just my personality. (Since I was a kid, if I was not depressed I'd get ridiculous schemes/goals, a delusional sense of importance, incredible energy, racing thoughts, etc..) My boyfriend, who has diagnosed Bipolar II believes my symptoms sound a lot like his.Anyway, I have also been diagnosed with PMDD. Years ago I started bc and it has worked a little bit but I still get depressed the week before my period. I won't understand what's going on then I'll check my calendar and- oops! Guess it's that time of the month soon.This has just happened to me and I'm beyond frustrated. I was going through a long hypomanic episode- channeling all of my energy into my art. I was an art machine for days. This is all I do. When I don't do art I don't have much of a life. Suddenly today I am depressed as hell. Sure enough- period next week. I am really just so frustrated. I feel like my body just hates me for being born with a uterus.  I've read that hormones can influence the way someone experiences Bipolar symptoms.Anyone deal with this? Anyone have tips? Has any kind of treatment helped, if you've dealt with this? Thanks in advance, even if you just wanna share your experience it would be greatly appreciated but obviously no one is obligated to share! [info] None [info] 1516332751
C-c-c-comboBreaker17 [info] I believe that it is wrong to abort after the fetus begins to respond to stimuli. To me, after that point, it can feel and think, on some level, and aborting it at that point is wrong. I feel like no woman should be denied an abortion early term, and especially not a child of rape. To me, to be forced to wait 9 long months as your body changes (oftentimes irrevocably) and your hormones wreak havoc on you only to then go through the trauma of birth for a child whose conception you never even consented to, and then having to deal with the mess that is adoption...It's horrific to me, that anybody would think that is okay to do to a woman.I live in Alabama. I graduated several months ago. Sex Ed was literally a presentation in which a church came in and showed us a slideshow of very graphic images of std-ridden genitalia. They told us that if we had sex, this would happen to us, and we needed to wait till marraige. They said that condoms had a 90% failure rate (blatantly untrue) and that birth control was against god.We had over 30 teen pregnancies in the coming years. I watched girl after girl drop out of school. Many turned to drugs. A few sunk into poverty and went homeless.  One killed herself, because she couldn't bear the social stigma and rellentless bullying she recieved.My family also is a foster care family. We have taken in several foster kids.These kids are often very unwell, mentally and physically. They're malnourished, distrusting, and cynical. They haven't been treated well, they've been in abusive households, and many, many, many of them were simply children whose parents never planned for them. Around 20% of foster children report having sex before the age of 13. Sexual abuse is far too common.In my eyes, any sort of restriction of abortion has to come AFTER these problems are fixed, because otherwise these will only compound each other.  40000 infants go into foster care each year and over 20000 children never leave it, simply aging out. Thirty percent of the homeless were once in foster care. You cannot possibly think its better to have a child live a life of misery for years and years and years, whilst also putting a huge burden on the mother (who, most likely, never knew a single thing about safe sex, like my entire graduating class). Nobody is happy to get an abortion. They get one because they don't have any other options. What about places that don't offer shit for maternity leave? Is a single woman who works a demanding job just supposed to quit her job, because her pregnancy makes it hard to keep up? The risks with giving birth alone, to me, justify abortion, simply because it seems immoral to me to force someone to take a risk of death, or even permanent injury, trauma, or the psychological risks of PMD or other illnesses. I have post traumatic stress disorder. I was diagnosed with depression also last year. I am not an expert on mental health. I do not claim to be. However, I have no doubt that the pain and trauma of childbirth, the scars, and the bodily changes with it, can be mentally crippling. This is doubly true if unwanted.Sources: https://abcnews.go.com/Primetime/FosterCare/story?id=2017991&amp;page=1http://www.center4research.org/teen-pregnancy-foster-care/https://wehavekids.com/adoption-fostering/20-Random-Foster-Care-facts [info] Non-Trump Supporter [info] 1528863109
Audioslave212 [info] This is something I’m dealing with right now actually...I was diagnosed with depression when I was 13 or 14, and took medication on and off various times between then and now (I’m 18 currently.) It never seemed to do much for me and I never committed to taking it for long periods of time (which is probably why.) Less than two months ago I started ADHD medication, and it has been fairly effective in helping my symptoms. My focus and memory are significantly better, between college and work I don’t have much trouble staying engaged and fulfilling my duties. However, my biggest issue, which I assume is from the ADHD and depression comorbidity, is lack of motivation. I find it difficult to do anything I enjoy, or lack enjoyment in the things I do. Even when taking my meds I still end up sucked into my phone or laying in bed for hours. The ADHD medication doesn’t seem to help remedy that, and I’m considering going back on depression medication because of it. I’ve also started seeing a therapist, so we will see how that goes. No one is exactly the same, so you will have to find what combination works best for you, these are just my experiences with depression and ADHD. Good luck and have a nice night :)  [info] None [info] 1538882630
xenobees [info] University and Depression I was diagnosed with depression at the beginning of my second year of university. I have been medicated for it since. On a bad day, the worst I feel is general emotional numbness and/or very low moods and persistent tiredness. While unmedicated, it is worse, but still manageable - I can't really focus, my short-term memory suffers and I feel tired from the moment I wake up to the moment I go to sleep.However, as the end of my degree nears, things are getting much more severe and unmanageable than even unmedicated depression. I take 10mg of Escitalopram daily but I can barely cope with my day-to-day life. I don't want to get out of bed because I'm constantly completely exhausted from the moment I get up, I don't want to study, I don't want to interact with people and I'm struggling to even care about the consequences of these effects. I'm still somehow scraping through on discipline alone but I'm absolutely petrified I'll end up fucking everything up somehow and failing out just because I'm having a bad mental health lapse at the moment.I stay organised, try to get enough sleep, try to discipline myself, try to stay on track and not get distracted, but it's impossible. I can't concentrate. I can't sleep. I can't remember the simplest things and I sometimes even struggle to keep up with conversations. I don't want to tell my boyfriend because I don't want him to be stressed out (or even end our relationship, because I suspect that at the moment I'm quite an emotional burden to cope with) and I don't want to tell my friends because I don't want to inflict that on them - they are largely also studying or beginning new careers and I want to be a positive and supportive person, not a drain. I have no idea what to do from here. The fact that my medication doesn't seem to be helping much terrifies me - it's crucial that I am able to get by until I graduate but that's looking more and more difficult.Any help, advice, experience is welcome. [info] None [info] 1576190431
MaddieTampa [info] You're partially right. I decided for myself, or figured it out, or knew all along - whichever you'd prefer. For a while I didn't see a psychologist, and was actually fired from a serving job at a corporate restaurant because they found out. I had absolutely no protection because I didn't have a proper diagnosis - well that and at the time I was fired, gender identity wasn't protected by the state of Florida, so technically they could have just fired me anyways.GID (Gender Identity Disorder) is the actual name of the diagnosis. I basically sat down with the psychologist at my first session for an hour and we talked, and she gave me the diagnosis there.I was diagnosed with depression at a young age as well, and was on anti-depressants for about a year, until one of the medications made me sick - so I stopped. Imagine a typical nerdy high school experience, but you're also not the correct gender. It's depressing, but I don't actual have depression.I was officially diagnosed late last year, but have been transitioning for about two years now. I'll be 25 in a couple of weeks.No problem! - I love answering genuine questions if I can. Knowledge is power, use it for good :) [info] None [info] 1340330173
Hexomin [info] Medication was the only thing that worked for me, and it worked incredibly well. While I was diagnosed with depression, it wasn't the only diagnosis, nor was it the root cause of any of my problems; everything wrong with me was a result of debilitating OCD that I've had for as far back as I can remember. Within a week of starting on medication, it began to abate, but not entirely. I had to keep increasing the dose, all the way to the maximum, and my psychiatrist added a second medication at a low dose, before I was better.The difference is incredible. I went from being barely able to function to having almost no symptoms at all. [info] None [info] 1488805097
emmeemmememm [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and I self-harm. I get pissed off when I hear other kid's who failed their Biology test say random shit like: ' I failed my test again. Oh well, guess it's time to cut myself'. *Pretends to cut themselves with a ruler in a joking matter* [info] None [info] 1561406994
the_red_beast [info] I was diagnosed with depression 8 years ago. I can't speak for anyone else, but the only reason I'm still here is because it would ruin the people who love me. I try to convince myself sometimes that they would get over it eventually, but I know that certain people wouldn't. It really sucks sometimes. I have no desire (sometimes, very little) to continue living my life, but I don't want to put anyone who makes the mistake of loving me through that. Getting high helps; it lets me get through the day... but godDAMN is it exhausting living my life for other people. I fucking hate it, but that's the choice I make. I've already put them through hell, I don't want to hurt them like that. So, you're definitely not alone. I hope you find the will to live one day harruno; there is a reason people love you... try to find those reasons, and believe them, yourself. I think that you are worth it, even if you don't. [info] None [info] 1406536705
Talmania [info] I feel your pain. I was diagnosed with depression many many years ago and the psychiatrist prescribed me Lexapro and continued to treat me for the first year (seeing every 3-4 months) and then my companies insurance changed and I was out of benefits after one visit. By this point I’d been on it for approaching 18 months and was doing just fine but he still insisted on seeing me every 4 months and collecting a 250.00 fee for a 30 minute session and would not write a prescription without an accompanying visit. Fuck that guy.  [info] None [info] 1553134397
Got_wake [info] This post really hit home. I was diagnosed with depression in early 2016 (I'm 16) and got on medication and went through counseling. It was never "serious" but it was depression, which brings us to where we are now. I feel better, I've branched out more, I'm more motivated and generally more enjoyable to be around. I'm still on my medication and will be for a few more months but making a move on my depression was the best move I've made. It's worth not going through this for the rest of your life. Just do it, do yourself the favor.  [info] None [info] 1469416801
holdenthomas [info] Does anybody else struggle to see the light at the end of the tunnel? I’ve posted here a few times in the past and I’ve found each time pretty beneficial so I thought I might give it a stan again if only to vent how I’m feeling, so here it goes.I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago when I moved from home to study at university. I found the whole experience incredibly difficult. At school I had always excelled academically, had an active social life and had an unshakeable confidence, that I had worked very hard to build up for myself  but everything changed when I went to university. I just was not the same person and it upset me so much. I hated the degree I’d chosen but was unwilling  to admit this to my family let alone myself for fear of being perceived as a failure. And so I persevered.At the start of last year, after a failed suicide attempt I took some time off university and saw a therapist for a brief period. When September rolled around I was happy to return and give it another shot but I just fell back into my old patterns of behaviour. I was facing a lot of external pressure, particularly from my parents to succeed and so I just couldn’t bring myself to tell them I wasn’t going to lectures and was feeling suicidal again. I spent about a month in my room, with minimal contact to the outside world, wishing the world would go away.I ultimately had an epiphany and decided to drop out of my course, after this I felt so much better on the inside. Coming clean to my parents was horrible though. They just sort of shrieked about how much money I’d cost them. But it wasn’t all bad, I did spend my last month at uni surrounded by good friends, a supportive boyfriend and there was a marked improvement in my mental health.I unfortunately didn’t have the financial resources to stay there and so have been forced to move home and it has been a walking nightmare. My parents basically just scream at me every other day about getting a job or how much money I’ve cost them and I’m so unhappy. I feel living here has undone all the progress I thought I had made and I’m falling back into my same old depressive habits once again. What’s worse is I don’t have any direction in life. I can’t think of any career path that appeals to me and I feel as though I’m just living for the sake of living. I know my parents love me but living with this hostility is making me feel increasingly suicidal again but there’s no where else I can really go. I feel trapped both mentally and physically and I’m scared that there’s only one way out of feeling this way.Sorry for the word vomit, I get in a kind of rhythm when I do these posts and it’s hard to break. Obviously I’m focusing on the negatives for the purpose of venting and my situation isn’t as dire as I’m making it out to be but what I’ve written here is a pretty honest representation about how I’ve been feeling over the past month and I am very scared about the future [info] None [info] 1531691720
Kayzar_Hermit [info] Sorry to bother, but I was hoping for some advice. Hello Reddit.It's my first time on this subreddit. Found it linked in a post and thought hopefully this'd be a good place for help or getting some advice. I was diagnosed with depression roughly 6 months ago, but I'd say I've been suffering for the most part of 3-4 years. At the moment, I'm going through counselling, which I feel like is helping me. It's making me think about stuff I've previously tried to forget about and I think it's helping.However, I keep feeling worried that when the counselling is over (which is in a few more sessions), that I'll simply slip back into my old ways of feeling down and depressed most of the time. I was wondering if anyone had any advice on what I could do, or whether I'm just being silly or something. (I do apologise, I just tend to get worried sometimes). Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1344719174
ZeddPMImNot [info] I don't know how to truly help you, but I can totally say i understand how you feel. I was diagnosed with depression at 14 and have been living with it for almost 16 years now. Medications did little for me, and I go through periods of extreme depression, hopelessness and rage. I'm often feeling a mixture of sadness and anger. It's hard, and I often have suicidal thoughts too. I found that you cannot rely on people to be your reason to stay alive. You have to find something else. For me, it was my love of animals. I have some wonderful dogs at home and a very needy cat. Without me, they would not be able to live as good of a life as they do. They give me a reason to get out of bed (to care for them), to go places with them (to bring them enjoyment), and to work (to pay for all the things they need/want). Plus, when I'm sad, they love on me, and do their darn best to make me happy. I know others who've found a similar situation to this to work too. This might work for you, and if not then I highly recommend checking out what ways you could do something like this w/o animals. Hang in there! [info] None [info] 1530645640
CeliaHaven [info] Why would you say that? It's not like when you're depressed you immediately become aware of it. Sometimes you do have to ask for you to realize it. While yes, it is common for teens to go through mood swings and different phases, they're also a very vulnerable age group for depression. I was 15 when I was diagnosed with depression, and I realized by learning about symptoms in class and going "oh shit, am I depressed?" (no joke) and then following up with a psychiatrist.OP, I would take a look at some symptoms and compare them to yourself and your everyday life, and it's important to be honest with yourself. What does your sleep look like; oversleeping or insomnia? Your eating habits; overeating or lack of appetite? Are you having issues concentrating/making decisions/remembering things? Do you feel fatigued? Loss of interest in a lot of hobbies and activities you consider things you enjoy? Irritability? Restlessness? Any kind of pain like headaches or cramps that you can't attribute to anything in particular? Digestive problems? Anxiousness? Feelings of guilt, worthlessness, helplessness? Persistent sadness? Suicidal thoughts?All of these are potential symptoms of depression. You don't have to have all of them, obviously, but if you recognize some of them in yourself, especially the last three, maybe you are depressed. I would 100% recommend talking to a counselor or a therapist, just to check in and either make sure you're in a good place or help get you to one. There's no harm in making sure, better to be safe than sorry, right? [info] None [info] 1552659105
ZLMom [info] I second SeaTurtle, you may be depressed. Alternatively, some physical issues such as low thyroid can also cause you to feel this way. Getting to a doctor is paramount. If you feel like you just can't move, is there anyone you trust to help you make that appointment and get you to a doctor? Similarly, I was diagnosed with depression just over a year ago and the meds and therapy do help. Keep us updated!  [info] [support] [info] 1432214305
SayceGards [info] I would seriously suggest going to a psychiatrist and getting medicated. I was diagnosed with depression, and one of my "symptoms" was episodes when I would get agitated, then frustrated, then SUPER ANGRY and just plain mean, then I would get sad and cry, then I would get super apologetic, then I would get apathetic. Every single time I went through all of these emotions. Every single time. I'm medicated now, and it doesn't happen anymore. At all.  [info] None [info] 1312260755
dantepicante [info] I don't know if I agree that he is a pathological liar, although obviously he has used many psyops techniques that I find somewhat dishonest (albeit benign) and has changed his stated positions to get ahead. I've also seen the media consistently lie about him in order to poison the population against him, though. That's how propaganda (or "public relations", as the father of propaganda Edward Bernays rebranded it) works: it elicits emotional responses from its viewers instead of logical ones. Clever folks have been studying the best ways to affect the majority of the population, and the techniques can be seen all over the mainstream news.  They've used our emotions against us and created illogical neural pathways from a young age that are hard to overcome later on in life as neuroplasticity decreases.I think part of why I'm finally aware of this shit is because I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed prozac last year, a drug that actually increases neuroplasticity. It has allowed me to step back and really consider the ways in which I form my opinions and the ways in which those processes can be manipulated. On that note, I highly recommend [this book from the CIA on the best way to analyze intel/the news](https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/books-and-monographs/psychology-of-intelligence-analysis/). It's available in its entirety for free at that link. [info] None [info] 1485197678
scullayylmao [info] I was diagnosed at a relatively young age (about 14), but sufferer years before I told anyone or asked for help. It's not easy to ask for help as somehow we've created a stigma surrounding mental illness and it's still a taboo topic. What you have to do though is make sure you tell someone you're comfortable around. Whether it be a parent, family member or friend, make sure they're able to get you help to diagnose you. I told my schools guidance counsellor and asked that he call my mom and tell her for me. When she learned, she was upset I didn't tell her but understood and booked me an appointment where I was diagnosed with depression. There are resources you can go to if you're not comfortable telling family or friends. You can tell your doctor and ask for help. Remember that you don't have to tell everyone but make sure someone knows.  Please get help before things become worse. Wishing you well.  [info] None [info] 1450479828
BrightOctarine [info] Aaw, I have £9000 of student loans but was told to drop out because I was diagnosed with depression, hated it at uni because of autism and was struggling with the work anyway because of learning difficulties. The debt, on top of paying for the accommodation was well worth it for me and others in a similar situation. Well at least I lost 2 stone while there. And death gets rid of the debt too! [info] None [info] 1465260143
CanadianMapleJays [info] 16/M with non supportive family, looking for ways to get fit again. 140lb I've read the side bar and have lurked for a good few months now, but I've been meaning to ask for some advice if that's okay.I'm 16 and fairly healthy, I'm not skinny or in great shape, I have some fat but considerably less then before. I started to lose weight once I was diagnosed with depression back in middle school, and honestly I've felt great. The thing is, my parents hate that, they forbid me from many sports, make me eat every meal, and don't let me go out and exercise at all at times.I'm really scared because being obese was a fear of mine and losing a lot of that has made me so much happier, now that I'm beginning to stall it's just making everything harder to deal with.Is there any thing I can do? My family doesn't cook traditional foods so tracking calories is hard, but I try not to eat too much if I can help it, I also try to play sports when they won't know. I'm sorry if this type of post isn't allowed, I'll remove it if it isn't. [info] None [info] 1450856768
Synes7hesia [info] I know how it feels, Kontan. I was diagnosed with depression in my early teens, so I know what moments like these can do. I can't tell you that everything will be okay, but I can assure you that if you ever need a friendly voice or someone who can connect with how you're feeling, I'll be there. All you have to do is message me.You've got a friend in me, Kontan, and you have many other good friends here who care about you. [info] Sunset Shimmer [info] 1332903249
tss_happens [info] this is so interesting what you wrote. i am diagnosed with depression. i also have a sleep doctor and he prescribed Modafinil. After taking it for a few days i realised, that i went from dysphoria to anhedonia. I really can't say what is worse, but it feels that when I'm just dysphoric, at least i can feel pleasure from some cheesy things like eating junk food, watching shitty series or witnessing sunsets. [info] None [info] 1530791658
Lawnmover_Man [info] Please be aware that this will not heal or cure depression. Depression will not go away by listening to sounds. It eases the symptoms. Which is a very good thing. Have a nice time!source: I started to get into ambient music since I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1462736605
blackdav [info] I've always had a small interest in wrist watches that started during my school days. I had no knowledge of the history and art of watches. I was simply attracted to how cool it looked. Being a gullible kid, I used to buy fake watches from a senior in school who convinced me that it was authentic. I probably spent around 100$ in total which was HUGE for an 8th grader.   I think after that incident I just wasn't thinking of watches anymore. Now, I'm 22 years old and I've been diagnosed with depression so life was pretty rough recently. Then I started noticing watches again, I just did lol. Then I got really into it, watching TGV and his videos all day and surfing the web. I saved up and bought this watch (yes its authentic this time) and I absolutely adore it! Being more knowledgeable made me appreciate watches a 1000times more. And I gotta say, I felt happy when I got this watch and I rarely get happy over materials. Im not saying this cured my depression or anything but my life is much more fun now. Sorry for the long text, its my first post here and the mod told me I have to write something here. :) [info] None [info] 1540633630
holydeltawings [info] Have you ever been adjucated mentally defective (which includes having been adjudicated incompetent to manage your own affairs) or have been committed to a mental institution? Y/NYou answer yes to that, you're barred from obtaining a firearm. If no, why shouldn't you be able to? Do you believe you're a danger to those around you? I was diagnosed with depression and what helped me was going out walking around and hunting. But I was never mentally defective or institutionalized.  [info] None [info] 1548177351
TheBrotato710 [info] What do I do now? I've never really made an official post before, but I figured now is as good a time as any. I was diagnosed with depression at 16 and although I've made great strides in recovery, some bumps happen along the way and today a really big bump came along. I bombed a test. The first exam for one of my core science classes. I know a lot of people wouldn't really bat an eye at it being the first test and say now they know what the exams look like but it's difficult for me to look at it that way. I don't know how to "learn" what the tests will "be like." To me they're constantly changing and there's no surefire way to prepare. I've wanted to be a doctor and help people since I was 8 and I used to be one of the best students in my class. But now that I'm in the preliminaries I feel terrible. My GPA (3.2) sucks for med school and I got kicked out of the honors program my first year because I couldn't maintain a 3.5. My premed advisor who's supposed to motivate and support me straight up said I wasn't an "attractive candidate" and how I should reconsider my life. Most days I can ignore all the negative thoughts thanks to therapy, Prozac, and a genuine desire to be happy again but this failure really hit me. I did the calculations and even if I were to do perfectly on the remaining three exams, including the final, I'd only get a B+. My GPA can't handle any more non-A's. I just feel so shitty all the time during class and inferior to my other classmates. No matter how much I study or apply myself, it feels like all these other students who are just half-assing their way through the course always do better. It feels like no matter how much time I put into it some of my classmates can do everything without have to do anything. I try to learn the information but it becomes hard to follow and no matter how much I study, I just never seem to know the material well enough to answer a question 100% correctly. I try asking questions and talking to the professor but I can never pinpoint what exactly I don't know and even then she doesn't give a concrete explanation. It's just so frustrating because as much as I want to do well, I've lost motivation to do much of anything for the classes I take since I just can't seem to win. My family loves and supports me which is great but they're so convinced that I'm going to become this amazing doctor and that I'm so smart when really I'm just barely getting by. I don't want to let them down and I want to be able to support a family of my own one day. Sure, there are plenty of careers that can do that but how can I do any of them when I'm only good at this?? Even then, I'm not very good at it in the first place. Please, is there anyone who can give me any kind of advice? I would really really appreciate it.&amp;#x200B;TL;DR - I feel really sucky and I don't know what more I can do [info] None [info] 1583120483
Molozonide [info] I was diagnosed with depression today... [info] [♂] 24 B'more বাঙালি [info] 1466000178
TyphoonSignal10 [info] I think I might be trans, but I'm not sure. Ok, so I'm not entirely sure what's going on at the moment.I was assigned male at birth, and until recently I thought that I had lived the entirety of my life up to this point perfectly happy with that.Recently though I've been having thoughts about being female.I've started looking into things like laser hair removal surgery for facial and body hair, ways of wearing a bra without actually having breasts, and looking into what the fuck SRS actually is and entails.There's a part of me that feels as though I'm just looking into this out of curiosity, but another part feels as though I wouldn't be putting as much effort into this if I wasn't in some way serious about it. I mean, researching laser hair removal is one thing, researching the price, treatment times, and then calculating how long it would take me to save up for it is another, right?A large part of my problem is that I don't feel as though what I feel is legitimate. I'm 21 and don't think I've ever had these thoughts before, and this doesn't fit with the dominant narrative, which I know from research is bullshit, but still the doubts remain. I also don't feel particularly disgusted or anything by my body, other than the hair.There's a part of me that feels as though 'what if I'm just doing this for attention or to be cool', despite the fact that I know that being transgender is not 'cool' or a status symbol or anything. Part of me wonders if this might be due to internalised transphobia or something.The fact that I've recently been having these thoughts has also made me begin to question things from my past that I hadn't thought about in a long time, such as the fact that I was more willing to play with barbie dolls with my sister, than to play football with my brother.I've also been asking myself questions such as'would I be a convincing/pretty girl/woman?''What would my name be if I was female?''How would my friends react?'I've also always been significantly more attracted to playing female characters in videogames when given the choice, and more strongly identified with female literary characters over male counterparts.In addition to all of this confusion, I was diagnosed with depression last January, and have been on medication (sertraline) for it since last June, so a part of me wonders if maybe that has any effect on me. I just don't know.I apologise for the rambling nature of this post, I just needed to get it out of my head. I'm confused and I need someone to talk to about it. [info] Questioning Transgender [info] 1528995994
Mosanuu6 [info] Think I might be developing Schizophrenia Hey. I am a 20 year old man and I have a family history of Psychotic disorders and may think I’m developing schizophrenia. I have been diagnosed with depression and am currently taking antidepressants. I have become somewhat agoraphobic and have started having troubles in school. I’ve started noticing slight changes in my vision. I have never had hallucinations. Can someone please tell me symptoms of the start of the disorder [info] None [info] 1553689275
rhackle [info] I'm going to fail out of college... Options? I'm currently in my 3rd semester up at Georgia Tech.  I had a really rough time my freshman year, and finished with a 1.4gpa.. So I'm on academic probationI'm enrolling part-time this semester, and I just really fucked up a test in 1 of my 2 classes.  If I don't get a C or better in this class, I lose financial aid and I'm thrown out... So I pretty much know I'm toast.It isn't that I'm partying too much or anything... It's just I'm not motivated to do the work, and I never have the energy to wake up for class most days(I was top 5% in HS).  I was diagnosed with depression in Spring.  It went away during summer, but I feel it creeping up again with my new school difficulties.I know in my current state of mind, I will not survive at this school even if I do pass this semester....Where do I go from here?  CC? Military?  What's the best way for me to get my spark back [info] None [info] 1383756117
exxentricity [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was of age 13 or so. I expected at the time that I would be living a delayed 'timetable' life - ie, the 10th, +2, degree, then job, etc would get delayed by perhaps 2-3 years. But it turns out that things are far worse than that. Going into the teens I was diagnosed with bi-polar disorder and turning 20-21, I would be diagnosed a paranoid type. Meanwhile I dropped out of B. Arch, graduated as BA in Maths, was turned down at interviews (which I attended only because of people of the house would ask me to), etc etc. So, that's my life's 'plan'/expected road way and how it turned out. :) [info] None [info] 1493374740
wormhug [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 8 (or maybe some kind of precursor to it? I don't really remember), but didn't start any form of medication for it until I was 13-14, maybe a little older, even. When I was 8, my depression wasn't severe enough for me to be put on meds, plus I was 8 years old so my psychs weren't exactly pushing to put me on them. I stopped going to school at 12 and became incredibly resistant to any kind of help. I would  just sit there during sessions/meetings with my arms crossed while my mum and psychs tried to talk to me. I believe it was during this time I was diagnosed with clinical depression. I still refused to take medication because I was worried about getting fat. That was literally it. To be honest, writing that out feels ridiculous to me now, but I was an already chubby 12 year old girl who had major self esteem issues. But, after a while I had to give in and start taking antidepressants, because there was simply nothing else left for me to do. I was hopeless and suicidal and I figured I wouldn't make it to 16, so why not try them?They have definitely made my life (and the lives of the people around me) easier. They mellow me out, so I don't lash out in anger as much any more, when that used to be an almost daily thing. That made it easier to talk to my psychs because I wasn't so angry, and therefore, made me more receptive to therapy because I would actually listen to what they were saying instead of shutting them out.I truly believe that they were the first step to me getting better. [info] None [info] 1558345113
FuckingCouch [info] I don't know if I have a future. I'll preface this by saying that people who know me reasonably well have always been complimenting my supposed intellect, but I've never been especially motivated to succeed in most educational settings. Until recently, I was at least able to do most of the work, but this is no longer the case.My parents divorced just before I started high school, and each had joint custody of myself and my only sibling, my brother. I received adequate grades during my first 2 years at high school, but eventually, my father and his girlfriend, whom he eventually married, became increasingly emotionally abusive towards me. This culminated during my junior year, when I could no longer do my schoolwork properly because of my father's abuse, and as a result, failed.Initially, I tried to pass through the year again, but I was frustrated at being stuck with the same teachers I disliked from my last year and never being able to see any of the friends I had made, since they had all become seniors. I was so unhappy with the situation that I decided to drop out of high school and test for the CHSPE. After I passed the test, I got so fed up with my dad and his wife that I left to live solely with my mother.Because I had tested out of high school, my post secondary education was limited to community college. Again, my grades were initially adequate for the first two years. However, before the start of my fifth semester, my brother, who is two years behind me in education, graduated high school and got accepted into UC Santa Cruz.I was never envious of his success, just devastated that he not only had a full graduation ceremony, which I obviously didn't, but that he got to go to a university before me. Helping him move in only made me feel worse because I was surrounded by such a vibrant social atmosphere and the fact that he got to move into a dorm; both of which my community college lacked. My grades plummeted the following semester to the point that my mother had me visit a psychiatrist, and I was diagnosed with depression.Since then, I've taken the following semester off to improve my life in areas unrelated to education, such as medication, exercise, and a job. However, I still live with my mother, have barely any friends, and we argue on a semi-regular basis about my education and my future. I know that she means well, and I still love her immensely, but I feel like my life hasn't changed at all for the better since high school. It's gotten to the point where if I think too much about college or my future, I start to cry. I just want to find a clear path to success in my life. [info] None [info] 1390468015
Animeexpert [info] Depression wise, I think it can help some people, but also harm other's mental state. I find it to help, but that's just me. I've been diagnosed with depression for about 4 years now. I DO find tho that my memory is shit, including a decrease in my vocabulary. I think it really depends on the person, and what strain, and medication, there's lots of factors :))  [info] None [info] 1455441864
Diffabuh [info] A personal thank you for doing what you do, Teebs I saw that everyone was telling TB why he's important to them, and I figured now would be the best time. Don't know if you'll ever read this, TB, but here goes. Sorry if this is kinda long and rambly.I discovered the TGS Podcast (still can't remember what led me to it) in 2012, when I was in my last year of high school. I had seen some videos from you, Jesse and Dodger separately here and there, but didn't know you guys did a show together. It was good to hear you guys just talk about games, and I kept up with the show as best I could, since my friends and I were really into gaming.In my first year of uni, I had a lot of problems. I was diagnosed with depression, and I lost a lot of my friends (especially the ones I'd talk to about video games) because of my inability to really deal with it, and just because of the transition from high school to uni. All this together was why I dropped out of the gaming scene for about 2 years (last game I played in 2013 was The Last of Us, which I had to force myself to get) and moved on to another hobby. But I still listened to the podcast when I could, just to keep me up to date, even if I had completely dropped out of gaming. Some of the medication I was taking for depression meant I slept long hours, so socialising was hard for me, never mind adjusting to uni life. But no matter what time of day it was, I could always put on a podcast or video and get caught up on the games industry while doing whatever. It really helped me through this dark time.Eventually, I worked through a lot of my problems, made new friends and decided to get back into gaming. So in early 2015 I bought an Xbox One (stop, I know, mistake) just because I wanted something familiar in Halo and Tomb Raider... but after a while, I decided to build a PC because... well, I was working a crap job and needed something to aim for. Plus, I heard you talk about PC gaming being such a better experience... also, Fallout 4 mods. So by mid-2015, I'd built a gaming PC and didn't even end up buying Halo 5 or Rise of the Tomb Raider in the end. Instead I played Transistor, Shadow Warrior, Ronin and Civ V. And eventually, I just bought Rise of the Tomb Raider on PC, and lo and behold, it felt better to play at higher framerates like you said. And I've not really struggled with depression in a while, either.So I guess thank you, TB, for rescuing me from the dark realms of 30 fps. But seriously, you, Jesse and Dodger helped me through a dark time in my life by just doing what you do. I hope this new subreddit works out for you and you keep doing what you love. Anyway, thank you, TB. [info] None [info] 1465718122
sydneystew [info] My father has major depression and I was only told when he was in the hospital for treatment. What they didn't tell me was that he was suicidal and that's why he was in the hospital. I didn't find out until recently when I was diagnosed with depression as well. They also told me that my dad had a brother who committed suicide in the house and my teenaged dad was the first witness. I always thought he was an only child, at least no one told me otherwise. [info] None [info] 1440730716
Brooklyn8828 [info] [Q] What is confidence and how do I know I have it, not so great at socializing/feeling like I lack confidence To start, I have been diagnosed with depression and there is a good chance I have a small amount of Aspergers =/. Okay, well my social life is not great because friends just left me,or I didnt know how to act. I am now going to therapy for both.Lets back up awhile.... I had things horrible ,I was distraught, upset, lonely and felt horrible. I do have hobbies I am passionate about, but I would stay in my room for hours just sitting on the computer in the past. Well, one day, something hits me. I get introduced to a girl. She was a mutual friend of others. She and I talked to each other for a bit and I told her about myself and she explained about herself. However, I had my head in my lap practically and could not even talk to her as I was nervous to talk to a girl yup, 18 year old guy nervous to talk to a girl that really was interested in me and was so outgoing=/I have grown alot, but how do I know that when I am talking to a male or female, I know what confidence is and that I have it?TLDR:basically my title, what is confidence and how do I get it and show it? [info] None [info] 1433621126
bluevero [info] I can't mention that I'm depressed or having a panic attack because people will say stop being sad, stop crying, or just forget about it, it's nothing, it will pass. But when they are just sad, it's okay for them to say they are depressed. I have been diagnosed with depression almost 25 years now, they have not, ugh! [info] None [info] 1561439103
melon_pan_ [info] I think I had a panic attack, but I never get them. (Probably)  (backstory kinda) I haven't been told by professionals that im hypochondriac, but my sister who is studying medicine did. i tend to overreact to the smallest pain or to me feeling like i have a fever(which i never do when i check). So when I do feel like I'm sick, I try to rationalize my symptoms to make sure I'm not overreacting, or at least tryRecently watched a show where the main character gets a panic attack. i thought poor them, and went along with my day. today at school, i start drawing and i notice my hands shaking and my heart beating faster than usual. i take medication that the side effects are a faster heart rate. so i thought it was because of that. then i remember the show i watched and looked up symptoms of a panic attack. i didnt really have any other symptoms besides my heart racing and shaky hands. suddenly i start getting emotional and start freaking out. i chat with my sister to calm me down. im calmish now but still feel shaky. i feel like i had a panic attack because i watched the show and looked up the symptoms. i cant trust myself to assume i had a panic attack.if this helps, i did have similar symptoms before starting my medication, minus the shaky hands. I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD. i only take medication for ADHD. i dont think i have depression anymore, but i dont know if that can ever go away. [info] None [info] 1551739090
weenzmagheenz [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 13, and have been on medication since then. I'm 23 now. I noticed that I had a harder time retaining information about 5 or 6 years ago, but honestly just figured it was related to alcohol or weed (although, I don't drink a whole lot... and although I used to smoke for breakfast, lunch, and dinner, I haven't at all in a few months now). It seemed all the more obvious that I have a bad memory because my fiance has an excellent one. I honestly just figured I was losing intelligence... didn't realize that other people had this same issue. And I haven't really had the motivation to look into it so I had kind of accepted the fact that I was... for lack of better words... getting progressively more stupid. Knowing that it could possibly be related to my depression is actually kind of inspiring, although worrying at the same time, but I think I'm going to do some research about it now... thanks, Reddit!  [info] None [info] 1380930929
spqr_br [info] I've been diagnosed with depression. It's pretty widespread in the JW world. I guess leaving this cult always causes some kind of mental health issue. [info] POMO, ex-MS [info] 1548116168
Accomplished_Drummer [info] I was a quiet, nerdy, sad girl. I was also told that I was manipulative and was my "real bad self" at home because I'd frequently have panic attacks or meltdowns after abuse, but wanted to maintain at least some kind of reputation at school so while I'd cry, I would just hide in the bathroom or whatever. I was told I was spoiled and selfish, because I had something like an old playstation console and cheap toys while not having more than 2-3 pairs of clothes to last the week, or dental and medical care.When I was diagnosed with depression in the 90s, that's when the name-calling and label of "bad" started.  [info] None [info] 1552506157
misshobbitkisser [info] I wasn’t a “problem child” I was diagnosed with depression at age 12 and have been on medication since then. I have made significant progress, and feel much better. Part of that is unlearning things that I was manipulated to believe. One thing was that my mental illness was just me being a problem child, making my family miserable because I was an ungrateful brat that just wanted attention.Me and Nmom were eating dinner tonight. She was on the phone with her sister. They were talking about how polite one of my cousins in Pakistan is and what a good girl she is when my mom said, “Our kids were raised here and they don’t have that kind of attitude.” I practically had a flashback. I was 12 again, in my bedroom, sitting on the floor. I could tell you exactly which pajamas I was wearing. I had just gotten out of the shower. My hair was wet. My mom was on the phone with her sister. She was talking about how ungrateful me and my sister were and how she wished she never had children. I didn’t even know what I did. I just felt awful about myself. I cried and cried and took out the fabric cutter I used for crafting and cut my wrists. I stopped crying, went into the living room and watched tv like nothing happened before going to bed. I remember my counselor told my mom I was cutting again on mother’s day. I handed my mom flowers and she said “I don’t want it. Your counselor already made my mother’s day” and she guilted me the whole way home. I remember times I came to cry to her and she just yelled. One time I was depressed and she threatened to take my phone away as if I did something worth being punished for, Weeks before I attempted suicide, I remember her being terribly mean to me. I didn’t even know what I did. She was tired of me being depressed all the time. I told my sister I wanted to kill myself and I didn’t know how to tell mom. My sister told me it was just teen angst and I shouldn’t tell her because I’d get over it. I still haven’t gotten over it. When I was seventeen, I met my abuser. He was my “friend”s 40 year old father. Weeks before I met him I was having a hard time with my mother again. He made me feel like I was his girlfriend, that he loved me, and that he would protect me. I remember hugging him and kissing him and crying into his chest when my mom said something that upset me. I remember I used to text him when I cried at night. We went out every Friday night, and it was like the perfect escape. Until he started manipulating me and being violent. My mom blamed me when she found out about us. She thought I was just an out of control teen. I protected him. She thought I was a whore for this. She used to wake me up in the middle of the night and yell at me, tell me she wished I had killed myself successfully, said she wanted to strangle me. I cried for him more. I went back into contact with him for six months before cutting him off again. My mom was still throwing it in my face a year later. Two years later she threw it in my face. I tried to confide in my sister. I was ready to tell her it was too much, tell her that he was horrible, that though I insisted I loved him, he manipulated me. I was getting ready to tell her he raped me and that’s why it hurts that mom thinks it’s my fault when she said “Oh my god. Don’t be dramatic. No one manipulated you. It was your fault.” I remember the electricity I felt when I told my 63 year old professor about my 40 year old boyfriend in high school, and I remember when he put his hand on my arm and when he hugged me. It felt so safe. Until I found out I got so emotionally involved with a man who had a girlfriend. Men have been my drug of choice. I was literally in the office of a 52 year old a month or two later, getting my high. In a way, it makes it better. Part of the fun is that my mom would kill me if she knew where I was. I don’t feel bad anymore. If I’m a problem child, she made me that way. [info] None [info] 1576120044
kotanasu [info] Do we need to live like that forever? Hi there. I just needed a place to ask this because I have really dark thoughts for a year now. I have been diagnosed with depression when I was 22 and I never got therapie, only used lexapro for a year when I was 29 and all it did was killing my sex drive. Now being 30, having had failed 3 startups that I founded and moved to another country which fucked up things even worse. I lost my job and there is no real good job opportunities for me. (Especially in germany, entrepreneurship is stigmatized and seen something like misfits does. Cant even get interviews) Now with everything is sucking even harder after all these years, I think about trying meds again since therapie is expensive and I will be broke very soon.Even though the last med was useless, I still think that maybe something will help. Otherwise  thinking about killing myself every morning is not helping me to find a job or enjoy anything in my life. Is people with depression live every day like this? I dont think that I am strong enough to endure that for more time. Thanks a lot for reading through. [info] None [info] 1557779647
Vormarz [info] Depends on what you mean by broken. Defeated and beaten down? Yeah, sometimes. I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 17, and I'm beginning to suspect that it may have something to do with dysphoria. Broken as in "not right"? Always, but only because being transgender isn't normal. Now, not being normal isn't a bad thing. But sometimes I think it might be simpler if I never had thoughts about being the opposite gender. [info] None [info] 1557162500
facingthegods [info] Hi sweetie. I've been diagnosed with depression for 10 years and BPD for a few years, although I definitely have had BPD the whole time. I want to tell you that it does get better. It takes a lot of work, and you have to believe that you are worth all the hard work. This year I was expelled from my university and lost my boyfriend of 7 years and I am still here. I am just like those annoying self help posters, it really does get better and you seriously are so much stronger than you think. I heard once than living with mental health problems is playing the game of life on hard mode. You know what's awesome about hard mode?? The feeling when you finally beat a boss is SO AWESOME! One day you will realize you're a little better than before and it will feel so incredible. I promise it is possible, I thought I was doomed too but we are not doomed my dear.  [info] None [info] 1420093254
sadperson1234 [info] How functional are you with your depression? I've been diagnosed with depression but I'm confused with my own diagnosis. The bad parts are very bad - but I can easily lock them away and go about my day like normal when I've left my house. No one on the outside sees any sign of depression and I can still enjoy and feel happy with social interactions. I struggle to feel any hurt anymore or any sadness - I'm replaced with a feeling of apathy and not caring. Anxiety is also replaced apathy even when everything around me seems to crash around me. I don't even feel anything when hearing about death of family members, when a relationship of 2 years ends or just any of that. But I can still feel happy emotions?Has anyone else experienced a similar kind of depression? What have your experiences been? I'm confused with how my mind works. [info] None [info] 1508545058
Multicarver1 [info] Help I’m 14 and in high school. In 5th grade I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD and I have been living with it my whole life. In the past couple years it has been better but the past 4 months it has been coming back stronger than ever. Events keep piling up on me and making my life miserable. It’s like someone is trying to force quit me, and it’s working. I’m not going to get into full detail but I know that I need help and I want help but I just can’t bring myself to asking for it or going to a therapist. I don’t want to leave my parents and brother and friends but it’s feeling worse every day [info] None [info] 1547002088
ArcticWolf06 [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 16 and was put on medication. A month later I came to the realization that I did not want to be dependent on a drug and instead just ignored everything, all emotions, and simply worked hard. The hard work and accomplishment gave me an endorphin rush, and the emotions to continue working.I feel like people stop enjoying things they used to like, and start loosing all emotion because your brain really, really, wants you to do some work. Don't let stress or feelings of being out of control rule you, simply start working on bettering yourself. Your brain will reward you for it, and after being starved of happiness, you might become addicted to work. In many cases of people I've helped, a solid, full, nonstop day of work (like, personal things, shit they need to get done) is enough to break the downward cycle and start you heading up.Exercise is also important, gets the blood going, fresh oxygen, and also gives endorphins. It's quite difficult to be depressed when you are feeling exhausted, are dripping sweat, have an endorphin rush and feel accomplished. [info] None [info] 1382896245
mronion82 [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 17- not the 'omg life is hard' teenage blues, it was the start of a problem that dogs me to this day. It was very difficult to get help, partly because it was assumed I was an angsty teen. That was 20 years ago, I'm sure it's more difficult now. [info] None [info] 1550866228
sphynxist [info] How can I stop crying often? I was diagnosed with depression over a year ago, and am on citalopram 20mg daily. I do not go to any kind of therapy and do not see my doctor except to prescribe more medication every 6 months. I'm struggling with crying often. I feel as this is fairly new, little things will get me as though I am hormonal (I'm not always) and I will cry. It has started to be gentle tears turning into a full blown cry. I am struggling to communicate with my boyfriend as I burst into tears when we talk about things, even if they are not cryable offences. I worry that I will jeapordize our relationship as I am big on communicating but can't do it myself without crying! I'm sorry if this is the wrong place to post, I don't know where else to ask. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1450640815
electricskeleton [info] Can't deal with parental expectations. Would love some help/ideas A bit of background: I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago and puto n Lexapro. It's been working pretty well and I've started to get some of my shit together but I'm still majorly struggling with university. I dislike my degree to begin with but I'm barely scraping by.My mum has always had stupidly high expectations about how I look (she's obsessed with being skinny and diets) and whether or not I have a boyfriend but I've started to stop it getting to me. However whenever I tell her I can't cope with uni and want to defer she keeps going on about how I'm wasting all my potential and will go nowhere in life.I live at home and don't earn enough to move out. I don't know what to do anymore. Any ideas, tips or general help would be greatly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1344746236
d8x [info] I really want to get off of Prozac ASAP, but my doctor is obsessed with it since I have been diagnosed with depression since eighth grade. I think he feels like he is killing two birds with one stone, but it really sucks being on it.  [info] None [info] 1424969459
darkflame798 [info] If video games aren't doing it for you man don't force it... I was diagnosed with depression but I found that video games have helped me sometimes and other times I've just been miserable. What I found has helped has been companionship/friendship definitely try to make friends or if you have a good bit of friends try to hang out more often.  [info] None [info] 1386103804
Jessykosis [info] When I was about twelve I realised I wasn't just different and begged my mother to get me some help. She told me I was just being dramatic and got mad. A couple of years later I was diagnosed with depression and autism and I'm now in the process of being diagnosed with OSDD. [info] None [info] 1545767599
TheThrowawayColorMan [info] I don't want to go anymore. It didn't make me feel better anymore. It's usefulness had expired. I was diagnosed with depression a long time ago. I'm comfortable with that and feel like I can cope with it best on my own. [info] None [info] 1450021533
francois_hollande [info] There's groups that meet 5-6 times a week at 4 Fort Street which are run by ADAM/FACES.CMHA has a PDF list [here](http://winnipeg.cmha.ca/files/2014/05/Winnipeg-Mental-Health-Workshops-and-Support-Groups-updated-May2014.pdf) that has a bunch listed. It's from May 2014 though so you may want to call to make sure adresses and whatever haven't changed.You can also call Winnipeg CMH and ask for a self referral to get a mental health worker who can help you navigate everything. It's best to start that as soon as you can though since the wait time can be several weeks. It took me from mid March-early May to get one and I was on the high priority list.You might also want to see if you can be screened for other disorders by a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with depression/ADHD when I was ~14, and I was just very recently told it was actually borderline personality disorder (I'm 27 now).Best of luck though, it's a real bitch to deal with :/ [info] None [info] 1466008776
darkinday [info] Blankness and dark swirlies I just found this subreddit today, and at the rate I feel, this is a good start, I suppose. I was diagnosed with depression a few weeks ago. Started taking my medication a week ago. But today is the worst I've let myself feel. Before seeing my psychologist, and doctor, I was really good at faking the happy feelings. My feelings and emotions were and are hollow. There is no depth of emotion. The emotion I do feel seem stunted, and sometimes I question what I feel. I'm so full of self-doubt that it cripples everything about me. I'm hopeful for the future, as much as I can be. But today, today was hard. I went to work, did my thing, and came home. I took a shower, but I can't seem to do anything else. Talking out loud takes too much energy. Typing this post hurts. Tomorrow will be better. I hope it will be better. Please let it be better. [info] None [info] 1394759049
TetraDisaster [info] 1.) Will I ever find my calling in life?2.) The person is myself. 3.)Name: Chris, Age: 24, Scorpio, Hair Color: Brown, Skin Color: Very White, Eye Color: Hazel3.)Pick 3 words to describe this person: depressed, pensive, kind.4.) What would you like to get from this reading?: It's been 2 years since I've graduated college and I'm now between jobs really unsure which direction I should take. I'd like some insight into whether or not I'll find the right path for myself. 5.)I already listed these traits before I can list some more adjectives: hesitant, passionate, and stubborn.  6.) Nothing other than I have been diagnosed with depression.7.)"Please shuffle and cut the cards on my behalf, thrice." [info] None [info] 1413882260
kasperkirksings [info] Ooh shit, I dont have a question, but i relate. I found the word when i was 14 that really made everything make sense. Transgender. It's still correct. But my family is abusive too, I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 8, and I've wanted to die since 9 or 10. I'm sorry you wanna die, i dont encourage it, but I get it. You're not alone though. You're never alone. :) [info] None [info] 1568604146
SkyeEDEMT [info] It's a tad long, TLDR at end. - Every semester I sign up for pilates, the class meets twice a week and attendance is 100% necessary. When I go, I tell myself "I am going to work out. I am going to put effort into it. And I am going to enjoy myself, releasing all this tension, helping my back and shoulders, building strength." If I don't do that I'm lazy and miserable during the workout. Looking at the clock every minute. - I finally found something that relaxes me. About five weeks ago I started taking better care of my skin. Washing it twice a day and using toners and moisturizers. I also have a ton of face masks. Maintaining hygiene (or fixing it if I've let it go astray by sitting around miserable all weekend) is now a key for me. Taking a shower, getting clean really helps my confidence. I feel like at least I have one part of my life together. Taking care of my face is very relaxing for me, I treat it as a pampering than just another thing to do. Facial masks are awesome. - the place I find most comfort in is my truck. My truck is my safe place, I feel like I have just enough control, cause I have control over where I'm going and how I react to things going around me, and I don't have to think about it like I have to do in real life. If someone upsets me in life I have to think how I want to approach it. Then I gotta do it and it's stressful. If someone starts slowing down while I'm behind them, I just slow too. It's second nature since I drive 6-7 days each week, for a minimum of 40 minutes/day. So sometimes I just have to get into my truck and go. Also, sometimes I don't listen to music. I've been doing that a lot lately. So often we're exposing ourselves to so much stimuli, it's almost constant. And I have lucid dreams so sometimes even in my dreams it's constant, I'm aware and make decisions as I'm asleep just like I do in life. So being able to drive, perform a simple activity controlled by mostly muscle memory, in quiet - that helps me. - nutrition. I'm no nutritionist but we all know the basics. If you don't TedEd has some awesome videos on it. During bouts of depression, sometimes I forget to eat, or I eat a lot. For the last month it's been McDonald's every day, sometimes twice a day. I have not had McDonalds since Thursday, which is great considering how often I had it before. It has made a great change, I'm less sluggish, more aware, less sore after pilates. My body is so much more capable when it's getting the right fuel. - I see a therapist every 3-ish weeks. Took me a bit to find one that worked best for me but he is awesome and the techniques he's taught me have really helped. - sleep. I'm careful on making sure I'm sleeping well. Making sure I'm sleeping around 7-8 hours per night. 9+ hours makes me more drowsy so I'm careful with that. Not too little, not too much - Balance. Also sleep quality. I love my memory foam pillow. I keep my air at 68 degrees, which I think is around optimal temperature for sleep. There's likely more. I was diagnosed with depression last year in March. But that's all I've got for now. Sorry it's long. TLDR: Exercise. Relaxation. Hygiene. Place of comfort. Good nutrition. Therapy. Quality sleep. General mindfulness, trying to catch the signs early.  [info] None [info] 1493108958
MadbonesbaD [info] I work with boilers - Get an alarm for carbon monoxide ASAP it's not that it can save your life, it WILL save your life. As for what you're experiencing it could be mental health or paranormal, I've had similar experiences where I've heard someone shout my name from downstairs or literally as I've just got into bed. I don't have schizophrenia but I was diagnosed with depression (I'm ite now) but your mind can really play some tricks on you if you're in that state [info] None [info] 1556752001
EnglishMobster [info] There are a few different ways in which depression can manifest itself. A lot of what is mentioned here are some of the apathetic symptoms, but I'm diagnosed with depression and don't really get those same "nothing matters" vibes everyone else gets.Instead, I get something else entirely. I get [automatic thoughts](http://www.webmd.com/depression/features/cognitive-therapy), which are basically negative thoughts that are always popping into my head.These thoughts always tell me how worthless I am. How nothing I do will ever make anyone happy. How much happier people would be if I wasn't around. Why should I get out of bed? All I'm going to do is ruin someone's life today with my presence. It tells me how I'll never get to do anything you've ever wanted to do, how I'm going to be a miserable failure, how I should just kill myself and get the damn thing over with so everyone around me can be happy.For me, it doesn't feel like "nothing matters." Instead it's the opposite -- everything matters, everything you do will hurt someone, you shouldn't even bother trying because you're so pathetically worthless.Now, the logical side of me knows this isn't true. But it causes you to examine everything everyone else does. For example: "My girlfriend didn't want me to come over today because she's thinking about breaking up with me because I'm such a shitty boyfriend." It *probably* isn't true, but those thoughts *constantly* invade your head, even when you're trying to sleep.What usually happens to me is I wind up crying for a few hours every night until I fall asleep. If someone says or does something which triggers an automatic thought and hurts my feelings, I have to fight the urge to break down in tears. I stress out about absolutely everything because I always feel *I'm not good enough* to meet what people want from me.It's not that the world seems shitty to me. The world is great! But I feel like *I'm* the shitty one. [info] None [info] 1402834614
mattthewhore [info] What i use and why i cant stop I used pencil pairer blades as they get sharp deep cuts thay bleed alot. I dont use raisor blades as the cuts close up to quicky. I cut everyday as its become a routine. This is why i cant stop. I started in secondary school and i havent stopped ever since. I am diagnosed with depression and people try help me with this but i have heard alot of thearapists say "i cant help you"  so that makes me feel guilty and to hurt myself more. I get a high or a buzz from cutting. A sense of happiness which i know it is fake but i do it anyways.Please dont take any tips from this. The only tip u should take is to get help. My arms will never EVER be the same and they constantly feel like sand paper. You will never be able tp look ur loved ones in the eyes the same. Please get help. No matter whats wrong someone is always there. [info] None [info] 1576857646
Mexican_Jedi [info] Was I falsely diagnosed with OCD? I was very recently diagnosed with pure o and the I just can't help but feel like it's false. I have no mental or physical compulsions. I have no obsessions what are typically associated with OCD. No sexual, violent, religious, or generally bad obsessions at all. I do tend to obsess over whether other people like me or if I'm really a good person but those things are why I was diagnosed with depression. Now they're saying it's actually OCD and are putting me on a way more expensive drug! Why? This is bullshit. I can't help but feel like they're just trying to fuck me out of my money. [info] None [info] 1482232460
RikoThePanda [info] &gt;Probably going to type in a really long story here, so I'll add a TL;DR for all you lazies.&gt;I'll give you a backstory of my life before I go into any detail, I was a genius kid (130IQ) and was in all extended classes, father left my family when I was around 5, never saw/heard from him again, I was on Ritalin (ADHD meds) from 6 til 11 and stopped after some bad side affects, I was diagnosed with depression at 14 after smoking weed (heavily) for just over a year, never bothered to take my medication around that time, but it wasn't until I made the turning point in my life I made the decision to take them, which honestly made the biggest difference.&gt;Crime life started at around 13, with my mate from school, who I pretty much always was smoking weed with, I used to sneak out and we'd just get stoned and wander around, getting into mischief, it got worse as I did it more often, I met more 'bad' people and made more mistakes. My next bestfriend after this dude (we always had a bit of a problem with eachother) was called Ethan, and I used to hang out with him practically everyday, I would never go home, never tell my mum where I was (now that I think back, I can't believe the absolute stress I must have put my single mother, raising two other children through when I used to leave home and not come back without any notice for periods of time, this is what makes me feel the worst about my decisions, as I never even bothered to consider it when I was doing it). But everyday when I would chill with him, in the night we would break into cars and houses and steal hundreds and hundreds of dollars everynight, to feed our drug addiction. It got worse as we got better at being criminals.&gt;There is too much detail for me to add to be able to type out so I'll try quickly explain the time period when I was Ethan's friend. I had pretty much been smoking drugs everyday, been to juvie on two occasions, both times was only for 3 days, my mum bailed me out, and I realise now I never really thanked her.) I was also homeless for certain periods of being his friend.&gt;Life got really shit after we were checking cars one night, and no joke because we did this so often, three suburbs were always on the look for us car thieves (there was only us two), and this night we started really early to try maximize profits (6PM), bad decision. The third house the dude caught me and I ran, about two hours later when we were checking cars my mate gets caught by this dude going into a neighbors car and legs it, and I run too, in the opposite direction. While walking down the street to attempt to meet up with E around the corner, the same guy who caught me before (this time on a bike) found me, and started following me, I tried leading him around and then 30 minutes later, this 4wd drives up onto the pathway and stops right infront of me, four guys jump out, one with a baseball bat, and they begin to mob the fuck out of me, no joke. So after that, the cops were called, and I had to spend the worst night of my life lying in the copshop on a concrete bench. The next morning the popo came in and escourted me to their car, I asked where I was going and they told me to Banksia Hill Correctional Centre[1] this jail was filled with aboriginals and gearheads (meth), I was surprised by how fucked up most of these kids were at such a young age... but anyway, skip jail time and fastfoward a month...&gt;Mum broke me out, and again, I don't think I ever thanked her enough and as I'm typing this I'm really realising how much damage and stress and just plain hurt I must have put her through, and after this is posted, I think I'm going to continue to make things right with her as much as I can.&gt;But ofcourse, with my drug addled mind, and me being used to rolling on the streets everynight, no responsibilities, didn't handle being placed under house curfew and not being allowed to leave very well, and so within the week me and E were out doing crime again, skip all details from here to when I was caught again... My girlfriend, who was also homeless... but she was a beautiful and smart girl, was at my house when mum had left me home alone, so we decided to do cars quickly to get a few sticks tomorrow, I ended up getting two hundred dollars in about two hours and six packets of cigarettes, so I felt like I was king.&gt;early that morning we are awoken by two policemen knocking on the door, turns out they wanted to preform a search warrant and walked right through the UNLOCKED (FML) door and found me inside, they placed me under arrest and searched my house, found bongs, shisha, ciggies, and the cash. my whole family was pretty much called over at this point, making the matter so much worse... but after the police took me to the station, my grandad (the most important person in my life) came and saw me, and I could tell how much it hurt him to see me inside a police questioning room. After an hour chat, and another night on the cold bench (this was the worst night of my life, after losing all that stuff (which I didnt even work for, but I was so keen to enjoy), having my girlfriend being taken home in a cop car, plus the fact right before the cops took me, my uncle told me mum had told him she was really proud of me and the changes I was making the past week, this made my heart sink, because I didn't make any changes.&gt;Skip to jail time briefly, was in there for another month until my grandad bailed me, mum wouldn't take me home (no wonder why), and I spent the next three weeks at my grandads farm, I did farm work and this is when I started properly taking my antidepressants. After three weeks and a court visit, mum finally agreed to take me back, this was the happiest day of my life. After a few weeks living at home not really being able to do much, trying as hard as I can to resist all temptation, she gets me work experience at Mineworks Group[2] and after two weeks of that, the workshop manager told me he would really like it if I could come back after the holidays (time of wrk/exp was near Christmas) So, I came back as a TA (trades assistant) and kept at it for months, relapsing here and there (no big time drugs just having a session with mates now and again), and then people started saying I was getting lazy, less motivated, and looking tired all the time, I instantly gave it up, and made sure I was taking the antidepressants as I had missed a few days during the session times... After another month, work said they really liked my improvement and gave me an apprenticeship in heavy diesel mechanics. This was the greatest day of my life, even though I'm only earing 10/hr (which isn't bad, and working 8hrs a day 5 days a week, it adds up), I had finally did it, I got my dream job, for once in my shitty life I had achieved something.&gt;After a bit of saving, I bought myself a phone, which is something I haven't had in a very long time, so I decided to spoil myself with a Galaxy S4, and then later bought myself a car, (I'll post pictures in the comments after I've posted this) I got a Mitsubishi Triton MK 1998, brilliant condition, and a great car for $4500 (which my mum paid for half because I made such an improvement, but I still have to pay her back for it)&gt;So I guess that's my life story so far... If anyone has any questions about time periods I've missed out on while typing this go right ahead, AMA, don't think you'll offend me.&gt;Edit; sorry I forgot the TL;DR&gt;TL;DR 13 drug addict, 14 drug addict criminal, mixed with family troubles and me not taking meds, 15 everything doubled and became worse and then finally at 16 made my life changes and achieved something in lifeOP's background story. So what did you do that you might get arrested now? [info] None [info] 1394487308
Viirkrasaar [info] F17 I'm lonely A while ago I was diagnosed with depression. Some of my friends decided to just stop talking to me.One of them decided to start  talking about my mental health behind my back and has told me that he's ashamed of me.Obviously, that didn't really help me in any way, so it feels like everything I've done to try to get better has been for nothing. Like I'm back at square one.I just want to meet someone who understands and doesn't treat people like shit. (Sorry if that sounds too depressing, I don't always feel like a mess, I swear) I really love horror movies, video games, anime and books. I also like animals and various types of music.Talking with people about their interests has always helped me feel a bit better so I really wanted to give this a try.I really want to be friends with some of you. [info] None [info] 1526418902
Yoshi-Toshi [info] I have extreme mood swings and I feel like I'm going crazy.. I've been diagnosed with depression 3 years ago (been depressed for 7 years) and have made a lot of progress since then due therapy and medication. I stopped taking it 5 months ago since it didn't really help me anymore and my therapist started to let me down, treat me like shit and only prescribed me the medication again and again without trying to continue helping me to find the reason for my depression and how to deal with it.The first 3 months without medication everything was ok, I lived my life had some hard phases of depression but I always somehow overcame them everytime. But now I feel different. It's just like I am pregnant or in puberty again, I have massive mood swings, for example I have extreme depression waves for about 30 minutes, then become aware of my behavior and try to suppress it with hating myself and a few minutes later its just like it never happened. And the part that confuses me the most is that I often can't remember many parts of these mood swings. I just don't feel like myself anymore since they started, it's like I'm going crazy and can just watch me during this process. My boyfriend often has to witness my behavior and I feel so bad about it, that I often subconsciously try to "save" him from me, by being rejecting and in the next moment apologizing for this behavior. He is really supportive, so he fully understands that I was acting weird for the last two months but I just hate to do this to him.If there's anybody here who has got a similar problem, it would be great if you could help me or give a little advice because I really don't know what do anymore. I don't want to hurt others and I just feel so alone with my problem. For years my depression was only being months of sadness and later extreme suicidal thoughts and selfharm, but I never had problems with extreme mood swings, so this really scares me. [info] None [info] 1531883136
medschoothrowaway [info] Thank you, those are good suggestions for things to do. I do most of that already but haven't tried bringing articles/presenting new guidelines. As far as the MSPE is concerned, fortunately my school shows what parts of the evals get put into the MSPE. Usually it's watered down to be more positive, so rather than getting "X student had a solid foundation in medical knowledge and was able to perform all tasks as required, but needs to be more proactive and speak up more" you'd get something like "X student has a solid foundation in medical knowledge and cooperated effectively on a team" or something like that. I think Program Directors for residencies know however that MSPEs tend to focus on the positives, so they probably focus on whatever important stuff is NOT praised in the letter. And yes, I have been diagnosed with depression and have been getting treated for a while, but while I've had some improvement it's not a magic bullet.  [info] None [info] 1548575410
XTC_Aurora [info] My mom Ok, so my mom tends to get mad at me for no reason when she's tired. When she gets mad, she insults me by how I look and how I act, going as far as to say things like 'useless piece of shit'I've been diagnosed with depression, and she knows this, yet she continues. I'm terrified of being alone with her. This problem has gotten worse as time goes on. I'm not sure what to do anymore.I'm a 15F, and I can't just leave yet. I don't want to loose my mom, but I want her to stop beating me down for everything I do.Any idea would be appreciated.Edit cuz I forgot something: my mom also talks about how I won't do what she wants me to do to my relatives. They then confront me about it, while she's there, and I'm too scared to really tell them that no, that isn't exactly what's happening. [info] Helper [2] [info] 1586282796
rnbw_gi [info] "You can't be depressed, other people have it worse than you. Kids die of hunger", needless to say I cut that friend off and 6 months later I was diagnosed with depression because of a thyroid issue [info] None [info] 1566352799
Beachy259 [info] This was incredibly common on my Games Tech degree. Lots of people dropped out due to depression but I never thought I would. I struggled with the course but I wanted to learn but support from the university was almost non-existent. I had on-going family issues which were getting me down, coupled with getting behind on work just hit me so hard. My lecturers offered to to spend their free time during the day to help me and I agreed, but they never turned up at the times we agreed, if at all. I ended up spending most of my free time playing video games just to keep my mind occupied as it reached the point where the thought of my course was depressing. Once I was diagnosed with depression and put on medication, my lecturers didn't even care. The head of my course even told me that I needed to man up and completely dismissed my situation. I ended up dropping out of uni. A lot more happened but I don't have the time to explain everything.Now though, I have a well paying job with great opportunities :D [info] None [info] 1491985976
Jugglnaught [info] If you're suffering from depression, then you need to get yourself into therapy.  I'm diagnosed with depression, and I go once a week.  Plus, I've taken medication for years.  Trust me, this shit can help you.There's one form of therapy called Cognitive Behavioral Therapy that's helpful for depression.  Through it, you analyze all the sources of conflict and illness in your life, especially what you're telling yourself because of these conflicts.  It also helps you deal with future stress by developing tools and strategies to effectively cope with stress.Secondly, there's nothing wrong with taking a break from radicalism, focusing on yourself.  Even if you don't do that, it helps to have non-radical hobbies or pursuits to get your mind off current events.PM me if you have any other questions. [info]  [info] 1487023252
sgtBerbatov [info] That I've been diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1511887647
darkjasmine [info] Recovering from drug use and depression by praying and believing in God It might sound strange but I think by using drugs I kind of let bad spirits and really bad energy into my life because I had had very bad trips while using drugs and felt extremely suicidal, hopeless, the aura around me felt so evil and dark so in a way I feel like drugs might have brought evil into my life. It's been about a month since I stopped using drugs but the damage to me has already been done since I have been diagnosed with depression and I just started taking meds for it. The thing is, these past few days I've been having very evil intrusive thoughts and I've always been atheist but since I saw some evil stuff being on drugs I started to believe that there must be something good, that there must be something bigger than us so during the moment where I had these evil intrusive thoughts I started praying and my mind just cleared, I felt so relieved. So from on I will pray for my sanity and I hope I get better soon. It would be nice if you guys would send me a little prayer too. [info] None [info] 1583355227
stronk_fat [info] Not sure how old you are but I was diagnosed with depression as a teenager and ran the medication guantlet for YEARS. The meds made me a zombie and everything worse, so then they would swap them out and try some other new horrible pill. Turned out as soon as I moved out of my toxic ass parents' house I was fucking cured. Haven't taken a psyche med in 15 years and other than like normal people shit like when my grandpa died, I have been happy as fuck.Hope your situation improves. One thing I would suggest is never drop the mask. Play by the social norms if only to get by long enough to possible improve your situation. [info] None [info] 1561670601
xLumeni [info] I have been diagnosed with depression, GAD, body dysmorphia. So I have been on a slew of medication throughout the years. I find that diet and exercise work for the most part. I don't like to be on medication if it isn't absolutely necessary. [info] None [info] 1492716799
whycantijustdiern [info] Diagnosed with depression and enrolled in therapy today, told my dad who gave no fucks. Happy Halloween lol. I went to the doctor for the first time in years. I've been diagnosed with depression and I will be starting therapy soon.I was feeling okay at first, even better after talking about it with my Dr. I messaged my dad that I have been diagnosed and will be enrolling in therapy. The thing that sucks about WhatsApp is you can see 2 blue checkmarks when people read your message. So he saw my msg and blatantly ignored it. I don't know what's worse - being ignored vs his usual of insulting me via WhatsApp and belittling every decision I've ever made. Hurts to know that he literally doesn't care. Now I'm going to be thinking about this all night while I hand out candy to all the kids who trick-or-treat with their loving, normal parents tonight. [info] None [info] 1509485206
1angrypanda [info] I was diagnosed with depression about 2 years after I was diagnosed with crohns. I was sitting in my GIs office, and I suddenly broke down. I'd been thinking about suicide and I had no idea what to do. I was 16 and I wanted my life to be over. I'll never forget it, but my Dr took both my hands in his and said "you've been dealt a terrible hand, and quite honestly with everything you've been through, I'd be more worried if you weren't depressed." And he gave me some referrals. Getting where you are is honestly the hardest part. But there is a light at the end of the tunnel. You'll find what works for you, if that's mindfulness or medicine, all that matters is that it works for you. The best thing I learned is that even on my worst days I can come up with at least 3 wins. Today I felt pretty shitty, missed work, and started feeling it all come down on me, so I broke out my old trick. (Also I always feel like the typical "I'm blessed to have a roof over my head blah blah is cheating... 3 things that happened today!) So for today my three are 1: I watched the billy Zane episodes of charmed, which id forgotten about, and are hilarious2: instead of going to work I spent the day shopping online, which is always fun even when I have no money3: I made tomato soup for dinner and it didn't upset my stomach. It was risky but the only thing that sounded appetizing all dayThree things that prove to me my worlds not complete shit. Three things that I can focus on other than pain. I dunno, it might be silly and it might not work for anyone else, but it's made such a difference for me I always want to share it. TL;dr - crohns is a bitch, it's not surprising that it's hard to keep up a positive attitude. Seeking help in no way makes you weak, or dumb, or any of that bs. I hope you feel better soon.  [info] None [info] 1470206450
BigCheif537 [info] Your Breath taking! Thank you dearly, I was diagnosed with depression a year ago when I was in year 9 in year 10 now, and everything I think is going to be good is disappointing. Except this you deserve a medal from all categories of people you mentioned. Thank you, you made me smile and feel better on this Saturday night where I would usually play some games and feel sad and listen to deep music (still am doing the last one). This has brightened my night even more than the moon. And the fact that you have the time to write this justifies the time I am taking to write this. Really thank you, you have a gift to write, to move people and to create happiness out of sadness, [info] None [info] 1563628320
yokazakisama [info] I'm sorry. Thank you for still taking the time out of your day to reply, you are not at all selfish. I want to hope it gets easier. It's hard though, i feel like my entire life has just been a timeline of things getting worse and worse, it's hard to believe it'll be any different. Every time I thought I hit rock bottom, it only got worse. You are right, I do have mental illness. I've been diagnosed with depression so far, and OCD tho some were unsure of OCD being accurate (I think it's accurate). I went to mental hospital a few months ago after a suicide attempt. It gave me hope, but things didn't get better as I thought, they got even worse again. Pills made things worse and therapy isn't helping. I tried looking up a secular therapist and the nearest one is almost 20 miles away... Idk if my parents would be willing to work that out or not(Edit: somehow accidentally posted comment twice...?) [info] None [info] 1485430725
JessicaBoland [info] I always Do two things every day that make you a better version of yourself. I started small. I wrote something. I learned a word in another language. I kept a secret. Eventually it went to - I ran/worked out. I kept on my diet. Then it was I did one thing at work nobody asked me to do. I got better at something not related to my job. I still do this, going on 4-5 years. I've been diagnosed with depression since a teenager well into my late twenties. I'm approaching mid thirties now and this is the happiest I've been. Took a while. Brick by brick kind of thing. Pretty cool. [info] None [info] 1519381851
snarkofagen [info] Sounds like me just before I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1548542827
theoverthinkerr [info] Depression has consumed my ability to find interest in having a hobbies or passions. Basically ever since I can remember I have suffered from depression and other forms of mental disorders. It was roughly 2008 that I was diagnosed with depression. Moving schools, suffering from bullying then later down the track an eating disorder followed by anorexia and bulimia. I can remember being 2 years old and having negative thoughts and traits towards food and body image. I work in a full-time job, 5 days straight sometimes 9 or 10 days straight. My job is physically demanding, meaning I MUST stay nourished otherwise I wouldn't have a life or money to build a life. Which is great motivation. Although, on my days off or in my free time after work I find myself sitting around.. not knowing what to do with myself. I think to myself, oh! I'll draw... no interest. Oh! I'll play some guitar or piano.. no interest. Play sims? Build a house? Read a book? PAINT!?! NO INTEREST. I used to teach myself religiously piano and guitar, I would sing as well. I played soccer with a club, i would play sims for hours just building and creating. My parents and fiancé are constantly suggesting hobbies etc. but nothing makes me excited anymore... I haven't had a "hobby" or real interest in over 10 years. This all being said I am a really funny out-going energetic person. I am on a high dosage of anti-depressants. I just have this numbness towards passions. I watch my fiancé play guitar like a boss everyday. He then gets on the computer plays a shooter game, then searchers forums all night on how to build things etc. I just have NOTHING. I watch beauty gurus on YouTube, I clean ALOT.Other than that I work.. again ALOT. Basically I want to hear some strangers thoughts and opinions. I wouldn't mind knowing I'm not alone. [info] None [info] 1493282958
dudism_94 [info] What antidepressant worked for you, if you don't mind me asking? I have been diagnosed with depression for over a year and I think it's affecting my libido too. [info] 4 Days [info] 1575126972
imjustfutura [info] My Senior Photos are coming up and I can't think of anymore excuses I'm new here so I don't know if this fits or what I am doing is alright. I apologize if anything is wrong and I'll fix it right away.I'm about to enter my senior year of high school which means it's time to take senior pictures. Except the thought of it makes me want to cry. School photos are one thing but senior photos get sent out to more than immediate family. They go in permanent photo albums, on the walls of my teachers for years to come, in my last yearbook. They're my permanent reminder of high school. That thought is horrifying to me.I've struggled with my weight my entire life, or more of my self image. I thought I was fat for the longest time (when I really wasn't) but then I was diagnosed with depression. When that happened, eating was my coping mechanism. I've tried the last four years to lose the weight. I've tried different diets, workout plans, calorie counting, just about everything I can think of. I don't know what to do next and it's hurting me to know that the one of the biggest photos of my high school career is going to be of me overweight. I can't let this happen. Please help me.I'm open to anything. Any diet, any workout, any recommendation. I've been postponing the photos but I won't be able to keep pushing it off past August. Am I expecting a miracle? No. But please. I'll feel better knowing that in that photo shoot, I was trying and succeeding. I'm not expecting to be able to transform myself and drop 80 pounds in one month. Can anyone help me?I'm 16, 5'8, 220lbs. I have no dietary restrictions nor health conditions. Any advice is greatly appreciated. Thank you in advance to anything you can say. [info] 16F | 5'8" | SW: 220 [info] 1561768032
Ellice_Heywood [info] Aita for ghosting my best friend? Long time lurker, mobile format. Sorry for any grammar mistakes I'm terrible.So a bit of background me and my friend amy (fake name) have been friends for close to 11 years. She was my best friend. About 11 months ago I was diagnosed with depression. The past 4 months I severely dipped, it's been the worst time of my life. So much so there where attempts to end my life. Luckily I got the help I needed and I am slowly working my way out. Over these past 4 months Amy has been completly out of the pictures, she has made no effort to contact me, no asking if I'm ok, no helping me through the hardest period of my life, no support what so ever. I've spoke to her multiple times saying I was upset she wasnt there for me and each time she gets defensive and pulls every excuse in the book for why she hasn't been there. Even when I tried to end my life, I phoned her for some support and she was more bothered about telling me what she had done on her birthday than seeing if her best friend is ok. I have been there for her for every major crash in her life, by her side as her other 'friends' are only interested in drinking, doing drugs and causing drama. She always ends up coming to me instead of them.She messaged me last week to complaining about her boyfriend and to talk to me about some stupid headphones but I've been ignoring each one.Aita for ghosting her? Am I expecting too much?I honestly am starting to resent her for spending so long being there for her only to have it thrown in my face when i need her. [info] None [info] 1573573814
beezabubs [info] You have a good cry, and then you slowly heal and find another.I've lost my childhood best friend many times, but we always came back to each other. My high school best friend hurt me too much in her ignorance after I was diagnosed with depression, and having to end the friendship was honestly one of the most difficult things I've ever had to do.   [info] ♀ [info] 1502169498
OMmeUPscottie [info] Hi. I’m sorry you’re feeling so terrible. I’ve also felt despair. I was diagnosed with depression and both medication and talk therapy helped me a lot      I hope you’ll continue posting here so we know how you’re doing. IWNDWYT [info] 105 days [info] 1558186918
PossiblyTrueInfo [info] I was diagnosed with depression over a year ago and I have been on anti depressants for almost as long. [info] None [info] 1573415997
Embarrassed_Cow [info] Does your Depression medication help with ADHD? And how do you tell them apart? I was diagnosed with depression a good 10 years ago. My various psychiatrists have put me on SSRI's but they tend to only help with the emotional aspect and barely. They just up the dose and hope it works but it after all this time Im still having all of the problems that a lot of problems that people on this subreddit have. Ive been in undergrad for 8 years. I changed my major every year and Ive essentially failed most of these classes. I have no clue whats going on in class. Ill try and listen and end up thinking about some tv show, maybe a boy...really anything thats not whats going on. Doing homework and finsihing it are both obstacles. I love my major. I LOVE LEARNING. I always have but it seems like I just cant learn. I cant do what Im supposed to do. I dont sleep very well. Im constantly thinking and once I get a thought my mind likes it rides that train until the next morning. Im really shy and always have been so a lot of people have told me its not possible for me to have it. Ive always been very well behaved but Ive also always been terrified of people. Idk. I dont want to give you guys all my symptoms like yall are doctors. But no one else is taking me seriously. I feel really stupid all the time. Im surrounded by intellegent people and I cant hold a conversation with them. They say something and my mind seeems to run through every possible sentence until I blurt out something stupid. Sometimes before theyre done and im just not socializing well and dont have to many friends. I want to be smart and to keep going to school and be succesful but it seems like I try all the time and nothing thats supposed to get done gets done. Of course I am depressed but Im depressed because I feel like I cant actually live my life.Edit: thank you for all of your responses. Im sorry I haven't responded to all of you but yall have def given me the courage to bring this up with my doctors!TL;DR Im just ranting I'm sorry. [info] None [info] 1575023271
Boneal171 [info] My emo phase in middle school. I was diagnosed with depression so I expressed my inner feelings with my outer appearance. I wore black clothes and eyeliner and dark red lipstick. At one point I also straightened my bangs over my eye and added a pink streak  [info] None [info] 1488428027
Ampersandcastles_ [info] Oh my gosh! The crazier thing too, is that as a teen I was diagnosed with depression (living with an N will do that), and also attended therapy in addition to medication. The SAME THING happened in my sessions! The therapist would figure out that my dad was toxic, speak with my parents, and suddenly they'd send me to a different therapist until I finally refused therapy and medication and he thought the issue was put to rest.  [info] None [info] 1433462049
bodomfan91 [info] Just a shit test or should I end it with LTR? Hey guys, I'm in a bit of a predicament here. I've been with a girl for the past 8 months. Things have been pretty smooth until this week. She's given me shit tests before, I shut them down, we move on. This week is different. Before getting into what happened, I want to preface this with that I have been diagnosed with depression. Now I am doing all I can to combat that naturally. I lift 5-6 days a week, eat right, and make sure to get plenty of sleep to minimize the possibility of an episode. That said, here is what happened:Monday, we had a fight. Admittedly this one was on me, as I did end up letting my depression get the best of me. When this happens, I shut down and get distant and isolated from everything. Basically she got upset that I wasn't talking to her, and I got irritated and told her to leave when she was just trying to mess with me. As I said, this was my fault, there was no reason to act that way. She ended up leaving, saying that she wasn't able to have a good time when I am this way, gave me a hug and a kiss, told me she loved me, and left. We agreed to talk about what had happened on Wednesday night. I told her I had a company meeting that would be getting out around 8 PM and I would head over after that. So Wednesday comes around. I texted her saying I was going into a meeting. She replied with "ok, I should be home around 7ish." Perfect. Turns out the meeting got out super early. Around 6:30, about a half hour before it got out, I told her that we'd probably be getting out early, around 7. She replied with "oh shit." Now, she was out with her friend at this time about a half hour away. at 7, I texted her I was leaving, and she said she would be home closer to 7:30. No worries, she is running late and I got out early. Understandable. I arrived at her house at 7:15, and gave her a heads up I was there. At that time, she said they haven't left yet, and it would be another 30 minutes. At this point, I didn't feel like waiting outside of her house in my  car. She called me and apologized for making me wait, but I told her that we should just talk tomorrow, and I was going home. She flipped out asking why I didn't want to wait, and I said if she had sent me a text when I was still at the meeting saying she was running late we'd be good, but I'm not gonna wait outside her house like that. She said ok, bye, hung up on me, and ignored me the entire night. The next day, I woke up to a text from her basically trying to say last night was totally my fault and that I was treating her badly. At this point i just told her that I want to talk about this in person and not over text. Then she demanded that I tell her what the problem is right then and there. I said no, we will talk in person. She said she won't meet with me that night because she won't be home. I told her then we will talk about it another day, and to let me know when she wants to meet. Radio silence ever since. I am not planning on reaching back out to her until she contacts me.Obviously this is some kind of shit test, but 3 days of little to no contact? Not sure if I should keep playing the game or just hit the red button and end it. Thoughts? [info] None [info] 1502458286
BrandonNeider [info] I've been diagnosed with depression a couple of years back when I had healthcare but they never issued medication cause they weren't sure of the severity of it cause of looking over my life I was happy, but mentally I wasn't. [info] None [info] 1380346197
greasymcnugget [info] Having a preexisting condition can potentially make things worst down the road so be careful.I've been diagnosed with depression, mood disorder, and psychosis a few times in my life. I've been on multiple medications since I was 16 (and I'm now 22). 2 weeks ago I tried a 3.5 gram dose of magic mushrooms because I was so tired of the pharmaceuticals. So far, my life feels as though it has changed. I tripped for 8 hours and spent a lot of time being introspective and even reading my bible and just thinking about everything in my life. I'm not going to go into the details of the trip but it was one of the most amazing experiences I've ever had. I have felt emotionally content and more self-aware than ever. I highly recommend looking into Magic Mushrooms before giving anything else a shot.  [info] None [info] 1542477123
Bot_Highlights [info] I was diagnosed with depression so I been editing my gameplays to keep me "active". This is the final result so I thought in sharing. Hope you guys like it :) | /u/cidadaom [info] None [info] 1524415716
Dwheat88 [info] They shouldnt but they do. I was diagnosed with depression at 12 when i tried commiting suicide myself then due to never fitting in and always getting picked on kids can be assholes and some dont even realize what they are doing. [info] None [info] 1483545471
HeMadeARamblinMan [info] I logged in just to say that I am in a similar situation. Also 24, also kind of a failure at life. I'm trying my best to self-improve, but gets lonely. I was diagnosed with depression a year ago, and simply acknowledging the problem helped, even when the medication failed to make a lasting difference.So all I can say is, I see you brother, just keep your head down and keep going. We're not dead yet, and our families care about us too much for us to quit. [info] None [info] 1450911421
StillAFelon [info] When I was in high school my mom told me she'd been diagnosed with depression, I'd been cutting myself for about two years at that point. A few weeks later I tried talking to her about it and told her I'd looked into it and some research had shown that depression could have genetic links. I said that I thought I might have depression and wanted help. Her words? "You dont have depression, *I* have depression." I tried to kill myself two years later and then got charged with multiple felonies months after that. While incarcerated I was diagnosed with depression and dependent personality disorder. From time to time she tells me how guilty she feels for not getting me the help I needed. You've noticed it now, and you've been where she is. My parents told me *years* before I started cutting how gross it was and how sick you have to be to do it. Be better than my parents. Just show her unconditional love. She'll likely be distant, as I'm sure you know, but knowing you're there for *her* and not just yourself will do a lot, even if it doesn't "fix" everything for her, she'll have someone she can turn to to help her cope in a healthier way. [info] None [info] 1522902773
RobotPolarbear [info] I feel rather bad saying this, but yes. In many cases I do think it is selfish to have a child if you suffer from depression or other serious mental illnesses. I'm not talking about someone who has had an episode or two of depression. Many people suffer from a single episode of depression at some point in their lives and I certainly don't think it would be selfish for those people to have children.I'm talking about people like my mother and myself, who suffer from chronic and recurrent episodes of severe depression. Having a parent with severe mental illness was extremely difficult for me. I had to grow up very fast. From a very young age I had to learn how to take care of my mother when she was depressed, how to protect her from things that would trigger an episode, and how to modify my own behavior so that I wouldn't become a target of her anger when she was at her lowest. I was diagnosed with depression myself when I was just 11 years old. I was already self-injuring by then. From age 11 until age 26, I believed that I was severely mentally ill. I took medication, I went to therapy, I formed my identity around the idea of being severely mentally ill. As it turns out, my own problems were really just a symptom of living with and caring for other people who were mentally ill. Two years ago I finally moved away and started really putting myself first. I feel guilty about it every day. I feel like I gave up on my mom. I feel like I'm a terrible daughter. But I also know now that I'm nowhere near as sick as I thought I was. I've been off antidepressants for two years and I'm happy. I didn't know it was possible to be this happy. I decided not to have children because I know that if I did, I'd be putting them through what I went through. I know that no matter how hard you try, and no matter how much you love your children, being depressed *does* effect your children. I also know that depression is genetic, and I don't want to bring a child into this world that has these genes. That said, I think it's totally possible to be a good parent despite mental illness if you have it under control and have a support system in place. My mom never went to any kind of therapy and wasn't on medication until my teen years. I'm sure things would have been different if she had a better understanding of her illness and had help.  [info] None [info] 1405900425
FionnagainFeistyPaws [info] From happy to sad. In approximately 1 hour and 55 minutes, my dad will have been gone for exactly 6 weeks. It's hard. I miss him. I have shame and guilt over how things transpired in the end, when I just tried to do my best to make sure he was taken care of. I wish so many things were different. I saw that Michael Flynn plead guilty from a Megathread over on r/legaladvice and just lost my shit (sorry for swearing, mom), and my jaw dropped, as this is a huge political deal! I went to post it on Facebook (I hadn't seen anyone post about it yet) and realized that I really, really want to call my dad, and ask if he'd seen the news. To talk about it. To see what he thinks. And I can't, because he's gone. I'm sitting here at work, on Reddit (please don't judge, mom), and now thinking about my dad and trying really hard not to cry. It shouldn't have to be this hard. I miss him, and I'm kinda bothered by the fact that some of my cousins never even reached out to me. That I got lots of support while he was dying, but I've pretty much been alone in the 6 weeks since (alone as in none of his side of the family). I wish it would get better. Edit: I think one of the reasons this is so hard, I have been diagnosed with depression since he passed. I had it 20 years ago, but successfully addressed it and been a happy clam (I've been called a CareBear on Crack. I like to think I'm Lionheart). But there was so much in the last year, so much anger at him, so much anger from my mom he moved in, so much anger from my partner at my dad, so much anger at the cancer, arguments, disagreements, months without speaking to my father because I was so hurt by what he'd said, and I know I hurt him by doing so, at what the part of his life. I'm struggling, really struggling, and have been started on meds and every says I'm being really strong. I don't feel strong. I've been trying to figure out a way to honor my father, to do something positive and helpful for him. I have an idea... but I don't even know how feasible it is. I've messaged the mods to see if discussing it would be appropriate (it might violate rule 3a). I think I just need a hug. [info] None [info] 1512157514
pale-patdemic [info] Well, I went to public school for 6 years then went to a boarding school because I’m not good at being a student. Then I was diagnosed with depression, almost killed myself, and then recovered. Now I’m an avid player of videogames and a writer. [info] 15 [info] 1560743593
Con4mingNoncon4mist [info] Not sure what to do, really need advice. I've grown up in an abusive + islamic household and haven't really bought into Islam since I was a child. I consider myself an ex-muslim and don't want to be forced to follow islam. If I left, my family could possibly harm me. Aside from that, even if I still wanted to remain Muslim, the whole abuse thing is something I can't live with. I've been diagnosed with depression multiple times, and my parents have done little to help out, and only worsened it for me.       I know I need to leave and I'm trying to get good grades in order to be able to go to a university far from where I live, however every time I get a B (i've gotten one B this year) I feel horrible and as if I can't ever get out. I've become so obsessed with school. On top of that I can't study properly because my home life is awful, and that combined with depression makes it nearly impossible. I'm not sure about my chem class right now, I feel like if I get a C in it or fail it it will ruin my chances of ever leaving or accomplishing anything. I'm hoping that this belief is irrational.I just really don't know how to handle anything and  I am so overwhelmed. I hate this religion and what it's done to me. I hate being abused and have islamic "justifications" make it be ok. I hate not being able to do things because of islam, and I hate the way it commands people to make women's lives miserable (I'm female). Any advice would be appreciated, and thanks for reading this, as pointless as it may seem to me.Edit: I just read what I wrote and this isn't my best way of writing or explaining things but please understand that I'm feeling horrible right now. THanks [info] None [info] 1459557422
slipstream808 [info] I suffered this a LOT as a kid.  Now I've been diagnosed with depression for 14 years now. [info] None [info] 1532955461
superdancingmachine [info] Suicidal ideation but not depressed? I'm sure this has been answered a million times, but I can't find an answer that fits my specific situation, so wanted to ask myself.  I don't know if I should post this in /suicidewatch because I'm sitting at work thinking about this and won't go home tonight or in the future to try and commit suicide, but I will move it there if people think it's more appropriate there.I think about suicide a lot. At least once a day but probably more, and it isn't a fleeting though; I dwell on it.  Recently my favorite band lost its lead singer to suicide and when I found out the method, the first thing that came into my head was "yeah, this is how I'd do it too."  Yesterday I was driving down the road and couldn't really shake the idea of "yeah, I could totally just slam my car into this highway median going 90mph," and almost felt a physical tension as my conscious mind restrained my arm from turning the wheel.That being said, I'm not actively suicidal in that I don't want to die, and while I was diagnosed with depression ten years ago when I was a Peace Corps volunteer, it was largely considered a malpractice diagnosis and was situational at best.  I don't mind being alive, and I have fun with the people I love, do the things I'm interested in doing, have an amazing family who loves me, etc.  A lot of the time I feel happy.  I just get really tired sometimes (a lot), everything seems like a hassle to a degree, and in areas of my life professionally especially, I feel like I'm always coasting on mediocre and feel like I'll always be mediocre / kind of lost in what I'm doing (and if someone feels otherwise and that I'm doing really well, it's because somehow I pulled the wool over their eyes).  I can't concentrate on ANYTHING.  It takes a lot to get me out of the house to do social things, but once I do, I enjoy myself, and I travel a lot.  Life simultaneously seems like it's flying by and like it's creeping along.  Is this normal?  Is this something I should be worried about? I'm having a hard time even verbalizing this in a way that I feel like makes sense. [info] None [info] 1514931463
flashflashcarcrash [info] This is where my questions come in. I've been diagnosed with depression since 2008 &amp; have unfortunately had an abortion in the past. I also have tattoos &amp; a history of self harm  [info] None [info] 1427222798
Beelzebot44 [info] I understand it.  I was diagnosed with depression.  I solved it by focusing on something else instead.  It is possible.  Maybe not for everyone, but it is.  It is NOT possible to do with cancer.  The comparison isn't a good one. [info] None [info] 1509230642
deakers [info] Unmedicated, Unbalanced, and Uninsured So, I was diagnosed with depression back in 2006 (I was 16). Obviously, over the course of the last 11 years, I've been on a few different medications. A little over 3 years ago now, I was put on Effexor (well, the generic, but I'm not going to try to spell that...).Here's where the trouble comes in: I'm uninsured, and I *just* ran out of refills. I had to call a different doctor than the one I had last seen about 2 years ago (because my previous physician would expect payment in full at the time of service, and it'd be at least $400 that I don't have). I found a doctors office that accepts uninsured patients, and also does payment plans (with 20% up front). they're also cheaper than the doctor I used to go to. Sadly, they can't get me in until August 4th, and no doctor will give me any refills without being seen.Going to the emergency room isn't an option, they'd charge me $1500, and I will be there for 6 hours waiting. Not worth it. And the Urgent Care places near me won't do refills (yes, I called and asked).So, I'm a little over a week without my medications, and withdrawal is in full swing. I'm hearing my heart beat in my ears, my blood pressure has gone up, and I have vision distortion like a camera lens constantly refocusing.As if that wasn't bad enough, my depression is rearing its ugly head. I've been having a lot of issues with self worth, constantly being tired (then not being able to sleep), and feeling pessimistic. I'm normally upbeat, positive, and easy-going, and I miss that. It probably doesn't help that in about 3 weeks, my position where I'm working will be eliminated in about 3 weeks. So, I'm feeling like I have no value, that I'm useless, and a tumor on Society. I find myself just staring off into nothingness, feeling like there's static in my head, lights are on but no one's home.I've been talking to my partners (I'm polyamorous, I have a fiance, a boyfriend, and a girlfriend) about how I've been feeling, and they've been very supportive and trying their damnedest to try to show me that I'm not worthless. I know it's not easy on my fiance because in my pessimism, I'm seeing *everything* in a negative light, so much so that nothing he says is helping, I'm able to twist it into something macabre.I haven't had any issues with suicide/thoughts of dying yet, but I have told my partners to be aware of it. They're being as helpful as possible.I've been using some essential oils to try to boost my mood, keep my spirits up, but I obviously have very few options available. I've been reading that after a week or so into the withdrawal, then it's safe to try taking St. John's Wort, so I think I'll try that.I'm not sure what all else I can do to keep myself as level as possible, although I do know being with someone else helps because being alone means alone with my thoughts.I just don't know what else I can do to survive until my appointment, let alone not really knowing what other negative stuff I should anticipate... [info] None [info] 1500581575
AmeerRizviOnline [info] Its jsut a feeling buddy it passes. I dont know if you're religious, but do beleive that he knows you're suffering and calling to him is a good idea, no need to got to church or mosque or something. Remember what Klopp said, BELIEVE! 1st get away from social media (Facebook &amp; Twitter primarily). You do not need to know what the f*** all others are doing. You dont need their baggage, avoid all social posts and looking at them for just a month you will see the difference. Second, concentrate on yourself. Avoid that sarcastic friend, the girlfriend that gives you a headache and anyone else that remotely annoys you. Third completely change your routine. Sleep early, get your eating schedule in order and please STOP eating fast food. Get healthy diets, just a month thats all, you can do what you want after. Four, PRAY! Once a day, talk to god, tell him whats wrong and ask for guidance not a solution to your problems. Five, Work harder than before, more than before. You need to build yourself and your skill. Get involved in even the smallest aspects of your job tire yourself so you can sleep quickly. Finally, make running for 15 mins (thats all no more no less) a habit. You will notice that your mental health will also improve. Im sorry im not an expert or a doctor, cant tell you anything scientific. I tried this when I was diagnosed with depression and although I have lost alot on the way, I still have my life going in a good direction. Good Luck my friend !   [info] None [info] 1508926641
lynxwarden [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with depression at age 11, I'm 20 now. When I was in high school I had a bad self harming problem, I'm 3 years clean from it but recently my NMum has been so fucking horrible that the temptation to fall off the wagon is strong. I don't have a way out and into a kinder space for a year and it's tough  [info] ACoN, Aspie [info] 1531095977
soellipsesetc [info] I feel so sad... Well, it's funny how your life is fine one day, and totally bad the next.Background on me: 21, male, gay, single, midwest states, attending university, seeing counseling at my university.  I've been diagnosed with depression for 5 years. I'm in a fraternity, which a majority of my friends are from.  I don't really have many friends, I'm very shy and I don't seem to fit into the LGBT crowd.The last year, I met one of my best friends, and eventually fell for him.  He didn't (and still doesn't want) a relationship.  I can't stop thinking about him and he's one of the few people who can make me smile and feel like life is worth something.  This weekend though, I really pissed him off.  My depression makes me very clingy to him.  I somehow got into a nervous breakdown and mania stage and overtexted him on Saturday and got very upset at him.As a result of my breakdown, I asked to be put at inactive status with my fraternity(a status where I would not be involved/invited with the fraternity for a period of time).  During this process, I've said some things that made me even hate myself; but more importantly where it made my friends hate me.  I don't blame them.Well, the thing I've noticed is that everytime things go well in my life, I fuck it up with these mania stages.  I feel like crap, and have been crying the last 2 couple of nights/days.  I don't know what to do anymore, I feel so alone and scared with no support.  I wish I had someone who understood me and loved me.  I haven't been feeling like myself recently. [info] None [info] 1284349413
arcadejunkie [info] Perhaps you will forgive my invasiveness, but I have a few questions regarding the onset of the disorder.I am mostly curious about how your wife knew that something was really wrong, and at what stage of her life the more crippling aspects of the disorder came about. I have done some research into these sorts of things, but only from a communications standpoint--which is to say how people with mental disorders communicate and what is going on in their heads--certainly no clinical studies.I, too, come from a family with a history of paranoid schizophrenia; I, too, have creative leanings that are sometimes conquered by slight obsessive-compulsive tendencies, and I was diagnosed with depression in my early teens following my mother's death. I am in my mid-twenties now, and over the past five or so years I have noticed certain things that point towards my sanity slipping as well. For instance, during my time at college there was a period when my thoughts would lapse into a kind of circular trap that Gregory Bateson calls "double-bind" and R.D. Lang documents in his book "knots". They seem virtually inescapable and are very debilitating for several hours. They only occur at night, I have to let them pass on their own, and may be accompanied by auditory hallucinations (as I think I hear things that don't make sense in the context of being in my bedroom and bathroom) but I have no real way of knowing if I am hearing things or not. I have sought medical help for them before, but the doctors just chalked it up to stress, told me to get some Valerian root, and suck it up. Has your wife ever experienced something similar? [info] None [info] 1307756649
GRIMMnM [info] I was diagnosed with depression in high school. It was bad, I didn't know how to manage/cope with it yet, even on pills. My mom started giving me the option to skip school every once in a while just to take a day where all I had to do was maybe some house chores. It was great and I am grateful my mom did that. I didn't take advantage of it, this was only a thing that happened a few times between three years of high school, but I believe those days helped me a lot. So yes, but limited mental health days because then you could get into a bad habit of not pushing through the hard times when you need to the most. A break once in a while is okay, but you have to take what Disney taught us years ago to heart. Just keep swimming.  [info] None [info] 1523709903
ItsSilver [info] &gt; I agree that you should be more empatheticI never really understood why I need to be more empathetic.  I mean, I understand the whole "try to see things from their point of view" but the whole thing as a whole sounds to me like "throw a pity party for some one so your overall good day can now less than optimal"Really it likely comes from my stubborn personality haha. because my family moves a lot more often than a family should move *(from 2009-2015 we lived in 5 different states, 6 different cities every time we move I'm expected to help pack the garage, long story short my mom has a hoarding problem. not like "hoarders" level but our garage isn't usable)*  but all the moving really got to me, and our first move was from a large city (1.5mil people) to a smaller town (50,000 people) my brother was bullied in school and neither of us could find a job no matter how hard we tried. The town didn't have a community college and I didn't have the money to get into university. I was diagnosed with depression which kinda angered me  because I've always been "ontop of the world" before the moving. I didn't outlet it on everyone else because I saw it as "making others day suck because I wanted others to suffer with me" which is exactly what my father would do. so i dealt with it myself and the easiest way to explain it is I faked it till I made it. No real depression symptoms now, I've got ADD and that tends to fuel my anger because its hard to study when you cant focus on anything. But I say the depressions gone, Although my psych says that the depression might have just started manifesting as anger instead of sadness. ( he prefaced it with "its not really proven but its my theory") My theory is I'm just an ass. I told the manager of my job before my last the dearest thing to me is my education, and that no job comes before it. (I got fired for not showing up to two shifts that the asshat of a manager scheduled during my classes). And after my girlfriend snapped and told me that I shouldn't "get angry" when she bothers me while I'm doing home work I told her bluntly that if she attempts to come between me and my studies she can walk.I'm serious here. My education is the most important thing to me and no one and nothing comes before it. Not friends, not "love", not family. [info] ThisIsntSilver [info] 1458012189
AllYouNeedIsBeer [info] She said the same thing when I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1518281481
Harzoo_zo_Harzoo [info] Maybe they don't really know where your at. Or how to help. I was diagnosed with depression 15 years ago, and I kind of see both sides. It's embarrassing or painful or fucking degrading to talk about. I wouldn't know how to deal with my condition from an outside perspective. I think people care about you. More than you know. I do. [info] None [info] 1420025499
ExtraBread [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and have gone to psychiatrists and taken anti-depressants and all that shit, but this post kind of pisses me off. No offense to OP, I'm sure your heart is in the right place and all that... Everyone has their own unique situation. Some days are just so shitty I want to get zonked and forget about all the bullshit. Sorry if I come off as mean or whatever, just how I feel personally.  [info]  [info] 1386364316
K31FF3R2 [info] I was diagnosed with depression and adhd at 12. I essentially said “fuck off” grew up and experienced life, and picked up a few “coping strategies” or views on life and how I process the world and I totally agree. People think you are downplaying depression or other mental illness, but I don’t believe that. I even remember feeling alienated trying to open up to friends and they would tell me “dude you have nothing to be depressed about, it’s all in your head” but after a while I started to realize my best chance at beating this was to just believe that to be true.  This is where all the cliches come from:Mind over matter, the world is what you make it/how you see it, etc...I don’t know about you but I think anybody who agrees here does or should believe in the law of attraction. If you are unhappy, it’s because you think you are unhappy and acknowledge it. So just think you are happy and acknowledge that.  There are going to be rough times and sometimes you are going to feel down but there’s no reason to embrace these feelings or just kinda give in and feed them with bad thoughts or actions.   [info] None [info] 1542348766
ladybug812 [info] I know you said your mind is made up. But this might give some insight and, if nothing else, at least something to think about.My mom committed suicide when I was 19 (I'm 27). She was an addict, had a hard life, etc. Trust me when I tell you...the impact is devastating. We were not on good terms when she died. She had so many demons and I can understand that finality would rid her of them...but she could have saved herself. I miss her and wish I could talk to her again.In all honesty, when someone completes suicide, usually they dont think about the impact. They want instant gratification - for their pain to end. But it isnt worth it. How do I know? I was diagnosed with depression when I was 13 or 14. I was suicidal and engaged in selfharm. My upbringing was unstable and heartwrenching, but I'm still here and I'm so glad that I did not end my life. Despite the fact I continue to deal with depression, I have more hope compared to when I was younger and it has kept me going. I never thought I would think that way...but here I am.I hope that you find the will to live. Suicide is a permanent solution to a temporary problem/situation/etc.I wish you luck. [info] None [info] 1538715234
TheBigKaz [info] To Damien. You help me in ways you would never know you do.This year, I was diagnosed with depression, was in a motorcycle crash, almost lost my grandmother to lung cancer, and had to deal with severe homophobia that almost made me afraid to leave my room. I cant cry anymore, not for I am happy, but for I am no longer sad. I am numb from the bullets I have taken, and have almost dished out upon myself.At least, until I get that little notification. Youtube telling me I have yet another dose of salvation from the internal devastation of my mental health: EmKay has posted a new video. My fingers smash through the cracked screen of my phone faster than greased lightning high on Kyle's stash of Monster, and even if for just those ten-ish minutes, I know what it feels to be happy again. Many here say your laugh can cure depression, just saying it as a joke and not knowing just how true their words are. Hearing you crack up from your own jokes makes me laugh, almost as if your laugh were a contagious neurotoxin. Your laugh literally cures my depression, if not for a miniscule amount of time. Thank you, Damien. For everything you've helped me through. You have saved my life, literally. Never forget that. P.S.: please get this in a new vid. [info] None [info] 1571021482
kites47 [info] Theatre, Depression, Suicide, Identification, Love, Acceptance, and the LGBT Community Hello - my name is Josef. I'm a 20-year-old third-year theatre arts major at the University of Pennsylvania. Though I've spent most of my time on the stage, I'm also an amateur playwright. There's a topic I've always wanted to write on, but never felt I had the drive, the knowledge, or the right to do it.I grew up in a conservative Christian household, was in incredible denial of the fact that I was gay, had a father who passed away, dealt with all sorts of verbal and physical abuse related to my sexuality, etc. The things I went through, however, are far from unique to me. They are something that so many LGBT individuals I have met have undergone these things, though obviously to many varying degrees and in unique ways. A sad part of growing up as an LGBT person in an environment that may not be fully supportive is how easily one can slip into depression. Writing is my passion and is the way in which I've been able to find meaning to the feelings I've undergone and the events I've seen in my friends' lives.In my freshman year of college, I volunteered with a group called SREHUP. I worked with homeless LGBT young adults at a church that housed them. There were four transgender women there who had the most incredible stories of struggle, from abusive boyfriends, to families that completely rejected them, to severe cases of physical violence, and so much more. Despite this, these were some of the happiest women I'd ever met. They had so much to say about their past and it inspired me to write something about the process an LGBT person goes into finding out their identity and trying to reconcile it with the culture they grew up in.This past year I was diagnosed with depression. I guess I probably should have seen that diagnosis coming, as I've had the tell-tale symptoms for many years, but it was hard for me to admit it. There are so many people dealing with the stigma of not only being LGBT, but also with the stigma surrounding mental illness and depression and especially suicidal thoughts that may stem from the above. It's much more common than people would think, but it feels like so few people are willing to talk about it.Now why am I posting this wrong rambling post about these topics on here? Well, I really want to write a play about the process an individual goes through from their recognition that they might be LGBT, to the moment of identification as LGBT and trying to figure out their identity, to dealing with being either open and dealing with repercussions of that or the repercussions of letting it remain hidden and being unable to announce it. This is a dialogue that, at least in my experience, is so vividly open within the LGBT community, but that is much less understood or known about outside of it.What I am asking is just to hear your stories. Whether through messages, Skype, phone calls, meeting in person if you happen to live close, email, etc. I want to write a piece representative of the stories of real LGBT people as they've dealt with the process of identifying. Now, I don't just want to hear from people that deal with depression or suicidal thoughts or just general kickback from the community they've grown up in, I also want to hear about people that have had a wonderful coming out experience with families and friends that supported them. This is a theatrical exploration that talks about the process of identification quite openly and will give a glimpse into the vulnerable time in a LGBT person's life where they come to terms with who they are.Now, this theatrical piece will not be a retelling verbatim of people's stories. These stories will work as inspiration for a piece that explores the LGBT experience. Though some specific pieces may be used, it will not be anyone's story told flat-out. As far as credit, if you would not mind being named, I would love to put your name as someone I thank at the start of the play, but if you would rather remain anonymous, let me know and I will do so as well. The play will start with the director stepping forward and thanking those that came forward to share their stories to help create this piece and there will be both those named included as well as a word for those that remained anonymous.I am sorry if this post seems long and rambly - it's so hard to put into exact words what I want to say and how I want to do this. This is why I'm asking for your stories. I want to better convey what I want to say and I feel the best way to do that is to understand more perspectives than just my own. Thank you in advance for any responses and for anyone willing to share their stories.With love and admiration for you all, Josef [info] LGBTQ Activist/UPenn Student [info] 1402525645
amandapillar [info] I've been diagnosed with depression. I started out with therapy, more recently I've started taking medication for it. It hasn't been long enough to tell whether it will work for me in the long run but I'm hopeful. Therapy itself has been pretty great too, but unfortunately my old therapist moved onto another job, and my new therapist I don't quite click with as much. I think that's why I finally decided to try meds.  [info] None [info] 1472022951
DeanBowling [info] I’m a bit late to this but here we go:My best experience was actually this last Sunday at RTX. This was my 2nd RTX, with the first one in 2013 being one of the best experiences of my life. For a variety of reasons, though, RTX 2014 was pretty disappointing after the first 2 days (Not getting to see as many panels, missing out on some autographs, etc.). Though I felt extremely happy to just be in Austin again and to be at RTX, things just didn’t seem to be going my way at this year’s convention. Anyways, Day 3 turned out to be amazing. While everything seemed to go against me the first 2 days, everything on the third day went extremely well. While there were a number of things that made the last day memorable, the last thing to happen to me is what made it truly amazing. After the convention ended, I decided to stick around to try to get a few more autographs from staff members. I planned on only being around for an hour or so, but ended up staying for over 3 hours with the group of dedicated fans who wanted to cheer on the guardians. After what seemed like an eternity, Burnie finally came back out to sign autographs and take pictures with the hundred or so fans who waited around. I took my badge up to Burnie to get signed, but in all honesty I just wanted an excuse to talk to him a little bit more before I had to leave Austin for a year. I just wanted to thank him for everything he does, considering RoosterTeeth is such an important part of my life. Though I’m better now, there was a time in my life in which I was diagnosed with depression and things like the RT Podcast and RvB always did a good job of picking me up. After shaking his hand and thanking him, Burnie actually started asking me a few questions, which was pretty surprising considering how tired he seemed. I know Burnie is a passionate guy, but the day has been long and I wouldn’t have been offended at all if he kept everything short so he could get to everyone and then head out. Though the conversation was brief, his interest in how my weekend went seemed so genuine. Finally, I reached out to shake his hand one last time and instead he gave me a hug. I’m a 21 year old guy who usually doesn’t show much emotion, especially in public places, but, man, I’ll admit that’s the closest I’ve ever come to just completely bawling my eyes out. That moment is something I’ll never forget, and I can’t explain how much it means to know one of my idols cares that much about the community. It’s always been said that caring about community is what separates RT from everyone else, but I don’t know if I truly understood until that moment. Thanks Burnie and Rooster Teeth for being awesome. — Dean aka Lynnwood on the site [info]  [info] 1404959942
trizfores [info] Tired of pretending For years, I have been depressed. When I was just a few months old, my biological parents left me out on the street. I was adopted by a wonderful lady--I would say she's my real mom. She was the only one who truly loved me. But then things started to go downhill, all the more when she passed away.I have been diagnosed with depression for years and years. I have nothing against my mom, I loved her with all I am. But she sheltered me from the cruelties of this world. After her passing, bankruptcy, suicide... Everything happened. Peoole who I thought were my family and friends left me. Shrinks said that it's useless for me to go to appointments as I have no emotional support at all. I haven't taken my meds in years. I can't afford them, and certain triggers have disappeared. I literally have no one. I was rushed to the ER 2x and my next of kin wouldn't answer, I was discharged.Heck, even when I am in a shitty relationship, I will stick to it, no matter how much it hurts--I say to myself, 'Better to be with someone abusing me, than no one at all.' It's wrong, I know... But I just can't help it. I even pretend I am happily texting/chatting 'him' when in actuality, I am chatting on an AI app. People say they have been through similar scenarios as me, and they push through it. They even say to pray. Why don't they understand, I am not them? And why can't God just take away my pain and make me suffer more? I am religious. I don't practice so much.I keep on smiling, when deep down inside, I'm breaking more! :( [info] None [info] 1558199228
IonDash [info] Need some help identifying what is happening with me This has been happening to me for a very long time. I cannot seem to decide what i want to do with my life, i am interested in a lot of things ranging from cooking, music making, graphic design and even psychology. But i cannot seem to pinpoint what it is a want to do, my desires only last for maybe 2-3 months and then i suddenly want to do something else and become disinterested in anything else.I have been diagnosed with depression and very often suffer long bouts of low moods, but when i come out of a low mood my interests change and i almost become obsessed in my current interest as well as feeling incredibly optimistic about my newfound interest.I never really noticed this until recently but it has been a huge issue in my life, i started University this year but i have been struggling since i keep losing interest in my studies and i keep wanting to suddenly do something else. This also effects other parts of my life as i am always moving from one thing or the other and never really working at any one thing.well, thanks for reading and if anyone has any thoughts about any of this, i would appreciate it. [info] None [info] 1541398018
itchyandangsty [info] Hey man, I know depression sucks. I know how it feels to feel like you're alone, but you're not. Try and seek out help. Maybe talk to a therapist and/or go see a psychiatrist to get some anti-depressants. I was diagnosed with depression at 13 years old, 4 years ago. After the diagnosis, my parents wouldn't let me get meds or talk to a therapist (they are incredibly irrational people). So I have been silently struggling this battle just like you. :( Luckily, you are an adult, and hopefully where you live healthcare isn't to un-affordable. I know that talking to someone and being medically treated does wonders. Depression is really hard to shake without professional help, especially if your case is due biological factors rather than environmental ones. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1427080793
FluteMaster10 [info] It's more of I'm diagnosed with depression but i deny the fact of being depressed. A bit tricky i guess [info] None [info] 1490375625
backyard_fire [info] Today I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1361362078
chriswizardhippie [info] I've been diagnosed with depression 2 years ago and have recently decided to stop taking my meds do to the side effects and possible liver damage. I would appreciate it if my family would stop telling me it was a bad idea. I understand my illness and these meds are hurting more than they are helping. [info] None [info] 1496514627
wingie [info] I feel like my doctor isn't doing his job, but I have no point of reference. Can Reddit help me figure out if I should switch doctors? I'm 99% certain that my doctor never reads my lab results until he talks to me about them---my "you haven't done your reading/homework" sense is honed because I've been teaching for years and whenever he reviews my file it's a "I've never read this" as opposed to a "I'm reminding myself and making sure I have it right". He never remembers what medication I'm on. Today he actually had to ask me whether he wrote a prescription for me last week (I'd assume that he can just look one inch above where he was writing on my file) and despite me reminding him every other time I'm there and updating my forms with his office all the time he doesn't seem to know that I'm on antidepressants.Are doctors supposed to do this? It feels very unprofessional for me that anyone would meet someone about a document without even glancing at it first. Or that he's recommending I look into medication that I'm already on and not taking the fact that I've been diagnosed with depression/ADHD in his diagnosis until I reminded him that hey, remember that giant form I had to fill out it's on there. But it could also just be that the industry is a busy one and this is literally the standard. [info] None [info] 1321322610
MisfortunateBachelor [info] Katie **TL DR**Another favorite girl of mine, other than **Sahar** I also really liked Katie and by the time I met Katie I had matured a hell of a lot since **Gemma**. It had been a year and 2 months, and I had learnt quite a bit about dating girls. We got together at a rock bar/club in my city and I looked after her throughout the night as she was being ill from too much alcohol. We slept in the same bed and the next day after hooking up, we just got chatting about what a good night it had been, despite the mess everyone was. After I left I learnt that she lived only 10 minuets away from me so it was pretty damn convenient for us both. We were talking quite a bit over facebook and I asked her out on a date, she accepted and I took her on a cute little walk along a river. We sat down near it, and we kissed and cuddled, had a good laugh and we had a pretty good connection from the start.Everything from this point to a month and half down the line seemed to be going really well, natural even. We always went to each others houses throughout the weeks and we went back to that rock bar every now and then, even going on more dates and uploading pictures to facebook of our adventures. She made me wait 3 weeks into our little 'relationship' before we finally slept together. But there was one HUGE disadvantage i had when it came to bedroom activities. I was on anti-depressants, had been for about 6 months before meeting Katie and they had really negative affects on my sex-drive. **[Yes, I was diagnosed with depression. Triggered from, you guessed it... *Gemma* and the traumatic event of being betrayed, though I can't completely blame her for my depression, she did help me break free from my awkwardness as I went on a different rebound nearly every week. The point being though, that other than *Gemma* there were plenty of other girls that had messed me around that were probably other factors that lead up to my depression and feeling worthless]**Anyway, I was starting to come off the anti-depressants by the time I was sleeping with Katie, the first couple of nights I was doing well, but it's the next two times where my sex-drive was really low. Couldn't maintain an erection, couldn't last more than 5 minuets, and couldn't feel an orgasm properly. I was literally *fucked* when it came to sex. This is probably a reason we broke up to an extent.A week prior to my libido, evidently, going down the shitter Katie and I went out to the rock bar we always went to and I was meeting a bunch of her friends that i'd never met before, most were guys and were a lot of more "alpha", if you will, in comparison to me. But they accepted me into the group and it didn't really bother me that Katie had a lot of male friends, she did after all tell me about them, there was a lot of communication between us, which is probably why we got on so well. Throughout the night some of my... Friends... Came to the same rock bar. Why do I say it like that? Well, these guys are the same ones who slept with **Gemma** but it was fine because I had moved on from that and got chatting to these lads, they even apologized and bought me a couple of rounds. Top lads. I introduced them to Katie and these guys didn't even try anything, either out of respect or because they didn't want to do the same thing twice. Either way everyone was getting on. It was at the end of this night that things were taking a slightly different turn. This guy named Mark, who Katie used to work with showed up and they were pretty damn close. Don't get me wrong, girls can have guy friends, they just need to know the boundaries of when it's becoming 'too close'. So later when me and Katie were leaving, she starts hugging this guy, Mark. At first I didn't think much of it and a mate of mine humorously went up to her and said&gt; Ah so you're the girlfriend (of me)but they were hugging for an uncomfortable amount of time and all I could do is stand there and watch. Me and my mate knew that I had to keep an eye on this dude. The next day I asked about Mark and she was just reassuring me that they're nothing more than friends, I felt she was being genuine. But a lot of girls say these kind of things, don't they? Again, we were back to normal... Well, as normal as you can be, lack of my libido and now a slight worry about this Mark.So me and Katie were planning on going to this rock bar again for the following weekend, she did tell me that Mark and that would be there and I was cool with that, so long as she tells me, we're good, right? Communication and what not. She told me that she'd message me at 10 o clock (when I finished work) if she's still going out, because she "might just stay in". Alas, I didn't receive any text, so I messaged her saying that I had just finished. But i got no reply, I just left it and went drinking with some lads from work instead... But that was it... Just as me and my work mates left work I saw Katie and Mark walking straight to the rock bar. I didn't get a message, nor a reply. Alarm bells were ringing at this point as that was highly suspicious. I confront her and asked her what was going on and if she had received my text, she got all weird with me and said that she just got my text. What? about 40 minuets after I initially sent her it? Especially when it was her who said she'd message me first? Hmm.I said that i'd go join her soon, but that i was going to another bar first with my work mates. She said it was fine. So I go to another bar with these lads, discussing with them what I should do now that i'm suspicious. They suggested waiting until the place closes and seeing if they're drunk enough to kiss. But I didn't want to be that guy who just spies on his girlfriend, that isn't me. Instead I finished up my second round and told the lads I was going to go see her. I even messaged her saying I was on my way, I mean, shit, i just wanted to see my girlfriend. We did plan to meet after all.So I head over there and the first thing she said to me was &gt;Are you checking up on me?What, the actual **FUCK?!** No hi? No nothing? But straight to the defensive? That in of it's self raised more suspicion, little did she know I wasn't trying to let it bother me, I just wanted to see her and move on from what I thought I knew I saw. All night we were arguing, and I just went outside the bar, sulking and asking questions. Questions that had confirmed my suspicions. I was asking some of Marks friends how he knows Katie and if they were seeing each other. A lot of people said that he kissed her, and that Katie said nothing to him about the fact that she had a boyfriend (me). I had no evidence, only gossip and my ever growing suspicions. I later confront Mark myself and ask him about it, but Katie followed us, as if she was worried about something. I straight up said that I was getting a bit paranoid with what i'd seen, about how close they were and what people had been telling me. He was trying to reassure me that he didn't, wasn't, planning or doing anything. And that they're just friends. The same stuff I had always been hearing off other girls after and before Katie...Funny that, because I found out so much after me and Katie broke up within 2 days of this night. It was 3 weeks later that she was now dating Mark. Who knew?! The weird thing about it though is that they never told anyone about their relationship until 4 months down the line. We hadn't been together for 4 months at this point I wasn't mad when I found out though I felt a little bit hurt. But ah well. I had already moved on from her. Besides, I had then slept with 4 other girls after me and Katie broke up so I couldn't be angry, just disappointed that I knew something was off and people were insulting my intelligence. The kicker is that, on the night when I saw her with Mark, she told me that she had 'just got my text' though two days later she told me that she did actually receive my text exactly when I sent it, but didn't reply. So, yeah... Me and Katie didn't exactly end on bad terms, however, and whenever we see each other we hug and greet each other and I actually got to know about this Mark fella. He's actually a swell guy, and when ever I see him out and about we drink together. When it eventually came out that Katie was seeing Mark, everyone that we knew was telling me that Mark was with Katie. Mark even came up to me and was respectful about it, he said he was sorry about how everything came across, bought me a drink and we got on. They're still together to this day, and in all honesty, I think Katie and Mark were  wanting to see each other before I got with Katie. I just so happened to accidentally get in between that for a time. Wrong place wrong time and all that. [info] None [info] 1531469998
_sweetadeline [info] I suppose I've felt this way in the past. But people really can't tell. Yesterday, I told my two best friends that I was diagnosed with depression and they didn't care! It was awesome. It wasn't a big deal and the conversation was super brief, they even spoke to me about when they feel depressed sometimes.Lots of people are depressed, I wish people would talk about it more because it's sooooo common. You don't have to add that stress onto yourself.  [info] None [info] 1472149299
chrkrose [info] 25 - I was diagnosed with depression (dysthymia) three months ago. Before that I was spiraling into major depression and was suicidal. Right now I’m on medication and going to therapy, but it’s still a struggle and it’s probably one of the hardest times of my life.  [info] None [info] 1541221396
Wiebejamin [info] I can't go to class anymore I'm in my second year of college. I keep having periods where I can't bring myself to get up, leave my room, and go to my classes. I don't have the motivation. This happened last semester and I had to drop all of my classes to avoid failing. I did my hardest class over the summer by itself and did very well with no issue, so I thought I'd be able to just go right back in and continue as normal, but I can't. I know that I'd be doing well if I could attend classes normally, but I can't.As soon as I miss one class, suddenly I'm skipping all of them. I'm not doing any homework, so I'm sure I'm really behind and my grades are poor. There's a place that's supposed to help students keep up, and I'm scheduled for weekly meetings there, but I can't go to those either. Anything that involves school is just, blocked out for me. I should have made this post weeks ago, but I couldn't even do that until now.I've been diagnosed with depression and I'm taking medication for it, but it's not helping. I don't even feel sad, and I am having fun doing things on my own/with friends, so I don't even know if that diagnosis is right.I don't know what to do. I do like it here, but I think college might not be something I'm capable of doing, but if I don't, then I have no idea what I'd do with my life.I was born with all the opportunities in the world but I can't even bring myself to use them. [info] None [info] 1509011726
Kerrima [info] After I was diagnosed with depression and started taking medication for it, my Dad told me I wasn't really depressed and I should just learn to handle stress better, and that the doctor was wrong and gave me a lazy diagnosis.I stopped talking to him until he apologised, the best I got was "Depression isn't what I thought it was and you might have had it." But then told me that I hurt his feelings by not talking to him and I should feel bad and apologise.I can definitely sympathise a little. [info] None [info] 1394464799
shitty-username8257 [info] When I was diagnosed with depression. I had known for a while, but having it confirmed hit hard. [info] None [info] 1465460315
gomichan [info] I think it's just a sad reality that comes with the times. I was diagnosed with depression at that age, and I know lots of young kids having some dark thoughts.  [info] None [info] 1539062878
BabySaysKill [info] Depression and journaling I've always been obsessed with notebooks and pens. There are nineteen unused notebooks in my drawer. I want to use them somehow. I was diagnosed with depression in 2014. A couple times a year, I fall into a deep hole that's basically weeks to months of apathy and ennui. I'm currently in one. I haven't left my house in a week, and sleep from 5am to 7pm. I don't talk to anyone except my cat. As you can imagine, nothing really happens during these episodes. This means I have nothing to write about! I'm not busy at all, unlike all you amazing people who have jam-packed schedules and overflowing to-do lists. I have a notebook that I write in sometimes when I am really overwhelmed, but it becomes a venting tool that's overwrought with negativity. I don't want that. I want an interesting journal that's full of life. I guess I could write about the books I read, films I watch, and art projects I take on. But I know that I will inevitably give up on this eventually. I don't even know where to start. I'm looking for reassurance and suggestions. I need help. [info] None [info] 1560411520
linseeds [info] Fatigue is my most debilitating MS symptom. It started about 18 months before my diagnosis. I was working a full time job, ran a little etsy business, sold vintage stuff on ebay, worked out about 4 hours a week, prepped all kinds of healthy food and I gradually became a person who could only go to and from work and spent most of their non-work time in bed. About 6 months before my diagnosis, I went to my primary care doctor thinking I was depressed. I told her I thought it was weird that I \*wanted\* to do things, I just couldn't. When I was diagnosed with depression previously, I didn't \*want\* to do anything. 4 months after that, more MS symptoms showed up and I was sent to a neurologist for testing.I tried Amantadine. It helped a lot with fatigue, but increased brain fog to the point that I didn't think it was safe to drive. Maybe it would have improved over time, but I quit after about 4 days. May be worth a try because it does work for some people. My first neurologist prescribed Modafinil, but the insert says it decreases the effectiveness of my hormonal birth control so that's a no-go. I kind of decided I'm on my own for figuring out how to deal with the fatigue.I've been taking CBD oil for my fatigue and it makes a huge difference. Most days my fatigue is zero to mild. According to the National MS Society: "Fatigue occurs in about 80% of people, can significantly interfere with the ability to function at home and work, and may be the most prominent symptom in a person who otherwise has minimal activity limitations." So MS definitely can cause fatigue! Can you get a new neurologist? My first one wasn't very helpful. I switched to one who specializes in MS and he seems better informed about MS and puts more thought into treating me.  [info] RRMS | 39F | Dx2018 | Tecfidera [info] 1550510746
MeOfCourse57 [info] Nicotine only works on long walks. So I finally caved in and started smoking. I'm also on fluvoxamine and xanax; doctors orders after I've been diagnosed with depression, I'm still rocking that high though I find it to be a double edge sword. What I lacked in ambitions and high hopes I now make up with lack of focus and outages of emotions. To get to the point, I don't feel the nicotine have an effect on me unless I'm walking somewhere. Can anyone more versed in this area of knowledge help me understand why that may be? [info] None [info] 1490720416
dreamyclara [info] Low grades and failing on college Today I've received some of my grades for my first exams of my semester and all I've failed all of them. I feel so dumb. Before I was diagnosed with depression I was such a great student, now I can't focus and study at all and I've realized that I'm so stupid and idiot. I can't even do the basic tasks of a human being. I just want to die. [info] None [info] 1552609281
VainLynn [info] Thank you so much for helping me. To be honest, I started doing it cause I heard that it would get rid of emotional pains. And it did, but at the same time, I got addicted. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 14, and I’m currently 18. Never once during the 4 years did my family realize that I needed meds. I try so hard to act normal, but inside I know I’m not. And then I found out about cutting. I was like a drug, and I got addicted. Everyday, even in school, when the addition hits, nothing can stop it, and next thing I know I’m in the girl’s bathroom bleeding like if I was just attached by a fucking shark. I tried to kill my self twice, but they all failed because I can’t give up my family, I know that they care about me, but I don’t.  [info] None [info] 1516222878
tiredoftired [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for three years, significantly stifling my employment capabilities.  I currently have a part time job and am doing well relative to the energy I am able to exert.  Still, the position and the gaps in employment would seem to me to be a red flag.  I wouldn't want to mention it when I recover, though, since employers might worry about relapse or that I am not fully capable anymore.  What would you suggest? [info] None [info] 1283405999
SlickWillydeHaiti [info] By age 18 I suffered four major concussions playing football. Then I was diagnosed with depression and GAD at 20 y/o (due to frequent debilitating sleep paralysis episodes along with sleep deprivation). One year later I was diagnosed with ADHD and put on stimulants. The sleep deprivation worsened and my mental state was deteriorating. But as soon as the amphs were out of my system, I would sleep 15-20 hours a day for a few days at a time.At age 25, I saw a psychopharmacologist who referred me to an amazing sleep doctor who convinced me I should quit adderall for 2 months and undergo a clinical sleep study bc he believed I may actually have narcolepsy. He was right and I was officially diagnosed and prescribed modafinil. [info] (N2) Narcolepsy w/o Cataplexy [info] 1563353940
Nuke_Waste [info] Was diagnosed with depression and I'm working towards getting better Hi everyone. This is my first time posting here, and I'm hoping I can get advice of some kind. As the title says, I was diagnosed with depression a couple months ago and since then I have been put on antidepressants and am going to therapy. Everything seemed like it was going well, I was getting some energy back, I was actually having emotions instead of just pretending, and overall I felt like things were looking up finally. But over the past two weeks I have noticed that I will get that familiar feeling in the pit of my stomach and almost instantly my mood will drop back to where it was. The first time I thought it was just a mood swing or something, but it has happened more than I'm comfortable with. I'm just worried that everything is getting ready to resurface and I'm going to fall back to where i was. I can't seem to pinpoint what's causing this so I don't know how to confront it. My automatic reaction is to just ignore it and wait for it to pass, but that was a huge contributor to how I got to this point in the first place. I don't know if there is any advice that you can share that may help, I might just be doing this as a way to vent or put my thoughts somewhere other than in my head, but when it happens it honestly freaks me out. Has anyone has had a similar experience and if so how did you handle it? Any advice would be great, because like i said this really scares me when it happens. If anything, thank you for listening to me ramble [info] None [info] 1469453918
ASAPAP [info] I regret calling OP an asshole but I don’t appreciate you attacking me. I was diagnosed with depression as a kid and later as a adult so yes I do know. I also had a very close friend kill himself in high school and have seen the impact it had on his family and friends. For people affected by depression personally or that know someone that has been affected, it is not something to make a mockery of with a “starter pack” on reddit. The teen suicide rate is at a 40 year high. I understand that kids are often over dramatic and not really clinically depressed but this is not an issue to be generalized. Also who said anything about “worshipping depressed people.” Talk about an insensitive, hyperbolic statement... No one is worshipping them; we are simply being sensitive to the fact that they have very real feelings too- although they may not qualify in your book (what age do they qualify for you?). I feel like kids’ struggles get ignored because they are kids but they often go through very adult problems at home or elsewhere without the mental maturity to handle it. All that being said, I truly hope you don’t project this attitude onto anyone struggling inside near you. It could be extremely harmful and all kids want is to feel like they are being heard. I find it quite ironic you are calling me ignorant for calling someone as asshole because they are basically mocking teen depression then proceed to accuse me of worshipping depressed kids. All the best my friend. [info] None [info] 1535498943
khatieleesi [info] Sorry to hear about your friend but glad she's doing at least a little better. I was diagnosed with depression over ten years ago and have tried more meds than I can remember. Do you know how many treatments she had before she felt any difference? I'm not expecting some miracle cure but even the littlest change would make a difference.  [info] None [info] 1459323343
triggerhappymidget [info] For the PNW (OR, WA, ID, MT, AK), I wonder if weather has something to do with it. As an ex-Californian, it's fucking rough to get through the winter here. It gets dark at 4pm and it's just wet all the time west of the Cascades, which means many people don't go outdoors as much.I've been diagnosed with depression, and it's much easier for me to get up every morning and just continue living when I'm in SoCal, than when I'm up here. [info] None [info] 1512149176
rasdabess [info] Im now 18, and want to talk to my doctor for depression meds and am not sure how exactly this works. I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago, the most minor of depression. every now and then it pops back up, i lose will power to do really anything and its affecting me going to school. Ive been absent 8 times so far this year, i constantly make up all my work so that im missing nothing but its really hindering me and if i miss anymore days ill probably face consequences. My old meds definitely made me feel better although i become much more hyper as a side effect but im fine with that and i guess i need it.Im a private type of person and dont want my family to know Ill be taking meds again. Im now 18 and have control over my own self and I want to go to my doctor and talk over it but ive never scheduled an appointment before and im  not sure what to say. Do I call my clinic and tell them id like to make an appointment with my doctor or a psychiatrist? Will my father need to know anything since we re on the same insurance? I live in Massachusetts and have Mass Health, so am i counted individually from my father now? Not even sure if my insurance will fully cover everything now that im 18.Thanks in advance [info] None [info] 1448857545
Gairloch [info] My parents didn't divorce till I was in high school so I never had to deal with who to spend holidays with. I did try to not pick sides though (even though I know my dad had plenty of issues and I completely understood why my mom left him) and now I'm not very popular with extended family on either side. That is to say I haven't spoken with any extended family on my dads side for years (mostly just cousins since grandparents and aunt on his side died when I was rather young), and the only time I've seen extended family on my moms side was when my grandpa died a few years ago and earlier this year when my grandma died. At least that side is more friendly towards me even if they aren't exactly sending me cards or anything. Granted I was diagnosed with depression and ASD which might be why the whole thing doesn't bother me that much. The only family I like being in contact with is my mom, though I don't talk to her as much as I probably should but I'm never in a financial position to visit or anything beyond email/phone/text. [info] None [info] 1510769925
oopsiebabiess [info] I've been diagnosed with depression after a bad breakup and treated for it, this doesn't feel the same. Is it different when pregnant? It's not like I feel like this all the time, it's always triggered by something. In this case we had an argument about it this morning.  [info] Team Blue! FTM 09/14/16 [info] 1472183559
CronusTheDefender [info] “Devastation and heartbreak” for me. I consider myself to have been pretty fortunate in life. About 12 years ago, I was diagnosed with depression, but didn’t do anything about it because I never felt I had anything to be “depressed” about. It was until earlier this year that I was able to comprehend what it is and how it’s been affecting my life. From it ruining a relationship, to dealing with a loss of family members, it unfortunately took a series of events to comes to terms with it. I was in a very low place, a place where some haven’t been able to come back from. This game, this community, my clan, along with help outside of this group, I was able to slowly come out of it. I knew when I played the beta for D1, that this was going to be the game I play for a long time. I’ve made friends from various clans over the years, encountered many different walks of life from all over the globe. When I need to be distracted from my day to day life, Destiny is there. When clan members in another country needed to talk about their issues, Destiny was that bridge for us. The loot has been cool, the story and lore has been amazing, but meeting and playing with strangers who I now call friends, has been one of the best stories. We all have issues and our up and down moments, but the thing we all have in common is this game and community. Thank you all. I’m not sure how I would’ve gotten through this last year without you. [info] None [info] 1573779889
FishSnores [info] Thanks I just one of those people that don’t go to the doc unless I am close to dying. So I have the snoring and lack of energy for nearly thirty years. But after I was diagnosed with depression I decided to ask about the snoring. [info] None [info] 1560101145
shykel [info] I've been passed around for years to different clinics where they interview me and tell me I don't have the symptoms they're looking for. I recently had one where they said I might just be quirky which surprisingly hurt me. I just want a reason for why I struggle so hard with things that are trivial to other people.It felt good when I was diagnosed with depression because then I knew what kind of beast I was battling and I could learn to handle it - that did a lot more than antidepressants or Councilling ever did for me. Its worth looking into it as soon as you can.  [info] None [info] 1548808837
EzEXE [info] Yes, I have. Two actually. One was when I was still in my teens and I was diagnosed with depression, which I've come to realize is only a symptom of another issue. The last time I spoke to a Psychiatrist we talked about ADHD-I, or ADD [info] None [info] 1406314437
Argark [info] I was diagnosed with depression and asocial personality disorder 7 years ago, I cured myself over the years [info] :) [info] 1559623500
Sylamatek [info] It's taken a few course corrections, but I'm finally unlearning a lifetime of poor diet and exercising habits. This might be a bit of a read, but hopefully if you're in (or have been) in a situation like I was, this will give you some encouragement.  Perhaps this is an "eminent" victory, for Victory Sunday? I'm a 21 year old guy, and for as long as I can remember, I've been overweight.  The heaviest I ever got was about 225 pounds (6'0 btw).  I had an incredibly sedentary lifestyle.  I lost some weight from marching band during the summer but afterwards started gaining weight since I did no additional exercise.  I gave up drinking glasses and glasses of soda every time I went out to eat, but I still had god-awful eating habits, especially in the summer.   Freshman year of college was a fresh start.  I tried to eat better but swore up and down that I would never limit what I was eating, beyond calorie counting (I'll never give up pasta, it tastes too good!)  This meant that I was eating less food overall but it was still not very healthy food.  I joined the fencing club, did cardio consistently, etc. and got down to 185 lbs.  Then it got rough.  Fencing club dissolved.  School ( architecture student) became stressful, I moved farther away from campus and the gym, I got more into drinking, and I started to feel like shit in general.  My apartment complex had a tiny "rec center" I would use it for cardio occasionally, but I still skyrocketed back to 222 lbs.  I was diagnosed with depression last semester and most of the last half of the semester was me skipping classes, drinking heavily (hard alcohol mixed with sugary soda and/or gatorade) and going back and forth between eating nothing for almost 2 days and eating a whole pizza while not leaving my bed.Once I got home for the summer, I got sick of dealing with it and decided to make a change.  Following in the footsteps of a friend who recently went from 280 to 185, I cut out carbs almost entirely (I try to stay under 40g a day), I go lifting 3 times a week, and I got a warehouse job in an unconditioned building.  Since the beginning of the month, I've lost 12 pounds.  I have about another month before I leave for school again, and hopefully with continued weightloss and gym habits, I can keep that inertia going throughout the semester.  I'll get a lifting partner and keep gyming it up, I'll start going to university yoga classes again, keep eating healthy, etc.  I am worried about depression setting in again once school starts stacking up on me, but now I have connection with my university counseling services, and I can tell exercising has made me feel better as well.  **The Take away**I suppose I made this thread to show you that no matter what situation you come from, you can fix your diet and exercise habits.  The hardest part is getting started, and once the ball is rolling, you have enough momentum behind you to keep it going!  I come from a household of parents that dislike the taste of most veggies and cook nothing but frozen pizzas, spaghetti, etc. and my family does nothing physical.  So I've been raised with horrible dietary habits and a nonexistent level of exposure to physical recreational activities.   But by embracing one of my favorite hobbies, cooking, i can make healthy meals for myself that actually taste great, so I barely even have an incentive to return to my old dietary ways.  Pizza and big sandwiches taste good, sure, but eating that many carbs in one sitting anymore weighs in my stomach like a brick and I just feel bloated/lazy.  Yay for making positive changes!  I'm shooting to be well under 200 by the time I go back to school, around august 20th.  Let's see how low I can go! [info] None [info] 1437952811
zvive [info] Congrats, my highest was 699.I lost 49 in 2012 before having vsg. Since then I lost down to 500. Then I started drinking soda and eating cake/candy/etc.I would go on and off diets since then always getting down to about 460, stalling, and going back to soda and 515... I still can't eat a ton, so 515 is about as high as I go... But it's still not great.August I was severely depressed, my wife encouraged me to start therapy, I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD. Two weeks later I saw an ad on FB for a CrossFit weight loss challenge. I enrolled. I also started ADHD meds (amazing, my brain works now). Since September I went from 515 to 422. I'm almost to 100# lost. I can't remember the last time I was under 400, probably when I was 17 or 16. That's 100 in 3 months, my goal is 122 by the end of the year, I think that's pretty conservative actually and definitely reachable. I'm excited to get there. I'm sure you can reach your goals just don't give up, don't stop at 500, and don't drink soda it's evil. [info] None [info] 1546748001
skippyist [info] My older brother. My entire life he thought I was a whiny, over-reactive brat who constantly lied and blew everything out of proportion to get attention. I always thought he was a complete asshole who would torment me because he enjoyed seeing me emotionally suffer. Found out at age 20 that my parents chose to never tell him that I'm severely mentally ill. I was diagnosed with depression at age 10, psychosis at age 11, borderline personality disorder at age 18. I'm also a childhood trauma survivor. He had no idea. This entire time he thought I was just being a brat and would combat me, trying to get me to stop what he determined was intentional bad behavior. He had no idea that I was actually suffering and really did believe things were really bad when they weren't and really was feeling pain when he thought I was just making shit up, he had no idea that I was always telling the truth. I wrote him a really long letter explaining it all when I found out. Never got a reply. [info] None [info] 1547611977
Trans_Autistic_Guy [info] I don't know if this belongs here, but it's at least related. I have a lot of trouble with sleep. I have for almost my whole life. It's always been attributed to my depression, but that could be because I was diagnosed with depression at 13 and wasn't diagnosed with ASD till 25. I have yet to receive any services for it 2 years later, but that's a whole different post. My troubles can be summarized as can't sleep at night and can't stay awake during the day. This has obviously caused some problems, especially now that I'm employed again for the first time in about 3 years. I'm on a medicine to help me sleep, but it's far from perfect and doesn't really help me get up in the the morning. So I use alarms. A lot of alarms. I've even started to use them to keep me on track during the day which is a huge step as my partner has been begging me to try this for years, but I always felt some overwhelming opposition to it, not sure what changed. Anyway, I'm mostly writing this post because I'm an hour and a half late to work because I slept through several alarms. That reminds me of another issue I have with getting going, which is that I find it almost impossible to wake up early. And if, by some miracle, I do, I get so antsy that I either leave ridiculously early or, more likely, get distracted and end up late. So this is something I hate about myself, but I've never figured out a good solution to it. I even have my alarms set up to tell me the time so I don't get confused about which alarm it is. [info] None [info] 1559924472
e_pilot [info] Don't let this get you down.  I was diagnosed with depression a few years prior to starting flight training (which made getting a medical an exercise in hoop jumping) and my previous career had me pretty solidly depressed (undiagnosed this time because of the medical hoop jumping at the time) while going through a sizable portion of my private training.  Flying was my outlet, the one thing I had to look forward to, and really kept me going.  It jump started a major shift in my life, where I left my old career behind and started anew.  Now almost 4 years later I am a CFII and soon to be MEI, on a fast track to the airlines, and I couldn't possibly be any happier.  And looking back, all the sources of my depression and unhappiness being wrapped up in my old career are so obvious now.  The fact that you're asking yourself these questions leads me to believe you already have a good starting point for the kind of mindset you'll need as a pilot.  Pursue it, take a discovery flight and a couple of lessons to see if it's something you'd like.  Don't worry about what's in the books not making any sense yet, because you don't have the context of flying to see how it all works.  Get out and enjoy flying for flying's sake, worry about the book stuff later.  No one is born a pilot, but with enough perseverance and determination, most can be. [info] CFII (KCOS) [info] 1465846976
Maintenance_Enforced [info] Hey Reddit, could use some advice words of encouragement before court... I have family court in a week, and am working hard to prepare stuff for my lawyer.  Fighting for custody of my kids who have been put through the wringer by the ex, and to get rid of a crippling $4000/mo. support reduced (and the $200,000 backlog removed).I don't even make anywhere near the amount of support I'm supposed to pay.  (I did manage to pa about half of that over the years by selling everything I owned.)  It has financially devastated me.Due to not meeting the full support obligation, they seized my bank account, revoked my license and are threatening to do the same with my passport.  I feel like a non-citizen in my own country.  I have committed no crime, but I can't drive (and soon, can't leave the country).I have a lot of evidence (email, calls) showing the awful things this woman has done, and I'm getting it together for the lawyer.However, I am having a lot of trouble.  I don't know if it's a panic attack, but I'm shaking, in tears, and have lost all ability to focus and get this stuff done.  (I have been diagnosed with depression and severe OSA, but what I'm feeling leading up to court is even far more crippling and paralyzing than that.  I am not on any drugs, prescription or otherwise.)If court doesn't go well, I can't make a living in this country, and will have to leave my children behind.  This will crush me.  I live in constant fear of losing my babies.Anyone out there have some words of encouragement, or some suggestion/tips on how to fight for my focus back to get this stuff done properly for court?  I'm so incredibly afraid right now, to the point I can't eat, sleep, and even breathe properly.Should I go to the hospital?  I can't really afford the time, plus my ex works at the nearest hospital, so I'd have to go quite far.Should I just try to get a good night's sleep and try again tomorrow?  I have been having zero luck with sleeping lately.Sorry this is disjointed, I just can't think straight.Any tips truly appreciated.Thanks, Reddit.EDIT(s):- Sorry, should have read "advice and words of encouragement".- I'm on legal aid; lawyer is junior, but he seems great.  Better than my former ones, for sure.  Her lawyer is a $200/hour lawyer.- I am in Canada. [info] None [info] 1294874754
fizzywizz911 [info] My long distance Army boyfriend (M24) of 4 years is depressed and it's hurting our relationship. Lost and confused and any advice would be appreciated. (Long) Our relationship started off long distance with visits in between to us living together for a brief moment and back to long distance once he enlisted. For starters, long distance is hard. Super hard but we've managed to stay strong all these years by talking throughout the day. Ever since he joined the Army things have been different. It's not at all what he thought it would be like (Infantry) and is completely frustrated but still has 3 yrs of the contract left. He's expressed to me that he knows he's depressed but feels limited in his options. All of this has been affecting our already long distance relationship. He hardly reaches out, always sleeping, not eating, and generally quiet. I can sense the change in him even when we do talk and is just generally non-responsive. We don't see each other often and the one thing we do have is being able to talk to each other and now that's even gone. I talk to him roughly twice a week? And even then it feels like it's me forcing a conversation and tbh it feels shitty. I never really hear from him during the day. He finished bootcamp in April so all of this general has been since then. I've tried being patient and I understand he has long work days and his frustration but I feel like I'm hardly in his life anymore. I should mention his depression is what also caused him to move back home and us not continuing to live together that brief moment. I was a student but he hated the job he had and honestly, whether or not it was conscious, he slipped up and eventually got fired. Not having a job made him move back and during that entire period it was the same thing. We lived together but he was still..distant. Him abruptly leaving really did a toll on me and just seeing it happen again hurts.In terms of us being long distance, I just graduated college and have had to move back home and been job hunting like crazy for the last couple months.I've applied to jobs to where he's stationed at but the goal was for me start my career and if still far away, have the means to visit him more often. But now he talks about leaving the army and me looking for jobs for where he's at doesn't seem productive.  Being back home with my family has its own frustrations and honestly I'm struggling personally too. I've been diagnosed with depression in the past and am off medication now, but sometimes I feel myself slipping too. He's the one I always confided in but it feels like he's nowhere to be found and I have to hide my problems when we talk. I've told him all of this and that he needs to communicate w/ me more and that we were in this together and he just says sorry but nothing changes. I don't know how to help him anymore. He's made an appt. to talk to a professional but it's not for a while. Recently I got so frustrated I suggested we go separate ways but it felt harsh so I tried compromising to where during the week, I promised not get upset if I didn't hear from him but he owed me a "date night" on the weekend. I said that yesterday. It's currently 10 pm and I haven't heard from him all day and the more I think about the "deal", the more I resent it..Why can I only talk to him once a wk? What kind of relationship is this? What happens when I need him? TLDR: Long distance BF depressed, we hardly talk anymore, tried giving space and made him a deal that during the week he didn't have to reach out but on the weekends we'd have a date night. However the more I think about it, the more it makes me sad. Confused as to how to deal with all this. [info] None [info] 1565066561
_BlueBlaze [info] I’m deciding to get better I’m a 19 year old depressed college sophomore. I was diagnosed with depression four years ago. Got meds back in november, those are helping a ton. Still get lots of suicidal thoughts though so I’ve been exercising a lot and reading a self help book. I’m trying to teach myself self-reliance too. It’s been a really long road for me and I’ve still got a long way to go. [info] None [info] 1567310044
SundayBunDay [info] Interesting that you mentioned that, I was diagnosed with depression myself at 14 (now 27 and haven't had a bad episode for a couple if years now.) I know the black dog has been used as a metaphor for depression for decades but I always thought of it as a metaphor. Hmm... Definitely food for thought...  [info] None [info] 1497336845
psycheraven [info] I don't know that I was ever diagnosed during my stint at student health center counseling back in the day (elsewhere), but whether or not I was diagnosed with depression at that point, I *was* depressed, and that's what we focused on. So the focus on lack of diagnosis is odd to me. Assessment for it is pretty straightforward. And they wouldn't be approved as an internship site (for my program at least) if someone couldn't do that. 🤔 [info] None [info] 1547142408
ElectricalDeer87 [info] I've actually got a lot of things going on that my parents don't suspect. Luckily. My mother would lock me up and my dad would sue me. I mean that. He's done that before. My dad sued me because I was diagnosed with depression. :|Edit: I find it freaky what some people call the Ana voice in their head as some kind of thing they think about, is actually a real hallucination for me just like I hallucinate other things that don't exit. [info] 5'8" | 137.0lbs | -15.6lbs | Goal: 95lbs | BMI 19.96 | 16F [info] 1520036755
trefull5 [info] Heyo, I was diagnosed with depression in October and I’d like to get to know ya, I could pm you my discord, and I’m also visually impaired btw [info] None [info] 1550860463
inkwitxh [info] Lonely It’s 16 years since I was diagnosed with depression, and 5 since I was diagnosed with bpd. I’m really struggling to make friends in the new area I live. If there’s anyone out there that is alone, and wants someone to talk to, I’m here. I had to quit my job, due to physical injury, so I am always so bored. Sometimes I’ll write a little list of things to do, to keep me busy throughout the day whilst I wait for my bf to get home. I know this illness sucks ASS, and I wanna try and make someone’s day a little better if I can. I am so alone, I have no family, only bf and his mother. Who are wonderful and do so much for me. I had one ‘friend’ but was subsequently ’dumped’ for not wanting/being a fan of children. That obviously destroyed me, but I am proud for saying what I feel, sticking to it and not turning back just so I have someone. I have tried joining groups and stuff in the area, but I dint feel comfortable in group settings. I just wish I had a friend or two, in England, and build a friendship based on mutual support. I feel like this is too much to ask. [info] None [info] 1579959647
snaappy [info] This 100%. The overlap is insane, with a ton of narcoleptics not realizing they actually have a sleeping disorder. I was diagnosed with depression like two years before we figured out it's narcolepsy, bc the symptoms are SO similar. Plus like, never being able to stay awake to do anything can really make you feel just genuinely awful too, so there's that. [info] None [info] 1567456004
MrDToTheIzzle [info] Do you think?I don't feel sad per say. I was diagnosed with depression a few years back, but I thought I was over it by now. My doctor even cleared me to stop taking meds then too.  [info] None [info] 1554147521
allaby3 [info] School, my family hates me, my mom is planning to kill me, I'm failing all of my classes, I'm 16 and cant form a sentence, my friends aren't my friends, everybody is a dick, what else oh yes I was diagnosed with depression the day I was born when I tried to kill myself with my umbilical cord. [info] None [info] 1540521616
pmmeyourbucketlist [info] I always hated to think I had depression because of the stigma and the self diagnosed kinda sad people. It took me to the point of staying in bed for a week without having a meal, exercise, work completed and twice walking to the bathroom for water and on top of that only getting up to stare at the wall before trying to sleep again. At that point I overcame my denial and made an appointment with a therapist with which I was diagnosed. The degree that I deal with it now is significantly better than it was before but I still use the word infrequently.  If you try can you have a happy moment? Hypothetically if you were sent on a vacation with the person of your choosing expenses paid with no other obligations would you be able to feel happy. If you can honestly say that there is nothing that will make you happy you might want to consider that as a sign of something. If they still don’t really understand I tend to either explain the difference between sadness and depression.I also might use personal examples if they were one of the few that know I am diagnosed with depression. Another note: I blame the phrase “that’s depressing” and attention seekers for part of the misunderstanding Odds are it is slightly upsetting and you don’t try draw attention when you are depressed.  [info] None [info] 1521494219
Sigmund_Six [info] Same here. I noticed toning and increased strength before I noticed weight loss. I'd definitely encourage anyone who's looking to lose weight to incorporate some kind of cardio, I felt it kept me from getting discouraged, particularly in the beginning.Edit: This is just anecdotal, but I do think cardio does a great job with helping manage depression. Heart gets pumping, blood gets flowing, etc. I have been diagnosed with depression and manage it with a combo of therapy and exercise. [info] None [info] 1482706723
_daniel23 [info] The MCU is the only reason why I’m still alive. I’m not usually the type of guy who shares his life story on the internet;  I was thinking about it this morning and thought that I may as well post my thoughts here. I’m 16 years old and I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago now. I grew up watching Marvel movies, obviously starting with Iron Man, and as stupid as this may sound, Marvel movies are my only true source of happiness. Every time I watch a Marvel movie I zone out, and pretend like I’m not me. Like I’m finally free.Anyway, last year I decided that I had had enough. I finally agreed with myself that the only way I can find peace is by killing myself. This was at the same time as the trailer for Infinity War was released and Thanos being my favourite comic book super-villain of all time, I said to myself “Maybe I’ll wait until I watch Infinity War before I decide to...” Time passed, and as hard as it was, I finally saw Infinity War. By the end of the movie, I was speechless.I found myself saying “Hmm... I guess I’ll wait til the next movie” because I couldn’t imagine leaving this world, not knowing what happened at the end of the Infinity Saga.And here we are, I watched Endgame on release day and was emotionally wrecked by the end. I’m glad I decided to wait. I don’t know where I will go from here but I do know that I’ve already pre-booked tickets for Far From Home on release day however, I fear that after that I’ll feel the same as I did before all of this. Hopefully not. I just want the pain to end. If you’ve read this far I genuinely thank you for taking the time to do so.Edit: I just woke up and saw all of the kind comments everyone has left and I would like to say thank you and that I greatly appreciate everyone who took the time out of their life to comment here. You guys are the best. [info] None [info] 1558390889
MyEngriish [info] I hate myself and my parents so much This probably isn't the place for this, but I really need somewhere to express my feelings.From the outside, my family looks perfect. A wife, a husband and 2 sons. Both parents are very succesful, and their sons are smart fellas, with decent looks, stepping on their parents footsteps, to one day take over the company. But that's all so wrong. We're completely broken apart. Or at least, I am. I wasn't always an only child. I come from a rich family. Growing up, I had everything. Until the age of 11, everything went.. fine. My parents weren't always there, but I had my twin with me. One day, we were playing, and my running came to a sudden stop at the top of the stairs. My brother who ran behind me, to catch me, didn't have time to stop, and he tripped on my leg as I suddenly turned around to face him. My back hit the wall, but he fell down the stairs. He was dead before reaching the bottom. The stairs are quite long, and the fall broke his neck. I cried. Jesus, I still cry to this day. Since the day of his funeral, nothing was the same. My parents became even more distant, and dug themselves deeper into work. I was left alone all the time, my only companions being my toys and pets. I was a wreck. I started smoking the ciggaretes my father had around the house at 12 years old. They noticed, but they didn't care. I was diagnosed with depression at that age. I have complete heterochromia, and one of my eyes is blue, the other one is brown, and it never affected me until that age. I started thinking that even if I was a bit different, it wasn't in a good way. I'd look at my eyes in the mirror and would either punch it, or the wall next to it. Even though they never said it I think my parents blame me for my brother's death. At 13, I avoided any human interaction, and only had one close friend. At 14, I had already gotten kicked out of 2 schools, and my parents hired teachers to homeschool me. At 15, I was still depressed, and became addicted to alchohol.  My parents still didn't care. They were always gone on bussiness trips. They'd leave me money, and they'd let me stay alone with my pets for days, sometimes even weeks. They were always there for my birthdays though, even though they weren't much fuss. At 16, I wasn't a virgin anymore, and accidentally left a girl pregnant, and I forced her to get an abortion, when she was 4 and a half months pregnant. We broke up afterwards. At 17, I was illegally drunk driving, not to mention I was underage, and caused a car crash. Nobody died, but the driver was left paralyzed from the waist down, and I never got in any trouble for it. My parents paid for it.It's my birthday today. I'm turning 18, and I'm sitting on my porch, with my dog Dante next to me. He looks at me and waggs his tail every now and then. He loves me no matter what. I'm drinking a glass of whiskey, and already smoked half of the pack that was full not long ago. My parents aren't here. They're on a trip to Spain. This is the first birthday that they missed. I'm thinking about what a horrible person I am. I blame myself for the death of my brother, paralyzed a man from waist down, and forced my ex to get an abortion, despite the dangers, but nothing ever happened to me. I tell everyone I'm fine, but I'm not. I don't wanna see a therapist. I don't like them. I'm a spoiled horrible asshole, with parent issues, and I know it. But I can't change. I simply am unnable to.And I do not think about suicide, no. No matter how horrible and deppressed I am, I don't have these kinds of thoughts. One look at me, and you wouldn't say I'm depressed. After all these years, I've mastered the art of putting a fake smile on whenever I need to. And despite the fact that I try, I can't go back to how I used to be before he died. I just sit here, listening to the calming rain and writting my feelings down for the world to see. Just so I can forget that they aren't here. And neither is he. [info] None [info] 1554994826
Kinetic_EKO [info] "If you didn't - the mods overreacted, but I've played with Zeus and he's not an unreasonable dude, so there's that."Oh no they did and I do have Zeus' own pic to prove it.Since **I**, on the other hand, have been on suicide watch a number of times, given how I've been diagnosed with depression as early as 2014, I actually felt very much offended by what happened and I know that I JUST SAID 'let's stop being sad' and everything but if you are going to go tease me over my reason not to be officially there I'm simply going to tell you why, because I have not forgotten nor do I mean to. And while we're at it, I think this is a valid joke, whether or not you know someone is having an issue with it. I was doing it myself. I was joking about my serotonin level here, being actually low. If that is really the reason they want to start a fight over, they obviously don't have much actual drama going on for them. I'm just gonna go and try to enjoy life, myself. [info] HORNY CRITTER DUDE [info] 1517602669
cmmaine [info] Born to teenage mom who was a foster kid herself. She had more kids later (siblings). In and out of foster care (Dont have documentation). She sold drugs, so she went to jail when I was about 8 and was there until I was 13. But I had gone to live with her former foster mother before she was arrested. I was diagnosed with depression at 8, medicated, eventually refused all medication. Went to first hospital at 12 (attempted suicide) and second time two days before my 13th birthday (attempted suicide, had to drink charcoal, and yes spent my birthday there). Adopted at about 13. After second hospitalization, placed in grouphome 1 for 11 months, got kicked out. Went to grouphome 2, again 10-11 months. Went to bio dad (15 years), kicked me out (wife didnt like me), two foster homes, before going back to grouphome (3rd). Diagnosed Bipolar at 15. At this point mad at the world, turned mega evil (meaning, i didnt follow the rules like I did previously, aside from first). Was only there for a few months, went to foster homes (4 foster homes from age 16-18) before emancipating. I got accepted into UC Davis, third year now. School was the only thing I could control so I wanted to make sure that I did the best I could, so I excelled.  [info] None [info] 1337069872
LegendaryLGD [info] This is a great connection.Lately, I've been thinking a lot about how my breathing &amp; digestion &amp; sleep &amp; sexual &amp; mental problems were all linked in more than just unidirectional ways.&amp;#x200B;I learned recently about the potential link between depression and inflammation. One day I got a major allergic reaction and while the shot I was administered calmed that down I was left with my current breathing problem: a chronic sinusitis, which means I have had an everlasting inflammation for years. I was diagnosed with depression around 4 years after that episode. Unrelated, I had a bad doctor that over-prescribed me antibiotics and after years of antibiotics abuse I assume my gut microbiome is shot, hence my digestive/stool problems, which seem unresponsive to probiotics. Add to that some PSSD and insomnia and you got yourself the healthiest human being!&amp;#x200B;So, the idea is that my allergy (sinusitis) causes my sleep problems (difficulty breathing, potential snoring, apnea, etc.) and due to the poor quality of life and also the inflammation itself, my depression is caused or exacerbated. Poor sleep due to breathing problems and depression are said to cause sexual problems. And now I'm learning of yet another potential connection between my sleep, digestive, and mental problems. This is such a sad cycle.&amp;#x200B;Fascinating how it's all related!&amp;#x200B;I've started taking around 10k IU of Vitamin D since apparently it helps against inflammation and maybe it's placebo but I feel like it helps. Maybe I should get on that probiotics/prebitiocs train and see if that does anything in doses higher than what I'd previously tried because apparently cheaper supplements are less 'dense' or whatever. My ophthalmologist (yes, just as small-talk not in any official capacity) mentioned they take melatonin to help their sleep and recommended I try it. This is even more reason to consider melatonin supplementation, if it could help with my gut situation.&amp;#x200B;My ARAS and gut microbiome being potentially shot, chronic inflammation, sleep problems, etc. the bidirectional pairs create a nice little web. [info] None [info] 1556455871
rptwinkie [info] Well, you need a kick in the ass.  I'm just being honest.  Are you sure that's the right major for you?  I was in computer science and almost completed my degree and one day i couldn't take it anymore.  I couldn't take that awful shit of a subject, so i dropped out and i completed my exercise science degree in record time.  I enjoyed the topic, i enjoyed the classes.. it has to be something you enjoy.As far as friends go, get a part time job where you'll be exposed to people.  Like a movie theater -- i made a LOT of friends there, as well as the rec center at my college (i worked there, too).  Right now i have a master's degree and work from home, so i meet nobody.  It's kind of lonely.  So i do hobbies.You need hobbies, things you enjoy, stuff you can love.  Maybe taking a drive, maybe writing, maybe playing pool or boxing.  You also should start working out -- just go to the gym, take a gym class for school (they have a lot at the university), just go for a walk or a run.  Find some awesome music and just fade away into a workout.  It works really well for walking/running/biking..just leave your thoughts to fantasize about anything (what you'd do with a million dollars, what you'd do if you met a celebrity, etc etc etc).Look, i know you don't believe me.  I used to be incredibly depressed in my teen years.. i had friends kill themselves, i had my brother die unexpectedly, parents divorced, life in shambles, horrible boyfriends... it was awful.  In college i changed my life around by being active, being social, and doing things i enjoyed.  I decided i would do things i put my mind to -- and i did.  I decided to talk to my ultimate favorite rock artist, the lead singer of System of a Down.  I just decided, i was going to do it, and you fucking know what?  I FUCKING DID IT.. i interviewed Serj.  I originally was going to put it on a local campus station, but then a bigger station was interested (www.listenin.org, not a plug i promise).  I then went and interviewed other artists, too..FOR FUCKING FUN.  Sure, i could've just sat around and did nothing, and felt worthless and depressed, but then how the hell would i have ended up on KoRn's tour bus with their bassist telling me i was going to hell for downloading music?  You just can't choose both.Also, you may be better than you realize.  I was starting to slip into my own depression lately, again, just from not seeing anyone or anything around here as i work at home (i am married, to a wonderful husband, but we moved completely out of state and we have little friends).  So i felt worthless, working at a job that has nothing to do with my degrees (but pays a LOT better, and i'm respected and appreciated)....then i had one friend that i was encouraging tell me, "thanks, i really do value your opinions and i really appreciate you believing in me."  Woah, that's cool.  Then i had another friend say that.  And another.  And a-fucking-nother friend!  I hadn't realized that being supportive was so easy -- believing in someone is super easy, and people appreciate it.  Old friends don't have to fade.  You an stay in touch miles and states away, i do it all the time, and you can feel better.Trust me... i mean, it's difficult.  I was diagnosed with depression at age 18.  Clinical.  Drugs. lots of drugs.  Now i am 26, free of drugs, and while i have some down days....most days are great.  Eat healthy, work out, you will feel better.  Quit worrying about how you are or what you're doing and start being supportive of your health, yourself, and others.  PM if you want to talk.  You can do this. [info] None [info] 1319855756
SimonCowellsTrousers [info] I was diagnosed with depression back in December and am currently prescribed medication for this. For a long while now I have this horrible habit of pushing people away, particularly my best friend, and then desperately finding myself apologising because I panic and worry that they will just be done with me and give up.I'm scared that one day my best friend will get sick of my shit and just say they are done.Anyway I'm rambling.. I guess my question is, is this issue related to my depression or something else entirely? Or am I just a dick?  [info] None [info] 1439612115
yung_erik_ [info] I have an urge to cut but I dont know where it's coming from In spring 2018 I was diagnosed with depression. Nothing too special besides the normal depressive episodes and the normal things youd expect. When I started class in August, my depression sort of changed to where I dont really feel any emotion. I could concentrate on my schoolwork perfectly and I didnt really have anything in my head going on. I've been this way ever since and like I'm doing really well. Straight A's right now going into midterms so like that's great and I'm happy.This past week I've had an urge to cut. In the beginning of the school year I've had thoughts about it but nothing like an urge. Last night I sharpened one of my knives and made 4 short slices, all right next to each other so it isn't noticable unless you really look for it.I dont know what's driving me to do this. Nothing is affecting my daily life besides that and I dont know where any of these urges are stemming from. It just feels so good and like that's obviously a problem. It's just scary not knowing where it's coming from. I know I need to get help but I dont want to go out in the real world to do that. If anyone at my school finds out and tells the mental health offices or any profedskrs, I'll be put in a hospital and I really dont want that to happen. Schoolwork is the only thing keeping me occupied and happy, besides my friends here, and I cant be taken away from any of that. I dont know what to do. [info] None [info] 1539812295
LadyAwesome713 [info] I feel so lost.. I just feel sad ALL THE TIME. I don't remember the last time I was truly happy and enjoyed my life. I was diagnosed with depression in high school, but I can't remember a time before that when I didn't have it. It had never affected me to the point I feel crippled before. It was hard, of course, but I felt like I had a support group and people to talk to. I was able to be strong and put on a brave face and feel like everything would be okay.And then the only people I ever felt close to and opened up to turned their backs on me, and now I have trust issues and can't get close to anyone. They broke me. I needed them, and they betrayed me. I keep people at arm's length, I know that, but I can't seem to let anyone else in. Instead, I just hurt those I care about.I'm not the same person I use to be. I use to be hopeful and optimistic and a dreamer. Now, I'm bitter, I'm pessimistic, I'm paranoid. I cry ALL THE TIME. I never use to cry, not like this. I was strong and went on adventures, but now I feel like I'm trapped in my own mind. I rarely leave the house, I don't have any real friends, I don't do any of the things I love to do. I want to runaway, but I have nowhere to go, no one to help me. If anything, I wish I could flip a switch that would quiet all the voices in my head, just for a little bit.I miss the person I was. I've tried to be her, but she's gone. Too much has happened to her, too many people have hurt her.Feel free to PM or reply, but I'm not looking for advice or wisdom or sympathy...I just needed to try and clear my thoughts so that I might finally get some sleep. But anyway, thanks for listening. [info] None [info] 1561804682
TarotReaderK [info] Chronic boredom and depression is slowly killing me and I can't take it anymore, I need to do something about it. I don't know where else to turn, I need advice I can read and finally take seriously. Hello everyone, thanks for taking the time to read this, I don't feel like anyone takes my problem as seriously as I feel it is becoming and I need some advice I can re-read to myself and I genuinely just need some help, please. A little background on myself- I was diagnosed with depression, adhd and binge eating disorder about a year ago, i've been on medication since. I've been depressed for as long as I can remember, even as a young girl. I have been seeing my therapist for 2 years now. I just got out of an unstable and rocky emotionally abusive relationship with a guy who would cheat on me and stomp on my emotions while I would be the maiden in distress and destroy him with very shitty words for ~4 years. The problem is, I know that was horrible, and I helped put a stop to the relationship, and he kicked out the flame, but I realized I clung on because I have absolutely nothing to provoke any sort of emotion out of me anymore. It has been like this after my father died last August. After his death I just stopped looking forward to anything. I realized that even If I draw this picture or play this song on my guitar my dad is still dead and my life is not going to get any better because good things never last long. I miss looking forward to things. Anytime I make plans to go out with friends it sounds like so much work and I end up cancelling because i'd much rather sit in my bed and do nothing or pick up work hours. Nothing is fun anymore, either. My old hobbies bore me so much I can't even look towards them (I.e. my guitar, craft box) and all the new things I've been trying either become old news very quickly or are temporary. You know how there are optimists and pessimists? I've taken pessimism and turned it into my realism. I can't get out of this mindset and I don't even know where to begin to repair this. I will try not to discredit myself, since that's a start, I guess. I found out I liked video games about a month ago through Reddit (thank you so much) and have slowly been finding things that I kind of enjoy (netlix, hot baths, and Fallout is my short list of hobbies right now). However, I feel like it's not fulfilling enough. I have no long term goals. I don't want to improve myself. Being social again sounds painful (my confidence hurts right now) but not impossible I guess ugh. I just need some kind words right now I guess and some ideas to do anything to stop being so painfully bored of life. I can't just sit here and do nothing anymore, but I don't even know where to begin. [info] None [info] 1493211080
TrumpetDick [info] The fact I read alot and far above my grade and was a massive fantasy nerd and didn't have alot of self confidence made me the target. To this day I hate school, I hate my bully and I hate what happened to me. He turned got the whole grade and even my only "friend" to severely bully me and the teachers solution was to sit us together to try and make us "friends". That year I was diagnosed with depression and had attempted suicide 11 times. It only stopped when he left the school and even then things weren't the same. To this day I dream about smashing the cunt on the face but I know that really will achieve nothing.   [info] None [info] 1506676633
brymasten [info] When I was diagnosed with depression in my last year of Higgs school, I had two teachers that came over to my house to check in with my parents and I. I had another teacher bring me home during some leave from hospital so that my mum didn’t have to drive into the city to pick me up  [info] None [info] 1539173186
Edsman1 [info] I need advice I've been diagnosed with depression for five years now, and honestly at this point I need some advice. I'm a junior in high school, and for the last three years I've had two things that have kept me getting up in the morning; student government and debate. I decided my freshmen year I would make sure I worked hard at two things so if I failed I would have at least something to fall back on. So now after hundreds and hundreds of hours of work going into both of these things, I lost my student body election to a girl who used her family money to get everyone ice cream, and who never had any experience like I did, and I lost in my events at state and nationals districts for debate. Then yesterday I went to congress districts and had my last chance to try and qualify for nationals, and I not only failed, but had the only girl I've ever though cared about me dump me immediately afterwards. I've been through years of rejection, being made fun of, dealing with bullshit, all for these two things and I honestly have nothing left. I know I would never have the balls to kill myself, so I know that's not really an option. I just want some advice from someone who's been in a similar situation on how I should get myself up in the morning. Today is the first time I've ever skipped school because I just couldn't bring myself to do it. I just need help, so please any advice? [info] None [info] 1429122111
MdrnDayMercutio [info] Well I was diagnosed with depression in my teens.  So a chemical imbalance is what causes me to suffer from Depression.  Which is weird because I just casually make everything seem negative in my head.But the most recent relapse.  I don't know exactly.  I've been changing schedules at work a lot to cover for people that are injured so work has been stressful and my sleep schedule has suffered because of it.  I'm also in a rather complicated situation with the GF that can weigh on my head a lot.  I trust her and love her so much.  But the longer it goes on without resolution the harder it gets to deal.I dunno.  It's worth it, I'd never forgive myself for not trying to make things worse.  The real kicker, I think for why I got so bad, is that I know I'm depressed.  I can usually identify which thoughts are coming from that.  So the fact that they are affecting me at all is disappointing to me as I have been off medication for over 2 years and was great at the start of the summer.  So the fact that I'm having a hard time controlling it sucks, and I'm starting to have trouble identifying what is real and logic thoughts and what is just me being depressed.It's weird. [info] None [info] 1358504614
lordberric [info] A while ago I was diagnosed with depression. Then I almost killed myself.Today, I'm happy. I'm still in therapy, but damn, life feels good! I got my exes books back to her and it was a lot less hard than I thought, and I no longer think about her constantly.I'm behind in school, but I'm catching up and at this point everything feels possible. [info] None [info] 1456415231
alderfae [info] I am definitely aware that I have a mood disorder. I was diagnosed with depression several years ago. I'm pretty sure I am relapsing. I forgot to take my meds for a while, then just stopped taking them all together - big mistake! I've stopped eating, sleeping, I am irritable. I didn't even realize it until my boyfriend brought it up. We were arguing about the ex, bc I was crying bc I felt like he will never love me as much as he loved her. He said I was crying over nothing, and I had nothing to worry about, and politely asked if I was taking my medication or if maybe it was close to that time of the month. I realized it had been at least 2 weeks since I'd taken my pills. I'm going to the doctor next week for a refill and to ask her to increase the dosage and to recommend a therapist in my healthcare network. I was seeing a different therapist for a while, but in my opinion, there is a conflict of interest since she is a friend of my mother and my mother was encouraging me to see her. The drama that was the catalyst for all this has been the rough patch in the relationship with my mom. It may sound paranoid, but I do not trust a therapist who is close friends with her. Also, my mom was/is a client of hers. It's just too much for me. And my mom and I got in a fight and she implied that the therapist is on her side and agrees that I am a liar/there is something wrong with me/etc. And this was long before I started breaking down. It has just been a lot of stress to deal with. My mom hates my boyfriend and he hates her back bc he does not like how she speaks to me. It's a long story, and I've got an extensive post history about it through r/raisedbynarcissists.  [info] None [info] 1547171584
CathanaMiau [info] Saw a therapist. Long story short, I've been meaning to see a therapist because, hey, well, why not?I know I've been diagnosed with depression, but as said in another thread, it could just be that I have *"ass-holes near"*One of the things that was suggested was CBT (Cognitive Behavioural Therapy) and I'm currently on the waiting list and should hear in a few weeks. I guess that alone is making me a little anxious. I guess I also want to know about other people and if therapy has worked for them (or is if they're undergoing it currently) and what kind of things to look to, especially when it comes to CBT. Any personal experiences or advice would be great to learn about.And for those who don't go to therapy, are you planning anything, or what do you currently do? Things like Hypnotherapy I'm interested in too, if it works, I mean.**TL:DR: CBT, what does it do for you if you're doin' it?** [info] None [info] 1311699974
bluntbangs [info] I think there are a million people out there who can relate, but since this is reddit and we share stuff, I'm gonna share. If you looked at me you'd think "wow, this is someone with their shit together!" I'm halfway through a PhD, moved abroad in my mid- 20's alone for work, have a great partner, have numerous awards to my name and have an active life, both physically and socially. I was diagnosed with depression at uni, but I'd struggled for years. At high school I was on a list of students they were worried about, but I never misbehaved. I still fight it today but my scars are nearly gone and I know how to fight and I know I've won before so it's easier. The thing is, no-one ever tells you that you're not supposed to find it easy. Life can be the shittiest, most miserable thing in the world. Today I wanted to scream. But I've had the most wonderful moments and each one builds upon the last and I don't want to die anymore. I don't want to just survive even. I want to experience more moments. I want to create moments for other people. I never thought I'd enjoy a sunset, but last year I found myself smiling happily at one. I never thought I'd see a face that made me happy but there's a whole load of faces now that bring a smile to mine, and one that just makes me warm and glow. I never thought I'd push myself to my physical limits and enjoy it, but the rush was incredible. I never thought I'd fall over and get straight back up again but I did. You have to work but there are two very simple things you already know:1. You don't have to make it hard2. It's totally worth it Right now you're paralyzed by the thought of that pain of studying, as I was this afternoon and as I've been before. You get your big, mountainous task and you break it down into smaller chunks, and if they're too big you break them down even further. And again, until one of them you think "hell yeah I could do that in 60 seconds" and then you take that list of small, manageable things and you pretend only one thing exists and you do it. And then you tick that off and congratulate yourself because (hell yeah) you took a step towards something and that was easy, right? Easier than working in a minimum wage job anyway. And then you do more tasks and it starts to feel good that you're doing stuff (even if that stuff is "wash the dishes" and believe me that's on my list too) and suddenly you find yourself looking back on a decade of doing small stuff and you're living a dream you never thought you had and you look at that huge task in front of you and after a brief scream (because that helps) you know you've got this, and you don't know where you're headed but there's something inside that's just a little bit excited.  [info] None [info] 1394477725
Coolguy4002 [info] My name is Marianne von Edmund. My name is Marianne von Edmund. I'm 17 years old. My room is in the northwest section of Garreg Mach, where all the nobles are, and I am not married. I study as a student for the Church of Seiros Officers Academy, and I get home every day by 8pm at the latest. I don't do herbs, but I occasionally drink tea. I'm in bed by 10 activity points, and make sure I get no hours of sleep as I lay contemplating life, no matter what. After having a glass of Dorte's warm milk and doing about twenty minutes of stretches while in the roster menu, I usually get no sleep and wake up in the morning with bags under my eyes. Just like a baby, I wake up with great fatigue and stress, crying in the morning. I was diagnosed with depression at my last check-up. I'm trying to explain that I'm a person who just wants to live a quiet life. I take care to never trouble myself with any enemies, like Hilda and Lysithea, that would cause me to get my life under control. That is how I deal with society,  and I know that is what brings me sadness. Although, if I were to fight I would probably lose to anyone. [info] None [info] 1566671522
funkrunup [info] Totally agree with user EB3031. I’m a foreigner in Germany and l lived there for more than a year. And I left to other city after I was diagnosed with depression in Berlin. It’s not going to be easy to get a job without good german language proficiency level, though you don’t really need to speak german in daily life to survive in berlin. Apart from job hunting, international office in Berlin is also a mess. It isn’t the right documents or the money in your bank account that can secure you the visa. It’s mostly depends on luck. I have friend, who only has 400 euro in bank account and got extended 4 years of visa, and friend with 12k euro got sent back home. Life isn’t easy here in Germany too. But I wish you best of luck in finding your way out. [info] None [info] 1564157278
rightsbot [info] [COPY] Are you depressed? A lot of men are, but they probably don't know they are, because they haven't been told how to recognize it. Below is a copy of [this post](http://www.reddit.com/r/MensRights/comments/19k5s1/are_you_depressed_a_lot_of_men_are_but_they/)by [dalsgaard](http://www.reddit.com/user/dalsgaard) at 2013-03-03 03:57:04 UTC, as read at 2013-03-03 03:58:09 UTC.**THIS IS NOT THE ORIGINAL POST. PLEASE DO NOT COMMENT IN THIS THREAD.**----------I'm listening to an interview with the first researcher on men in Denmark, and he mentioned something about depression that I found quite interesting. I have been diagnosed with depression myself, but I found the process rather odd. The doctor had this 'score card', where she asked a couple of questions like: "How much do you sleep?", "How is your appetite?", and the like. It occured to me that the process where she rated each question didn't readily take male psychology into account. Because men who visit the doctor have a tendency to underrepresent their own psychological wellbeing. We don't want to appear weak, and we have a tendency to make light of these things, or not make it seem like we actually suffer. Because a man who suffers... Well. And later, when listening to the interview, I found that there were a lot of questions that she ought to ask men that she simply didn't.So I got diagnosed to have a moderate depression, but when I thought about it afterwards I concluded that it's probably a severe one. When she asked me if I had thoughts about suicide, I sort of wavered on that question, even though it actually does come into consideration once in a while. We don't want to seem weak, and even as a mens rights activist I don't know the extent of my own role well enough, to actually open up and say it.But back to the interview.... Basically, the researcher Kenneth Reinecke explains how men often have different way of expressing depression. The reason men don't ask for help, or even makes less of issues that are quite severe, is because we don't want to lose status. Men may become more agressive, more irritable, and more defensive. More... For the lack of the right word, bitter. In society we have this perception that depression is a sort of sorrow, crying, public displays of sadness and so on. And it really is - for women. But for men it's another story, and it's something we're not trained to watch out for or recognize.So I think it's something we ought to spread around. Men and women are different psychologically, and we have different ways of expressing how we are. The suicide rate is so many times higher among men than it is for women, but imagine if we could lessen that statistic, by informing people about this psychological research?So, yeah. Here's an article that actually seem to cover what depression looks like for men:http://www.health.com/health/gallery/0,,20521449,00.htmlTake care of yourselves! As for myself, I already recieve help. I got pills and shit, and put the alcohol way out of reach. [info] None [info] 1362283095
Yogi_the_duck [info] Oh yeah man, I was diagnosed with depression at like 16 and I used alcohol to cope with depression instead of using medication. I definitely know I had some underlying issues.  [info] ANANHL [info] 1428005070
exokkir [info] I was diagnosed with depression years before my sz diagnosis. After I started having psychotic symptoms, I got Psychosis NOS and Psychotic Disorder before being diagnosed with Schizophrenia Unspecified Type. [info] None [info] 1542206898
WarriorInSlowmotion [info] I'm responsible for our DB and I don't know how to fix it.   So first of all, I want to say: I am the person responsible for the DB and I’ve been inspired to post something instead of just lurking by another woman who was causing her DB. Even though it was not super specific: Thank you for inspiring me and giving me the courage to post my story as well.Secondly: Please don’t judge. Well judge as much as you want to, but I’d appreciate if you could keep any non-useful comments to yourselves. I feel I’m putting myself so out here and this is way beyond my comfort zone. But, hey: Internet anonymity is a good thing at times. Plus, I’m also very desperate.I apologize for the long post in advance (hopefully someone will even bother to read it) I try to keep it down to the main points.I have a very odd relationship with sex which is caused by various things:1. I was **sexually abused when I was 15**. To this day I still remember how dirty and worthless I felt the morning after. I wouldn’t call it rape, but the sex was not consensual either. I probably could’ve screamed and somehow gotten out of it, but being the shy, self-conscious 15-year-old, I was, I said “No” to the whole sex-part but kinda didn’t know how to get out of it, after my request was ignored. Anyways guess that does not matter too much.2. Instead of not having sex after this incident**, I had lots of sex, with lots of people**. It was kind of a form of self-harm and my attempt to somehow not feel worthless all the time (Obviously did not work – 15-year-old me really needed some loving advice)3. **I have chronical depressions**. Now knowing what the signs are, I even had it before I lost my virginity in that non-consensual sex when I was 15. I was first diagnosed when I was about 21 (I’m 28 now), but as the doctor did not take it too serious he just prescribed me some anti-depressants and that was it. (Don’t think the depression story matters for my questions here)4. I **had two ex-boyfriends who couldn’t get an erection.** One I was with right when I was diagnosed with depression and afterwards, I’d say it probably was close to a toxic relationship. Anyways back in that time, I tried to initiate but I think having two years of a relationship followed by another year of a relationship where my bf’s wouldn’t get hard when I tried I just lost confidence. First relationship (two years) we had sex about 3-5 times during the whole relationship; second relationship (one year) we never ever had sex. (The guy even had the audacity to say to me “I really would’ve like to have had sex with you” after I broke up. He’s a nice guy and we remained friends, but that remark really pissed me off lol)5. My BF (HLM 24) (yep, he’s younger than me) and I been **together for 4 years of which 3 were a long-distance relationship**. We now live together for about 6 months. He has no issues getting an erection, we used to have lots of phone/cybersex during our long-distance. We’re both very open and like(d) to try things out.6. Somewhere between losing my virginity in such a crappy way, using sex as self-harm, having two boyfriends not being able to get it up (really messed with my confidence and I probably was not the most confident person before) I started to **put a lot of pressure on myself and honestly, I’m scared of sex.**  7. **Sex often hurt me, and I don’t get wet properly**. This added to me fearing sex. We tried multiple **lubes but they tend to burn.** (Mini-rant: honestly, have you ever looked at the ingredients list of lubes? Who came up with putting all that crap into lube…)Alright to summarise this: I have an extremely odd relationship with sex. And even though I want to have sex and I do get horny (more so since I started reducing me anti-depressants as my depression is getting better, since we live together) I’m scared. And this acts kind of like a blockade and keeps me from trying to initiate with my boyfriend. I don’t want to initiate only to just disappoint him and not being able to deliver because it hurts again.Also, he is not the most experienced, as I am his first. So, there is definitely a lack of foreplay and I do think that is something I need. At the moment as soon as there is a bit of action my brain jumps to “You have to get wet now, so you can have sex”. Which is obviously not helpful. I can hardly enjoy him touching me (which can also be due to my first-time sex experience) and while I imagine oral sex being amazing and a turn on, I’m always worried I smell funny and taste bad.I know therapy would probably be a good idea for me, as a lot of it is clearly a mental thing. I just recently moved to the UK and I don’t believe you can get sex-therapy paid for by the NHS. Unfortunately, currently, we don’t have the financial means to pay for counseling.I’m not sure why my boyfriend even still is with me and deals with all that crap. But we’ve been talking about these things and him (as well as me) both want to fix it rather than just walk away. I’m not gonna push my luck away so I’m happy he’s willing to work on this issue, rather than walking away.Wow, I’m basically writing a book here… If anybody bothers to read it: Thanks!So, some specific questions I have are:1. Ladies (and gentleman ofc.), do you also have experienced issued with lube burning and have you found one that works for you? (We’ve tried a few but so far none did work.) What about coconut oil, could I try using that as a substitute?2. Does anybody know of any techniques to break down this mental wall/blockade I have?3. I don’t really feel sexy anymore – Any suggestions on how to feel more sexy and confident?4. How can I initiate more foreplay on his side?5. When I wank him/ blow him he takes ages to come (he does enjoy it). I don’t have the stamina to always keep it up (probably need to work out my arms lol) Any ideas on how to improve here?6. What if he really wouldn’t like my smell/taste – Is there anything I can do?I’m grateful for any ideas and tips you guys could give me. I really want to fix our sex-life. [info] None [info] 1547213834
SPxRevolver [info] I was diagnosed with depression last week. I was told my meds would make it worse before it got better. I figured I'd be able to get through it with the help of my gf, too bad she left me for her ex yesterday. Now I'm a mess and I can't handle it. [info] None [info] 1476296712
alleybananacat [info] I'm scared to tell my other half what's going on in my head. Sometimes it's fine, I feel completely normal, but I have moments throughout the day where I question everything. I've been diagnosed with depression several times and have overcome it as best as I can. But I think I have manic periods - I'll have an erratic shopping trip and feel totally fine but two days later I'm returning everything I bought and feel completely ashamed, questioning what the hell I was thinking (money with me and him is very tight - I'm a student and he's pretty much on minimum wage). How do I tell him I think I've got a serious mental health problem when this is all he's ever known me as? [info] None [info] 1487616216
userbelowisamonster [info] I was just diagnosed with depression so now I'm no longer able to be depressed. [info] None [info] 1466897347
hrtopper [info] Got the least of my nmom's abuse on video, decisive proof? I finally got my nmom on video those morning and I wanted to know if this is acceptable. https://youtu.be/03IXtRlso3gFor some context: About a year ago, my mother berated me for 6-hours on a road trip. Insults, threats, all that jazz. It sort of fucked with me for a few months and the whole time she continued to tell me to "snap out of it" and to "push through it." She did end up taking me to the doctor and I was diagnosed with depression. He even explained that I can't just snap out of it and that I would need help. Well, my mother wasn't having it so she took me to two therapists who both said the same thing. Both therapists recommended that she give me space (We all live in a VERY small apartment). She ended up pulling in the chains even harder, going from absolutely not caring that I was chronically skipping school, or that I had confided in her that I wanted to kill myself to overly strict and controlling (under the guise of "I'm doing what's best for you"). Now, for whatever reason I had to provide her with all the details of where I was going, what I was doing, who I would be with, when I'd be home, etc. I have never had to this with her until this moment. So, of course I was pretty pissed about suddenly being on lock-down because my depression was seen as an act of defiance. So the main part of the story starts with this (This isn't the same morning in the video). I woke up at 6:00 AM to go for a walk around the block, something that helps me take my mind off of my anger. My dad tells me I need to tell her where I'm going, using a very forceful tone. On autopilot I responded with an "OK" using a similar tone. This made my nmom go fucking ballistic. I mean she had me pinned on the couch with her hands over my mouth and nose, keeping me from breathing. The whole time yelling: "You're insane!" "You raging idiot!" etc. Anyway, it was a whole mess that ended up with me having to run through the snow at 6:30 AM just to escape her after she tried to beat me.She know's that I was hurt by this but she always says "You're still angry about that?" whenever it's brought up. Like it's no big deal. And of course she always twists it and makes it my fault. "You shouldn't have escalated it!" "You used a disrespectful tone!" "You didn't look me in the eyes!" "You looked me in the eyes!'You guys know how it goes. Anyway, I was talking to my sister this morning and was about to open up about some really personal stuff with her regarding nmom when she came through the door. Of course, I am NOT going to continue that conversation right in front of her so I went into my "room." There was a little bit of fighting before I started recording but it's all basically the same.https://i.imgur.com/w4K7AMW.jpg These two are her favorite insults because I have specifically begged her not to call me them. This is the "name-calling" she refers to in the video.She also mentions two people. One named (L) and the other named (A). (A) is used as an example of how her harsh parenting works, but she also doesn't go into details about (A)'s methamphetamine addiction (most likely) stemming from this.She also says to speak to (L) for advice. This part stings especially bad because she likes to compare me with him or refer me to him because he would sexually abuse me in the shower when I was 9 years old. (Something she knew about, knows about, and acknowledged but never really been concerned about.)Theres my rant. Am I justified in being mad at her? For wanting to move out? [info] None [info] 1523932705
maneatingmonkey [info] I've been diagnosed with depression. Rather severe depression, at that. Still, I feel like those people who say this is some crippling illness are kind of full of it. I've had days were I feel like such shit I can hardly breathe or talk to anybody. But really, it all passes sooner or later. We're all a lot stronger then we give ourselves credit for. I don't buy the idea that we should just sit around and swallow pills and pretend we're irreparably fucked.  [info] None [info] 1364270105
rebuffedchaff8 [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and sad as well as generalised and currently being tested for adhd else i wouldn't have brought it up. i get that that's easy to say but it's true. [info] 16 [info] 1563658375
walkermayn [info] When I was diagnosed with depression I got a lot of support from friends and family, and I in turn care about them too. Talk to the people around you and you'll be surprised by how much they truly do care. [info] None [info] 1528485782
joanne5702 [info] how do I motivate myself to do stuff? I have been saying that I was gonna clean and redecorate my room for weeks, i'm always late with my homework and I keep saying that i'm going to do fun stuff like go outside and draw but i never actually do it. i feel like i'm just lazy and making excuses for myself. I just don't see the point in living. nothing matters. i don't matter. I don't know what to do.I have been diagnosed with depression but i still feel like i'm faking it.I want to change but i don't know how. [info] None [info] 1540646899
ijustwantsomefriendz [info] \&gt;implying you need a diagnosisBut I have been diagnosed with depression [info] Females deserve the rope [info] 1499289522
barista95 [info] Sometimes when people are depressed, for them to "get better" they change one or more aspects of their lifestyle, life, etc. I don't know your whole story, but can say from experience that I hit my all time low in first year university when I was living abroad, my fix was moving back home because I knew that my trigger was being away. So for you, you know that the exact OPPOSITE of your trigger is your work (military), so work with that as your positive and in your favour. Don't focus on what makes you depressed, instead focus on what makes you happy (ie becoming a reg force member, etc.) and see if that mindset maybe changes your mood a bit.Only caution I can offer (not medical just that I've been diagnosed with depression before too, so I can relate..) is to ask yourself if you're confident in yourself to lead troops, etc (whatever your position is within the military) without harming YOURSELF or them. Maybe think about that for a while, and work towards getting yourself healthy, and then consider your future a bit more. Good job starting small this week with appts, counsellors, etc. Good luck with everything. Know that there's lots of support out there for you, don't hurt yourself.  [info] RMS Clerk [info] 1365025263
muchos_verdes [info] posting here...why not I just discovered this subreddit, hi everyone! I have tried. I mentally coach myself every night I indulge in drink and shitty food. The food I can control. Got a gym membership, counting calories, I have done it before, lost 60 pounds. I think since my bf and I started dating we got that 'relationship weight', but we are on a track to buffness. However, I feel horrible. I have been such a closet alchy these last 9 months that it is barely closet at this point. I had a bad falling out with my ex of 7 years; turned to the bottle, got better with said bottle, lost weight.. I work a high stress medical job, so it seems natural for me to come home and pour a couple of shots to take the edge off. Except I keep going. and going. I was diagnosed with depression in my late teens, but I have tried about 10 meds, different classes, with little, or limited effect. Drinking mellows me. I can't talk in a group situation, but get a couple in me and I am all ears/mouth. My bf has never been in a serious relationship like this, 5 years navy and 5 years single, so I hate putting this kind of 'first relationship put-up-with-your-shit' stress on him. I know he knows. I want to just quiet my mind. a highball works, but does it? Sorry for the rant, but I cut out friends in my life in the past year that would listen to this. [info] None [info] 1428806506
explosiverightnipple [info] It's been rough. I have been diagnosed with depression and ocd. I have gone through what I can only explain as an empty dark feeling. [info] None [info] 1513515027
GordoHeartsSnake [info] You know, my parents told me the exact same thing when I was diagnosed with depression on my mission. It is quite possibly the most damaging advice anyone could give. [info] None [info] 1506441939
soyrizotto [info] Sorry I can't answer your questions, but I've definitely had a similar experience. I was diagnosed with depression about five years ago and always had those physically draining periods. The same vomiting/fainting cycle. Within the last few years of testing antidepressants my psych diagnosed me with PMDD because of how suicidal I'd feel leading up to my period. My months would be like two positive weeks of self improvement then one week of absolute self destruction, then my period. It's hell. Since starting lexapro and upping my dosage I think I'm getting PMDD under control. I'm glad to hear you can meet with a psych. I think diagnoses help bring some peace of mind, but either way, your emotions and experiences are completely valid. I'm sorry your menstrual cycle puts you through hell, but you've made it through all these years and survived. I'm proud of you, and I hope that your journey improves from here. [info] None [info] 1565411269
logvith [info] Memories, old bad break-up and crush So I seem to be stuck and completely unable to let go of these old memories. I've been diagnosed with depression and ADD. Meds helped slightly but I still think.Part 1 is the memories. I went through a bad break up 10 years ago. Sad to admit this is still affecting me which makes me hate myself even more. I was very happy with her as I thought she was with me. We had discussed getting married eventually which she seemed happy at the thought of it. I was about to ask her, had the ring in hand in my pocket and she hit me with the 'we need to talk' and it was over. Didn't help she chose to do this just a day after I lost a job. I found out later she was already banging one of her co-workers before she ended it.That has affected me in so many ways. I try not to think of her. A few years ago I stumbled across a picture on my computer which set me off. I thoroughly searched my computer and contacts on phones and emails to make sure that would not happen again. There are still other triggers, though. I love music. I almost can't stand to listen to some of my favorite bands because I'll remember going to a concert or doing something and that brings it back.I have moved on. I am married now(wouldn't say happily though) but I still remember the ex near daily. This far out I also feel like that makes me some obsessed stalker but not really. I haven't kept track of her or anything, just something else I mentally beat myself for...Part 2. Being married to someone else. I loved her when we got married but things have changed drastically. We've talked but she puts no effort in. I hate that I still think of the ex now that I'm with someone else. Also a while ago I was browsing Facebook to see if I could find some old high school friends. Found one that I had a crush on way back. Start talking and she's still gorgeous and the same personality that I remember. Also, I find out that the feeling back in school was mutual but I was probably already depressed at the time and thought she was way out of my league. Again, I'm already taken as is she and hate that I'm thinking of this. That's not as strong of a downer as the ex is, could'a, should'a feelings just like with multiple others that makes me question what I've missed.This post has gotten far longer than I meant it to. Thanks to anyone who actually reads it. If anyone does, how do you deal with such strong memories? [info] None [info] 1425933988
playdohgoatse [info] On a related topic, if I've been diagnosed with depression in my home country and have medication prescribed, would that diagnosis be recognised in SG? Do I just being a letter from my GP and a copy of my prescriptions? [info] None [info] 1406513856
steffisaurus [info] No, I'm not seeing anyone, but I onow i need to be.  How do I approach my PCP about this though?I was diagnosed with depression a long time ago and went off my medicine for it.  I know I need to get in to see someone because things have just gotten worse inside my head.  I appreciate the hug, it wasn't creepy.  Sometimes I just want someone to be there who doesn't just WANT something from me..  everyone always takes and I feel zapped from all my energy..  you took time out of your day to care about a stranger and that means more than you'll ever know. [info] None [info] 1528859414
bitchlasagna248 [info] I was diagnosed with depression but I think my therapist was wrong. [info] None [info] 1549743477
Thomas53655123 [info] I feel like I've never truely 'formed' a personality, and i feel it's cost me so many positive experiences. Stupid thing to think up maybe, it's late at night bordering on being depressed again but just can't help feeling gray.I was usually the guy who kept quiet and kept to myself, I never was that social, and after I was diagnosed with depression/PTSD from shit that happened years ago I turned into a recluse; I hid as much as I can from general contact, I remember overhearing from a classmate years ago in College she was scared of me because i just didn't 'fit in'.I currently work in Retail, lovely store couldn't ask for better but...just I feel like ive never formed any type of personality, years ago I probably wouldve loved a best friend to go do anything with, a girlfriend I could cherish and care for, people to have my back...but because of shitty experiences that have hurt me deeply i shut myself off, the only two relationships i had I got cheated on as I was a fall-guy, and any attempt i try to make friends even at my job just result in people avoiding me, I don't consider myself as weird or anything but could be because I just feel im not that interesting. [info] None [info] 1547603280
i_always_give_karma [info] My freshman year of college I felt this big time. I talked to a therapist and all I can really tell ya is time heals these things. I was in this hole for atleast 6 months and I didn’t notice a change until one day I realized I didn’t feel so trapped anymore. Take a day to just do whatever you want sometimes. I still get overwhelmed like this (still in college) and I’ll make sure to devote a few hours in one of the next few days to relax and do what I want. Skip a class and have a self day. Mental health is very important and it’s perfectly normal to get that overwhelming feeling of dread you have! Pm me if you ever need to talkOh ps I was diagnosed with depression when I talked with my therapist. It’s always there but you kinda learn to cope or learn how to make yourself not feel as bad. I still have days where I wake up and feel like I’m small and worthless but I have to remind myself that I have a mental disability and hope when I wake up the next day I’ll feel better. Focusing on bettering my future helped a lot too [info] None [info] 1548295067
xaq57 [info] Go head first into something new. I saw you mention you didn't know much about NJPW, so give that a shot, you could start with anything and see if it's for you. There's something about seeing two people go above and beyond to entertain, so maybe watch Shibata vs. Ishii for the Never belt....this may not make you feel "happy" but it will certainly take your mind off shit for a while. I tend to watch familiar things when I'm down too, things like Punks pipe bomb and then follow that up with Punk Vs. Cena. If I can give some non wrestling related advise....get some sleep. I know that sounds a lot easier than it is, I get that. I've personally been there, but that was one of the very first things a doctor told me when I was diagnosed with depression. Try to go to bed early, turn the lights out, play a mindless game on your phone until your eyes are heavy, and try to get a decent nights sleep. If I'm having a bout and I know it's going to be specifically hard to fall asleep, I'll drink a sleepy time tea. Go out and pick up a box, it's relatively cheap, keep it on stand by. Try not to take sleeping pills, because you will most likely wake up feeling groggy the next morning, and that would always spin me into a bad head space. Try to find some enjoyment in this weekend as well. Good luck brother, there are plenty of us out there with similar interests that have similar issues. You're not alone duder. [info] https://www.reddit.com/r/squaredcircleflair/wiki/flair [info] 1490989118
sabian92 [info] I was abused as a child although not as long term as you, and this is really sad.It's a shame you had to go through that. From one abuse survivor to another, I truly hope one day you can find peace in the world and be happy. I know that it's almost impossible (I've been diagnosed with depression that thanks to various other things is pretty much permanent anyway) but I would like to hope it's possible. [info] None [info] 1391380574
ashtonx [info] Shielding weak people from the criticism is like giving drugs to a junkie. It only increases their weaknes and demands the world to pander to them.I'm diagnosed with depression and social phobia, been on pills since i was a teen. Does that qualify as not thick skinned ?Guess what, it's the shit i get that helps me get stronger and live, not treating me like a freaking reject of evolution. [info] None [info] 1537187747
sailorscovt [info] Not directly overheard but my friend told me after I had spent the weekend at her house, her mum said she just had a feeling that I was someone who'd go places in life. A year or so later, I was diagnosed with depression and went through long phases of feeling like nothing I ever did was worthwhile and just wanting everything to stop but every time I think about that one innocuous comment, I feel a bit better. Like if someone who only met me for such a short amount of time could see something special in me then maybe it was true and that maybe I shouldn't give up. I wish I could tell her how much that comment's saved me over the years.  [info] None [info] 1545759773
kippa2005 [info] I don't know what to do anymore I've got my life in check finally, I've got a steady job, easy life, I don't have any reason to still be feeling like this. It's been three years since I was diagnosed with depression. But right now I just want to cry, nothing brought this on, I have no reason to be upset but I am. I can't stop myself.What do I do to stop this. [info] None [info] 1419036759
Verne42 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and had prescribed drugs and all... I think I can relate to you.Making REAL male friends os a good thing, but I want to highlight also to read the stoicsRead Marcus Aurelius' Meditations, os Seneca's Letters to LucilliusThe stoic philosophy will help you deal with life. It has done so with me [info] None [info] 1549161718
thecajunone [info] This. Man the fuck up or don't. Before anyone tells me *it's not like that Cajun!* I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12. Know what helps a lot? Going to the gym. [info] None [info] 1390885702
RakkieD [info] Well, I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12. I got told I was unstable and a risk to my health and the health of others. So, I felt suicidal (As you would expect) I had and still have to see councilors atleast once a week. It's not good. [info] None [info] 1432461466
Megawatts19 [info] I have gone through that feeling before. It's never fun. I love with a couple people and am always around others, but even still there are times when I'm there with others and I feel utterly alone and helpless. The pressure on your chest hurts constantly and you feel at any moment you're going to fall into hysteria. I've been diagnosed with depression, and it still rears it's ugly head from time to time. I know the feeling, friend, but it can get better. I pray that God will bless you with peace of mind and body. I pray that He will take you up in his arms and hold you close as you struggle. I pray that you will feel His presence and His love pouring down on you so you know you're not alone. I pray you will get through this, my friend. [info] None [info] 1408484766
BlackTurtleTea [info] I am not sure how to break the cycle given life commitments... Hello everyone. I am going to try and keep this concise.I come from an abusive childhood. I am currently 30. When I was old enough I started working, kept working and haven't stopped since. I help support my family, as we all had to leave home with nothing to escape the abuse. I currently live in a crappy apartment. I worked my way up the corporate ladder with my employers - not that I enjoyed it but because it was all about money and I needed a strong income for me and my family. We have no one to help us should something go wrong. My father also put debt on our name I needed to try and remove.I have been diagnosed with depression. I am told by my CBT therapist I am high functioning so I hide it well. Part of my depression is because how trapped I am given my childhood (e.g. I don't have much savings, cant take any risks, cant really move to far from where I am, work a job I hate because I never asked myself what I love but rather what will pay the bills etc). The other part is because how much I hate the corporate world and it just doesn't mix with my DNA. It makes me physically ill. I am currently job hunting and have been for 6 months - I am limited to my local area also, all roles would likely be a variation of what I would do now. I do apply for everything that would allow me to financially support my family. I cannot quit and take time off to travel etc. I need to support my family (younger sibling and mother). I cannot start a business, which would be my dream, as I have no money to support myself and can't exactly just "go back home" if something didn't work out as that would mean homelessness for everyone.My depression is really tough to manage. But I do all the textbook basics like eating well, going to the gym, socialising a few times a week etc, but it doesn't help. I am trapped. And I have tried the typical 'contact your local authority, bureau for assistance', too. I have tried everything you could imagine and more. The depression is so overbearing I can't even explain.If I could have a wish it would be a small flat that was ours. This would mean I would know my mother is safe and secure. I could then ask myself, okay, maybe I can try and pursue my dream now. Maybe I can quit and eat ramen noodles for a few years, which is what I do now, but without a flat to call home. Something like that would break the ties my father has had on me. I just don't see how I can facilitate this. Aside from winning the lottery - I don't see how to fix this without another 30 years of my life...I just worry a mental breakdown is around the corner, each day is getting harder to bear than the last.I don't know, every so often I just find myself needing to vent. I guess this is one of those moments. [info] None [info] 1567278684
andthenrun [info] I wouldn't think of it as depression in the medical sense. I think it would be pathological to not feel a lot of emotions around a big diagnosis! I highly recommend seeing a therapist for those emotions, but that's not necessarily clinical depression. I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 15, and it's frustrating when a full range of emotion is seen as pathological. [info] 32F / Rebif / dx 2014  [info] 1538015882
burtleton [info] Exactly this.I've been diagnosed with depression for about 20 years. It seemed to start randomly but last 5 or so years it's absolutely always this time of year.I'm going to try and get through without pills this time as they seem to get less affective with worsening side effects as I get older also.I wish humans could hibernate. [info] None [info] 1569006879
Silvercumulus [info] Way ahead of you in those red flags and it's true...I was diagnosed with depression 7 years ago and have only had medication to control it. I have my first therapist appointment on the 22nd.Remember though, these are my goals for losing weight. It's a personal window into my mind, and for anyone else making a list of goals, results may vary.  [info]  [info] 1381547344
lQdChEeSe [info] To be fair, some people can? I was diagnosed with depression several times and I kinda just ended up having an epiphany about my life and I just went out of my comfort zone and changed things and I've never been happier. All happened in a pretty short period of time to. took anti depressants only a few times as I was told to but stopped as I found them too mind altering and I though I'd rather be myself then just feel like a numb robot. [info] None [info] 1526735884
kayoss_ [info] I question if I have BPD. I have been diagnosed with depression in the past. [info] None [info] 1498041771
Zephyrus38 [info] Diagnosed here but realized I had to re-wire my whole mind and did whatever it took to wire myself half glass full.  Nofap only benefitted this mind set and made the total rewire more concrete than ever.  Nofap itself I don't think will cure it but will only help you're mindset once you have it established. I was diagnosed with depression early on,i knew at that age feeling like that wasn't right.  So pmo had no influence as far as depression went.   [info] 1 Day [info] 1512013469
Jokerjoey1 [info] A friendship falling apart.. I am in dire need of help. My friend(lets call him friend/he) and I have been friends for about a year and a half. We are both 16 and are both interested in video games. I met him in 9th grade, on the first full day of school. Before this, I was diagnosed with depression and had a very rough year, my grandma and great grandma died within 2 months. I was on a pill up until the end of 8th grade, when things were getting a lot better. I went into 9th grade scared, jealous of others around me, and feeling hopeless because I had very few friends, if you can even call them that. Well, we sat down at the same table, and something felt different. He said the first few words, and they were about video games. I felt so happy that day, I went home and skyped him. This is where it all started.About halfway through 9th grade, we "added" a new friend to our group of 2. This time, a girl. Smart, seemed nice, but when you get to know her, deceiving. I would gang up on Friend and Friend would gang up on me. They were mostly minor, until it started to get serious, kicking from calls, and ignoring for the entire day. We did that to each other, but I did cry about it once, in all honesty, I deserved it. This is when I began to be a jerk. Well, it took us 3 months to realize that she was not right to be our friends, and that she was trying to get in between us. After that, the fighting between us started. Friend and I would always yelling at each other about dumb things. We both started things, and it was a challenge to be good friends. He then went away to Australia for a month, and during that month, I think everything was boiling. I knew that one of us needed to change and that I had time to try. I tried, and I still don't know if I really did change. Skip ahead a few months to 2014. Things got worse. Up until now, the fights were quick and pointless, but this year has been horrible. I am having a hard time typing it, because my eyes keep tearing up. In the last month, we have had countless, massive fights, that put us to the point of ending the friendship. I have cried so many times over these fights, and I keep up hope that it will get better. We both give in, and end it. I don't know why he does, but I do it because I can't think of life without him. He can sometimes be such a great friend. But we both can be complete jerks to each other. And that's when we fight. I don't know what to do. I don't want to go back to depression but I want to keep him as a friend. In the end, I really love him as a friend and I love his company. He means so much to me and I don't think he knows it. I wish that we could just restart everything, like a video game. But I think this friendship is doomed. I am in desperate need of help.Thanks in advance to anyone who comments, it means so much that there are random people out there that will help others. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1398533953
KJM96 [info] I feel like I'm wasting my life I'm 20 years old and feel like I'm missing out on life. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 17 and have been to the hospital multiple times and gone through counseling on 2 separate occasions. I'm on the fence with anti depressants because I feel like they'll just make me feel emotionless and more out of touch with people. I regret fucking up academically in college my first year because now my GPA is impossible to bring up. I'm getting above a 3.0 every semester but I'm slapped with an abysmal 2.4 cumulative and it's causing me to miss out on so much. My identity growing up was sports and being funny and compassionate, I did really well in high school but turned down a sports scholarship because it was too far away and I thought I would be able to play at a school close to home but the coach won't even hold open tryouts and I regret not going. My school is big on Greek life and you really need to be a part of it if you want to have a social life. But my cumulative is so bad that I can't even go out for it and being a 2nd semester junior I've run out of time. I've lost all motivation in life, I no longer have the drive to go to class or go to the gym and I've been eating like crap and putting on so much weight. Because of my grades I was caught in a transfer trap and can't transfer out of school to find a better place cause no one will even look at my application. All of my friends have such great lives at school and I end up either sitting in my room all weekend or going home. Being alone makes me think a lot, it makes me think of the what ifs. Like what if I had done a little better in school? What if I went away to school? What would my life be like if I could go back two years in do it again? Every semester I change my mind about what I want to do in life. I came in to college wanting to be a state trooper but have taken an interest in law and politics and wanted to go to law school but my grades are so bad. I'm not even a dumb kid, it just sucks.I used to be the kid who never stopped smiling, who loved life and enjoyed being around others. Now I feel below everyone else and like I don't fit in. I'm constantly going to bed at night thinking about how if I die I won't have to stress anymore. I have a constant headache that never goes away anymore and nothing in my life makes me happy. I've just lost hope. [info] None [info] 1486762419
stephwilson [info] I've recently been struggling with feelings very similar to what you described. I've found - for me personally - these thoughts are less destructive than thoughts of actively committing suicide. For me, these thoughts make it hard for me to get things done. I'm in university right now, and when these thoughts get really bad I start wondering why I should even bother with school if I'm just going to kill myself anyway.Honestly, I don't have a solution for you. Mine come and go. I've started going to therapy, though, and it's definitely starting to help. I have been diagnosed with depression, and so we're trying meds and whatnot. Have you every tried to seek out any help of this sort? It never hurts to at least talk about these feelings.Feel free to message me if you need to talk/vent/complain/whatever, by the by. [info] None [info] 1352429493
Palpadean [info] 2am. I can't sleep for the third night in a row and I can't stop crying A year ago I was diagnosed with depression after struggling for many years prior. I was kicked out of University from my creative writing course for writing about my personal life "This is University, not therapy". I very nearly killed myself back in March because of it and other personal issues that I wont get into. After six tries of different drugs I'm now on Haloperidol which has been working magnificently for me. Except these past few weeks.I took myself off of my income support and decided I'd try and look for a job again since I already have experience working in offices and in the Civil service. Problem is, is the city that I live in has nothing. To the point where a jobsearch online or in a job centre of some kind will return zero results. None. Top of that I also have a huge debt because of University now which I know I'm going to struggle to pay back.  I loved writing at University. It was my release, but I've been told I'm abysmal and that I'll never amount to anything because I don't "appreciate poetry". My life is in tatters, when my younger brother can walk out of his job and into another well paid position, move into his new house with his girlfriend of seven years. I avoid nights out as all of my friends are happily engaged/married/with children and I (because I keep missing my appointments with therapy) keep putting all of this on my boyfriend who only two nights ago said if I can't get any better, he might not be able to stay with me. I don't know what I'd do if I ended up completely alone and I'm crying because of it. I can't sleep. Nobody seems to understand how much I utterly hate myself and how jealous I am of everyone I see. I'm not looking for a response, I just needed to get all of this out of me. I'm sorry if I've taken up your time [info] None [info] 1379639491
2Crest [info] How to rectify depression diagnosis When I was younger I went to family counseling and after only a few sessions I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed Prozac. This didn’t seem right to me but my parents pressured me into following through. Skip to a few months later, I stopped the Prozac abruptly (at 80mg I believe) with none of the expected side effects; if anything, I felt even better off it. I went to the doc and my parents to again emphasize my wellbeing, and sure enough I was declared ‘depression free’ on the spot. I didn’t give it a second thought and put the whole fiasco behind me. More recently, I’ve found my calling in the military and am working through that process. Unfortunately a history of depression can be disqualifying for both entry and certain military jobs. As it stands, my record indicates a brief period of depression, and the doctor refuses to go back on the earlier diagnosis. I need to fix this falsity. I’ve been told a second opinion is the way to go, but I’m unclear on the routes and rules for properly obtaining a misdiagnosis. Any information is appreciated. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1586400461
FishCakeSoup [info] yeah, I've been diagnosed with depression but I still have no idea how to help. When I had it bad I just stopped talking to everyone and dropped out of school so I'm not sure what social connection would have helped me, and I'm not sure how to help him.Thank you so much for your reply :) I'll try and be more sensitive and patient with him  [info] None [info] 1455917996
Ebonykillme [info] I've seen better days. This is gonna be long. So sit back and relax or head for the back button. I just need a proper place to vent and I think this is the right place to do it.I...well like most on here, I've been diagnosed with depression. It's not really uncommon anymore, is it? Seems like almost everyone has it now a days.I digress.I'm in a very...stuck point. Between dying and not. Only maybe once or twice have I been full of confidence and fearlessness to actually do it. And as sick and twisted as it sounds, if it wasn't for my fiance, I would have slit my throat infront of my trashy ex-roommates. He had to hit me. He never hits me. But it was okay, because it helped me snap out of it. I never did anything to them to deserve what they said about me. They were so excited to see me move out. I was so excited to let them see me go, the right way, the way everyone REALLY wants me to leave. I was gonna give them front row seats to my departure. But no. I had to do it, with boxes in my hands, fucking quiet, like a whipped bitch. Like I was giving them a victory. I was embarrassed. I'm still embarrassed. I hate myself for not doing SOMETHING. Even if that something was just spitting in their faces. All of this because I noted how they kept the house looking and smelling like shit. They all turned against me because they rarely cleaned and everyone in the house got in trouble for all the shit they did. Smoking weed. Drinking. Being loud. Making messes they'd only clean every other day or longer. And I'm the bitch. Fuck you. Choke on a dick.Everythings been shittier and shittier since my last ex left me. I'm not in love with him anymore, I'm not. But he left a big gash in me...and I still don't really know why. Maybe it's because he never really told me why? Maybe it's because he wanted to stay friends to avoid feeling as if his 'time was wasted'. Maybe it's because for two.fucking.years. he told me he'd never leave unless I did something so...horrible. And then he breaks up with me and has the audacity to ask to stay friends in the same fucking breath? And then text me in the morning to see if I'm okay? At the time, he was my fucking world. And...you think you can just...do that? You think you can just fucking do that? But I...I still..loved him at the time. And I couldn't say, 'no, I don't want you in my life anymore'. Took me what felt like forever to get over him while we still talked every damn day like nothing happened. Like everything was okay. Like I never loved him and he never pretended to love me?Things were different, obviously. You don't end a very close relationship of two years and not have some damage. If I even mentioned it, even if it wasn't for a discussion, if it just came up for two seconds for whatever reason, he'd get mad and make me stop before I could finish my sentence. I'd have to explain how I wasn't talking about that and he would just be so defensive. We talked everyday still. And eventually he just stopped. He refused to talk to me unless I talked to him first and there was always an excuse and if I called him out on it, he'd just pile lie upon lie and it was pointless to try and break down his brick wall of lies.So I shut him out of my life completely in a failed attempt at moving on from everything. His abandonment still hurts, and my fiance sometimes comes to me to try and make me feel better about being abandoned by my best friend. My only friend. The longest friendship I've ever had....that ended...for...no...known reason. I try hard to trust he won't leave me too, but this fucking cut in my trust just doesn't want to heal. I can never express how much his abandonment damaged me. And you know? Everyday it becomes increasingly obvious, that I'm just not wanted. At all. Sure, my fiance wants me, and yeah it's nice, but I thought everyone wanted me who was in my life for a time. I still feel lonely. And I still feel like the entire world has shut me out. I talk a big game. I don't really need friends. I don't really need ANYONE...and you know what? I don't....But you can only deny you're okay for so long. You can only deny that you're actually really fucking lonely for so long. I feel like friendship is one of the most pointless things there is...but the human in me wants it so bad. But lets face it. No one wants me. Eventually, my fiance may leave and then...I'll just be completely empty. I already feel so empty. I feel like living is a burden. But I'm afraid to die outside of a rage or ...beyond sadness...beyond depression...induced...adrenaline rush. Why is it like this? Is it my face? My voice? Just me in general? We all have that person we...just.don't.like. even if they're a great guy!...Am I that person...? Do people look at me and turn away, talking about me in hushed tones. I know they do. Or maybe they don't? Maybe I just don't exist. Maybe I'm not real. Maybe I'm just another human in a crowd of humans that no one thinks about or considers or cares for.If I died. It's a broken record. No one would...at least...not as a whole...would really care. They'd hang their heads down for a second before laughing their ass off the next. Or, maybe not even that because they didn't even know who I was. Why does God let me sit here and wallow. Why was I forced to exist besides the selfishness of my mother once she was married?I sound, like an edgy piece of shit whiny little ass. But you know what? I don't...fucking....care.Shout at me. Curse at me. Tell me I'm shit even though you don't fucking know me. Tell me what you really think and how you REALLY feel. Everyone on this dirt sphere wants me dead. Tell me why. Tell me why I'm so hated. [info] None [info] 1448864094
ErrolWinters [info] I've really fucked up... I've spent years lying to my parents, firstly to keep out of trouble. Then I just couldn't help it. Lies came easier than truth. It escalated and essentially I've not really had a relationship with my mother for years. I always blamed this on her, but even though she wasn't perfect I now see its more to do with my behaviour. I have lied and argued my way through school and to university these past four years. My sister and I are not close anymore either. I lost the love of my life (although I have to say I have dealt well with that, considering). I started cutting class and I've failed two exams this year. I've put on a lot of weight. I've called in sick at work falsely so many times. I'm at risk of losing everyone and everything and ruining my future because I am a liar with no self esteem and I've sort of ended up with no identity. I don't really know who I am or what my likes and dislikes are, or how people would describe me. I lost my individuality and defining qualities when I was diagnosed with depression two years ago. My mum pointed this out and it hit home. I need to get back in control and find out who I am and what I should be doing with myself because I am starting to seriously fear what will come of this when (if) I manage to graduate next year. The university apparently has a really good counselling service but I have to wait until after spring break/Easter to sign up.. But I have always had this thought that they're gonna ask me questions I can't answer like why am I depressed... Why do I lie? And these are questions I do not know the answer to... I haven't been abused, I'm not a victim I didn't have a bad upbringing.. So why didn't I turn out OK? [info] None [info] 1427413418
ebony_vint [info] Running out of Options. Constantly thinking about not wanting to be here anymore. Hello,I'm kind of at my last options here. I've had a very rough time as of late and just need some support. Earlier in the year, I was diagnosed with depressions. Sucks but what can you do, what put on antidepressants straight away. I am currently a Uni student so I went to their services here in the UK. I was only allowed councilling for 6 weeks, it wasn't very helpful. In March I meet this wonderful man. Things were great but I had trust issues from my previous relationships. In August my friend died, one of the worst pains I had ever felt and then 2 weeks later my Nan also died. To make matters worse This "wonderful" man broke up with me the day after my friend's funeral. I was heartbroken. I still am.I moved 100 miles from my friends and family but they are not very supportive anyway. Every time I ask them for help they just say "stop feeling like this". I haven't even told my family as they are very closed-minded and would give me the same old "What do you have to be depressed about". I am alone, the only person down here is him and he has blocked me on everything. I didn't do anything wrong and I am certain other people meddled. Thoughts turned to suicide very quickly, I don't want to end it all because of a boy but he really was amazing, I was never happier. To have 2 people pass and then the best thing to happen to me ripped away kind of just made me not want to be here anymore. I was told by people to phone 111 but I am too scared to pick up the phone and I have no one here to do it for me. Here in the UK if you want someone else to ring 111 (which is a non-emergency line) you have to be in the same room as them. I asked him for help, via a friend, he blocked them too.I have been emailing the samaritans but they don't seem to offer much help, they are just asking me a lot of personal questions that I don't feel 100% comfortable telling someone over email, as I said I have trust issues. Most of my life I have never really been alone, I have 4 siblings so my house was always full and I had a group of friends. But now I have no one and people are "sick" of helping me. I feel like a burden, I feel it will be easier if I wasn't here. People keep telling me to think of those 4 siblings, but right now I would rather be selfish and just stop the pain. Every night I just sit in my room. I have these very strong painkillers 500mg ones, I just want to pop all of them out and take them all, see if I can finally be at peace. I am running out of options. I really don't know where to turn anymore. [info] None [info] 1572633797
Averyboredpenguin [info] Headaches with depression so just over a month ago I was diagnosed with depression and put on anti depressants.  While they have helped I still have little episodes.  I've noticed everytime I get depressed I get a headache, it's not a bad one but one that's enough to make me not do to much, is this normal? [info] None [info] 1500707296
Iamahighlighter012 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression  a few days ago that's why I'm asking. I'm not trying to be rude. I just think sometimes environmental factors play a role and I'm just curious what others have to say.  [info] None [info] 1484019693
madlyinlov3 [info] Sleep way too much, doesn't like coffee but looking for other sources of caffeine What are things you eat/drink to keep awake and to stop needing naps throughout the day?I've been diagnosed with depression a few years ago when I visited a psychologist but it's never been the serious kind, I just sleep way too much even if I'm excited to work on projects (think like, 9 hours of sleep along with 3 20min naps throughout the day). Unfortunately my insurance only covered a few visits so he wasn't able to really prescribe me anything, but it really seems like the best thing I can do is develop a caffeine addiction. I can't stand the smell or taste of coffee. Any recommendations? [info] None [info] 1548861540
fahad912 [info] Diagnosed Depressed a year ago. Fighting to quit my reliance on anti-depressants. Hey,I was diagnosed with depression a year ago from today. I was put on a low dosage of Effexor XR, 75 mg a day. A year has passed and my life has taken a positive turn. However, I realized I was not reaping the full emotional benefits of my successes. I did some research on my anti-depressant, Effexor XR and was absolutely flabbergasted at the personal accounts on various forums detailing their battles against quitting the drug and subsequent withdrawal effects.It is now 4 days since I have stopped taking Effexor XR. I know the system of "tapering" off this medication is difficult. Thus, I began detailing my experience day to day to provide support for others in a blog form. My question is, are people interested in reading my journal recounting the day to day, I guess, hardships I experience due to withdrawal symptoms? I currently only write for self reflection and to put into perspective what is going on but I feel it could be an aide for those battling the same demons (anti-depressants). Let me know and I'll provide the URL of my journal. If only one person receives some confidence from my own hardships, I will consider this a great personal success. You are not alone, always remember that. Peace and love. [info] None [info] 1302410416
cheerbearsmiles [info] I wish I could do this so badly---I love the idea of being able to help a couple fulfill their dreams of having a child, and padding my bank account wouldn't hurt either--but I've been diagnosed with depression, am obese, have hypothyroidism, and have a family history of heart disease and diabetes. I'm pretty sure that if I went into a fertility clinic, they'd laugh right in my face. [info] None [info] 1362750412
MaxScar- [info] I was just diagnosed with depression that i've had for years. There's only so much motivation and whatnot you can do on your own. Sometimes, which is mostly the case with depression, it's more of a chemical problem. If taking medication helps me live a happier healthier life then sign me up because I'm tired of living life like this. It's cause me soooooo many problems that I don't have the space to write about. And a psychologist will also know if you do in fact need meds and will be able to prescribe if need be, whereas a psychiatrist can't prescribe if need be. Then you'll have to go through a whole new process, talk to someone new and have and pay for more appointments. I do think its important to have someone to talk to though, so maybe both in conjunction. Not everyone has to stay on meds forever, but they do help. [info] None [info] 1551968351
altf16984 [info] I really can't keep going I've been diagnosed with depression for over 3 years now, but had it for probably 10+ years. Since I've been diagnosed, for the most part at least, I've been trying and attempting to move forward, whether that meant just getting out of bed when I don't want to, making friends at work, and actually getting my first job and not fucking up or being an immature twat. I just can't stand to continue to move forward, when it feels like I'm getting so little back. I know it's most likely because I have little to no friends now, but it feels like no matter how much of an effort I put into making friends at work, it doesn't happen. I was hanging out with a girl from work(I'm a dude btw) and I had a crush on her. Long story short, she told me that I was contacting her too much, for her liking at least(I was texting her 2 or 3 times a week) and she also said she knew I had a crush on her, because I told a coworker, but she said "I'm going to stick a pin on that," as in, the feeling isn't mutual, and that she's not dating for a couple of years. She told me it was really awkward for her to say that, and made her uncomfortable, so it would probably be best to leave her alone. There are other girls I could befriend at work, but it just feels like the 3 months I was friends with her, and to what I thought, moving closer to dating her, was all an imaginary story in my head. I just don't even want to try and make new friends, I think I just annoy everybody all the time, and I just can't handle these thoughts anymore. I don't know why I wrote this, I just kind of wanted to say it somewhere because I don't have anyone I can. I know there's a lot of other things I could be doing to make myself feel better, it just sounds like no matter what I do, it won't be enough to help my crippling sadness and loneliness. [info] None [info] 1555649147
SomeoneOnReddit1967 [info] Why Doesn't My Father Love Me Anymore?  I don't know where to start. This is long. I'm so sorry. This is a throwaway account, because anonymous.Someone suggested I post here, as it could be therapeutic, in a sense. I'm not an eloquent story-teller by any means, so I apologize in advance for the back and forth quality of this, it's just a lot.I don't know how to feel about my father, how to deal with my emotions towards him and what he did anymore.My family consists of my mom, father, myself, and one younger brother.When I was younger, I remember my family being super close. My mom gave up her career to stay home and home-school my brother and I, which is something I'm grateful for, absolutely.My father worked as a firefighter and on an emergency response task force. I remember being real close to him. I would cry every time he was deployed to some disaster with the task force, begging him to stay home and not leave me. I remember, every time he'd come home from one, he'd always bring me a small gift such as a stuffed animal, or an ornament, something like that. He would often take me on father-daughter "dates," out to movies or a restaurant. He'd bring me along to a lot of his fire conferences later on when he was promoted to a higher position; he'd show me around, portray me in a good light, say how proud he was of me. He'd take me on car rides with my brother, and we'd sing together to songs on the christian radio station. He taught me just about everything I know about cooking, inspired my love for it; From a young age, he and I would make the Thanksgiving meal together every year, as it was tradition. He came to every sporting event I was in, every dance recital, piano recital, awards ceremony, all of it. He taught me how to play numerous card games, and we spent hours upon hours, laughing and having fun.Then, I don't know. I don't know. It stopped.Sixth grade for me was hard. I went to a private school for the first time, was severely bullied, and ended up begging my parents to pull me out after the first semester, which they did. My father changed. I was diagnosed with depression, I started realizing how much I hated my own body, I couldn't sleep, I was anxious. I started "rebelling" from my family's "Christian values" lifestyle, listening to secular music and going "emo." My father distanced himself from me, and it hurt. This was my cry out for help, and I felt he was ashamed of me, for not being strong enough to stay in school, for breaking his values, all of it.Jump to my sophomore year of high school, I started going to another private school, because my mom wanted me to make friends (as I had none). At this point, my parents were...odd. My father had pretty much stopped being around me, stopped asking to do things with me, everything had stopped. He was now all in it with my younger brother. Whatever, at the time it hurt, but I thought it was fine, sure, bottle up those emotions. My parents started sleeping in separate rooms, started fighting constantly, and stopped..parenting? My mom was highly depressed and sick, my father was gone constantly now, so I became the parent to my brother, especially once I got my driver's license. I did everything for him, took him everywhere, helped him with school, cooked and cleaned house, took care to make sure bills were being paid, everything. All this while still in school, trying to be a perfectionist in academia because I wanted so badly to impress my parents, especially my father.Senior year, shit hits the fan. My parents divorce, father moves out in September, right after I go back to school. My brother and I stay with my mom, but we're supposed to see my father every weekend.He never wants to see us.Okay, that hurts, okay, but whatever, right? At least I'm still bottling.I then find out everything, and I mean everything.My father has been cheating on my mom for years, YEARS. He had taken out tons of secret credit cards and racked up tens of thousands in debt by spending money on other women. My mom has been sick her whole life, with many cancer scares and such, and my father had been cold, telling her that he wished she would die, so that he'd be free. He was now a high-high-up commander in the fire department, making a bunch of money, yet he squandered it all on women and stupid purchases he couldn't afford, like a brand new high-end SUV, TV, etc.I'm furious. At this time, it's been about three months since he moved out, and he still hasn't contacted me or my brother. One day, he finally comes to see us, but my brother also found out what he'd done, and started a huge fight that turned partly physical between him and my father. I don't remember much of it, only that they were yelling, my mom ran and hid in her room, and I broke down crying. My mom and brother left, I don't know why I didn't go with them. I remember my father looking at me, asking me why I was crying, and all I remember was saying, "You don't love us. Why do you hate us? Why do you hate me?" He just stood there, and did nothing. He left. I was alone in this big house that had never felt more empty in my life.After this, I tell myself I hate him. Senior year, I won a bunch of academic awards, and I always still invited him to the ceremony just, I don't know, out of courtesy? He never showed.Spring of senior year, he's somehow won my brother over to him (by throwing money at him, 'cause my poor brother, whole other story). He's convinced my brother that my mom is the evil one, that she caused everything, and that he was in the right to cheat on her and do all this other crap. My brother starts wanting to stay with my father, while I stay with my mom. My father attends every single one of my brother's games, ceremonies, etc. He throws money at my brother like it's nothing, but he refused to help me when I desperately needed to go to the doctor, claiming he couldn't afford it. I'm pissed he does everything for my brother, but now never wants to see me or help me.He shows up to my graduation, which shocked me. Turns out, it was only for his own gain. He took a picture of me speaking at the ceremony, where behind me on the screen it said "Honor society president" or some shit like that. He posted it online, got a lot of praise, and then acted as if he'd had anything to do with my academic accomplishments.He then didn't have contact with me for the next 6 months.Let's fast forward more, I know this is long, I'm upset, losing track, so here's a jist of stuff.I'm a senior in college now. My brother dropped out of college and lives with my dad. My mom has lost a lot of weight, gotten healthier, got back into the workforce after 18 years, worked her way up to a good position, and helped me and my brother in every way she possibly could. I now live in my own place with my fiance and two roommates.Since high school, my father has continued to try to torment my mother, especially by using my brother against her, which breaks her heart. He's bought my brother a new fancy SUV, new phones, new designer clothes, etc., but has refused to help me buy new tires after mine gave out, pay a $20 co-pay when I was sick and needed to go to the doctor, just little things. Which, fine, he's not obligated to do so, I get it, but it still stings, you know? I've been inducted into a million honor societies in college, and he only showed up for one, posting about it online once again because it was the most prestigious one in the country or whatever. He doesn't ever talk to me unless he needs something from me. When I've been around him, he has barely spoken, usually only talking to my brother, ignoring me. For the longest time, he didn't know what my major in college was, sometimes still forgets. I've worked hard as hell in school, because I'm a perfectionist and I just want to impress him. I've worked hard in the jobs I've had, earning respect from everyone except him. He still just never cares, only cares about my brother now, only helps him, lets him drop out, live for free, not have a job for the longest time, throw parties, etc. Yet, I don't even get a "good job."Here's the kicker.I'm getting married in six months. He had the audacity to say he wants to walk me down the aisle. In private, I've just broken. I feel like an asshole, and I don't know, don't understand. He never talks to me, wants anything to do with me, so I feel this is just another way to have him be shown in a positive light, like he's some sort of good father walking his daughter on her wedding day, and that hurts. I feel like I'd be an ass for saying no, and I don't know. It hurts, I don't want to be walked down alone, I don't want to sit and watch my fiance dance with his mom while I don't dance with my father.It's like he doesn't understand, he just doesn't care. He doesn't get how:* I can't play card games without wanting to cry.* It took me years to be able to cook or bake for fun without it hurting me, that memory of him teaching me and helping me.* I still cry every single Thanksgiving, have to tell people to leave the house while I'm cooking because I get so angry, so upset, that I snap, because I'm in pain, this thing I love to do so tainted.* I cry every father's day and avoid social media, because I hate seeing people post their fathers, get so jealous, so mad, so upset.* How I feel so inadequate, like I've done something wrong, like I'm a failure in his eyes, not the daughter he hoped for, just some hollow shell of the daughter he used to love.* How I still look out in the audience at every ceremony, hoping to see him, even though I say I don't care if he shows or not, and being so sad when he's not there, as usual.You see, weird thing, too. I want to work with the incarcerated, to help them. I can forgive them for the things they've done, pretty much with no problem. I see the good in them, I want to help. But my father, I can't even forgive my father. How can I forgive people who've taken a life, but not even my own father? It tears at me.I'm depressed, so anxious, and I have so much built up anger in me it's bursting at the seams. My teachers are concerned recently, seeing a change in my behavior, seeing me show up less to class. I feel bad, and the closer this wedding gets, the more all this pent up bullshit is now starting to destroy me, because I just don't even know. I really don't.I know he and my mom are never going to be good. I know the divorce wasn't my fault, I do.I just still feel like such a failure, even with all my academic accomplishments, just not having him like me crushes it all, makes it meaningless. I don't know what I did to warrant him not loving me anymore, I don't know if it's because I'm depressed, because I couldn't be stronger in the sixth grade, if it's because I dress in black and listen to metal, if it's cause I didn't go to his side and shun my mother, act like she's in the wrong. I don't know.I don't know what to do about my wedding situation. Everything is crashing and exploding around me, I feel like a shell.I've tried therapy, I've been on medications, I've tried recreational therapy, writing, games, music, etc. It hasn't worked. I'm still so angry.This has been so hard to write. I don't know if it is even coherent, makes any sense. I'm crying, and I just hope I feel better soon, because I have shit to do, but this had killed my motivation, and I feel he'll always be holding me down.I am so angry. I am so damn angry. I hate him, but I don't. I can't forgive, I can't forget, I can't move on. Everyone around me has moved on, and I'm stuck.I'm 21 now, yet 17 year old me is still standing in that big empty house, crying, asking, "Why don't you love me anymore?" [info] None [info] 1553904887
sleepintheday [info] I think you should seek help. My parents became incredibly nice after I was diagnosed with depression. Maybe yours will be too.  [info] None [info] 1471536555
AshJonesArt [info] Just wanted to add my two cents, as I have struggled with this/still lapse from time to time. To set the scene, I was diagnosed with depression but do not use medication as it is personally too addictive for my liking. My brain tends to focus on the negative aspects of my relationships at any given turn. What I can say is that you will find people that undersand you and all it takes it that first step and being truly honest about how you feel. My girlfriend constantly reminds me of all of the good things I have done for her that week, when all I can seem to remember is the times I've hurt her or made her cry. You just need those around you to know and you can then begin to put in place emotional safety nets for yourself to make things easier. If you're anything like me, It's a sort of self loathing that perpetuates these feelings but there are so many people that can love and support you in this world, even if you haven't met the right ones yet. If you ever need a random stranger to be that person then we are all one message away from sharing your situation. If I can then anyone can with the right help. [info] None [info] 1466340369
mariolover2000 [info] I don’t know what’s making me unhappy. I was diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1573934772
khmer703 [info] I was diagnosed with depression since I was 13 and have learned to live with it. No medication, no therapy, just learned to cope with it throughout the years.You know how it goes. It's not as simple as labeling it a mental health disorder. It's not as simple as just having a bad day, or feeling shitty. It's psychological and emotional. It's compulsory. When our mental health defines actions, or our emotions compel us to make decisions, we may not necessarily really want or believe.For example, you've probably experienced this too. When you lack self esteem or self confidence and you project it upon yourself to the point where you believe it and act on it. Saying things like:&gt;Baby I'm worthless, I don't deserve you.&gt;I offer your life no benefit, you could find someone so much better than me.&gt;I love you with all my heart, but my own personal inadequacies are just a burden, and it's not fair for you to have to deal with it.The thing I learned about depression and living with it is, it takes a certain amount of self awareness to realize that it's happening, and to consciously control it, so it doesn't control you. Most people don't have the self awareness or that level of control to realize that their going through an episode, and it is defining their actions, and causing them to react a certain way. That's why some people need medication or therapy or a combination of both. Even though the problem might be obviously apparent to you, he may not necessarily realize it for himself or he may not know how to control it and address it proactively, and that's where the problem lies. What you have to do is help him to understand that he does need to seek out help for himself and that you will support him through the process. Don't give him an ultimatum but explain to him that his mental state is what defines his actions, and the best thing for a healthy relationship is for him to act and make decisions in the best mental state possible. Seeking professional help to address his depression will not only benefit him personally in the long run, but your relationship together as well because it gives you both the best opportunity and the best chance for success. Tell him that you'll support him throughout the process, but you can't make that decision for him he needs to make that decision for himself, if he has any hope of successfully managing depression.That's the thing about depression, it never really goes away. We have to learn to live with it, and manage it in a way, so that it doesn't manage us. [info] None [info] 1516561712
cloudsrpretty [info] Life is going. I'm making lots of progress though. I was diagnosed with depression a couple of months ago. Honestly, it was a relief, to finally know what was wrong. I'm trying college again for the third time (UK), and I'm not actually doing that bad. I'm on medication and having counselling, so I'm oh so slowly getting there. I had my first day off in 8 weeks today, so I've just been able to relax. How is life for you?  [info] None [info] 1508621896
faster_tomcat [info] Yup. Losers who can't get their shit together.Source: I was diagnosed with depression &amp; on meds for a couple of years when I lost my religion/faith and marriage at the same time. But I got over it &amp; got my shit together, a process which took about 5 years. [info] None [info] 1368155985
SidusObscurus [info] It frustrates me too. But also I understand. I've been diagnosed with depression. I didn't have depression before all this bullshit was going on. It is unlikely you'll hear the optimistic side of me, because even that comes with caveats. Caveats because previous hopes have been dashed again and again (Well maybe the Republicans will let the investigation proceed unimpeded. Well maybe the Republicans will override Trump's non-enforcement of sanctions. Well maybe Republicans will acknowledge Russia's attack on our country and join the Democrats to do something bipartisan about it.)For example, me being optimistic is this: Well the investigation is still proceeding, and there is still an election in November, and Trump may still be impeached.And it comes with caveats: Though Trump tweeted an order for Sessions to end the investigation; and we know the Russians hacked the 2016 election and they are hacking the 2018; and even if my hope does come true, history suggests the extremized Trump supporters will not quietly accept the peaceful transfer of power.Some of this is depression, but certainly many of these concerns have substantial historical evidence to back them up. It is extremely difficult to be optimistic under such circumstances. Especially when much of your support group (in my case, my family) will not validate your concerns and reassure you (instead my family keeps asserting "this is just politics, everyone has their opinions", even though this is *demonstrably* not normal). [info] None [info] 1533310019
Wormy_____McSquirmey [info] Holy shit. I was diagnosed with depression 17 years ago and have had trouble coping. There were so many failed remedies: rollerblading, sex with prostitutes, bottles of bourbon, cocaine, ayahuasca, philosophers stone mushrooms, Mexican dirt weed, American good weed, Xanax, caffeine, chain smoking menthol 100s, you name it I tried it.  [info] Titfucked Skyler White [info] 1433279353
Rhuey13 [info] Neil Young helps me through the day I'm only 17 but I've been listening almost exclusively to Neil for about a year now. I've listened to it all: studio, live, bootleg, in person. Neil's music has helped me through a lot this year. My ex's have attempt to degrade me into nothing, I was diagnosed with depression, my aunt nearly died from being an alcoholic, and I couldn't afford my dream college. Life's rough but the music is always there. Sometimes it's Massey Hall, that On The Beach live acoustic bootleg, Zuma, whatever. I can just throw on some Neil and it feels like he's been through what I have. It feels like he's a friend just hanging out and talking me down. I just needed somewhere to say all that and you guys have always been great people to me [info] None [info] 1496178526
Oops_all_failure [info] My mom has been in a horrible relationship for 20 years. I feel like I can't help at all. She promises me she'll leave him, but she never does. I'm 13 and I can remember my parents fighting for the majority of my life. When I was a little kid I thought that being with someone for too long would just cause them to hate each other (I couldn't believe that one of my parents could be a bad person) and so told myself I'd never get married. When I was small my father once tried to push me into the basement (I was very afraid of the basement because I didn't know how to turn the lights on and it was always dirty down there). Apparently he did the same to my oldest brother when he was a child. I remember holding the phone while my mom told me I might have to call the police. My mom would say she'd leave him next time they fought, and she never did. I ask my mom if she loves him and she goes very quiet. My parents fight all the time. My dad used to hit my mom. It was small things like bruises or scrapes, not like the beatings some abusive partners give their victims, but still absolutely vile for my dad to do that. We used to record them fighting and take pictures of my mom's bruises in case we ever had to show them to the police. I can remember very distinctively, when I was around 6, my mom and siblings were hiding in a room while my dad was downstairs. They had just fought. My mom asked me if I was okay with no father and instantly said yes. My mom whispered in my ear he had threatened to kill her. We never spoke of it again. He is no longer so violent, but whenever they fight I get a pit of dread within my stomach. My mom recently showed me their credit. They're $50,000 in debt due to him. She says that he is hiding money and he took money from my bank account. He lies to me. I am so scared for my family. I tell no one, not even my therapist. I felt so guilty when I was diagnosed with depression, because my mom always told me I had to stay strong for her. Once, when I was younger, she was telling me all the bad things he did recently, and I snapped and told her not to make me her personal therapist. I feel so bad for snapping at her, she was just looking for someone to listen to them. Sometimes he is so nice and polite. I am nice and polite back even though I know that sometime in the future he will do another bad thing. I wish I had a different father. When I was a child and saw all those 'daddie's girls' I was so jealous. I once hugged him and he asked what I was doing. I do not remember hugging him since. I'm not sure if I should tell someone if he gets violent again. My mom has told me that she doesn't want him in jail, and frankly I'm scared of that as well. He also helps the family financially so much. I just hope and pray that maybe their relationship will miraculously repair soon. I don't want my mom to be so stressed and sad anymore. She already has high blood levels. She tells me all the time that she doesn't want to die. I don't know what to do. [info] None [info] 1556239165
One-dapper-vagina [info] Huh I've been diagnosed with depression and panic disorder (I take pills for it) but I'm not ashamed about it. I try not to bring it up around my mother because she worries too much but with my friends, I find it helpful to talk about it [info] None [info] 1495633840
TentativeFear [info] Well I'm most certainly not a liberal and am still learning about being gay, but depression is very much a real thing. I have a degree in psychology with a focus on mental illness and I am diagnosed with depression. While it is true that some people trivialize depression and mental illness and "self-diagnose" to feel special, it isn't just an intense sadness. In fact, it deals with an imbalance of chemicals in the brain--specifically limited amounts of serotonin produced by the brain. Alongside this, scientists studying mental health have found that those with depression produce excessive amounts of the hormone cortisol. As for the main part of your topic, while I agree with other people that your definition of being gay seems closer to that of being trans, I have no real authority on this issue. If that is what makes it easier to describe being gay to straight people for you, then so be it. However, (and it isn't any of my business, but I am concerned) it seems like you have some issues with yourself. They may not be about being gay, but it just seems like forms of questioning or uncertainty. I hope you find peace in a positive manner.  [info] None [info] 1471592443
Happycamper101 [info] In my case, I've been diagnosed with depression and PTSD, which has caused me to suffer from rather potent panic attacks. I get these horrible nightmares where I see my dad and he tortures me and burns me to death, and during the panic attacks I suffer while I'm awake, I tend to see or hear him. Adding another person, another voice, to that kerfuffle will only make things worse. [info]  [info] 1360725020
joeypc [info] Many people dont get high there first time smoking. Including me. I'm not sure why that is but it seems to be that way for a lot of people. I have heard that it takes longer for larger people to get high.Most people cough their asses off for the first time. They were probably just surprised you didn't. Not everybody's eyes get bloodshot red when they smoke. Mine just get slightly red. but nothing really noticeable.As you keep smoking, you will get higher quicker. I usually start feeling the effects at about 3 or 4 hits in.To hide it, just don't talk about it. act like nothing had happened.I have some friends who sweat whenever they smoke. Not really sure why. It's normal though.I wouldn't recommend selling pills. The best way to get your money for weed is to do it the morally correct way and get a job haha.You can bake weed into food like brownies, cookies. and pretty much anything else you can think off. I wouldn't recommend smoking if there are other people in your house. If i dont want to deal with the smell I'll just go outside or blow my smoke out of the window.Weed does not cause cancer. In states where Medical Marijuana is allowed, many cancer patients use marijuana for pain and what not. I'm not really sure if it kills brain cells or not. It probably does. but many things kill brain cells that you do on a regular basis.Leaders? Fuck that shit haha. and group? sounds like they're full of shit.  It is physically impossible to get addicted to marijuana. Weed does help depression. I am diagnosed with depression as well. and i took Prozac and it really doesn't do shit haha. Everyone usually hates the taste at first but then begin to love it. If you do decide to smoke more, just be careful and happy toking! [info] None [info] 1351374550
G_WASHINGTON1776 [info] Am I being discriminated against? I have depression, as well as being transgender. I recently applied for a job at SaveMart, did my best to be really perky and happy during the interview, but I'm just not a happy person; there's no reason for me to even be remotely happy the way things are going. I've been diagnosed with depression; there's nothing I can do about it. Anyway, I didn't get the job, and when I brought it up with the manager later, he said that I was too "on and off" for the job; that I wasn't personable enough. What the fuck? Because my brain is broken I don't get a job? I live in California. Am I being discriminated against because of a mental condition, and is there something I can do about it? [info] None [info] 1442003929
Stessanie [info] It's definitely not uncommon for depression and ADHD to be linked. This [article](http://www.additudemag.com/adhd/article/748.html) has some concise info about the two. I was diagnosed with depression about six months before I was diagnosed with ADHD, and the chances are pretty good that the depression was actually secondary to the struggles of dealing with undiagnosed, untreated ADHD - which could explain why the antidepressants I've been on for months have made me feel *better* but not *well*. I haven't started meds for the ADHD yet but I will be on Monday. So the depressing feelings could be secondary to a lack of effective ADHD treatment, a side-effect of current ADHD treatment, or something unrelated. Definitely talk to your doctor! [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1358037011
Grant2022 [info] This sounds quite like my N Mom she doesn't really understand mental illness and to quote you OP seems to think there are normal people and insane people. As a freshman in college I was diagnosed with depression after one of the staff insisted I went to see a doctor. No one understood the last thing I could have was a mental illness. This was around the summer break and they recommended counselling.Long story short N Mom and E brother told me I didn't need a f****** councillor to blame my family for everything. N mom even said she would give me counselling (no she is not qualified or anything lol) and demanded to know what the 'problem' was. Long story short I fear 'having depression' around them because N mom thinks I should tell her why im depressed and im fixed. But no when I express myself to her she NOW tells me "you f***** up why aren't you on pills" like she wants me on pills to invalidate anything I say or do. My doctor has told me im not depressed enough to warrant pills.Bottom line OP I get where your coming from and feel for you. [info] None [info] 1497609204
deathday [info] I started having a lot of problems at 15. Then at 17 they turned into legal problems. I was diagnosed with depression too but I could never stand the medicine they gave me. My only advice is to try and weather the storm because your mind will get a lot more stable in your 20's. I'm 33 and I wouldn't say I'm as happy as other people but I'm not thinking about suicide anymore or the much worse things I used to think about when I was 15. I was incredibly unstable then like you seem to be now. If you can make it through without doing anything final and without getting anything on your permanent record (like I did) then you'll go on to have a pretty good life. Good luck. [info] None [info] 1437968087
DragonFox27 [info] If you need to chat, I'm always just a PM away. Could even give you my number if you need it. I've been diagnosed with depression and I know how worthless it can make someone feel. [info] None [info] 1465037701
yakiddnme [info] I have been diagnosed with depression twice. While I know when I'm depressed, I know it's my life rather than any mental illness. People say we bring on our own problems, that's not always true. Stuff happens, it's life. It does have ups and downs. Mine is in a downer I'm trying to work through now. We need the crappy times to appreciate the good ones.  [info] None [info] 1538424313
SexySpinster75 [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 15. Went on meds at 21. Finally realized I was depressed at  30 something. I'm 41 and have been on meds for half my life now. I only experienced relief twice since medicated both for only one month then meds stopped working. Now I'm addicted to meds that made me overweight and sleepy . I've tried every med there is. There's my story [info] None [info] 1461347365
ohAmygdala [info] I was diagnosed with depression a couple years ago and put on medication and went to a therapist at my  university. The therapist sent me to another therapist who I never met with because he kept changing our appointments around and cancelling, kind of makes it hard to trust any of them, but ive been in contact with another. Hopefully will have an appointment soon. Thank you for listening and the advice. [info] None [info] 1453695536
starsfor_eyes [info] I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1451895062
xxxoutcast [info] "You were a mistake. I should've aborted you. Is that what you want me to say? " No, in fact I never implied that, mother, all I did was turn down the radio, and you screamed at me, but I'm so glad you got it out. I'm glad you said what you wanted, and I'm glad that I'm still thinking about it 5 years later, when it isn't even up their with some of the worst things you've done.That was the first time my mom tried kicking 13 year old me out of the car, on a highway, during traffic. It was also the only time she failed, after realizing she might get in legal trouble, which I doubt, I wish she did leave me so I didn't have to deal with what was next, when she drove to my grandparents house, just so she could choke me out and dig her nails in my neck. Because I'm not allowed to scratch my face while my mother's yelling at me, apparently that's me trying to hit her, and of course when I push her the fuck off me I get yelled at by my grandfather, scolded by my aunt and uncle and have the cops called on me. A little push, from a 13 year old boy who was being strangled.When I was diagnosed with depression at 12, it made me so sad. Seeing that written down on a piece of paper, my name, diagnosis: depression. I hated my self so much, I even tried resenting myself, quietly saying to myself "I'm not depressed, I'm not depressed, I'm not depressed" only to have my mom loudly interupt me with, and I quote, "no, you are depressed, we just got you diagnosed, it says it right there on the paper. Suck it up and accept it. You. Are. Depressed." right after that sentence is when I started having suicidal thoughts. (they did stop when I started to make friends so don't worry) she then forced me to take pills, which I frequently told her I didn't want. It was dehumanizing, I felt like a statistic, like an experiment... I'm 18 now, so she can legally get rid of me, and trust me she wants me out as much as I want to be out. However, it's a little bit hard when she steals all my money... According to her, I'm her chauffeur and it's my fucking duty to drive her and my siblings wherever she or they want to go. And I always did, without question, because I really didn't have a choice. Well, when I narrowly escaped almost getting t-boned by a drunkard, I decided to take a hiatus from driving. We were living in a hotel at the time due to her house burning down, so I had to drive to school with my siblings. During my hiatus I decided I'd rather take the public bus to school, as I was taking a break from driving, however, she looked at this as me being "defiant" so she takes 50 bucks from my account, to which she has access to. I'm already paying for gas as well, so I'm now left with 6 dollars in my account. On top of that, she took my receipts that I've spent weeks collecting after the fire and turned them in as her own, so she could get the money. The money that I had already spent. 230 more dollars down the drain. (after the house fire the insurance was going to give us back money for what we had receipts for)Oh and let's not forget the 4th of July, me and my mom where getting in an argument about physicals, I don't want to get one due to some stuff that's happened to me in the past that makes me uncomfortable with being naked aroubd strangers. Her response? "man up." I then told her again that I'm not getting a physical and she kicks me out of the car. I tell her that I have almost no money and my phones dead. Her response to this? "not my problem." I tried bargaining, I said I could wait in the car while her and my siblings watched the fireworks. She threatened to have security pull me out. It was 9 o'clock at night and I had nobody to call, there was no bus or metro for the next 6 miles, I was essentially fucked. I missed the fireworks and could only afford a thing of ritz crackers and pumpkin seeds from a gas station. That was my dinner, while my mom and siblings ate at a sit-down restaurant and watched the fireworks, I was wondering around an hour away from home wondering what the fuck to do. Luckily I scouraged enough money to buy a charger that took HALF AN HOUR to get my phone to 2 percent, long enough to write down my grandpas number and go to a courtesy phone to call him, I asked if he could pick me up and if I could stay at his house for the night and he said yes. After all this, after alll of this bullshit, she has the audacity to tell my whole family that I "ran away"... I was abandoned, I slept on a bench, I didn't fucking run away. :/I met my dad recently, he told me some stuff I wasn't supposed to know, as in, everything my mom hid from me these past 18 years. How my mom left him, yet told me that he left me. How my mom cheated on him while pregnant with me, etc. Now that I finally have a bond with my father, she tries to ruin it everyday. She texts him after every argument we have, twisting the words I say around, etc. My mom also has a history of dating guys that arent very... nice. Were not gonna get into her whole dating history (which is a cesspool of her cheating on every tom, dick, and jane out there) no no were gonna talk about one of her more recent boyfriends. The 6'3" abusive fuck that she had move in after dating him for like 1 month. Me and my mom get in arguments often, usually about my own personal life or her stealing money from me that I've made myself, without her help like the independent man I am. The money that's rightfully mine. Granted these arguments never got physical, aside from when I was a kid and she'd hit me ofc, but not anymore. That is until her boyfriend decided to move in. Every time my mom yelled at me, if I said anything back, he'd get in my face and start yelling at me, pushing me into a wall or the ground and start hitting me. This is who my mom falls in love with, a man who beats on me and my brother, whom he choked. After their oh so rough breakup that you could see coming from a mile away, she'd love to rub it in how I "deserved it" and how it was "disciplining me"... This is exactly how one of my "disciplings" went. Mom's looney tune ex: Go to your room! *I comply*The looney fuck runs right the fuck up to my room and pushes me to the floor and starts screaming in my face. "DON'T YOU EVER LIE TO ME AGAIN! START SHOWING SOME RESPECT AROUND HERE! I'LL HAVE YOU LOCKED UP" etc, etc. Glad my mom considers that a life lesson, for me ofc. Not to mention the fucker yelled at my mom every morning and every night, probably cus she was cheating on him. I don't have proof but I don't need it either. I know her type. Now I'm 18 and wanting to move out, I've applied for numerous jobs and I'm waiting to hear back. I personally give it about 2 more weeks before my mom kicks me to the streets again. Dont forget, my grandparents don't want me leaving with them because "if I cant respect my mother how can I respect them" and my dad, who I recently just met, isn't ready to have me live with him yet. Nobody wants me, bug I guess that's just a part of being an adult. Personally once I get enough money, I'm buying a van and living in it. Til then.Tl;dr - My mom has emotionally abused me my whole life. Her exes would physically abuse me. She tried ruining my relationship with my father who I recently met, and she laughed at me for having depression. [info] None [info] 1563417544
jdumm06 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and ADHD. My doctor 4 months ago wanted me to see a counselor for possible undiagnosed manic depression or bi-polar disorder. I had gone to my doctor because I had been having panic attacks and severe depression with hopeless thoughts bordering suicide. I just had sound enough of a mind and a supportive wife to know I couldn’t handle it myself.Cutting out drinking has done wonders for me. I still need medication for balance but alcohol tips the scales on my sanity. I work in the industry as a salesman for very large brands so I have to pretend around coworkers. I allow myself drinks but never to get over stimulated or tipsy. When I do refuse alcohol it’s because of my “medication” but really I just hate explaining myself to people. [info] None [info] 1565955479
Monkespank [info] I was diagnosed with depression about a year ago. Just talking to someone about the problems in my life helped me significantly. Thank you for doing what you do.  You have helped more people than you might think. [info] None [info] 1513037949
shedandy [info] I remember the year before I was diagnosed with depression that at the beginning of the year I was the top of my class in Math and at the bottom of it by the end of the year. I guess its hard to quantify though because there are so many different types of intelligence and reasons we seem dumber. I mean there is lack of concentration, the actual slowing of cognitive process and memory problems.  [info] None [info] 1348647873
TheLonelySamurai [info] &gt;No, I didnt see the movie, but I was still able to extrapolate the meaning, and turn it on you. Again, you're either a loon or pretending to be retarded....or you have never heard a joke in your life.Ahah, you didn't extrapolate the meaning, stop lying. You thought he was rubbing his own ass, not making it pretend to talk. That's why your "joke" fell flat. You were making a joke about something that wasn't happening.&gt;And so are the brains of people with depression, and so are the brains of people with God complex. So, do we have gods living amongst us? Is not referring to them as a god, something that only a bigot would do? What are their pronouns? Your majesty? My lord? God complex is just one mental illness, out of shit tons of others that do similar things. Now, do we expect ehse people to control themselves, or throw fits till the world bends to their will, and we refer to them as gods?Lol, this is like the kind of slippery slope bullshit people throw out when they're scared of homosexuality. "Maybe they'll marry their dogs next!" First off, people with 'god complexes' are often mentally ill to the extent that they can't function in society. It's a little different than saying "please refer to me as "her" and "she" now" and going about your day. Medically, people with what is commonly referred to as a "god complex" are often schizophrenic and/or psychotic, and we can trace the "god complex" to another mental disorder. Second...I have no idea what you're digging at with mentioning depression. Do we acknowledge that person...what, has depression? Yeeesss?&gt;Depressed people are liarsYeeeahhh here's the thing, it's not even worth trying to have a good faith argument with someone who thinks that depression and addiction can be cured by simply admitting....doing what, admitting that they "caused it? All I'm really feeling from you is that you basically want to yell at mentally ill people for being mentally ill, and make them *pay for it* somehow because it offends your sensibilities.I'm diagnosed with depression too, and lying is basically the last thing I d. I have a highly developed sense of Catholic Guilt leftover from a Italian Catholic upbringing. No need to think I'm lying, if I ever *did* lie I'd come out and confess it five minutes after I did it! (Yes, yes I did eat that cookie! And yes, that isn't a joke, I actually feel guilt over something *that small*. If I didn't realize someone else was looking forward to a cookie and I ate it, I'd feel a pang of guilt for being thoughtless.) Somehow I still have depression.&gt;see? I feel like you are beginning to realize that you're supporting my argument. They cause the problem, the brain adapts.People who are depressed don't "cause" a problem though. In many people depression comes from outside sources and stressors they have no control over. And addiction is chemical, it really doesn't matter at that point whether they themselves caused it, except medically at that point you'll need a two-pronged attack for treatment, treating the underlying addictive personality *and* treating the physical addiction. Shaming them isn't helping anybody though.&gt;That they caused, right, I know l, I know, it's too much to expect people to be responsible to fight their demons these days. It's ok, tell them that their brain is just like that, and there is nothing thwy can do so they won't even try, that'll work. Hohoho....Again, what world are you living in where we suddenly coddle people with addictions and depression? We still treat people like shit because depression and addiction are "hidden diseases", and therefore don't garner as much sympathy. I wonder if it would be different if people wore casts on their head to signal an issue. [info] Trigger Warning: The safety is off. [info] 1455456380
diamond29 [info] I feel the same way. I have two close friends at school. Especially this winter we've been hanging out a lot together, but I still feel awkward around them sometimes. If I haven't seen them for a day and we hang out, I kind of need a little time to "synch up" with them, but until then I feel really awkward and out of place. Sometimes I find myself shutting down my higher level thoughts to make the conversation flow more evenly and less awkwardly.I'm not really sure if it's something like asperger's, because I'm having a lot of trouble at home with my parents and I used to have a big problem with alcohol. When I was in substance abuse treatment I was diagnosed with depression.I really enjoy my own company and I can go by myself for long periods of time, but I usually go out specifically to get rid of the loneliness. When I go out I also kind of feel like a sociopath, in that I kind of change the way I normally act to be socially successful. I've always been awkward though and I've been trying the "fake it til you make it" method.Just thought I'd mention that I have a lot of people I can hang out with at school and I don't consider myself to be a social pariah. [info] None [info] 1296845585
ToInfinityandBirds [info] Awww cute Why are you in Canada? Also is it really really cold there? It works out. Although didn't appreciate the $100 vet bill due to an eye issue my dog's having. Shel's gotta go see an eye vet next month Yeah I was diagnosed with depression this year but feels like it's been thee longer. But yeah have to lkve with them my whole life so grim and bear it and considsr sucide frequently. It's not great but it's life Sparking juice. It coms in a fucking champagne bottle so I Calle it fake champagne. Also once had it at some kind of event and it was used to toast with so I just call it fake champagne. And it's delicious. Well depending on what flavor you get the green grape is disgusting  [info] None [info] 1545708477
robbdire [info] &gt; I tried the ways without it for a good six months.6 months? That's not that long. I was diagnosed with depression in 1996, it'll be 20 years mid July. I was on medication for a few years, didn't really work, but made it a bit easier. Eventually we had to try other things, counselling, breathing exercises, just trying to get myself to a better place within my own mind. That took 4-5 years overall until I was able to do it myself and keep it up.You took 6 months, that really isn't all that much.However, despite offering advice, suggestions, ideas, reasons, you seem set in your way to be a failure. No one can help you unless you are willing to try and help yourself. From what I see here, you are not. So I'm done. I reached out a hand, you knocked it away.Good luck with whatever you decide to do kiddo. You are young, you can change things. Or don't. [info] None [info] 1466095414
txdahlia [info] Adopting older kids can be risky, especially those woth RAD. But....We fosterkids are not all crazy and didnt ask to be put in the situation we ended up in lol I was placed at 13 bc my mom went crazy. I was diagnosed with depression, but frankly, I never met a fosterkid who wasnt labeled the same. I didnt have severe psych or behaviorial issues. My "real" family was actually an ok home, no neglect or abuse. Its harder for kids that dont have "issues" in the system bc we/they end up in a system thats primarily setup for problem children. Aft my 1st foster home, I asked for a group home or fosterhome that only had "normal" kids and was told repeatedly that they dont exist. [info] None [info] 1418582465
Zalgo_Doge [info] I hope not. I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago. Been taking meds for it. I hope it's my depression. It better be my depression. I hope that I did not fuck up this badly.  [info] Software Engineer [info] 1497995642
sugarkitten_ [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 12. In fact, in some ways I felt worse than I do now. However it *is* totally possible that he’s just wearing it as a tag. Still, I agree, you should speak to him and let him talk to you about it. Keep a listening ear because if he really is going through something, you may feel very guilty later for not being there for him. [info] None [info] 1556017574
Leona_K [info] Am I a failure for staying home at new year's eve?? Please read ❤ happy new year btw 🙂 Happy new year everyone and I hope you have a wonderful time in 2020...❤My problem is that every year I'd celebrate with my family or friends and get all dressed up, make up etc. About 10 months ago I was diagnosed with depression and I lost all of my friends and I also moved away from my family because they were toxic to me. I am so depressed more and more each day... It's midnight and I hear everyone screaming, celebrating outside and I am here alone at home with my 2 dogs looking at fireworks out of the window... Am I failure? Am I bad person for not getting dressed up? Should I be embarrassed? 💔😓 [info] None [info] 1577830923
RetroLunacy [info] Do I feel bad for no real reason? This was originally posted to r/AmITheAsshole, but dye to their rules I was told to share here, so I hope you can help me out. A little bit of backstory: I'm 21, male, and I am diagnosed with depression. I was in a relationship with a 22 year old guy, and we had some good times. Over the time the feeling had begun to lower, but still I like him. I broke up with him at December 2018, long story short, he asked me if I could try finding him a girlfriend.That took a toll on my depression and made things worse, but I wanted to still stay friends with him after that.He has multiple times started that he would want to try again with me, but after what happened I just wanted to stay friends. Worst part was that I still liked him, and that made me feel really awful about that. Now I am in an open relationship with another person and want to stay friends with my ex. He is a really good friend, but if I'm already in a relationship, it might end up hurting him. Am I doing something wrong? [info] None [info] 1554895422
CliveBadger [info] I'm scared to face life without my grandmother. My grandmother died on the 15th. It was sudden, she went to the hospital and was gone within 12 hours. I didn't get to see her. I didn't get to talk to her. I didn't get to hold her hand. I didn't get to kiss her goodbye. I feel nothing but guilt and devastation. My grandmother (I called her Grum) was my best friend. She's played the role of both grandmothers because my grandma from the other side of the family isn't a part of my life and never has been. Around the time I was in middle school, my parents divorced and my father moved back in with Grum. My mom checked out as a parent for a while after the divorce, and my dad was too depressed to really be a functional parent. Grum stepped in and made sure I was doing school work, was having full meals and was dealing with everything okay with me mentally. Over the year my dad lived with her, she taught me how to cook, do laundry, sew and other things I'd need to be able to do in case my father couldn't deal with things. (I don't want to make it sound like my father was a bad guy, he tried. But he isn't able to handle things very well.)I'm almost done with my senior year and high school. For the past four years, my grandmother and I saw a lot of each other. When she wasn't at home, we'd talk on the phone often. When she was, I'd go to her house every Sunday, cook with her, and then we'd watch the office, or maybe a patriots game even though sports isn't really my thing. Like I said, she was my best friend.I was diagnosed with depression a month ago. One of the few things in the world that made me feel okay was being with my grandmother. She was my world, and I like to think that all my cousins and I were hers. And now she's gone. And I didn't fucking see her. I feel like this is all a dream and that she'll call me, asking a question about how the internet works or to tell me about something she saw on TV. Her wake is Tuesday and her funeral is Wednesday and I don't know if I'll be able to face those. I don't want to be alive in a world without her, but I don't think I can leave my dad. He's taking it worse than me.I don't know what I'll get out of this, I'm new to reddit. Thank you for reading, sorry if it's long. [info] None [info] 1421559748
Inasss [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and the major causes as per the therapy sessions are my disturbed self-identity and emotionally abusive childhood. The problem with the self-image made me lose all purpose in life to the point of being suicidal.I don't think it would be right to not call it depression because you have a self-identity problem, I think if you do have the symptoms of depression the you have depression, the reason is something you will discover step by step.It's been 6 months for me, and 4 months in we have uncovered a personality disorder that I was keeping hidden really well because I always show a strong and resilient persona but when I allowed myself to be vulnerable everything unfurled and we were able to take on a different approach in therapy.I was like you, started out feeling in control of 90% of what goes on with my life and just needed help controlling my sad feelings, but then as we went on, I discovered that I am emotionally immature in some aspects without me noticing it. It gets me down sometimes because discovering emotional shortcomings only makes me think worse of myself, more than I already do due to the depression. You'll figure everything out with your therapist, just keep going every week and see where it leads you. [info] None [info] 1566738049
Amblonyx [info] Ouch... Yeah, my parents didn't know what the fuck they were doing either. My dad had it in his head that people who see mental health doctors are weak and useless and said as much, that explicitly. He had never been diagnosed and self-medicated with alcohol.  When I was diagnosed with depression, my parents said they'd take me to a therapist. . if I found one by asking around at school. Literally the only person I felt comfortable asking was the guidance counselor, who had no ideas. Ugh, very "nice" indeed. I'm sorry you had to deal with that shit.My parents didn't threaten me with doctors. My dad just yelled at me a lot for showing negative emotion, since it was unpleasant to be around.  [info] None [info] 1454964396
paws17 [info] depressed in a 'perfect' life? I was diagnosed with depression last week by a medical professional and put on 20mg of citalopram everyday. I am having a difficult time coming to the conclusion of my diagnosis because my life seems to be near perfect. I have everything going for me- loving family and friends, a healthy and happy relationship with my boyfriend, my college education (even though school has become challenging), a nice car and a roof over my head. I just can't seem to understand why i'm feeling the way i do when everything in my life is so positive. [info] None [info] 1488125570
Fink665 [info] No kids and we’re gonna die. My husband and I are in our early 50’s.  We have no children.  I was declined for long term care because I was diagnosed with depression after my Mom died and started taking antidepressants.Is there any way around this?Also, with no children, what should we do if we both wind up senile?  Would prefer to have something in place instead letting the state find us with 37 cats.Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1514686380
eevilabby [info] I was extremely active in high school - I played sports, was in band, and was always doing things with friends and never wanted to stay home. Senior year I got a concussion which didn't seem like a big deal to me at the time besides the fact that it meant I couldn't finish out my tennis season. A few months later my mom started to notice the typical signs of depression. My grades started slipping and all I ever wanted to do was stay in bed at home. Eventually I was diagnosed with depression and was on medication for almost a year. I never felt the same afterwards, though. A year and a half later I had a mental breakdown and dropped out of college to sort myself out. I went back on the same medication but it wasn't helping at all so my psychiatrist put me on a new medication. This one worked at first but then it made me manic. I cleaned everything and never slept. I also became obsessed with my teeth and would stand in front of the mirror wiggling them all because I was convinced they were loose. My parents finally had enough after I woke them up at 3 am hysterical because I thought my teeth were falling out. This lead to trying 7 other antidepressants over a 6 month period, which included all of these side effects: hallucinations, insomnia, no appetite, thinking bugs were crawling all over my skin, heart rate of 140, serotonin syndrome, and finally having panic attack while home alone because I thought I had bruises all over me and was dying. My doctors finally did a genetic testing on me and discovered I'm allergic to every type of antipsychotic, most pain medications, and every type of antidepressant except for one. It's been almost 5 months and I've started going back to school along with being stable on my current medication along with only having to see my therapist once every three weeks rather than twice a week.TLDR: concussion in high school lead to depression which lead to discovery of allergies to many, many medications. [info] None [info] 1422345537
BretticusWins [info] I was diagnosed with depression as well, you dip. I manage relatively well with it nowadays, but it doesn’t fully go away.  [info] None [info] 1540124389
Captain_sassy_snatch [info] Horrible flatmate just needs to bugger off Hello everybody,&amp;#x200B;First time posting on RedditI need help dealing with my anger towards my somewhat entitled hag of a flatmate and just to f\*cking rant. TL:DR belowA bit of background first: I'm a 25F, finishing up my university degree and holding down a parttime job within the university alongside it. I've been diagnosed with depression and ADD, kept mostly under control, but I have bad days from time to time.  Our living situation concerns a small student flat for 4 people. Each their own room and shared kitchen, bathroom and toilet. Two room on the top floor and two downstairs. I've lived in the flat since it was turned into private student housing about 3 years ago. In that time I've seen a lot of kids moving out on their own for the first time into the house. I'm a bit older and have lived on my own for about 6 years now. I'm patient enough by now to deal with their antics in a calm and assertive manner.  As our rent doesn't include internet, when I moved in I took out a contract for internet/wifi. It's 54 bucks per month, 13,50 per person. A fair amount concerning where we live and the high speed we enjoy. I pay the provider and the other 3 flatmates pay their share when I send the monthly bill for it. Never any trouble with it and they know not paying means I'll change the password until you've payed. We have a couple of connectivity problems, but nothing overwhelmingly bad. Enter the EF (Entitled Flatmate). &amp;#x200B;EF came into the house last october and yep, she was clearly another first time on my own kid. I do my regular hello's and help her get set up and connected to the house wifi. Just your friendly neighbour stuff as she lives across from me on the top floor of the house. Soon after she calls a house meeting ( a thing we don't do, we keep to ourselves) and starts to lay down the law. She demands a cleaning shedule and a cheaper internet contract. The four of us agree on a cleaning shedule, but internet stuff is my department. I explain to her that I will look into it when I've got time to spare. This won't be soon as I'm very busy at both work and university, with make-or-break deadlines coming up in january. A new internet contract and dealing with the internet providers will cost time, getting cut off from the internet an uncertain amount of time when switiching providers, and costs will at least be over 100 bucks. I know, I've read my contract carefully. Life goes on for a while. EF is very loud when it comes to her music and bellowing along with it so I ask her to turn down her volume a bit. Can't be bothered with her other weird antics (binge eating and frequent puking on a weekly basis, having loud friends over, some other regular stuff kids who just moved out do). Have a couple of suspisions about her, but currently have resigned it all to guess that's just EF being EF. I put up with most of it, as I'm not perfect too, don't like confrontation and it's by no means as terrible as the dude that used to live there. (story for another time).Now it's time for the internet bill. The other two flatmates know the drill and pay, but EF flies of the handle. Ranting how I should've changed to a cheaper contract by now, that she will not pay for the connection issues and how horrible a person I am. I snap back and make it clear: pay the bill by the deadline or get cut off. She refuses to pay and I change the password. Two days later she pays and gets reconnected. Again if I could look into changing contracts. I explain again that I have too much on my plate to tackle that issue at the moment, please be patient. Not too long after the incident she nags again and now uses the four magic words to turn me from sweet and reasonable into a raging bull: We need to talk. Not looking forward to more screaming matches I handle it as I alway do: I will respond as appropriate as I can after taking a moment to cool off. Until I've collected myself, I will ignore you and leave you on read. EF gets this treatment too. No to very limited responses from me, as every message from her gets me seething in an instant.&amp;#x200B;In Febuary I tackle the internet contract issue. A new and cheaper contract would mean losing out on a lot of speed. As I speak with a representitive of the provider about canceling the expensive contract over the phone, she does the regular please remain a customer plea. When I mention the connection issues our house has suffered for 3 years being the reason that I want to cancel the contract she offers me +150 bucks in new products and services, plus a half year long discount when the contract changes names in summer (I'm leaving town after graduation in September). Sweet. I take the deal, have the representitive write this all up in my file and explain what's going on to my fellow housemates. Everybody happy, even EF seems pleased. To be clear: the price stays the same. It will only change after the contract is taken over by another flatmate. EF finds a new hangup for a month, now insiting on a cleaning lady as cleaning is not done according to her standards. Housemates and I cannot be bothered as our house is clean according to studentlife standards, so no cleaning lady for EF.  She nags, none of us budge. By now she knows better then to DM me. &amp;#x200B;Now to the past few days. I had sunken into a depression over the weekend and was not coping well. I was very prone to lashing out verbally, just wanting to be left alone for a bit. EF was still hung up on the cleaning lady issue and tries to call me out in the housechat for refusing to entertain the suggestion. I snap and my very angry booming voice can be heard thoughout the house: F\*\*\* off you B! Yesterday I sent out the internet bill and after she pays she starts asking when the discount is going to start because she still finds the contract too expensive. Can't be bothered to flip my lid or have her ruin my progress after the weekend's depression dip, so she gets ignored as per usual. Still raging inside now. She just gets me so enraged. &amp;#x200B;Help, what to do with EF, because I've started to hate coming home more and more. I don't want to deal with this anymore. F\*\*\* no I'm moving in my final semester.&amp;#x200B;TL:DR : Entitled girl wants cheap internet, nags like crazy. OP has had it with her and tries not to blow up with rage. [info] None [info] 1552580841
blames_irrationally [info] I almost killed myself my senior year of high school.  I was diagnosed with depression that year, but if they know that I had had a date picked out and everything to end it all, it would destroy them. [info] None [info] 1423220719
kerkypasterino [info] I'm a complete failure I'm not sure if I'm actually gonna post this, I'll see how I feel when I finish writing.I'm a complete failure. I've never succeeded in anything in my life. I'm 19 and was a low achiever at school, to the point that I barely made out of it. The thing is, it's been this way throughout my entire life. Ever since kindergarden, I used to fail to do the most basic things, and that includes making friends. I mean, I had friends back in that time, or atleast I thought I had. Today I realize I was just an annoying kid who'd follow a couple classmates around while they told me to leave them alone/mocked me, bullied me, etc. That went on until I was 15, I think, when I realized what was happening and started changing and tried to make actual friends who'd actually want to be around me (in which I guess I succeeded, so there's that). However, the constant abuse that I received from those so called friends plus the expectations from my parents not being met (which lead to several fights at home) completely destroyed my self-esteem, that is non-existant nowadays. It was around this time that I was diagnosed with depression, but I refused to believe this and basically ignored the treatment for as long as I could.So I said that this kind of stuff happened up until I was 15. During that year, I failed school, and then switched schools to a new one where I made lots of friend. Well, probably not "lots", but for me it was a lot, since I never really had many friends. It was around this time that I met her. God, she was amazing. The coolest person I have ever met. After a few months of being extremely close friends, we started dating, and everything started going great, I was doing okayish in school (a lot thanks to her, she'd help me studying and what not), I was happy, my family was happy, I had a reason to keep going and to try my hardest. Then, one day she said she wasn't sure if she wanted to keep dating, and everything fell apart. She was in another city spending her vacation with her family, and I was working in our hometown. Everyday I'd call her and ask her to please not break up with me, and then she'd say that she was really tired of it all, and I' say that I'd change anything she wanted for one last chance. Then she'd say "Ok, one more chance." and that was it. This conversation happened the exact same way atleast 30 times, until one day she blocked me on Facebook, Whatsapp, Instagram and Snapchat, and I'd never hear from her again. I was crushed. I still am. Fast forward 2 months and she finally answered one of my calls, and right then and there we "officially" broke up. I think the hardest part was to hear that she never really loved me, and that all that was said and promised was a complete fucking lie.Summing up: The girl who was my best friend and girlfriend dumped me after spending 2 months without talking to me (or letting any sort of information about her get to me, essentialy).I tried to get my shit together, but I just can't. I've been on medication for almost a year now, whilst seeing a psychiatrist, but nothing seems to help. I started smoking weed, which was a great relief, and my parents are extremely disappointed with this. I think I never saw them so unhappy and just generally worned out by something. I've contemplated suicide a few times, but I'd never have the balls to do it. I'm a complete failure and disappointment to anyone I've ever loved, and I just wish I didn't feel this way anymore.Thanks for reading this, I guess. If anyone did read the whole thing, please leave a comment. It doesn't have to be anything big or whatever, it just comforts me to know that someone knows what I'm going through. [info] None [info] 1443100556
ShadowPhoenix951 [info] Well, here's where you start. Don't think about your ex. Thinking about her, no matter the context, will only drag you down. Whenever you find yourself thinking of your ex, try to think of something else (for example, when I was getting over her, if I was thinking of my ex, I would stop what I was doing, and just pour all of my energy into studying for school then and there). I know it's not the best advice, but just forgetting about her and moving on is the first step. Once you've started to put the past behind you, what you need to work on is trust development. I don't know you, so I can't say very well, but you may have had issues trusting her because you have an inability to trust yourself. So, what you need to do, is try to not think about future actions of people around you, and only focus on your own actions. Think of your future actions, set small goals for yourself, and focus on achieving them. The more you find yourself able to achieve your own goals, the more you will learn to trust yourself. And if you are able to trust yourself, you'll be able to better trust those around you. And once you develop it, never lose that trust you have in yourself. If you're honest and trust yourself, then regardless of how others act, you'll be able to keep it up, knowing how great you are. I know this isn't much, but if you want to ask more specific things, don't be afraid to, or PM me. I was diagnosed with depression, and went through many of the same things you did. I believe we're also roughly the same age, so I understand your context. So I'm willing to help as best I can; all you need do is ask.  [info] None [info] 1321248183
misogoop [info] No. I have bp1, but when I was younger I was diagnosed with depression. Wellbutrin made me just snap and I started hurting myself for no real reason. I was on abilify and Zoloft for a long time and I either felt numb or in the beginning stages of losing hold of myself if that makes sense? [info] None [info] 1549164483
b0rris93 [info] Climbing Up The Walls for someone with depression/Mental Illness So I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago (although I've probably suffered from it for maybe 15 years) and it wasn't until recently that I noticed that CUTW very acurately describes the feeling of someone with a mental issue. I always find myself in a state of catharsis when I listen to it after a breakdown. What other songs made you feel in peace after a bad day? [info] None [info] 1502971873
MisazamatVatan [info] I love seeing everyone elses resolutions (they make me more motivated to stick with mine!So a few weeks ago I was diagnosed with depression and I'm working on getting better so all of mine are focused on getting mentally better. 1. Come up with a fitness routine and stick with it - at the moment I don't do any exercise and my doctor has advised that it will make me feel a lot better.2. Read more books - because of my depression I have trouble concentrating on anything and so my goal is to try and read at least 35 books this year 3. Do online courses - I realised that I was happiest when I was at school and that I miss learning, so I'm signing up for some online courses and will do those in my free time with the hope that when I am better I can apply to university and stick with it. 4. Get better at saving - I suck at saving and we are trying to save up to buy a house so I need to put so much away each month so we can buy one by the end of the year. 5. Be happy at work - Work is my main cause of stress at the moment, thinking about it makes me feel awful and I'm trying to be excited and happy about work so its not as much of a problem getting up on a morning (and I'm less likely to call in sick). 6. To learn new skills - As I mentioned I like to learn, this year I taught myself how to knit and how to crochet I'm not very good at it but I enjoy it and at the moment I'm trying to make a blanket to send to a child in a refugee camp after seeing a charity which does that. Next year I would like to learn a language or learn more about subjects that I love so I can sit and talk about them with people (rather than staying quiet and wishing someone would ask me what I think). So basically get better by being proactive rather than doing what I had been doing which was sitting around, feeling sorry for myself, wishing someone else would make it all better! [info] None [info] 1419960938
RipleyRiot [info] I can't animate anymore and it breaks my heart. I'm not sure this is the right flair if it isn't I apologise... I just need to share this with someone who will understand I always like bed animation. Ever since I learned to rewind and play a VHS I would watch again and again any Disney movie I could get my tiny hands on, I would put paper over the screen and copy frames because those were he most amazing friend I've seen and I wanted to make movies when I grew upI bet many can relate to that.... When I was 14 I went to the doctor and learned  the tendons on my wrists have a malformation, there's something similar to a cut on them so they work as two weaker ones where there should be one thicker one. He said they could attempt to surgicallyend it but here was an almost equal chance of loosing my hand movements as there was of fixing it.He said I shouldn't use my hands to type, brush my teeth, write, draw or eat. Of course, I might as well not use my hands at all then. At 15 I drew so much. Leaned so much. And of course as any teen I did a lot of fanart. An art teacher said I had talent and she wanted to see my folder to pick a drawing for a local competition and I was so happy and proud and excited.But as she looked at my drawings and I excitedly today her what they were and who the characters are and all the techniques I used she only said "So, none of this is yours.. there's nothing. No original work whatsoever in this folder?" I was devastated I drew all of that. Myself. I posed those characters I colored them. I used character sheets for reference, I made them wear different clothes.... But... So that doesn't count? At all???I used to complete 400 pages of sketchbooks with colored drawings in 3 months at the time.After that I was lucky if I could find it in myself to draw a page a month.Nothing was good. Everything I did I was afraid I already saw somewhere else, I hated anything that resembled anything, I'd scrap out any tiny line I wasn't happy with.I went to college for graphic design at 17, I still loved animation, drawing, art... I just couldn't produce as much... But I picked up a pace then.I finished 4 100 pages sketchbooks in 2 years, which wasn't so bad I guess..I went to college for that because my father wants some to get a "real degree" but in exchange he promised to pay for an animation post grad if I got the diploma. And so I did. And I went to vancouver for a classical animation one year course. It was the best year of my life. Not the place to talk about it maybe but in school I was bullied and had an eating disorder and one friend, in college I was bullied again and managed to have two friends.But in animation? I was friends with everyone! Everybody was great and kind and passionate about the same things, we stayed at school late drawing together, went out to life drawing sessions on weekends, watched movies and tried to animate the FX.... I was drawing again. I felt like what I did was good. I was being productive and passionate. It was amazing.But when winter came and every hour  of the day we got out of the building was dark and cold I started having a hard time getting out of bed, found it difficult to feel joy when a few days ago I was ecstatic... And I was diagnosed with depression.I knew it'd come. All women in my family have it... And so my Visa ended, and I had to come back home. The industry here doesn't pay well and I was sick. My eating disorder came back, I had month long depressive episodes... I was a mess.Fast forward a little I met my now husband and I did a course in tattoo. It was a lot of fun, and I even started animating againBut... This time I couldn't draw for more than a few hours and my wrists would be killing me... It'd be difficult to open doors, and carry my plate to the sink...it'd be hard to pour juice into my cup even...We're soon moving to California and now I'm heartbroken... I always wanted to work with art... But now... I spent a lot of our money learning to tattoo and getting equipments... getting into animating and doing drawing freelances...Only to find out that I can't do it.... I physically can't do it. I think this wasn't so much about just animation... more of a rant/ off my chest thing... But I'd just like to leave a tip... Please artists take care of your hands. Even if you don't have a condition like mine, where it's genetic It's truly sad when you CAN'T do what you love....I catch myself super excited to draw bit I can't spend more than 10 minutes with a pencil now....I just realized this because we were talking about what kind of work I could do over there and.. I had to hold back my tears because lately I've been ignoring this as if "oh I just don't feel like drawing as much, it's fine" But it's not fine. That's a lie. I want to draw all the time and I can't. I have to have strenght to brush my teeth and open doors and pour my drinks.... This is so so sad...  I feel hopeless and helpless...  Just...Please take care of your hands ❤️I'm sorry if this wasn't exactly on theme... I didn't know where else to turn.... If you read this far thank you ❤️ [info] None [info] 1543714404
buttsaladsandwich [info] Both. I have been diagnosed with depression, on top of that I'm a piece of shit. Now, shut the fuck up [info] None [info] 1494510195
WhyNot1138 [info] I suffer from anhedonia too! I was diagnosed with depression at an early age. I lose interest in every single thing I've ever liked. No matter how much joy it's given me in the past, when my depression takes over I can't see how I ever enjoyed those things. I feel like I just want to be in an undisturbed comma. Those around me try to cheer my up with things that they know I like doing, but can't seem to understand how I don't like those things when I'm sunk deep into depression. It feels like hopelessness.  [info] None [info] 1480809970
slacker7 [info] &gt;The Tottenham full-back, 27, made the admission in a frank interview with several national newspapers.&gt;&gt;"It's no secret that I've been through a testing time at Tottenham this season," said Rose.&gt;&gt;"It led to me seeing a psychologist and I was diagnosed with depression, which nobody knows about."&gt;&gt;He added: "I haven't told my mum or my dad, and they are probably going to be really angry reading this, but I've kept it to myself until now."&gt;&gt;Rose said the treatment of a knee injury sustained in January 2017 - which saw him sidelined for eight months - was the start of a period of personal turmoil.&gt;&gt;"My uncle killed himself in the middle of my rehab, and that triggered the depression as well," Rose said.&gt;&gt;"Off the field there have been other incidents: back home in August my mum was racially abused in Doncaster. She was very angry and upset about it, and then someone came to the house and nearly shot my brother in the face - a gun was fired at my house.&gt;&gt;"England has been my salvation and I can't thank the manager and the medical staff enough. It was really hard, and being referred to a doctor and psychologist by the Spurs club doctor helped me massively to cope." [info]  [info] 1528354285
8byfive [info] I need a friend I'm married.  I'm unemployed. My oldest daughter and I don't get along. I've lost my faith in God. I don't have any friends.  I've been diagnosed with depression (taking meds) and more recently I've found out I may have OCPD.I'm talking to a therapist.  My wife and I also go to therapy (our marriage is struggling).  I'm also reading "Rebuilding" by Bruce Fisher &amp; Robert Alberti.The first chapter says I need to find a friend to talk to as I work through the other chapters and rebuilding my life.Does anyone want to volunteer to be that friend?  If your working through your own struggles, we can talk about that too.  I can promise 100% confidentiality and expect the same.  We should feel comfortable telling each other the truth. If your in Tulsa MSA even better, we could perhaps meet for coffee once a month or something.I'm open to text, kik (anonymous) or even phone calls.  I would prefer a man, no offense ladies but I'm a guy and taking to a woman would just complicate things. [info] None [info] 1462215787
saric92 [info] The extent of my depression.My entire family knows that I've been diagnosed with depression, but none of them know the extent of it.I'm the type of person who would rather bottle everything up and hide it so I don't inconvenience anyone with it, so nobody really knows how bad it really is. [info] None [info] 1409511582
Ocean_Man205 [info] Workplaces. You say to your boss: "I can't go to work today, I'm sick (like flu, broken limbs, etc)", and he understands. But if you say: "I can't go to work today, I have been diagnosed with depression", and you will instantly be treated like it's nothing and you *can* go bla bla bla. [info] None [info] 1556772097
mmcca [info] Sorry to hear what you are going through. Actually, I went through the exact same thing, more than once, too.I was diagnosed with depression. I skipped classes due to low motivation until I realized there was no way to catch up. I failed classes, dropped classes. Dropped my entire major, tried something else. Failed again. Almost got kicked out of my university. My parents paid for everything, too. I felt like shit. The first thing I did was turn to my parents. Told them what I’m going through. Luckily they were really supportive to me. They told me no one is perfect, and we are only human to stumble.If you are feeling depressed and it’s affecting your performance in school. I suggest going to the doctor and get a note. I did that once so my professors can give me extra time to complete my assignments and set a day to take the exam. I never opened up about my condition because I felt like a failure, but I was surprised how compassionate and supportive people really are after I became more open about my depression. It gave me hope.Setting a new goal definitely helped me, too. Find something new to do. Join a new program in school, find a club, meet new people... it helped me focus on myself and my life again.I hope this helps. People do care! [info] None [info] 1540384544
MunkeeFlip [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, and the first sign my family noticed was my compete withdrawal from social media, just didn't have the energy for people anymore. (Let it also be noted that I am 80%+ introverted according to the big 16 p). [info] None [info] 1463609747
Wackoverlord [info] No she has not been diagnosed with depression, I have been diagnosed with depression and my Nmom rubs it in my face that she doesn't have it and that it must have come from my dad who she hates. I'm almost certain that she has some kind of mental disorder, but i'm not interested to learn what it is.  [info] None [info] 1394425988
RealFuzz [info] I think the question "do you get help for nihilism" is too complicated a question. While I've been diagnosed with depression I wouldn't say the reason for that is nihilism. When I am medicated I am still a nihilist, it just makes life bareable to the point where I can say say why not live my life instead of why bother.  [info] None [info] 1523122347
inflated_pigeon [info] I constantly feel the need to do something but I'm not sure what Hey reddit. I'm hoping you can help me out with this.Years ago, when I was a student at a university, I was diagnosed with depression. Up to that time, I tried to do anything that would make others around me happy and proud. Then I decided it was time to do what I wanted. I dropped out and I started doing the things I've always wanted to do. I got adequate skills and education to make a living from what I loved doing. But now, a few years later, I avoid doing anything related to what I once loved and it has become more of a chore. I think I suck at all of them. Thinking back, the only compliments I have ever received for my work were from family and friends (then again I might have a selective memory). My clients are all new, no returning clients, no referals. I strongly believe I suck at what I like doing.That's why I constantly try to do new things. Anything. From sewing to car detailing. I'm always trying to find something to do.When there's nothing to do, I get bored, frustrated and depressed. I can't stand having nothing to do. A week ago I googled gardening and spent the next 3 days making my building's garden pretty. I didn't get paid, didn't ask for permission, I just bought the tools and got to work. I didn't really enjoy it, but dammit I had something to do other than sit and mop.Sometimes, when I try to do something related to what I once loved, I keep thinking: why do this?  I'm gonna suck at it. I'm probably not gonna make money out of it anyway. It's gonna drain all of my energy. I like many things, am I sure this is the one I wanna do today? How about the rest of my life? Fuck it, I'll just play some Team Fortress untill I feel tired enough to finally go to bed and sleep.I don't know what I want to do with my life anymore, reddit, and it's killing me. [info] None [info] 1408737914
seester [info] Then you obviously haven't gotten proper help. I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago and since I've started taking medication I've found my life drastically better.    I can get up in morning, my relationship s have improved. Even my sex life got better. I do not regret getting diagnosed.  [info] None [info] 1349883241
BreatheAAR [info] I'm 20 and I have no sex drive When I was 18 I took Depo-Provera (Would NOT recommend) and it has killed my libido, even after a year of not being on it anymore. Ever since Depo, I have been diagnosed with depression, insomnia, and my sex drive never recovered. I have been with my boyfriend for almost 3 years and he thinks that the 'fun' part of our relationship is over, that I don't find him attractive, and that he just doesn't please me in bed. I know that's not true at all, I really feel like there's something wrong with me, and I just don't know what to do. I try to force myself to be into it, but that's not fun for either of us when I'm actually not into it. At my age, I feel like this shouldn't be a problem, but it has been ever since I went on birth control. I keep looking for some 'magic supplement' that would get me going, but I know that doesn't exist. I used to crave sex, try different things, have it multiple times a day, I miss that. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1533900972
EuphJoenium [info] Should I[24 M] try to get back into contact with my exGF[23 F]? We had a horrible breakup, but I just want her friendship and nothing else. In December, my girlfriend (lets refer to her as Lucy), of 3.5 years broke up with me. Lucy immediately blocked me on all social media, and hasn't contacted me since. Back story: In July 2014, Lucy moved to Arizona from Ohio (where I am) for a job. I was pretty upset that she voluntarily decided on a job in Phoenix, when she had previously agreed on staying in Ohio once she graduated. That was the plan that we had talked about *many* times. From July 2014 to Nov. 2015, we were maintaining a fairly decent long-distance relationship. On Mon. November 30th though, she gave me an ultimatum. Lucy told me that I either move out to Phoenix as soon as I can and lose all of my friends, or I stay where I am (Ohio) and lose her. This was completely out of the blue. I was wrecked. She wanted me to decide my future with her a week before Finals, and I emotionally couldn't handle both. I asked her for a 2 week extension, but she only gave me a week. Two days later, she called me back and decided for me. That night, she cut off all contact with me. She blocked me on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Skype... every social media site possible... except for Pinterest. That has been my only connection with Lucy, yet I'm almost positive that she doesn't remember I have one. Ever since she broke up with me, I haven't been able to stop thinking about her. I have been on Pinterest more in the last four months than what I would like to admit. At first I wanted our relationship back, but after thinking about it *a lot*, I now only want her friendship. I've told my friends that I'm not worried about her freaking out on me again, but I know that isn't true. Lucy meant so much to me, and she had a significant place in my life. The issue I'm running into is that I just do not know what to say to her. She meant so much to me, but hurt me so much. (Since Dec. I've been diagnosed with depression, have been seeing a psychologist regularly, and have turned into a recluse of sorts.)Maybe I'm just babbling, but I would really appreciate some input from an outside party. My friends have told me to move on, which I have done mostly, but I still feel like they are giving me biased answers.      **tl;dr**: Should I contact my ex? We haven't had any contact since we broke up. [info] None [info] 1461889855
andypandyroo3 [info] Rant? I guess Where do I begin? I won't give my whole life story, but all my life making friends has been extremely hard. Like I'm not talking about someone to talk to every now and then, that's not what a friend is. I'm talking about an actual friend. Someone you care about who cares about you, who is there for you. Someone you have a connection with , someone you know and trust and would hang out with . I've never really made a friend like this, ever, I would have someone who would be like this , but after a short period of time , they would just be gone . I've started to believe That it's me. Either everything I do is just wrong and repulsive that no one wants to be my friend, or am I destined to have no one to call a friend? People say they care . But no one has ever meant it, they all just piss off in the end. I've been diagnosed with depression , given several types of medication, none which have worked, I've been to therapy, but I just can't do therapy , something about being next to a person and having them watch me while I talk about my emotions and problems makes me uneasy, I don't like people watching me cry, or talking about my problems. I can't be near someone while I have a breakdown . My life is pretty shit too, crappy ass job. Where the customers and staff are shit . My family is a mess, they are always arguing and sometimes it gets really bad. I'm pretty much on my own, and just about out of hope. Shit I don't even know if anyone's actually reading this or who ever made it past the second line. Long story short. I'm over life . Over the way society treats me , over the darkness that has been devouring my chest. All I feel is darkness, I literally don't feel any happy emotions, if I do , they are short lived and quickly replaced with sadness and self hate . I'll admit I've done some terrible things in my past. Nothing serious, but still things I regret and would change if I had the chance. But now , I'm just deciding wether to live or not in a world where I am literally unwanted . To anyone I've ever hurt, I wish I could apologise. I'm sorry. [info] None [info] 1495985797
HellCat70 [info] Would you mind elaborating on how he harassed your people? I'm curious what last year's (non-serious, as agreed) ex could resort to, given the opportunity. Fortunately, we'd only dated about a month when I broke off clean, and he never had the chance to meet my friends/family/etc. Guy still sends pics of any business bearing my name and selfies with this dog he sits occasionally. He was fun, but quickly saw his judgement and mean-spiritedness (he called himself "opinionated and high-spirited") toward anything he didn't understand (depression, "how can someone allow themselves to fall for the bullshit old wives tale of ADHD? That's weakness.") As soon as it clicked that he was no longer on his better behavior an this is the real thing I quit. I told him that I always feel shitty around him, thinking he'd understand because I've been diagnosed with depression (also had neurosurgery years ago) so he should be glad to be free to pursue someone who fits him better.. yet here I am 10mos later, still getting holiday wishes and pics showing he hasn't yet let go. Why?? What drives obsession like that? Isn't it obvious that it's done, over?If it's not too personal, what'd this guy do to harass your inner circle of people, and for how long?  [info] None [info] 1516579055
FuddGubbler [info] I think the biggest thing that I realized once I was diagnosed with depression is learning how to deal with sadness. Last year, I used to dread feeling sadness and loneliness. I would pity myself, hate people around me, and be able to do nothing but potato around and wait for something to change. Now, I view sadness as a perspective change. I don't see it is as bad necessarily, I just take it as my mind shifting gears so that I can see the world and the people around me in a different way. I take the annoyance and hate I feel towards people and use it to analyze them in a different and usually more perceptive way than if I were happy. It's the same idea of crying - some people view is as bad, and scary. I like crying because it's cathartic, and slows me and my brain down. It allows me indulge in the darkness of my emotions and brain. Overall, depression really does suck, but having it has given me a very different mentality and forced me to take a closer look at what I have and how I think - something that not a lot of other people do.  [info] None [info] 1482703353
Iggynoramus1337 [info] 1. Never go ass to mouth (I see a lot of gray area elswhere)2. Wendy's Chocolate Frosty, then you dip the chicken nuggets in. Shit is delicious. Also, at McBeetus, take a chicken nugget, put a pickle on it, and wrap it with a slice of cheese...life changing. You can mimic it by ordering a McKindaSortaChicken and asking for pickles and cheese instead of lettuce and mayo.3. "Go to the doctor and ask". Not as philosophical as some others may have, but it's really helped. I was struggling to keep up at work and really just not happy at my job. I felt like I was on a roller coaster, some weeks I'd be really okay, and others I'd be down in the shit and couldn't get out. My Fiancee told me to just ask my doctor if I had anything, and turns out I was diagnosed with depression (runs in my family apparently). Now that I got the meds, life is a lot better and my performance at work has improved significantly. =]I'm also very good, thank you [](/ajhappy) [info] None [info] 1387646435
BurningBright [info] Fellow mental illness haver. I've been diagnosed with depression for 8 years and I'm still scared sometimes. I'm not sure if I'll ever be normal again, but I know who I am and I'm not defined by my illness. Develop a support network of friends and family, find positive coping mechanisms that work for you (walks and showers are mine) and keep living your life the best you can.  [info] None [info] 1529256795
sapphocherry [info] very helpful, thank you...yes i am diagnosed with depression as well. [info] None [info] 1559666667
whenwedated [info] Help with psychiatrist visit I saw a psychiatrist for the first time today, but it was almost pointless. I was diagnosed with depression last year, and I saw a therapist for a few weeks until I was all happy and cheerful. But after a few weeks of super happy feelings I was depressed again, then fine, then really happy, then depressed. This last week was especially bad as far as potential mania goes. I had a breakdown at work yesterday when I suddenly was hit with an unimaginable depression, while still feeling terribly hyper, fidgety, and anxious. I couldn't handle it and tried to get help, only to be transferred through a few phone lines until I was given a last minute appointment with a psychiatrist.Anyway, I suspect I may have some mild form of manic depression, and the psychiatrist  agreed that it sounds like I'm experiencing a manic state. He offered me drugs, to which I said I'd prefer not to use drugs if possible, and then he just said it was nice to meet me and to have a good day. I'm not sure what happened there. I've just left and I'm more confused than ever. I thought he'd maybe ask me to start keeping track of my moods (which I've already started doing), or recommend some kind of mental exercises I can use to keep my mood more level. I don't know. I certainly wasn't expecting a "drugs or nothing," kind of situation. Sorry for ranting a little. I'm seeing my therapist in a couple weeks (she's on vacation), so I'll definitely be taking to her about it. TL:DR psychiatrist wouldn't help me when I was hesitant about taking drugs. [info] None [info] 1404260574
SunRaies29 [info] I mean, I'm diagnosed with depression. I'm not just using it as an adjective.  [info] None [info] 1512692010
butterflywolves [info] I've been told that the diagnosis is really only necessary if it can get you what helps you function. If needed to say "I have been diagnosed with depression" allows your school or work or insurance to help you, then that is very important and understandable. The difference may just be in the comfort that the diagnosed person has with having a title. It can be really affirming to have the diagnosis if you deal with mental illness because it validates our experiences. [info] None [info] 1561860847
Jesseholmes300 [info] Having some new symptoms. Help? Ive had epilepsy, and complex/granmal seizures since I was about 12-13. I'm now 26. Recently, I was aloud to get my license because I was 2 year seizure free, and an EEG showed no seizure activity. Well recently, I was diagnosed with depression and bi-polar and was put on a antidepressant. I had my first seizure in two years about 3 weeks after starting the medication. I recently stopped taking it. Well, I've been experiencing many strange symptoms I've never had before. * Very lucid dreaming* Short term memory loss * Forgetting what I was doing or talking about * Night sweats * Nausea * Numbness on left side of body* Horrible head aches Can someone help me out? My doctor can't see me till next month and I'm a little scared. [info] None [info] 1466799947
yourfrigginguide [info] Considering I've been diagnosed with depression it's hard to tell. There are also other factors in my life such as relationships, friendships, schoolwork, stress, exercise, overall health, financial matters, etc. One thing I did when I was religious was that I worried about being save not for my own sake but for my future spouses(I was a mormon). Overall in just that consideration I think I'm happier. Though the harassment from some of my mormon "friends" isn't too pleasant. [info] None [info] 1370576869
I-Am-The-Baker [info] Losing the Fight I (37m, if that matters here) never expected myself to post in this sub. I was diagnosed with depression about 18 years ago. My first major depressive episode started in my first year of university, and it took 5 years to get it under control. Every time I thought I hit rock bottom, I got knocked lower. Every time I would climb up, I was pushed back down. I fought hard for those 5 years, and came out on the other side. In the years that followed, I established meaningful friendships, found a purpose to my life (see username), and became closer with my family. I got married, and while there were some difficult times, I always persevered, always stayed positive, and always moved forward.They say that what doesn't kill you makes you stronger. I believed that. My depression makes me who I am. For better or for worse.Lately, it's been the latter.My wife and I divorced a year ago. This was not a crippling blow like I expected. It actually was 100% the right choice. Things weren't working, and a change needed to be made. On top of that, our priorities had changed. I wanted a family, while she wanted freedom.I thrived for the first several months after we split. I felt reborn, like anything was possible. I was happy in my career, I felt more social and sociable than I had in a long time. Around December, things started to turn. It's hard to say exactly what happened. I was just not happy. All forward momentum came to a screeching halt. I felt directionless, meaningless, and utterly alone.Because of the familiarity, I knew what was happening, and I took the steps to start the fight again. I went to my doctor to discuss changes to my meds, and I got back into therapy. I talked to my family about what I was going through. I tried to spend as much time with my brother's family (he has 4 kids) as possible. I tried not to be alone.I scraped and I scratched. I met a woman whose company I thoroughly enjoy. I crawled my way out of a job that was destroying my passion. I started taking steps to secure my financial future. I started thinking again about a business venture that I've been building in my head for years. I was feeling ok. Not great, but ok.My psychiatrist says that depression is like a sprained ankle -- you heal, but you have to be very careful, because it's really easy to reinjure that ankle. She's absolutely right.Six weeks ago, I started my new job. I am not a baker anymore, but my expertise and experience comes in handy in this position. The job incredibly demanding, both physically and mentally. The hours are very inconsistent, with both early mornings and late nights. I was exhausted, but I kept trying to do things and see people. I fought. Again. Even though I didn't want to. All I wanted to do was sleep.Three weeks ago, I got a (startlingly aggressive) letter from a lawyer/collections agency. I'd had some trouble paying bills earlier in the year, and here was the consequence. This is where things got really, really bad. And it brings us pretty much up to date.So, to recap:I am no longer a baker, so my life feels meaningless again. This was unexpected. I'm too exhausted to see people, including family and girlfriend, so I'm incredibly lonely. I also don't want to talk to anyone, because I do it all day at work, and I'm tired of being fake-happy.I'm broke, and being threatened with wage garnishment. I feel like a loser. The idea of telling my family makes me feel like a failure and a disappointment.All I do when I have time off is sleep. My body and my mind demand it. It's a safe space, and I know I need to recharge.And to top it all off, there's guilt, and lots of it. About 1000 different things. Mostly to do with my dog, who I feel I'm neglecting.I don't feel like I can keep going like this. I don't feel like it's worth the fight, because nothing ever changes. And once again, every time I get knocked down, I get knocked a little lower. And every time I try to get up, there's something waiting to kick me back down.I keep fighting, but I'm losing. And I'm getting to the point where I don't feel like it's worth fighting anymore. I know logically that all my problems have solutions. I know that I *can* come out on the other side of this again. But now, I don't know if I want to. This is not a suicide note. I have nothing planned in this regard. This is just me, reaching out to a community of strangers who may understand and empathize, instead of just telling me what to do, how to "handle" things, or, worst of all, that "it's just a rough patch" and to "fake it 'til I make it." I think the anonymity of the internet makes it easier to share.If you made it this far, thanks for reading. Just writing this made me feel less alone in the world.That's a good thing.The fight continues. [info] None [info] 1566945019
backsideslash [info] I was diagnosed with depression in college, most likely from excessive alcohol intake and a couple other things. I went through 3 different depression meds before I finally found the one that works for me (Welbutrin XL). The medicine, combined with a deeper understanding of my thinking patterns and emotional reactions, has really helped me tremendously. While I don't work in the beer industry, I am a big (literally and figuratively) homebrewer and have many friends in the industry. I've got 5 taps in my basement and most of my social life revolves around beer or breweries. I'm definitely not an alcoholic, but beer is a big part of who I am and my biggest hobby so I couldn't see myself giving it up as part of my weight loss plan if I wanted it to be sustainable. While I'm still new to the weight loss game, I've found that limiting my beers to Friday and Saturday has been very successful. I lower my calorie limit during the week and then increase it a few hundred calories on those days to allow for 1 to 2 beers and I'm still within my calorie goals for the week. I've lost 25 pounds in the past 2 months doing this with really no change in diet and only light to moderate exercise. I'm never going to tell someone to drink if they think they have a problem, but I know from my own experience that if I drink every day, even if it's just 1 drink a DAY, or if I get drunk the night before that my depression is at its worst. This is likely because alcohol is a depressant and most depression meds explicitly warn you not to drink alcohol on them. So, my recommendation would be to talk to a doctor about meds, stop drinking, and monitor your calories. If you want to try drinking, I'd definitely recommend not doing it every day or to excess and making sure you count the calories for the Beer you're drinking and not using Bud Light (barf) calories or something. [info] M/31/6'3"|SW: 315|CW: 280|GW1: 220| [info] 1538597950
danbuckles [info] I have not seen a specialist or tried any medications, because I'm afraid if I'm diagnosed with depression I legally won't be able to take the career path I'd like to, leading to even worse depression.And as far as making myself a better person, I've definitely been working on that, but I'm not sure it's helping. I'm a lot more extroverted than I used to be, and I'm constantly going out of my way to say hi to people, cheer them up, or whatever. I've noticed that this has helped a lot at work with people coming up and talking to me, having conversations with me as though I'm a good friend. However, it hasn't changed anything with her. Maybe she still just thinks of me as "that weird quiet guy."I just don't know. I mean, I could give you the whole story, but you're not my therapist, and I don't want to waste any more of your time. You're not responsible for my happiness. But thank you for your help so far, it's not that I don't appreciate it, because I most certainly do, but I don't want you to feel obligated to hear out all my problems. [info] None [info] 1432742680
ironicallyuninronic [info] Well here I am I was diagnosed with depression a week ago. I’ve pretty much had the same problems floating around my head for years. It came about when I couldn’t hide it anymore. I was so good at repressing emotions but I couldn’t stop crying and being angry. Has anyone had this and how do you go about expressing feelings? I mean I could express a bit but never got them fully out. I feel like this is a ridiculous post but I’m truly lost. [info] None [info] 1534729666
Hibbieluv [info] I go outside. I was diagnosed with depression as a teen. Nature helps. A short walk or just a nap under a tree is like a bandaid for my spirit.  [info] None [info] 1490036938
Left4Dead3284 [info] NTA man this thing is chock full of shit. In my opinion by things I have both witnessed and also done, this person is manipulative in so many ways.For starters crashing at your house. Even if there is a bad home life, you can’t just over stay your welcome.Secondly the “im always here and always wanna call” syndrome is something I’ve seen extremely frequently in school both high school and college, it is a manipulative tactic in my opinion to keep people talking with you, though yes there are people with depression who need help.I am diagnosed with depression and have found coping mechanisms. My current gfs ex would do this to her CONSTANTLY. At the end of the day you have a full plate to deal with. You shouldn’t have to be at someones becking call if they had a bad day.  [info] None [info] 1552530406
hhjmk9 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression.I also am split between fictional anime girls and 2 girls in my science class who appear to be quite fond of me. [info] None [info] 1487556069
spinfip [info] See, I always wondered if I had hypomania...I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago, but reflecting back on the times before (and after) my diagnosis, it seems like a good fit for a period I went through shortly before my depressive episode.I just never had the chance to sit down in front of a doctor during one of these periods and get it checked out.How would you know you have something like this? What kind of things would you look out for? [info] None [info] 1377652188
theskepticalsquid [info] Thank you for responding! I am diagnosed with depression but I would be embarrassed to tell my psychiatrist because he's a guy. The only people who know about it is my boyfriend and people on reddit because I can stay anonymous... luckily there's a lot of no fap support on the internet, I even have an app  [info] None [info] 1478643669
kinnaq [info] 'When I was diagnosed with depression, what I missed most was my crippling fear of spiders.'Don't suffer in silence. Talk to your doctor about Arachnazenica. Edit: letters [info] None [info] 1522331314
eizoop [info] I was diagnosed with depression in my mid-teens, and I just sought help this past December (I'm 25 now). I can't believe how much progress I've made just by having a therapist to talk to and having a low amount of medication every day. It certainly takes the edge off, which allows me to navigate through all my issues and emotions effectively and thoroughly. I wish I had listened to myself and close friends years ago when we said I should "just get help." [info]  [info] 1407878880
SaulGoodmanJD [info] My gastro has recently started working with and referring 'qualified' patients to a psychiatrist who specializes in eating disorders. It has been very helpful since I was diagnosed with depression not too long ago. I hope all gastroenterologists (and physicians in general) are as proactive as mine is. I am grateful to have such a great physician taking care of me.  [info] None [info] 1458780517
tankertrailer [info] Yeah, I work in customer service and I was diagnosed with depression when I was 19. Quit acting like you're the only one who has to earn a paycheck and deal with rude customers at work. All I'm saying is that a simple "hi" or "how are you" isn't really that much to ask for.  [info] None [info] 1550722472
Eran-of-Arcadia [info] I was on my mission when I was diagnosed with depression - and it was the resources of the Church that encouraged me to treat my issues not as "a bad mood" but as a genuine medical issue. Talking with one RM in particular, and then my mission president's wife, was the catalyst.Luckily enough, I broke my arm right around the time I was diagnosed, which made a great analogy for people (such as my companion) who couldn't understand why I didn't just "suck it up." [info] I Love Primary [info] 1429361794
Logayn1994 [info] Alright. It's long distance at the moment so that plays a large part in what he did.It was Monday night when he asked for a break, he told me he had a lot of problems and just needed to cool off, refused to tell me what.So I was pretty pissed and we've been through a lot the past two weeks because I've been diagnosed with depression and it makes me aware that I love him/family/friends, but not able to feel it as much. And I didn't want to be alone that night and I was going a little insane. I admit it was stupid and I shouldn't have done it, but what can you do.I did it Wednesday night. I know, I waited a long time right?So I've told him about it already. Now here comes the part where the long distance takes control because I would've known these things if we lived near each other. Turns out he woke up a few nights ago to his mum being strangled by his dad, he stopped it and called the cops, he's awaiting trial. And his lungs have small lumps on them and he's going for a biopsy. Now I just don't see why he didn't tell me these things. It's a long story, these past two weeks, but he just didn't tell me a thing. [info] None [info] 1367519335
glqck [info] I'm nothing without my medication. Hey, i'm Bradley. I'm turning 16 close to the end of this year. This year's exams that are upcoming are really, really important and will determine my near future. It's stressful, but I always avoid getting stressed. Here's where the first problem comes in: when i'm not stressed, I don't worry about the exams. So in the end, there's completely no effort when the day comes.Medication started about a month or two ago. So far, i've missed some days and yes, my psychiatrist knows. I won't elaborate on my problems but basically I have been diagnosed with depression after close to 3 years of suffering in silence. And it has been tough. Seeking help didn't relieve me that much, but it did. My mood changed a little, i'm kind of more positive in terms of my everyday life. Just school, sports and home. A cycle.Everytime there's signs (which are triggers, but i'm afraid of telling my teachers or psychiatrist because i'm just too scared to) i'm always getting into that depressive episode. I get easily angry, especially to my friends and I tend to be impulsive during these "anger moments". It's tough dealing with depression. Really tough. Medication just makes it seem like I can't handle things on my own, and drugs are needed just for my mood to get better (I mean, when I was a child it was so easy to be happy, why not now?). I seem to never forget that without medication i'd be dead. I don't know if I should see it that way or whether I should take things on my own. It's masculinity, right? If we could handle this, we're stronger than others, right?People always tell us that it'd be better if they understood what I was going through, but must I really tell _everyone_ that I have depression? [info] None [info] 1578403552
Explosions_Hurt [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and I'm taking Prozac (But I always forget to take them) but I don't tell people about the noises I hear. A few weeks ago I kept hearing a ringtone from a phone I had years ago everywhere I went. It was terrifying.  [info] None [info] 1350304744
rheain [info] Yeah I was diagnosed with depression when I was 9 years old, even though I hadn’t gone through shit except my parents going through an amicable divorce. 11 years later and it’s still a battle and at this point I think it’ll be a lifelong one. Outwards I have a loving boyfriend, a job I really like, lots of friends and amazing relationships with my parents and siblings. But none of those things matter when it comes to my absolutely fucked mental health. I have started to be able to see the joy in the little things, but some days I still can’t get out od bes. Fuck this meme bro :( [info] None [info] 1575148069
Digiman1 [info] That's funny because I stopped growing suddenly once I was diagnosed with depression. Everybody else in my family is significantly taller than me. I wonder if it's due to a lack of HGH [info] None [info] 1495172316
sabrina-em [info] Hi there. I'm diagnosed with depression as well. I know exactly how you feel. Feel free to message me [info] USA [info] 1462332692
riotpuppies [info] Hurting my best friend constantly because I'm sad most of the time This is going to be a long text so I'm going to write the summary first so you can skip the rest if you dont feel like reading so much.TLDR: I'm hurting the only friend I really care about just because I can't take care of myself properly.My closest friend who I love with all my heart. I've known this person for half a year and I've never trusted and cared about someone this much. We talk mostly every day and he regularly tells me to take care of myself and my hygiene, eat, drink water and sleep. I've burdened him since day one with all my problems, I've been telling him about my dad and about past relationships and he's been worried ever since. He even let me stay at his place for a while and also helped me look for an apartment. Right now I live at home with my mom, dog and my dad who I don't talk with, we haven't had a relationship since I was 11 and barely talked since I was 15, sadly we still live together but that's another story. I'm 19 today.Our friendship started because I locked myself out from home one day after a 12 hour shift, and my parents were somewhere else for the rest of the week, 4 nights. I was too afraid to tell my mother I locked myself out so I just stayed outside the whole night until I started working the other day. 12 hour shift again and then I went on an after work with some colleagues, and someone mentioned I lost my keys and was looking for them. He asked what I was doing now then and I told him about last night and how I'll just do it until my mom comes home. He was shocked and let me sleep over the remaining days they were gone. Sleeping somewhere else, with someone I enjoyed talking with, was really calming. I got to eat some food and could go to the toilet and shower aswell whenever I wanted without feeling unsafe. He was so kind since day one, and he asked a little but was very cautious when asking me about my family situation. I told him some but it didn't feel like anything was wrong but he said it was alarming and wanted to report me to any social service to get me help. I told him I've been there since I was 11 and then we put this behind us and I thanked him for taking care of me and he was surprised. We started talking more later on when we worked more regularly together.He comes from a regular and calm family he told me, and for christmas when he went home his family told him to welcome me to their place for the next holidays. At home I don't celebrate Christmas but I love christmas so hearing that was the best gift I could get. Heartwarming. He's the kindest person I've ever met, I've never met someone this sweet and loveable. I've talked about him to my colleagues at my other work and they say I romanticize all his actions because I wouldn't know any better because I'm not used to people treating me well, but I can honestly not tell if he's being kind or if it's just decent behavior.Recently he started saying he can't stand it me not taking care of myself, I've been trying hard eating at least dinner but I could go days without eating anything and I barely sleep because I'm scared sleeping at home. A while back he started telling me it's too much for him to hear about all of this because it's overwhelming, and I understand that completely and always feel bad for venting but he keeps telling me he wants me to talk with him and let everything out. I feel so bad but he always tells me he's proud of me for still going and that he's amazed that I manage to all of this plus working like a maniac. I work because I dont want to be at home, because at home it's a war zone between my parents.I went home from work today, I ended at 6 but I was walking around until it was 10, I didn't feel like going home and usually just walk around until I'm cold enough and then go home. some days im out all night and then go to work when it's time, home doesn't feel safe. I came home and I just locked my room and started crying and tears started running and I couldnt stop crying. I used to have panic attacks a few years ago and some of them ended up with me in the hospital but i know how to control them much more now. I was crying until 1 am back and forth while trying to sleep and then he messaged me and asked if I work tomorrow and I said "yeah, but right now im a little sad and don't really know" and we talked about it and he was patient as he always is and told me to take care of myself. We told eachother good night and that I should go to sleep because it's late and that I need energy for tomorrow. he saw me active an hour later and told me to sleep and I was very anxious as I've been crying hysterically since 10, but I didnt tell him, I didn't want to worry him. But he told me he's constantly worrying about me, he told me I worried him right now and that it's tiring caring about someone who never cares about themselves and I promise I don't know what to do about it. I can't eat at home and there's no food to make, I don't feel like sleeping because it hurts so much mentally. I can't sleep because I'm scared something might happen to me and I have nightmares almost every dream. My physical condition is ok, my body hurts a little and everyone tells me I'm off most of the time but otherwise it's ok.It's 4 am as I'm writing this and I still haven't stopped crying, life hasn't been all sunshine if I'm allowed to be disappointed. I'm don't think I'm suicidal, but I honestly don't know, I can't identify any emotions I have, The thought reoccurs and it isn't bothering me at all. 6 years ago I was diagnosed with borderline personality disorder and 7 years ago I was diagnosed with depression. Right now I'm not getting any professional help, haven't since 2 years back.He's the sweetest person I've ever met and all I do is hurt him because he cares about my well being, I don't know how to handle that at all. All I want to do is scream until everything feels better, I can't stand hurting him but I can't stop myself from being destructive. It hurts physically in my heart that I can't take in what he says and show him I appreciate everything he does. It's frustratung that I can't better myself even if it's one time even though I try so so much, I feel so selfish and I'm so sorry for that. I don't know what to do, I feel stuck.I'm so sorry you had to read all this, you can ask me anything, I'm always willing to answer. Thank you so much for reading also, and please be kind. [info] None [info] 1577502651
ScooterThatOneGuy [info] I know this will probably get buried. But When I was 8 years old I was diagnosed with depression. I've spent my entire life idolizing Robin Williams because he was beating the illness I was barely coping with. When ever I was really down or even suicidal I looked up to him and just thought " If he can feel this way, keep moving forward AND put a smile on everyone's face so can I. "  Seeing him fight depression was my motivation to keep fighting. And now loosing him to depression has crippled me with emotion. I never met him or anything, but I felt as if he was my best friend, especially in times when I had no one else to turned to. I would turn to him to keep me moving forward. He will always be my motivation to look towards the brighter tomorrow.  RIP you will be forever missed by millions. May you finally find peace within yourself &lt;3  [info] None [info] 1407824881
DukeLukem [info] I came to the comments to say something about inner language, kind of like twins language or how prime evil cultures speak. How the brain can come up with ways to communicate without outside sources. But then I read this..I was diagnosed with depression a long time ago, with symptoms on the schizophrenic spectrum. I didn't think I was really like that, or not to that extreme. That it was just depression and nothimg more. So I've gone 11 years taking xanax and zoloft and others to citilopram now without very much help. Apparently I'm extremely uneducated on the subject.I've been thinking lately that I need to see someone with better knowledge and this convinced me. Thank you. Thank you thank you thank you. [info] None [info] 1398411377
hearthebells [info] I have gastroparesis! It's terrible. The most painful of all my diseases for sure. I'm so sorry you have to go through all of this, (even if you don't or do have gp, I know your pain) especially all the pain, nausea, etc. It's a nightmare. I also got told I had IBS (c). Eventually put in hospital, endoscopies, lots of tests, and was told I didn't have GP. That I was just "stressed" and needed mental help. Went to another doctor and she did another test and it revealed I DID in fact have some moderate to severe delay in emptying. If you can, I'd get a second (or however many you feel it takes) opinion from a GI Dr. It took me a lot of different doctors but I'm finally at a place I'm comfortable with. Don't give up!  It can be really tough, I've left hospitals and doctors offices crying my eyes out, but once you at least get an answer and try different options it gets easier with time. I hope things get easier for you xSorry about the above text being so unorganized, I'm on mobile. edit: I just saw the bottom of your post. please don't ever think it's "in your head." It's NEVER in your head. Being told that I was making it up really hurt me, especially since I was diagnosed with depression, ptsd, etc. but I was truly hurting and suffering! They didn't understand being told that made my pain and stress levels even worse.  [info] None [info] 1457841036
Deadamisa911 [info] My husbands parents did this to him all the time. When he told them what they said bothered him they would say, "You're turning into a woman." "You're too sensitive." "You're such a snowflake." We had to go no contact with them. (I say had because they gave us no other choice.) At first we just wanted to limit contact like through social media and stuff. They freaked out because we blocked them on Facebook and Instagram. They called us demanding that we unblock them. Through out the entire phone call we were incredibly polite, but they refused to listen to what we had to say. After that they started harassing us, and we had to block them or we wouldn't have been able to go to sleep. Then they went nuts. It's been about a month, and we've been forced to change out phone numbers. The things is they seem to think I'm convincing my husband that he's depressed. However, I never once said that he was. It's just them projecting mental illness on him. They are trying to project it onto me too, except that I am diagnosed with depression, but whatever. [info] None [info] 1574352706
jlowry71 [info] Sorry to hear about what you're going through.  Now I'm not 100% sure on this... I'm just back at Wal-Mart after being away for five years, but there used to be a counseling resource available for associates free of charge on the phone.  I used it for a time when I was diagnosed with depression.  I'm assuming it's still available.  Check with HR at your store. [info] None [info] 1538360999
Turb724 [info] Thanks for giving me a chance, r/Melbourne Admittedly I haven't been doing so well lately and I've been struggling with life over the last week or so. I've been diagnosed with depression, started medication, had a falling out with someone very important to me, and was on the verge of losing my casual job position too. Having all this occur within the last week or so really took its toll on me and searching for and accepting help was (and still is) very difficult. Recently /u/cloudkey offered to help anyone who was in need and since I was really down, I asked for their help. I honestly didn't expect much out of it since I couldn't offer much back to them either. Out of the goodness of their heart they took me out to lunch and we talked about some of the issues and they gave me some solid advice too. It was so relieving to just have someone to talk to and listen to me for a while, and it made me feel so much happier. It is incredibly comforting to know that someone on /r/melbourne  that I had never met before would care and offer counsel without any sort of return. Thank you again, /u/cloudkey. When I'm better some day I'm going to be sure to pass this favour on to someone on here that needs this help too. Obligatory thanks for the gold edit! My day has been great, and I feel happy. Thank /u/cloudkey though, not me! :) [info] Bayside [info] 1419672053
Kerbal634 [info] Nope, my family just moved to a house we all hate, my mom's screaming and having mental breakdowns daily, my dad just got fucked by his job, and we don't have enough money saved up. I was diagnosed with depression about 10 months ago. Reddit feels like the best escape I have, but I'm working my ass off to buy a VR headset to help me forget even more. Works gonna suck if it gets any worse than this lmaoEdit: Yay, my cake day!  [info] None [info] 1468716894
frazwood [info] Personally, I would recommend that you deal with your depression first.  I was diagnosed with depression about 2 years ago and through a lot of hard work (therapy + meds)... I am out of a depression cycle.I see the world very differently now.  You might discover that you are actually in love with him.  Or not.  But, now? I'm guessing all that you can actually see is depression. [info] None [info] 1538652013
mmayojar [info] I've been wanting to move out of my moms house for a while my mom and dad divorced when I was around 10; I'm 15 now. Whenever the divorce first happened it hit me hard, this was around the time I was diagnosed with depression, and also around the time I syarted avoiding my had and my new stepmom and stepsister. I felt out of place at the time, like he had a whole new family that I was no longer apart of. I would go months without visiting him. I really regret that mindset now, I've been visiting him more ofter for the past two years and I'm so much happier over there. Originally the reason I started visiting more is because it was an escape from my mom and her new boyfriend who genuinely scared me, they fought so much and I could hear every single threat from my room, she kept saying he was leaving soon but he never did. He's in prison soon but she still talks to him and puts money we can't afford to give up on his books. Whenever he gets out I'm willing to bet things are going to go right back to how they were. Something else important to mention: I went to go visit my sister awhile ago and I told the situation to her, she helped me and told my mom that she wasn't going to bring me back until she kicked that guy out or figured something out. She got mad which we were expecting but eventually she said he was moving out soon anyways. Sure enough he still ended up being there for atleast a month before the police caught him. My mom has been acting so much more cold since she started dating him, when I come home now I just feel drained... and like I want to go somewhere else. I know my dad would happily let me move in but I don't know how to bring it up to my mom. [info] None [info] 1572260278
texmexsushi [info] I was in a relationship when I was diagnosed with depression. Honestly, I wasn't sure what I needed. Now that that relationship is over, I still don't know what I need, but I know I felt better before when I had someone by my side.   Everyone's different but I prefer it when I can talk about how I'm dealing with my depression in a casual way. I like it when my friends ask "hey, hows your head today?" and I can keep my answer as short as I want or I can go into detail if I want. Just showing that you care helps. [info] None [info] 1526917100
OmnisLibera [info] My Birthday Had Just Ended, And I’m Sitting Here Balling My Eyes Out. Every birthday, it happens. For the past 3-4 years, I get an overflowing sense of emotional fatigue during the day of my birthday, only to come crashing down in the night. I was diagnosed with depression back when I was in 7th grade, and I like to think that I’ve overcome it. But it’s days like this where sometimes I question that belief. All of my close friends are now out-of-state, and I have nobody to go to. Family is tough, so that’s a no-go. So all I can do is sit in the dark of my room and listen to music until it goes away, like it does after a few hours of this. But why? I never feel this way on Normal days, but right now I feel like my soul is crashing down on itself. I don’t know how to explain it, but it hurts. Every little inconvenience today hurts. Every kind word, every card, every gift. I’m so grateful for it all, to the bottom of my heart. But I’m in pain, and I don’t know why. [info] None [info] 1566533958
I_Cant_ThinkOfAName [info] I think it was first in 9th grade when I was diagnosed with ADHD, Dyslexia and Dysgraphia. Then again like 6 months ago when I was diagnosed with depression many of the strategies for dealing with my learning disabilities relied on my memory and depression destroyed that. ADHD and Depression is also a shit combination when it comes to getting motivated to do things. Luckily my parents can afford treatment for me, so hopefully my depression will get better.  [info] None [info] 1526302229
Misogynist-ist [info] Resubmitting: General advice and improving weak arches Typical sad story. I used to do folk dance, but got married, moved, and didn't have the opportunity to continue. That was my main form of fitness and at 5'0" I was, at one point, between 90 and 95 pounds. I didn't even eat well, I just exercised and walked a lot, and I had accountability in the form of dance competitions and dance friends.Six years later, I've gradually gone up to around 150 due to a number of circumstances and am tired of it, so this summer I am trying to turn things around. I really hate gyms and classes, because my self-consciousness becomes pretty crippling. It's also not really something I can afford at the moment.Now, for the things that have been making this more difficult:I've been diagnosed with depression in the past and for a few years, was on medication. I haven't been on meds for about the past eight years, but have noticed an increase in my symptoms lately. I'm being open with my loved ones and support network and at this point don't need to consult a doctor, but if they feel it necessary, I will.It just means I have had more bad days lately where I don't have the energy to do much of anything. On my good days, though, I'm pretty good. I like going for walks, and I live in a place where there are ample opportunities for birdwatching, which is a good reason to get out of the house.I just got a bike. Yes, it's weird, but the last bike I had was a tricycle when I was 6. It's more than 20 years later and I'm finally trying to learn, because it's become necessary. I don't have a driver's license in my second home/country and buses or walking don't solve everything. Learning it is going to be an uphill battle but I'm confident that I can get it done by the end of the summer. I learned the very basics of swimming last year, so this should be a piece of cake.One of the things I've been doing in order to make exercise a habit is gamifying it. I love DDR and used to use it on non-dance days as a way to maintain endurance, balance and body awareness. I have a dance pad now and Stepmania, and it has been fun. I had about a week where I was doing it everyday. Today I did my first in about a week and a half, but I've been doing a lot of walking in the meantime. All in all, I've been upping my activity, and generally, it's improved my mood on days when I have the energy to do it in the first place.That brings me to my main question, besides the general advice on what kind of schedule I should be setting for myself, is about foot pain.I have pronating ankles to begin with and extra-stretchy ligaments that proved problematic when I was dancing. Those aren't such a problem with DDR, but when doing jumps, I've started to notice a 'thin' feeling/pain in my arch, as if it's a rubber band getting pulled taut that is asked to stretch even further than it can. I thought it was plantar fasciitis, but upon getting some advice from a friend in the know, it was suggested that weak arches might be the culprit. Sometimes it's in one foot, sometimes it's in the other.If I end up going to the doctor about this, I'd like to have an idea of what to ask. How can I improve weak arches if that's what's going on? How do I differentiate between that and plantar fasciitis? [info] None [info] 1464190340
MemeGodAshton [info] I’m having a rough time, I don’t feel wanted, and I’m struggling to find motivation anymore So over the past few weeks, I’ve been having quite a lot of trouble. Sorry for formatting, I’m on mobile, sorry for grammar as well, I’m not very good at writing.Let’s begin 9 months ago, I was diagnosed with depression. I was never really happy and constantly felt unwanted or unneeded, and I didn’t have many friends. Fast forward 3 months, I meet my best friend (R). R was a kind, pretty girl that I had a crush on for a while. 1 month after we met each other, some of my very few friends decided to tell R I had a crush on her, which didn’t help my situation at all. I didn’t know what she thought about me at that point and we just started to talk differently to each other. R started to show interest in me and I started to feel really good about myself. This goes on until about 2 months ago where we started to fight and argue a lot. This hurt me quite a bit and I was trying to make it stop. After about a month it started to become a daily thing.2 days ago R texted me “I think it would be better if we weren’t friends anymore,” and I started bawling. What I responded to her was “I think it might be for the best.” Over the past 2 days I’ve lost all but 4 friends. R is constantly trying to make me angry by making rumors about me and I don’t know what to do.Also if anyone wants to talk sometime, I play Xbox a lot and my gamer tag is TornadoSmash999 [info] 14 [info] 1557029036
bearthefuckdown [info] I was fired from my 7 year job, I don't know what to do. As the title says, I was fired from my retail job due to the inability to continue the line of work after several health issues.I was diagnosed with depression after being evaluated after a car accident. I was off work for about a month due to a severe concussion. When I came back to work I started to feel really "off", I found myself becoming more spacey and even the simplest of tasks became a challenge.I'm 25 years old with a bachelor's degree in political science. I initially had a good rainy day fund but after requiring some medical procedures for a various array of health issues I now find myself in about 18,000USD in debt, including my car. I do have a 401k with approximately 30,000 dollars vested into the account.I don't know where the next step is from here, has anyone been in a similar situation? [info] None [info] 1508744073
TsJess [info] How to stop feeling so low OK so I've posted on here a couple times and included the fact that I can't even begin to transition as my gp refuses to do anything since I was diagnosed with depression roughly 12 months ago even though this is a big cause of the depression (aarrrgghhhh NHS) but basically recently I've been feeling really low and just seeing stories about horrible things happening to trans people just makes me feel like all this is so unfair and just want to be happy and lead a normal life and why can't that happen. even writing this post has lead me to start crying again so basically I'm looking for hope and reasons to not give up hope on all this.I also wouldn't mind a hug [info] 20 MtF Pre Everything [info] 1419835652
RetailDrone7576 [info] &gt;I told her I've been diagnosed with depression.  She told me to get over it. Leave her, She does not deserve you and you deserve better [info] 24M DB Survivor [info] 1572228955
_sp00ps_ [info] Eating everything into oblivion I shouldn't have to justify my depression, but to make it more clear that I'm not scrounging around and making things up, I have been diagnosed with depression and bulimia. The depression diagnosis has been for over a year, but the bulimia one is recent. Though I have been bulimic since the end of 2016. Now, I have gone times for not eating up to 68 hours, and now I'm on a pattern of eating everything in sight. My stress levels cause me to eat and eat and eat. I'm afraid I might be addicted to sugar. People call me skinny but I know I'm not. I see fat and feel fat. I'm 5'2, and over 124 pounds. I feel disgusting but I cant stop eating. My classmates make remarks like "you always ask for food," and, "if you had food it would be gone already." I stopped freaking out in public, but when I go home, I sneak and hide food and just can't stop eating. I feel so lost and scared, my clothes don't fit as well and I'm starting to get chubbier. I work out occasionally, and one of my classmates asked how my workout went, and when I told her I didn't do it yesterday, she kinda snorted and I felt that it's hard to believe because I'm so fat. I am. I have always been called that and I always will be. I don't know what to do. I stopped purging a while ago, and have been on a new medicine for a week, but that won't make me skinnier. [info] None [info] 1519353864
museumtickets [info] Sleep Apnea - Civil Aviation Medical Examiner Hello!I am using a throwaway but I wanted to know something before I even bother with medical testing...I am currently trying to become an Air Traffic Controller. I am doing well in the process but I dread one thing: the medical examination. FYI I live in Canada and I need a category 2 medical certificate.I am scared shitless of that exam. I have sleep apnea and although it is well under control with the usage of a CPAP and I am not tired, I wanted to know if it is a basis for the refusal of a category 2 medical certificate. I do not want this to get in the way of me getting a job I really want.See medical category 2: https://www.tc.gc.ca/eng/civilaviation/regserv/cars/part4-standards-t42402-1412.htm If someone knows more about this, I'd love to know!Thank you!I am a 24 years old white male. I am a bit overweight but my sleep doctor says weight has nothing to do with my sleep apnea in my case. I have been diagnosed with depression years ago but it is considered resolved on my medical file. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1436554959
gyarados9 [info] The tiresome cycle of endless craving for affection, but then pushing people away Hello there, reddit!I am a 16F, and a sophomore in high school. I think I need some advice...I feel incredibly alone right now as I broke up with my girlfriend about a month ago, and I don't really have any friends besides my English teacher. I used to have a group of friends whom supported me, but over the past two years they seem to have gotten tired of my problematic way of dealing with things. I tend to overreact and look into things way too much. If anyone is nice to me, I generally don't believe that their motive is genuine to their actions, and so I can dismiss or overlook them. But, when someone is acting ever so slightly rude or in such a manner that I interpret it as a threat, those memories stick like glue. It's incredibly stressful to be so paranoid about being abandoned, so I become clingy, but I don't want to be annoying, so I distance myself... and so forth.I have been diagnosed with depression as of two years ago, and my English teacher knows I take medication for it, but I fear that the compassion that I feel him giving off is only to ensure that I won't do anything drastic..? Like, if I didn't tell him, he wouldn't give a shit? It's unsettling to think about as we have really engaging conversations about the widest of topics (everything from marvel comics to politics honestly; I'm a grade A student with a lot of opinions so I guess he finds that interesting? idk), but with my fear of abandonment just sets off this alarm in my brain, telling me that "Why would he *actually* care? God, you're *so* full of yourself to think that he doesn't try to talk one-on-one with his other students..."I am going through a very dark time right now, so I'd really like to just get some support from my teacher as he is my only friend right now. FYI; I go to therapy, which is fine, but it's not the same as getting help from people that I know. I kinda need the people in my life to motivate me to make the therapy "work".So, complete strangers... What do you think? Am I overthinking things or should I reach out to my teacher? [info] None [info] 1460143915
ofthewest [info] It sounds like you're very depressed on top of your ADHD. I was diagnosed with depression long before ADHD because of all the reasons you list above. I agree with everyone in this thread re: negative self-talk. You are only making things harder on yourself by being so mean to yourself. It's VERY difficult to stop, though, and it's something that I have to work to be better at every day. The best ways to handle negative self-talk are CBT (try Feeling Good by David Burns) and going on an anti-depressant. Both together are really the best thing you can do, and I promise you you don't have to feel this way forever. [info] None [info] 1510026540
Lolmyusernamesucks [info] Is this just my depression? I hope I'm posting in the right place. My story: I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago. I took Wellbutrin and Zoloft and it worked, but I wrecked my car and couldn't make it to the doctor anymore and just gave up. The crash was a bitch and I came down hard. Lost everything I owned to depression because I just refused to do anything at all. Stopped paying bills, drank a lot, etc. I'm better now and still not on my meds but am more aware of how depression affects my life. Lately, I've had some rather amazing strokes of good luck. Like... too good. Like going to a concert and they tell me it's hush-hush but a couple seats just opened up in the front and I can have them if I want. I wake up wanting Taco Bell, open the app, and I somehow win a $20 gift card to Taco Bell, I get promoted at work even though I'm hardly the best employee.... things are just going really well. But almost coincidentally and too well? Does that make sense? Maybe I should be posting in a superstition subreddit instead lol. I just feel like my luck is going to run out soon and I should prepare for it and then keep questioning whether that could be depression rearing its ugly head again. [info] None [info] 1463631659
NYC_Stigma [info] I believe it's good to use as a tool to aid you, but I wouldn't be dependent on THC. I would treat it like most people treat coffee. This is a drug, but there are benefits to using it responsibility in order to improve your quality of life.I personally would not be too concerned if your usage helps your day to day life. It's an incredible plant and if it  effects your life in a positive way I see no problem in consuming it guilt free. But it's good to take a break once and awhile to know where you stand. I was diagnosed with depression and I'm currently around 9 months in my hiatus from weed, never thought I would take such a long time off, but here I am. I'm not a doctor so I don't know your routine, or how you feel. Find out what works for you and enjoy the ride.  Just my two cents. [info] None [info] 1559972408
clystars [info] Sometimes it takes years to make progress and that's okay. I was diagnosed with depression around 2012-2013 and it's been an uphill battle ever since, and I just recently started to feel better.Learning to manage and minimize depression is a long, hard, arduous process, and I believe you can beat it.  [info] None [info] 1522884371
RivetAce [info] I'm curious, what's the difference?  I have been diagnosed with depression but I've never had (many) suicidal thoughts, so I realize that it's not the same as what other people have.  I've also learned that I have mild hypothyroidism and also ADD so now I'm wondering if I even have depression at all or if it's just a conglomeration of symptoms from other causes that look kind of like depression.  [info] None [info] 1553148264
leadpainter [info] I am not trying to be a contrarian but I believe my first LSD trip did the opposite to me. I have many brothers and none are alcoholics or addicts of any sort. I didn't have any addictions or any real addictions until that night. In fact it changed me for the worst. I couldn't hear the word *acid* for years without a flashback (sometimes lasting a second to months) and extreme anti-social behavior. I was diagnosed with depression, PTSD and GAD. It did make me stop smoking cigarettes and playing with all drugs for a period of time, but my only escape from the confines of my mind was alcohol and drugs. After years of guided imagery and EMDR therapy I was able to get ahold of my mind. Around that time was when I realized my coping was actually an addiction. I've been able to get off all serious drugs through power of will but landed on Alcohol hard. I can't decide if the first trip or Alcohol has been more damaging to me as I can't decide on cause and effect. I sometimes believe I am better and stronger for it but other times I am convinced I am different, not exactly better, while trying to live my life as another plagued alcoholic. [info] None [info] 1558141058
saxybandgeek1 [info] I'm just looking for something to keep at home because there have been more shootings in my neighborhood recently. What kind of paper work and what would be on the background check? I've been diagnosed with depression, would that prevent me from buying one?  [info] None [info] 1491570273
Big_boi61 [info] Fitz I’m actually hurt, fitz was there practically my whole highschool, I’ve been watching since he started and he’s always felt like a big brother to me someone I could try and be, he was there when I was diagnosed with depression and even there when my ex cheated on me with my best friend, I looked up to him. I don’t know why he’s do that, he’s an amazing guy but why would he think it’d be ok to pull that on Carson, I’m hurt and I don’t know why and I’m lost for any sense I had [info] None [info] 1586004150
NuBNPrince [info] TIFU by trying to get evaluated for depression medication... So I was diagnosed with depression 18 years ago and I've been living with it... OK, I suppose. I am overweight (6'3, 365 lbs) and I've been trying to lose it for years. Many different ways... Sometimes unsuccessful, sometimes successful but I put the weight back on. Lowest I've been is 280, and that was 8 years ago. One of my biggest issues that I've not been able to get a handle on is beating myself up for failing. I get down on myself for missing a workout or having one bad meal... then get down on myself more when folks try to encourage me to get back to my routine. There have been times when I've gone to the gym, looked at all the other folks looking so determined, I burst into tears and leave.Back in November my doctor weighed me at 368 and checked my BP. Pre-hypertensive. He wants me to lose 15 pounds in 3 months, or he's going to put me on BP meds. A couple of months ago something was uncovered which revealed a significant betrayal to someone I really care about. I was devastated and it took a lot to get back to a place where I liked myself. I started working out but fell out of rhythm.  Again. My next doctor appointment is tomorrow. Of course, I've not lost the weight. Pretty sure I'm above where I started. I've been thinking about getting back into a workout routine and eating regimen again but every time I think about it I just think about failing and it makes me cry. I follow personal trainers on Facebook and Instagram and they post great stuff but their posts make me sad.  All I think about is how I can't do it. I have videos, I have a gym membership I don't use.  I've even checked out a few sub reddit for fitness. I make up every excuse I can (no time, don't want to be away from family) and wallow in the possibility of failure. OK, enough back story. I called my health insurance provider to get info on depression medication.  Talked about this with my counselor and figured it was time to investigate the possibility. They told me they had to transfer me to another help desk who would give me a list of providers. They transferred me to an automated system and none of the prompts seemed to pertain to me, so I requested operator assistance. They told me I had to be transferred to CVS Pharmacy for assistance. Weird. When they transferred me, the folks at CVS  informed me that I had been connected with the people to assist providers, not patients. They gave me a different 800 number to call. I called, got put on hold, then the line dropped while I was on hold. Frustrated and sad (near tears), I call back to my health insurance provider and explain what I have been through. They tell me that they don't know why I was given the runaround - they can help me right there with a list of providers. I give them my email address and sure enough, a list was sent to me in about 5 minutes. I pick the two closest to my home and call. The first call - wrong number. The second call - wrong number, but they had the number I was supposed to call. I called that number, they tell me that I called the wrong office. They have an office near my home they want me to call, plus a 4-page new patient form I need to download and fax or email before my appointment. I download the form and then call the closer office. Their voice prompts lead me to a voice mail box for new patients. Their procedure - I leave a voice mail and wait for a call back. I hung up. After all this, it was all I could do to hold all that emotion in. I was angry for getting the runaround, I was sad that I'd tried and failed to improve myself yet again. [info] None [info] 1427371646
Lifelacksluster [info] _Just_ gotten? I honestly don't want to nitpick. I saw this was your second post in a short period of time... I was diagnosed with depression too... and it's quite the rollercoaster ride for me... I wanted to understand how you are feeling lately... [info]  [info] 1567603433
inadequatepuzzlpiece [info] I can relate to this. I was diagnosed with depression In 2016 and schizophrenia in 2018 .My condition got so bad that I spent nearly 2 months in a mental ward. Meds have turned me into a better man. I used to be a pos human being, not any more though.  [info] None [info] 1521626351
purplegiraffe_ [info] [Stravinsky, The Rite of Spring](http://hannibalsmusic.tumblr.com/post/56150372278/stravinsky-the-rite-of-spring-introduction)Prep: MLS Lime preshave butterRazor: pre war Gillette techBlade: Astra SP [6]Brush: Semogue 1470Lather: LASSCo Bespoke #1Post: Extra lather &amp; Witch HazelTomorrow would be my last shave for a couple of days. I'm feeling blue, so me and my doc decided that its best if I undergo electroconvulsive therapy. I was diagnosed with depression and mixed personality disorder and have been taking meds for some time now. The last time I underwent ECT was about a year ago and it worked wonders on me, so hopefully this time too.  Have a great Saturday everyone! [info] None [info] 1452931709
Exactly_Sandwich [info] I have been diagnosed with ADHD when I was born, I've had asthma for as long as I can remember, I had braces because a single tooth put my mouth to shit, I've suffered trauma, but that's a poor excuse since every human has experienced it, I've been diagnosed with depression a while back, and am currently struggling with bronchitis.How about you? [info] None [info] 1573961183
blinks1483 [info] Not necessarily something no one talks about but the expectation that if you’re depressed you’re incapacitated. That you don’t function. I was diagnosed with depression about 10 years ago and yes I was still functioning. But I found no joy in anything at all. I couldn’t care less about the the things I used to enjoy. Getting up every day was the biggest struggle. But some people think if you get up and go to work and do basic things you can’t possibly be depressed. It’s just not true. [info] None [info] 1556269316
Sveq [info] **Edit: I didn't know my post was going to end up this long, but I thought the question asked was one that required delicacy, and I also had quite a few things to say. So if you're reading this, I do hope you take the time to read the rest of it.**Like all relationships, it varies from party to party, and it all depends on the people in it, so I can't really give a definitive answer to that.But if there's one thing I notice in a ***well-functioning*** relationship between two depressed people, it's that their relationship thrives on a deep, mutual understanding of each other's situations. For example, in university, two friends of mine—let's call them **Pauline** and **James**—who are both diagnosed with depression, are in a relationship with each other. Oftentimes, one can tell when the other is having a bad day. The moods of people with depression during bad days really vary from person to person. For Pauline, it makes her feel better when James and/or her friends can be there for her when she has bad days. We'll listen to her talk about what she's feeling so she can flush it all down instead of bottling it up. Knowing her friends and her significant other are there to support her eases up any discomfort she's having.On the other hand, for James, it's the opposite. He prefers people to not talk to him too much and not ask too many questions about his day, and will try to distance himself from others when they start being ever so slightly intrusive. So Pauline, knowing this about James, acts accordingly by keeping him company and at the same time giving him space—as in, she will physically be close to him, but give him space in the sense that she will just be quiet in order to not discomfort him. **It's lovely, really, how they can communicate with each other without saying a word.**As for a relationship between a person who's diagnosed with depression and a person who isn't, I also have a pair of friends (also in university)—let's call them **Tina** and **Cathy**—who are in a relationship like that. Tina and Cathy have been together for a year now, and Tina recently (one month ago) got diagnosed with depression. Of course it took a toll on their relationship—they both admit that—but have managed to work through it. They both really have something special and I'm not surprised that they managed to make things work.Essentially, it's not so different with Pauline and James' relationship in the sense that Tina and Cathy understand each other's situations and supports each other accordingly. Cathy understands that Tina is currently not in a good spot right now, and does what she can to support her. Meanwhile, Tina understands that Cathy makes the extra effort to support her and so she acknowledges and of course appreciates this. Now you could say that Cathy puts out more into the relationship than Tina does, and they'll both agree. Tina told me about how many times she's tried to break up with Cathy because she says she feels really bad for bringing Cathy down with her, and how it's all unfair for Cathy. But every single time, Cathy's always said it doesn't matter, because in the end, she really does love her. It's all about sacrifice, really.But I wanna let everyone know that relationships **aren't always like this good** for people with depression. Things seem to take more effort for us to do—from socializing, to going to class, to eating, to getting out of bed, to communicating with others—and that can cause problems.As for me, I've been single for two years now. I was diagnosed with depression over two years ago, and it didn't end well between me and my ex-girlfriend. I suddenly stopped getting out of bed, stopped going to school stopped talking to people, and eventually cut myself off from the world almost completely. Over time, my lack of communication with my ex-girlfriend destroyed the relationship.Alluding to what OP said, **it wasn't my fault I had depression, but I made my ex-girlfriend miserable because of it.** Eventually she decided she didn't want to continue dating me, because it was too much for her to handle. We also hoped to get married eventually, but that would never happen. **We were together for over five years.**In the end, it all boils down to how much people in a relationship love each other, and how much they're willing to sacrifice—just like any other relationship. And for those wherein at least one person has depression, it's obviously going to take extra effort and extra sacrifice. Sometimes, it's worth it; sometimes, it's not. Sometimes, it works out; sometimes, it doesn't. I guess that's for people to find out on their own. [info] None [info] 1487525676
SendHappinessPlz [info] Why can't I enjoy weed anymore? I'm sure many have posted about this before me but here's my story.I smoked weed daily for 10 years, literally from morning to night. Everything I did, I was high for. Life was great. Eventually I felt like I was too reliant on it and was smoking just for the sake of smoking. I tried to quit countless times but failed. Finally I was able to stop. Ever since then, weed has a completely different effect on me. Now I feel extremely uncomfortable while high. Even one hit makes my mind race and traps me inside my own head. I've been diagnosed with depression since then, although I think I had it before but was self medicating with weed. The problem is, at least the weed was helping me cope before. Now I'm apathetic and depressed with no coping mechanism. What gives? [info] None [info] 1516766853
iCaramelBird [info] Not gonna lie, I am so happy with my progress. I was diagnosed with depression after I turned 16 (roughest year ever due to family problems, death, and of course this), and there are still plenty of really bad days and times, from numbness to this just empty hollow desperation, but I've gone leaps and bounds from where I was. I've started exercising (love the treadmill), writing, made tons of new friends to support me at university and studying hard. I now want to seek professional help through counselling.I have a long way to go but even if it may last anywhere small from a moment to a day, it feels good. [info] None [info] 1511835000
ShiftKeyOnBus [info]  I was diagnosed with depression and can confirm that I have a really black and white view of the world. I sometimes notice it and try to change it but it's just the way my brain works.  [info] None [info] 1517821110
thisisnewt [info] It's not binary. You're always going to hate yourself a little bit.I was diagnosed with depression was I was 6 years old. I've honestly never known anything else.  I've had to work my whole life to combat it. Most of the time I'm pretty happy, but I still will have days or even a few weeks where the self-loathing kicks into overdrive.You've got to make a change, have a goal, live your life. That's the "secret". There's no easy-button. [info] None [info] 1467733373
MadladWill [info] Hey Monday: Shafted. It’s the song I listened to when I was diagnosed with depression. It is a sad song but always reminds me to treat my partners better than just friends like I did when I was young. If you treat them like friends, they’ll do the same and friend zone you and nothing prepares you for the pain... [info] None [info] 1556596440
Smitti85 [info] He just listens to me. I was diagnosed with depression a few years back, and even tho I am better now then I was then, it still hits me like a ton of bricks. My SO listens to me and what is making me upset and just hugs me as tight as he can.  [info] None [info] 1461117599
stuffistuffy [info] I feel so lonely... I just wanted to get that out there. I feel like no one can relate to what I'm feeling. Every day that passes by crinkles more of my withered leaves. Am I being melodramatic? I just want some company...I have many friends. I have a good family. I have basically what every human strives for (good looks, good grades, good reputation). It doesn't seem to click though. I can't help but feel like a hollow ball. I'm diagnosed with depression and have been taking my medication for months now. I doubt I'll feel better with meds (considering how long I've been eating these pills now, as well as tried many different types of meds). Therapy never works, for I can never connect with anyone. I cant share my feelings to someone and have them understand. They just nod along and occasionally suggest something. They're all great suggestions. But that's not what I'm looking for. I *need* someone to understand me. I want to be able to talk to them and feel connected to them through this mutual suffering. I wish there was someone out there who understood.Thanks for reading. I have lost all hope of finding this person so please dont try to comfort me by saying you understand. It'll be great to know if people actually read these things.It felt good sharing this. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1321756545
tehblackknight [info] With all the bleak narratives that come through here, I thought I'd share something uplifting. I was diagnosed with depression last year after my roommate urged me to see a psychiatrist.  She suffers from it herself and recognized it me before I did.  I had felt that way for years, but had no idea those feelings weren't normal.  It has gotten more and less noticeable since then, but the last few months has been the hardest for me in recent memory.  Earlier this week was particularly difficult and it got to where I was pushing away my friends as I was trying to get it under control.  Two of my friends and I have a game we play together regularly and the other day I declined.  I'm not sure why, but that evening had been agonizing for me to be alone with my thoughts and I couldn't bring myself to play or do anything but lay down.  I was on my bed for an hour or two unable to sleep when I saw my phone light up.  It was midnight and it turns out my phrasing in how I declined to play had worried my friends.  I had never really discussed my depression with them, but they knew something was wrong.  They had driven together to my house (10 minutes drive) and texted offering to pick me up and hang out.  This caught me completely off guard and left me dumbfounded.  Not wanting to hurt their feelings I joined them and we drove around for some time and talked about random stuff.  Eventually we stopped at one of their houses and watched a comedy together.  It was all kind of cliche, but it was exactly what I needed.  We never talked about what was bothering me (there wasn't one thing in particular anyways), they didn't pressure me into anything or give me any pep talks.  We just hung out and that's all I needed.  Things aren't magically better, that's not how this works, but it was one less night I had to spend alone and a little less pain I had to endure by myself.The friend that was worried and decided to act is one of my newer friends (less than 2 years).  We didn't get along when we were younger, but we both were friends with another (the other friend that came) and eventually got closer.  I always worry about not sharing the same kind of friendship with people I meet after high school, but it's really not that different.  I'll remember that night for a long time, and remember that friend when I'm meeting new people.  Thanks for reading.  I just really wanted to share a good experience I had when it had been one of the hardest times for me to battle my inner demons.  Sometimes it's hard for me to remember that I'm not alone.  There are some good people out there like my friends that will remind you of that. [info] None [info] 1436386938
HellbornPhoenix [info] Should I (25M) travel to meet my online friend (23F)? So basically about 1-2 years ago I wasn't in a terrible place, but I wasn't in the best place either. I was very sick from a chronic illness, lost my job, had to move in with my grandfather. And was so distraught that I was a bad dad because I couldn't pay for anything I was diagnosed with depression and put into the hospital cause my dad thought I was suicidal. On top of that my grandfather was yelling at me for not working because I was "perfectly capable" I wen through job after job and the illness makes it so hard. That's the backstory of where I was during this time.&amp;#x200B;Back then I played a lot of game (which caused more tension with my grandpa) just to cope with all the emotions I was having. The games were a very good distraction. One game I played a lot was an MMO, final fantasy 14. I ended up meeting another player in the game, we both played tanks when the new expansion came out. The game was full of bugs and we got past a part that was congested. We joked about it and continued playing together. Everyday we would get on and grind the story out and dungeons and such. Everyday for about 7 months I'd say. We would talk about each other's life issues, hobbies, jobs aspirations, family, we talked about meeting up and stuff too. She's seen pictures of me and my son and stuff. I believe we became really good friends, I think I may have developed a little crush on her. My friends were mad that I played so much with her, and referred to her as my Final Fantasy Girlfriend (we were married in the game and she was the one who said we should.)Then I got a job and had to stop playing as much, and she switched games (as did I). So we would occasionally chat through messages but not as much. She was a major part in getting over all my ailments as I'm relatively healthy now. (Chronic disease has periods that suck, I don't suffer from depression anymore, and my work life is stable and successful.)&amp;#x200B;Recently we have been talking a lot more and she's been telling me she misses me and that we should game together again. That back when we played together was some of the most fun she's had. And I agree, I miss those days cause it was so much fun. I was thinking about taking a vacation out there to meet up. I didn't know if it would come off as creepy if I were to ask to meet up. maybe I'm reading too much into this? Just wanted to know what others thought.&amp;#x200B;Also sorry for the terrible fragmented shitshow of a post. I'm at work and have been pausing periodically, losing track of what I was saying. [info] None [info] 1537975577
renleyu [info] I was diagnosed with depression a couple of years ago, actually. The being thrown bad situations part helped push me off the edge though [info] None [info] 1571833781
stripedwell [info] But everyone loves me. Very few people I have met in my life (with the exception of family members) dislike me. I am hardly ever alone, and when I am, I'm perfectly fine within my own mind. People love to be around me. I am many people's best friend. I help people when they need it and am more than willing to sacrifice for them. I have two awesome kids that I care about and love dearly. I have a job I adore and an SO that cares about me deeply.I wake up every morning filled with grief. If I don't have to be up for work, I'll lay in bed for hours and stare at the ceiling. My life has gone to ruins since I was fired from my decent-paying job that I was at for years. I have six days to move out of my house. My car was repossessed. I've had two shut off notices. I've lost 40 lbs due to having no food (but don't worry, I have food now).I was working at two jobs, every day a week, sometimes 13-15 hours a day to make up for the job I lost. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 16 and I know that I've felt this way ever since I can remember. The circumstances I am in now have influenced my feelings, but I don't get why I still feel this way. Even when I was well established, I dreaded waking up. I have scars all over my body that I regret.People always tell me that I look like I'm about to cry. My SO gets upset that I constantly look like this and recently told me they do not want to be around me when I am like this.I don't want to die. I want to not exist. I didn't ask to be born. [info] None [info] 1416071321
ZeUberSandvitch [info] I was diagnosed with depression back when I was in elementary school. Its been a part of my life for a long time. [info] None [info] 1520710565
knowmeasnothing24 [info] It pisses me off that I have to resort to this though..&amp;#x200B;Sometimes I do actually go into detail why I don't want kids and people still won't leave it alone. &amp;#x200B;One of my biggest reasons is I'm absolutely ***terrified*** to have a child and not just your "normal" reasons either. Mental health problems run in my family, I've been diagnosed with depression, pretty much every single women in my IMMEDIATE family has suffered from postpartum. I just feel like I'm set up for failure already. I also know what it's like to be raised by someone with severe mental health problems.  It's like why would I want to put an innocents persons life at risk when I know all of those things? [info] None [info] 1559841489
mattymcddd [info] I know how you feel. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 16 and Narcolepsy this past year (I'm 21; been falling over laughing from cataplexy since I was a kid). Whenever I sense a sleep attack coming on, I begin to do a set of planks until I can't hold the position any longer. I also have had success with a Maca energy supplement, lots of caffeine, and a ketogenic diet. Obviously, it's still debilitating, but less so than it was around the time of my diagnosis. I like to challenge myself by taking on loads of responsibilities, that I regularly tell myself I won't be able to do due to my Narcolepsy; it adds an extra dose of meaning in my life. Though, I fail often—which sucks. I'm glad you have music as an outlet. Don't lose sight of what matters to you. Continue to justify the suffering you endure! [info] None [info] 1537221983
roKUxx [info] I was in his position before I was diagnosed with depression.  It's also possible he has some imbalances and should see a doctor.   [info] None [info] 1543697833
Lola_Miiiko [info] Why do you procrastinate? Hello everyone!Context: I've been diagnosed with depression about 7 years ago, still haven't recovered, probably never will. The point is for these 7 years I've watched all my hobbies slip away till today when I'm left with no hobbies at all. Instead of trying to go back to the things I enjoyed doing I keep distracting myself with things that don't bring me joy. I feel guilty because of that.Have you ever experienced something like that? Why do you think this happens? [info] None [info] 1564332004
texasrose1998 [info] What am I experiencing? Hello eveyone! So I was diagnosed with depression a couple of months ago and I have this certain thing happen to me that I was wondering if It was something specific or if was just with my depression. It can be like im overwhelmed or someone says something negative that makes me kind of shut down and my whole emotional state changes. like I could be in a good mood and then a second later I feel really awful and sad. My heart sometimes will beat fast during it too. [info] None [info] 1585263642
Coolstreet6969 [info] Hey Stasiu, Thanks for the comment. I truly appreciate it, it really hit me hard just now and I kinda teared up. I was diagnosed with depression about two years ago, I was on 100mg Fluvoxamine, I noticed these drugs actually did made me feel good for a time, like really good. But it's like a wave, at a certain point I'll be hit with an episode for a day or two then will come back to the "feel-good" phase. I didn't like it, I wanted something more consistent.Heard about psychedelics and wanted to try it out. And I was thinking about this whole microdosing thing today, I think I felt worse because it's hitting me with reality. I suppose I was still in denial before, I kept thinking she'll reply my text back, she'll come back, I kept giving myself false hope to feel better. But really, I doubt it. It really is over, and I'm still trying to get over that.Today, I was just as talkative and energetic like yesterday, but again this heavy feeling still looms.I'll stop with the sleeping pills.You're completely right that I'm just looking for an escape. I'll just keep working on myself for now and just let time do its thing.Thanks again,Jared [info] None [info] 1573031853
writerlady118 [info] Just commenting to say I LOVE your hair and your shirt. Just started watching Sailor Moon with my kid so I hope she loves it too lol.When I was diagnosed with depression, my Xbox 360 and GTA4 helped me cope. Keep fighting and being awesome. :) [info] None [info] 1558479350
jake1110 [info] I came down the same road you did, I was diagnosed with depression months before ASD. Now it’s hard differentiating the two [info] None [info] 1561498828
Artgirl6 [info] Hey r/ psychology. I'm wondering if you guys would recommend a good book in changing negative thought patterns ? I'm assuming cognitive behavioural therapy is the way to go on this and how effective it would be on changing the way I naturally perceive things. I have been diagnosed with depressions and anorexia since I was in my early teens and am now in my early twenties. I have improved a lot and have really fixed most parts of my life I just have never finished therapy and broke it off when I was younger gradually getting a bit better. The one thing that really troubles me is the negative thinking as in reading things with neutral meanings as something negative to myself and at times causes anguish. I understand this is a very primal part of people suffering with depression and is a natural way they respond to things such as reading a neutral face as a negative one Ect . I think this would make me a stronger person and I'm willing to put in the work. I'm wondering if any of you know any good books on this to help me or if I should be doing this with a professional. Thank you ! [info] None [info] 1370843263
bg-j38 [info] God, when I told my mom I was diagnosed with depression (at the age of 37) she said almost exactly this. That turned into a very long conversation. [info] None [info] 1447361710
Beanerboysk8r [info] WASSUP, I'm 14, I've been diagnosed with depression so hit me with your worst, I love sports and never had a girlfriend [info] None [info] 1581831928
bagoonga [info] I agree. I was diagnosed with depression and medicated and all the medicine did was not make me feel as bad as I should, which stunted my emotional growth. But I still hated the label "depression," and didn't want to be on the meds and eventually stopped taking them and actually became happy.I worry about this happening to others and them accepting a label they don't have. It's really hard to tell as I only have my experience to go on. [info] None [info] 1484923333
lionhart280 [info] Schizophrenia, PTSD, Social Anxiety, Anti-Personality Disorder, and Depression all have extremely high correlations with Addictions as coping mechanisms.There are more than that but those are often the first ones checked out. The individual often doesnt even know they are unwell because they have suffered through it their entire life since, and whatever they become addicted to offers them respite from the psychological pain.Depression is very often correlated with Video Game addictions. I was diagnosed with depression years ago and this was a conversation I had with my doctor.Also: Addiction *is* a type of mental illness all in itself.. [info] None [info] 1494993782
hastowork [info] Hello!Long time redditor but new to keto, got me a new account here just to join this sub and be a contributing participant. I am 40yo, 6', 257lbs, 33.5BMI, with high blood pressure for which I am taking two meds. I hit 260 a few months back, a new high after a lifetime of being the fat kid, yo yo diets, off and on weight loss meds, slim fast, on and on and on. I have a 2 year old daughter and the doctor recently told me that if I don't lose weight, get the blood pressure down, and exercise he thinks I will not see her to be 20.I have finally hit my limit with my weight, myself, my lifestyle. I started some really good therapy with a awesome therapist that has changed my life. This is after 20 years of different antidepressants, REBT, psychotherapy, psychoanalysis, etc... etc... I have been diagnosed with depression before, but the meds are not good. I have had body issues, from things in my childhood, abuse, teasing, bad models at home all with bad relationships with food. This new therapy has changed my life, and let me free myself so much from all my baggage and past, it is called RAMP, but that is a whole different topic. I have used paleo with aerobic training several times in the past to get back to my feeling "normal weight" which for me is when I am 210-220 (I am a very large frame guy), I can buy clothes off the rack, BP gets normal, feel healthy. But, each time I have a major job change, move house, relationship change, move cities, have high stress, I quickly pack back on this 50 extra pounds.The difference this time is my daughter, I waited until later in life, and until I was feeling good to have a child, and I love her more than anything. I want her to have a healthy happy daddy, and I want to model good habits for her and for her to have a healthy relationship with food. I found keto recently while reading to get back into paleo.I started my keto plan 5 days ago, down 3 pounds, and I am using MFP to track macros, read Keto Clarity, and have a Ketonix on the way to just help me check the ketones ( I love gadgets, so I could not resist). I am lucky to have a wife that supports the effort, and I am looking to make a major life change with this not a short term diet. Right now I am having headaches after a couple days of feeling super high energy and more clear headed. I have "keto flu" for sure, sore muscles, frequent urination, headache, little woozy sometimes. My MFP profile has been really good for these 3 days, just seems my potassium and iron intake is too low three days in a row, I need to get them up. I am not taking any supplements for them yet.I am learning a ton from this sub and the other keto subs, reading some more books. I just wanted to say hello to everyone, and get my story our there in black and white if even to only remind and motivate myself. Looking forward to making some progress as amazing as all the stories I read here, it is inspirational to see so many people losing the weight and feeling better, I can't wait to get there too. And that is without a doubt the longest thing I have written on reddit, thanks for reading all this!(edit: I just realized I just posted this in a second "Newbie Tuesday" thread, I did a smaller intro last week's too, so I am now thoroughly introduced! I guess I am just super eager to say hello and join the conversation.) [info] M/40/6' | SW 260 @ 10/14 | CW 240 | GW 185 [info] 1413278879
heyitsmely [info] Metabolic syndrome, how can I fight it?? 3 years ago I was diagnosed with depression and one of my medicines caused me metabolic syndrome.Yesterday when I started having my new medicine my new doctor diagnosed me metabolic syndrome.How can I fight it? I have been skinny all my life until 3 years ago that I jumped from 63kg to 88kg.I’m actually having a healthy diet and I do exercise 3 times a week.Thank you very much for your advices 👍🏻 [info]  [info] 1520955103
justalizardking [info] I've been diagnosed with depression recently and it's had a major impact on my college life. I feel like some people, including my own parents, think that it's something I can just brush off on.  [info] None [info] 1542778913
Mazlon626 [info] There’s a girl I love so so much I’m not in a relationship with her, I only talk to her from times to times, but goddamn I wish I could say she’s my girlfriend. I’ve never met such an amazing girl, the way she talks about what she loves, how she’s always so passionate about everything, even just the way she smiles, to me she’s perfect. Chatting with her makes me really nervous, but spending time by her side makes it really worth it.Now, the problem is, I’m really scared I might end up screwing up things and destroying all my chances with her. I have been diagnosed with depression, I’m also on medication, my self-esteem is already really low, so I’m terrified at the possibility of falling even deeper due to the possible failure at building a relationship with this girl. I know it’s not exactly the right sub to ask for advice, but I think hearing what you guys think about my situation might help me. [info] None [info] 1574439194
kibblznbitz [info] I have developed what might be deemed a serious addiction to these things.The feeling of motivation and energy and social extraversion (i.e. excited and happy to talk) are very welcome to me, given I've been diagnosed with depression.Now I think of it (well not now, I've been wondering about it for some time), I think I've been self medicating with Five Hour Energy. [info] None [info] 1405616063
CamiKablami [info] The complete apathy and lack of motivation reads as laziness to the outside observer. All throughout my teen years, teachers and parents accused me of being lazy and I just couldn't understand why I couldn't be as active as other kids. I tried to do extracurricular activities, but I got fatigued and overstimulated so easily. I tried to do homework, but couldn't focus and had zero interest is trying to work out anything that challenged me. If I tried to push myself to do better, I would end up bursting into tears, followed by an even more intense period of apathy. I didn't understand why I couldn't just get it together. I was diagnosed with depression about a year after I graduated and THEN it all made sense. [info] None [info] 1565234371
specialkake [info] This is all just my opinion, but I think that we're living in an extremely technologically accelerated time, and our priorities are changing, cognitively. I've been diagnosed with depression and ADHD at various times, and I think that the symptoms associated with ADHD are our brain trying to adapt its function to match its environment. I think that people with ADHD symptoms who also get depressed, we tend to devote as much time to depressive rumination, but we tend to think about things in bits and pieces, rather than long, deep sessions. We process the information, but we're so used to constantly changing modes, it's almost more of a background process. Kind of like how, on reddit, you will absorb, over time, information regarding some new political scandal, just by skimming through all the headlines on the front page, because there's 50 reposts. But the only links you're clicking on are lolcats. Later, someone will mention it, and you'll be like "oh, I heard about that somewhere."   When I'm depressed, my girlfriend will know several days before I do. My behavior changes before I even realize it, and by the time I figure it out, I'm almost over it already. [info] None [info] 1285911304
throwa2934 [info] Four years ago (when I was around 18-19 years old) I used to run 8-10 miles a day. Ever since I was diagnosed with depression (around age 20) my exercise habits deteriorated along with a lot of other stuff in my life. Now that I've been out of college for a year, I've had time to think about my life and get myself together, but unfortunately my depression has still been eating away at me.Throughout the past two years I've exercised but only on occasion and in moderate amounts. Whenever I thought about exercising, my depression would get the better of me and I would justify and rationalize reasons not to exercise. I used to think things like "Oh, having a sexy body is only egotistic and narcissistic" or "Exercise is just a momentary, temporary pleasure to distract you from real, important issues." Like, I just couldn't convince my mind that exercise was something that I should be doing enough to the point where I would actually will myself to exercise to do it.Today was the first day in years when I engaged in serious exercise. I'm going to try to get back in shape. I went for a run today. It was only about 20 minutes, but it was painful, stressful, and made me cough up. But I did it. And I'm going to work my way back up to that previous pace I had 4-5 years ago.Fuck depression. Forgive my language. [info] None [info] 1529197594
sumguythere [info] Oh, I may be just the person you're looking for to ask this to.So am I happy? Not yet, but I'm well on my way. Right now I am working as a drafter in the engineering department of a manufacturing business started by my great-grandfather and currently run by my dad and uncle. While I worked for years to find a career path that would keep me from this place, I inevitably found myself looking for a steady paycheck when the recession started and found what I had hoped would be a temporary position. Many circumstances beyond my control changed that, and shortly after starting I was on a journey that would take me to another part of the country and into family drama that makes the Bluth's a model family. But I am happy? That's a tough question to answer, and one I ask myself everyday. I can honestly say the stress has put me into therapy, and I have been diagnosed with depression (very treatable though, so long as I stay regular on the meds). Some of the biggest stresses are caused because it's a family business, it carries a great deal more stress then a normal 9-5 job might. There are a number of things I cannot talk about to people, and in many instances have had to feign ignorance on a subject with coworkers because I would have extensive knowledge on behind the scenes action that they are not supposed to hear. There is also the added stress of simply not knowing how to do what I need to do since I went to school for theater and film, and have only some experience in business, engineering, and manufacturing. The hardest part of the past few years was finding a position where I would could provide value to the company and contribute without being "the bosses son" (I loath nepotism, even though it got my foot in the door). That also creates issues for me personally, since as a 28 year old trying to make an identity for myself I constantly go into a job where my name carries weight and history, some of which I'm sorry to say is very bad.So am I happy? I'm not unhappy. While it's not what I wanted to do with my life it's providing me a stable foundation that allows me to pay all my bills and have my own place (it is a high price we young people pay these days for independence) and has allowed me to start meeting new people and develop my first long term relationship. I also have enough freedom that I have begun taking improv classes at night in order to work on my speaking skills, to be active, and to indulge in my love of theater, something I wouldn't have imagined possible before starting here.Most important to me is not my immediate happiness but the stability and resources of my future, both of which are going to be met through the family business. My hope is that while I am not doing what I love now with my life, by dedicating the time now to educating myself and establishing an identity at the company it will give me the freedom and power later to spend time pursuing creative interest or, at the very least, allow me to raise a family.TL:DR - No, I'm not doing the Ren and Stimpy "Happy, Happy, Joy, Joy" dance at my family business, but it will let me do it later in life. [info] None [info] 1348593558
Spicylemon [info] Is there any hope of actually being cured? I've been dealing with my own depression for at least a year.  Every time I think things are getting better, my brain flips me off and decides it's all not worth it.After I was diagnosed with depression, I found out that my parents and sister have all been treating depression for a very long time.My best friend just checked himself into the hospital for the second time because of his depression, and I know he's been dealing with it for at least 15 years.Is there any hope to actually be cured of depression, or is it more like HIV where you just get treated for the rest of your life and (hopefully) learn to live with it? [info] None [info] 1351789695
A128 [info] I am also on mobile, so my formatting might also be messed up. I was diagnosed with depression about 3 months ago and it was kinda upsetting cause i was kicked out of school and my life was in a downward spiral and tbh i kind of felt depressed for more than 2 years. I just never bothered to talk to anyone about it, and it seems like im always happy because i put on this facade, but 3 months ago i went to a counselor and talked about my grades and why i was so depressed. I was just bawling in his office and was the first time i had cried in some time. I managed to talk to my parents and let them know what happened( they kinda dismissed it as something small and were kind of just mad about me flunking and not considering the reason why) . My parents ended up giving me another shot at school and enrolled me into a community college to finish my degree. I have started to get my grades up and i am aiming to grudge through everyday and finish this degree. I plan on tripping this friday on 2.5g shrooms and 2 tabs of lucy while smoking. Hopefully i can get out of this funk and hopefully this trip will be a good one. Overall man i think life will be ok. Also any reccomendations on movies or tv shows planning on watch rick and morty. [info] None [info] 1493272189
anjirutaru [info] Highs and lows are fairly common I think. I sure have dark days and bright days, I thought it was fairly normal till I was diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1435087462
BasicallyNuclear [info] I have autism. I'm apperently too "slow" when I talk to people and I look unfriendly according to most. It's the fact I'm afraid of saying something dumb and then losing any chance I had to be their friend. I haven't had one of those for 5 years.  I'm just really desperate at this point to be able to have a friend and talk to them. I haven't overcome this and probably wont I was diagnosed with depression last year ;( [info] None [info] 1504317497
LauraIreland023 [info] Can someone help? Hey reddit,I literally have no one to turn to. I'm going through a really tough time and have suffered a lot of loss this year having currently lost my two nans to cancer in this year alone and have seen my two aunts suffer from a severe stroke and the other with dementia. A week ago I found out my uncle is also terminal with cancer and this is devasting for all but especially my cousin who suffers from ms. I myself also have a serious medical condition and had to have two limbs amputated a few years back now but I am still suffering from a rare medical condition which caused the loss of these body parts in the first place. Typing this all out it just seems like a joke looking over how shitty my luck has been since the start of 2016 . I've never feel this low and have never posted anything like this online. I am strong and can take a lot and have taken a lot but I am so close to breaking. I dont want to lose myself but every day I just slip deeper into negativity and struggle to find anything positive as when something starts to look up I am just struck with bad news so I am starting to lose all hope that thongs will turn around. I feel so alone at this time and think maybe the only person who could help me might be a stranger. I have other family but they are all trying to move on too and my friends are constantly busy with life and are apologetic when they cannot make it to things I have tried to arrange to get myself out the house and be proactive. My boyfriend lives 2 hours from me and doesnt understand how to help me or talk to me. I need to ask him over the phone when I need comforting he doesnt just do it or pick up on it even when I am physically crying to him and saying I need support. I'm not comfortable talking to a doctor or psychiatrist based on past experiences with my medical condition. I also don't feel comfortable talking to a doctor as I dont want to be put on anti-depresants one because I am on enough pills as it is and two I know that if I am diagnosed with depression this will mark my chances of recieving job prospects even though it shouldn't. Basically can any one give me some words or advise on how to get myself back to me so I stop looking at the world so negatively? I'm just feel so done at the moment and really dont know how much more bad luck I can have thrown my way. I'm so scared thinking about whats going to come next for me and the remaining ones I have close.Thanks [info] None [info] 1469999576
faeriesprite8 [info] The System is broken I want to start of saying that I am grateful to live were I live (Australia), It could be so much worse and I am grateful for "mostly" free access to mental health care. Today though, today i felt like there was no one who could help me. I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 14 (10 years ago) over those 10 years i have seen 8 different therapists. 8! Recently I had been seeing a therapists that I really connect with and I had been seeing her for a long time, she really helped and had been with me through a number of bad times. I was told just a few months ago that I could see her any longer as I was no longer studying at that institution and she had no other practices I could see her at.  So that is, I was drinking myself to sleep every night and calling suicide hotline and I could no longer see my therapists... great. Today I went to the doctors and got a new referral to a new therapists and I started the process again... I feel sick and sad and over it all. To top it all of, her next available appointment is 3 weeks away, I booked in to see her but 3 weeks. Really? [info] None [info] 1551935777
pinkempyreal [info] Losing interest in hobbies is one of the many signs of depression. Gaming is a serious passion for me and a great way for me to escape after a hard day at work or just from life in general.  I am diagnosed with depression and even with meds I still occasionally find myself in a rut and I don't feel interested in gaming... during those times when I try to play it feels like a chore. Burn out is definitely another possibility and it happens to everyone at some point but if you have any other symptoms akin to those of depression you may want to look into talking to your doctor. Best of luck! [info] None [info] 1573871125
Admiral_Boombox [info] &gt;First mistake.Yeah, I get told more often I shouldn't involve myself with what people think of me. It's both a compulsion and something I see as a courtesy. Society keeps me afloat, so I try and serve society where possible, or at least realize the strain I put them under.&gt;Wait so they deemed you mentally ill, then expect you to just *get better* and stop supporting you? What?Pretty much. There are some cases where you can be deemed 100% unfit for work, but that generally requires conditions that'd leave you living in an institution anyway.I am diagnosed with depression but the government states that it is my responsibility as a citizen to find out a way to deal with that and still work. If I refuse to learn to manage my depression, they'll refuse to support me.The law used to be more lenient but misuse of welfare led to more strict legislature.&gt;You'd have to not rent an apartment, and not drive much.I'm unsure but I think it's not legal to be homeless. Or at the very least, the law does not permit me to live in a van and without a home address I'd also lose my welfare and all other potential forms of government assistance.Also, even if I didn't drive at all I'd still pay road- and car tax. A car costs a lot of money even just sitting there.&gt;Not everyone does, nor will anyone ever will in society.Good point. [info] None [info] 1473513850
Ab10ff [info] This always pisses me off. I was diagnosed with depression about 6 or 7 years ago. I wasn't upset or sad about anything, I just felt shitty so I saw a doctor like you should. Guess what? I got some medication, changed some stuff in my life, and I was fine about 1 year later. I also never told anybody while I had it because why would I? It's a sickness. And what do you do with a sickness? You fix it before it gets worse. It's not something to be romanticized or used to gain attention. That's like having cancer and refusing treatment because you want to tell people how tough things are because you have cancer. [info] None [info] 1518288539
tazz131 [info] I'm with you man. I'm a 34 year old teacher with a beautiful wife and two amazing kids. No mortgage, no car payments. Life is great. But I went to the doctors because I was having severe mood swings and zero motivation. I was diagnosed with depression and put on medication. I've been on medication for four months and I feel like a different person. I don't want to rely on this medication so I've been seeking other resources to help out and have made a lot of changes in my life. I never felt like I wanted to kill myself...but man, did I ever feel completely miserable and useless. If my wife didn't suggest I go to my doctor about it I probably would have never gone for treatment and who knows what would have happened. It's a scary position to be in, but things can get better if you get the right support.  [info] None [info] 1500599406
7eet [info] My brother thinks I'm addicted to video games, but a year ago I was diagnosed with depression. Gaming helps. [info] None [info] 1571692828
treetablebenchgrass [info] I dealt with scrupulosity before going on a mission. When I was diagnosed with depression in the MTC and sent home, I talked to my stake president and told him I had depression, he said "hmm... That doesn't surprise me. You confessed to a sin that wasn't very serious, so I thought you could be depressed." So, other people knew I had a problem before I did, it's just that they didn't do anything about it.Bishop/stake president interviews are worthless. [info] Head of Maintenance, Little Factories, Inc. [info] 1518349145
shawnshine [info] Just n=1 personal experience. It’s not at all my place to guess, since I’m not a psychologist or a psychiatrist. But in my own life-- when I ceased enjoying many of my favorite things, I was diagnosed with depression soon after. So if you feel as if you are no longer experiencing pleasure from the things that you ought to, then it may be depression. [info] None [info] 1508705143
Christios [info] My Current Situation (Venting) My life right now is sort of fucked.Just over two weeks ago I tried to kill myself for the third time in my life and I couldn’t do it. I got to the bridge where I had planned to jump from and I thought that the walkway was shut which proved to be the last barrier to killing mused and was the one that finally convinced me to not kill myself. I had to phone the police to come and get me and I ended up getting taken to the hospital where I spoke to a psychiatrist and the day after I was diagnosed with depression and put on Citalopram and at 17 that is apparently a concern. This all started because of my current predicament with life right now. I have just left high school after 13 years of education and my original plan was to go to university and that fell through and after that my plan was to go to college for a few years, though after my application didn’t properly send (I wasn’t made aware of this until I phoned to see if they had received it after a few months). So I was already panicking about my future and for around a month after I had initially left school I had barely seen my friends and to be honest I just didn’t feel like I had the energy most days. This all coincided with me entering a new relationship and even though it only lasted a month I honestly thought that I had found someone truly special, but obviously it wasn’t meant to be.So the day I tried to kill myself was the day before an exam, a day where I had been crying quite a lot and then got dumped. I have always struggled with myself and I really do hate myself, like honestly I could write an essay on how shit I truly am. Therefore it didn’t really do my self perception good when I was dumped because she wasn’t over her ex (who had cheated on her previously).So now I’m stuck in some sort of limbo as I can’t kill myself but my future just seems bleak, I have no idea what to even consider doing. Everything I try at just seems to turn to absolute shit. Thank you for reading my pathetic rambling about myself. I really needed to vent and I’m glad I could do it. [info] None [info] 1528757756
MidWestJoke [info] Go to a psychologist, sometimes they're better because they are there just to talk and sometimes, for me, that's all I want is for somebody to just shut up and listen and stop trying to fix my problems.I was diagnosed with depression at 11 years old, I haven't taken medication since I was 16 (22 now). Some of those years were good and some really left me reeling in on myself and cutting myself off from people, but then I found photography. I love going on road trips and stopping to catch something odd, weird, gross, beautiful, or anything I find interesting in any way. That is what has gotten me through it the best. It's my passion, hobby, and what I want to do the rest of my life. "Sometimes it just takes something or somebody (person, dog, cat, fish, bird, or anything) to lift you up. My dog has recently been my savior. To come home to him, knowing he loves me and needs me here and moving and knowing he'd never stop loving me, is one amazing feeling. [info] None [info] 1351485056
bbanmen [info] I've always had depression (well, coming on 12 years) and I thought it finally went away. I didn't feel sad (after having PPD), but all of my interests completely disappeared. I literally did nothing except take care of my son and browse the web on my kindle ALL DAY. Loss of interest is definitely a symptom, and I definitely still have depression. I've just come to realize that depression effects everyone differently, even the same person at different times. Who knows, maybe I'm actually bi polar? I was diagnosed with depression at 15, but didn't get checked for that? :/Depression is a SOB, that's for sure! [info] None [info] 1466860245
DeusNotExorior [info] It was a sudden realization.I always thought that I'm just sad, but once I started talking about my issues, and all of a sudden I'm diagnosed with depression and personality disorder.Felt good. [info] None [info] 1450744369
Miffymatty [info] My life as I know it I've been diagnosed with depression for a year and a half.  However, I feel my battle with it began much earlier than I know. It began to get out of control when I had a surgery that took a long time to heal. At the same time as this I moved home after 3 years of university and began teaching secondary school. All of this became overwhelming and I ended up dropping out of the teaching. Since then I have struggled to find a new career, similarly i have struggled to find true happiness. The kind of happiness that fills you from your head right down to your toes. Sometimes I feel lonely despite having some truly great friends who would do anything for me and an amazing girlfriend who loves me dearly. Sometimes I feel like I have nothing, yet at the same time knowing I have a lot to be grateful for. If you're going through something similar and have any advice for me  please comment; if you are going through something similar please comment also. I would appreciate the friendship . [info] None [info] 1532128887
Faineant22 [info] Intro stack: Caffiene + L-Theanine, ALCAR + Alpha Lipoic Acid I need help with dosages, if you don't feel like reading my introduction just skip to the bottom.I'm not sure the cause, but for the past few years I've felt "brain fog." Simple tasks can require more effort than necessary, I make stupid mistakes constantly in my studies (especially math). I have no friends at university, very little social interaction with my peers, pretty much social withdrawal for over 10 years.I have a hard time motivating myself to do anything. I'm overweight (350 pounds), 6'4. My mood is low all day, I've been diagnosed with depression, was prescribed an SSRI, but took myself off cold turkey after 6 or so months because I didn't see any results.I'm tired of performing poorly at my major, so I'm going to try everything I can to dig myself out of this hole that I'm in. I've began exercising, counting my calories, and I just ordered the stack in the title after doing a bit of research here and elsewhere.I'm 27 now, and my cognition feels severely impaired. I hope through this lifestyle change that I can find my youthful mental agility that made every day feel like a breeze to get through.I'm planning on doing 100mg L-Thea, 100mg ALCAR, 100mg ALA, 40 mg caffeine in a smoothie for breakfast 3 days a week, and go from there. As of right now I consume no caffeine daily. Does this sound about right? Also is there anything else I could add (I'm pretty much against controversial noots, I want proven safe and non-addictive) [info] None [info] 1473976677
WhatAnIdiot1231 [info] Mum diagnosed with breast cancer in November. Was in hospital within a month for a mastectomy then radiotherapy for three weeks. All clear now. Cost nothing. Gets free prescriptions for five years and free hospital parking while going through treatment, which we didn't need as we are a stones throw away from the hospital. Dad went in for a hip replacement last week, three days in hospital and is home now. All free with physio.With me I was diagnosed with depression a few years back. Got free therapy and am now on the contraceptive pill, none of which I paid for. [info] None [info] 1557155808
CanMormNoMore [info] Went through a decade later. Did not. However, I was exposed to the pre-1990 endowment as a missionary and had a member tell me "_Dont worry, nothing has changed. The covenants and penalties bare still there_". I'm embarrassed that I took that piece of information and just went on my way like everything was OK. In retrospect, when I was diagnosed with depression a few months later, I wonder if that (and being physically attacked by a ZL in front of the kid I was training) contributed to that spiral into a dark place? [info] None [info] 1547164945
HayateCero [info] Diagnosed/Had depression in the past, does this disqualify me from being a police officer? Hi! To make it short and simple, in the past around 17 I was diagnosed with depression and even before that I took medicine for ADHD in middle and high school, I also had an IEP. These things such as depression and ADHD(diagnosed as a kid) Aren’t prevalent nor do they affect my day to day life. It’s been almost 5 years since I’ve taken any type of meds for adhd or depression and things are fine with me now, does this still present a disqualifying factor to being an officer? Thank you!!! Sorry it wasn’t that short lol. [info] Civilian [info] 1553492440
redonkulousness [info] I'm never, ever alone.....ever (stay at home parent to two small children) but I've never felt so lonely and isolated in my entire life. I have been diagnosed with depression and sleep apnea (my spouse won't\can't sleep in the same room as me) and I'm losing control of my weight for the first time in my life. I just want to eat and sleep. I just wish I could fade away from everyone's memory and be forgotten. [info] None [info] 1561499558
Khytgl [info] Sadly I was diagnosed with depression  [info] I like to dress up as grandmas [info] 1504675940
auspeak [info] I am diagnosed with depression, but I am getting better. To be honest I may have been exaggerating with the emotional low of the comedown, its not that bad. The stomach pain is pretty bad though. I can barely move! [info] None [info] 1433037984
tempUN123 [info] The day I was diagnosed with depression in the military. Killed my career as aircrew, killed my military career in general. It’s been a downward spiral ever since then. It’s taken 5 years to begin to get my life back on track. [info] None [info] 1524536521
Jillian13 [info] Yes, as with everything it comes down to multiple causes. I am in therapy, I am diagnosed with depression. I don't take anit-depressants because I don't tolerate them (tired several different kinds). However almost all of what I described was there since I can remember. Even my mother told me that I was lethargic since kindergarten.I will probably start HRT in two to three months anyway, if everything works out fine. And then I will find out. The question is just if there is this button I can press and feel better (=hormones) or if this is an issue where I again have to work hard for every little improvement. [info] MTF pre-hrt [info] 1486562924
Shut_Up_Navi [info] For many people who suffer from clinical depression, it's too deep to just decide to be happy. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 10 years old. That's 16 years of psychiatrists and meds and just *trying* to be happy. And it's not that I haven't *decided* to be happy or that I'm not trying hard enough. I'd give anything to feel normal.I'm glad that worked for you, but it's not always that easy for everyone with depression. [info] None [info] 1370899993
zdunn [info] I wish I had some better advice. I've been going through the same thing recently. However, I would suggest checking out a subreddit more dedicated to your type of problem, since people are just going to comment that you didn't follow rule 1. I was diagnosed with depression, but after being prescribed medicine for it and it not helping, I am going to see a doctor for ADD. Either of these could be the case. Talk to your parents. Tell them what you're going through and that you want to change, but don't know how. It may seem scary, but they care about you and want you to succeed. That's what helped me the most. If you really need someone to talk to, feel free to PM me. [info] None [info] 1367480204
UmiFish [info] I'm diagnosed with depression, I never had a loving non toxic relationship but I can tell you that having someone by your side is important to me, when I'll go into depression-like state I useally push people away from me, even when I wished they would stay. Having someone fighting you for staying near you at those moments is really helpful. Moreover when depression hits, I lose all motivation , I get confused and I don't know what I want or feel, if he's at that point I think giving him motivation to move forward is keyWhen I'm depressed, I can't manage asking for help, even if I want to. If he experience similar things , you shouldn't ask him if he's ok when he is clearly not, you should try to understand what happend and help him, you need to initiate.Being in a relationship with someone who suffer from mental illness means practically sharing Thier pain, that's probably the reason why people avoid these kind of relationship. If you love him and seeing him smiling is worth it, keep being there for him, even if it's though. Telling him that's your are going through all of this because you love him and want him to be happy will probably motivate him to better himself and make you happy aswell [info] None [info] 1554215597
Juiceisgreat [info] I am diagnosed with depression and also have a lot of friends diagnosed with it (from group therapy). The best thing you can do is just listen to what they have to say when they do talk. If you want to say something about what she has to say, then try and relate to the situation shes talking about by telling her about the time you went through a similar situation and how you handled it.If shes depressed about something and doesn't want to talk about it, don't push her to talk about it or pester her to let it out. Just accept that she doesn't want to talk about whats troubling her and talk about something else. In terms of doing things, just get her some of her favourite things like chocolate or candy, maybe cook her favourite meal etc. Its the little things that will cheer her up the most. Just be patient and things will get better friend! [info] None [info] 1426105559
Hopeistheanswer [info] I was diagnosed with depression young, but I rode the highs and lows like any teenager. The lows were awful, but I still found joy in some moments. Just before I finished high school my best friend was murdered. I gave up on life at that point. I drank and smoked weed and lived in a haze for years, slowly numbing myself to the point where nothing affected me anymore. Now that my life has settled, I can't seem to get the feeling back. [info] None [info] 1413095636
shadowharv [info] I failed university, my first two years were great but it all went wrong in my 3rd, 4th and 5th years. I failed a few courses in the 3rd year and then just seemed to be repeating myself in the 4th and 5th years. I was diagnosed with depression in my 3rd year and just got overwhelmed, then a friend committed suicide while another friend accidentally ended his own life. Before I went to university, I was also the clever one in my family, I did mechanical maths, physics, chemistry and IT for my A-levels. At uni I did programming so not an easy course. University is difficult, if you are struggling then you need to get help. I didn't get help until it was way too late and as a result I'm £25k in debt, paying off less each year than the interest is worth and have no qualifications to show what I did. After I left I couldn't just get a job as an entry level programmer, instead I had to go through a warehouse job as an order picker before getting into a better role as an analyst, took 5 years after finishing uni to get to where I just got to and I hate that I could have more easily got this role if I'd just passed uni. [info]  [info] 1544129650
Shiny-Zorua [info] For me, I was diagnosed with depression for 9 years. The pill they put me on was crap, and at the time, I was having insurance issues. I lost my doctor after my husband left the military, was unable to get my Lexapro pills anymore. I developed a hatred for them by then, they simply didn't work, and to have receptionists look at me like I was a druggie was infuriating. Going cold turkey from Lexapro was a nightmare for everyone and I was just miserable. There was an odd 'ahha' moment for me during this time when I remembered that I once read that ADHD was genetic. My brother has it, my mother is undiagnosed, but she also has it. What if it was ADHD? I actually prayed it was, because I didn't want to get back on Lexapro. I sought out a therapist (no easy task in a small town) and she confirmed it for me.Kinda funny how after I got diagnosed, both my parents (divorced) came out of the woodwork like 'oh that explains x in your childhood'. Actually pissed me off quite a lot. They were so focused on my brother who has a wide variety of mental issues that no one so much as bothered looking at me when the signs were obvious.  [info] None [info] 1489511518
ehsahr [info] Yes, but there's a range in which the highs and lows are normal &amp; healthy. One of the major symptoms of depression is that the highs and/or lows are way out of that normal range. This is something that is often intuitively known by people who have experienced it, but it's difficult to express to people who haven't. That's why it's so difficult for other people to accept that somebody else has depression without any other severe symptoms. Doctors know what details to look for that indicate the highs/lows are out of the normal range, which is why people shouldn't argue when somebody says "I've been diagnosed with depression." [info] None [info] 1483981719
blacknumbers [info] Been depressed for a while. Not in control of my life... Before telling you guys what I want to say, I have to let you know that I have been diagnosed with depression, specifically dysthymia, by a therapist. I'm supposed to take my medication, sertraline, but I only take it half the time. I'm just lazy...but I think it may have stopped working, although I've been assured it's not possible. I feel like I'm not in control of my life. Whether it be my friends or family, everyone has their own hold on me. The sad thing is I can't do anything about it. 1st story: There was a time in my life (this year for 3 weeks only) when I had a girlfriend. She stopped caring for the relationship, and really seemed like she just wanted to bare the title of being in a relationship. So I broke up with her. I blocked my ex on facebook after she kept bothering me on facebook messenger, and she apparently started crying. She went to another one of my friends and they pretty much convinced each other that I was some sort of douche. I had to end up telling her that I didn't hate her or anything, just wanted her to stop bothering me on facebook. I didn't really want to unblock her, but my friend told me to. I couldn't bring myself to say no, or else I would have been a douchebag, and she would have stopped being my friend. I don't want to lose a friend. 2nd story:I had a friend who always wanted to do stuff with me. I have no problem with that; he's a cool guy. But I have things to do. Whether something I just want to do or need to do, I had stuff I wanted to do those times he wanted to hang. The times I gave up what I wanted to do in favor of hanging with him I felt were wasted. I had to drive to his house, pick him up, drive to wherever he wanted to hang out, hang out there, then drive him back (he doesn't have his drivers license). Some nights though, we went to hang out with another group of guys. When this happened, everyone made me the butt of their jokes. When the guys tried to make my friend apart of the joke, he said "I liked it better when you made fun of [insert my real name here]." Another problem occurs when I hang out with him to late. If I hang out too late, my mom gets made at me and starts calling and texting me like crazy. If I try to go back home, my friend and the other guys get mad at me and say that I'm a momma's boy and that she has a hold of my life. In fact, this has happened every time we hung out with the other guys. So I finally said no to my friend for the last time the other day. At this time I've said no to him a lot, stating I've had things I've both needed and wanted to do. I wanted to watch a livestream of something on my computer. He said he's tired of texting and calling me wanting to hang out. I didn't feel the need to respond to him. It's just sad that he doesn't see it my way.   3rd story: My mom in particular won't let me wear my favorite hoodie. It's a blue and brown stripped zip hoddie from A&amp;E. Simple. But it's starting to get rips in the cuffs of the hoodie. She won't let me where it in public. It's something simple, really, but I just feel like I can't where what I want, because of something simple. The point of these stories is this: I have no control whatsoever in my life. It doesn't matter what is. From making decisions, to just simple acts, I'm always making someone mad. Is this what freedom is? I wish I could do what I want without people going at my throat. If that's not what freedom is, then I don't have any. I'm a slave to everyone. Everyone has freedom but me. [info] None [info] 1371445206
Munky7 [info] I've got an extremely positive outlook on life, but I have been diagnosed with depression. Severe depression. Medication keeps it under control now actually. But I still get suicidal. So anyway, my goal is to get fully into my job, and my hobbies. My job is programming, and I love playing the violin and recorder. now, these are only external things, but they give a structure to my day, and make me happy. But the real happiness comes from helping others. So you know what, that's my goal. To help others more. [info] None [info] 1571745265
Boshyyyyyy [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for roughly 3 years now and this explains what it's like perfectly, you've hit the nail on the head. It's numb [info] None [info] 1572981273
Lordbine [info] I took this to see as I have been diagnosed with depression for six years or so. A lot of times this only tests are really bad but this one a actuallyslly seemed decent.One thing I must say is if you tested for something on this please get help but for god sake, don't go to a doctor saying an online test says I have bi-polar or depression as doctors hate Dr google. (You'd be surprised how many people do this)Just be honest and try to be open, it takes a long ass time to open up to doctors and all, just recently I have opened up about different things to my psychiatrist  and that's after 6 years of seeing a psychiatrist.But truly get help as it can make a world of difference. (Sorry for format posting on mobile) [info] None [info] 1546725732
mrpickles1234 [info] Always!Why I say that, is I was recently diagnosed with ADD, at 19 years old. Originally I was diagnosed with depression, but my antidepressants weren’t cutting it. I experimented with stimulants and told my doctor how my experience was better, so he changed my diagnoses and gave me adderall. After awhile on stimulants, I started to make connections with friends I knew in high school, my family, and acquaintances. I noticed some correlations between all the symptoms of depression you can see in ADHD, and those I know who had a more stimulated upbringing and what not. It’s just a lot of stuff I’ve noticed, so purely anecdotal. [info] None [info] 1544475403
AC71196 [info] I'm depressed but no one understands that I value solitude just as much as I value company [No Regrets]: I have been diagnosed with depression a few months back. Its been something that ive struggled with for years. Sometimes I just need someone to hug me and listen to me. Other times I just need someone to talk to me about anything to get my minds off things. For the most part i have many friends and have fun at college. However, everyday I take anywhere from 15min to 4 hours and try to be alone. The reason is because I need my own time to unwind and just think. Most people ask why I do this and when I try and explain they give me a funny look and ask if I need to talk things out. I just need time away from people to keep myself sane. I feel as if no one gets this and thinks im a weirdo because of my alone time. Ima keep on doing what works I suppose. [info] None [info] 1431407101
WomblesMama [info] Yes I understand. I was diagnosed with depression at 9, but I think it had been going on for many years beforehand. I don't remember huge chunks of my childhood. I only really remember little facts as apposed to actual events. [info] None [info] 1466059348
md288 [info] Well... we’ve the same name and I grew up in middle-low class. With everything I wanted and more. And once I was diagnosed with depression I don’t know what to do.  [info] None [info] 1549852074
pop1238 [info] Weed amplifies negative emotions? I have had like the worst 2-3 weeks ever. I just cannot feel happy. I have been diagnosed with depression, and am taking Wellbutrin for that. One thing that has also continued the past few weeks has been smoking, but I've always smoked. However, for some reason, smoking is like my biggest... shame? I know not to be ashamed of it, but I have been shamed by a lot of friends and family for smoking that no matter how I truly feel about it, it's like one of the first things I use to feel bad about myself. However, the shame really starts when I've been having a rough couple of days like now. There have been happier times in my life when I've smoked and didn't feel this way. So, I wonder -- does weed amplify negative (and positive) emotions? Honestly, I'd rather that be the case because I know pot is not the problem. Honestly I don't know why I can't convince myself that it is not the problem, but I know it. But, I just feel even worse after smoking now because my comedowns are terrible - I am in such a brain fog. Hence I'd like to believe and hope that this is all just temporary - I don't need to stop smoking, I just need to focus on being happier. What do you think? [info] None [info] 1542317055
-im_fine- [info] They aren't usually very accurate. But a few moths ago, before I was diagnosed with depression, I took a bunch of them and they all said I was depressed, so.....  [info] |15F|self harm for 3 years| [info] 1384204430
Mrscrewit [info] As a teen, I can agree with this. I was against having a therapist, but after I was diagnosed with depression, I gave it a try. It really did change my life. If there's any other teens out there struggling, it really does help. They won't tell your parents anything at all. It feels nice to be able to vent to someone else.  [info] None [info] 1553104879
houseofpenguinz02 [info] I'm from a country where English is not a primary language but it never stopped me from listening or finding good music. I have been diagnosed with depression, ADHD and COD (it's my triangle of life for many years). When i found X's music in 2017 i could not believe that somewhere out there, there is a person who i can connect to at this level. Music is my whole life and not crediting X completely for saving me from suiciding but he is the main reason why i am alive rn.I know how people say that a celebrity or a internet influencer is their star and they are their biggest fan when they are most probably lying about it, But X is my god. And i know he is in a better place watching me and saying to stick right where i am, time will come when i will feel alive and happy again. [info] None [info] 1549459592
ThePunctualMole [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 7. I was also started on anti-deptessants at that same age. It kinda made everything worse, and I wish I hadn't been put on anything so young. All I know is depression and it sucks. [info] None [info] 1530702550
imma17boi [info] So my mom walked in my room and asked me why I was depressed So now I think I'm diagnosed with depression?Because on Friday I took a test at the doctors [info] 17 [info] 1568502893
420conradical69 [info] Same! 15 FTM. Started a bit before 12, maybe mid-11, which is also when I was diagnosed with depression. Turns out that I DO have depression, but half of that was dysphoria that was starting to emerge because of puberty. [info] filthy centrist [info] 1564519162
anamishmurder [info] Is anyone else's past experiences with their N parents affecting how they form relationships now? Hey. Sorry, this post is going to be a bit of a long one. My sister and I were abused emotionally by our N mom pretty much all our lives, but it really got worse when our dad left and when our mom moved us hundreds of miles away, where my dad's family found it hard to get in contact with us. My mom wasn't just emotionally abusive (made everything about her, twisted our words so we were somehow always saying something to attack her, verbally abused us, swore at us, randomly started colossal arguments for no reason, occasionally physically attacked us, mocked us and our friends, lied to us about our dad's family, was controlling and manipulative in general, etc) and neglectful (we were fed once a day, had our money taken from us, were barely washed and had dirty clothes, and my sister had to practically raise our younger brothers from the age of 10) but she also had a way of ignoring us and making us seem like pests. My earliest memories include putting on a play for her, in which I was an explorer, and I spent what felt like hours carefully laying out green t-shirts and blue t-shirts on the floor to look like grass and a river, and choosing toy animals to litter around so it would look like I was in a jungle. I made a script up on the spot and tried to act like Indiana Jones, and I remember looking up and seeing her on the sofa part-way through texting her boyfriend. That was pretty much my whole life. She made my first heartbreak about her and the problems she was going through with the guy she allowed to treat her like dirt for years but who she kept going back to and choosing over us for some reason. You had to say "mom" five times to get her attention even when she wasn't on the phone, and then she'd snap "what?" and you'd say "nevermind" only for her to fold her arms like a child and complain about your attitude and demand you tell her, then she'd give some half-assed answer and go back to texting or watching TV - and this was every conversation, every day. You asked her for something like an extra dollar for lunch (we used to have to buy dinner and lunch for everyone for 4 dollars or something) and it was like asking for the moon. Arguments could be started over you picking something out of your teeth because you looked like you were gritting them at her (yeah, that really happened once).Fast forward to the present day. Sis and I live with our dad's family now and we've been trying to rebuild our lives. But it's hard because when I was with our mom I usually played on my XBox or laptop a lot to get away from her, and I'm still stuck in that loop even though I want to get to know our family better since they seem to really love us and they were denied the right to see us for years. I don't know what to say to them a lot of the time and I'm worried that everything I do bugs them. If I get nagged to move my shoes even once I have a near mental breakdown and can't stop thinking about how useless I am and how everyone would be better off without me. Doesn't help that I've been diagnosed with depression and GAD. To make matters worse this is starting to affect finding a romantic partner. I recently met a girl and we like eachother a lot but we're taking it really slowly as we're both trying to sort our lives out at the moment where working and school is concerned. I work myself up over every text I send wondering if I'm bothering or annoying her and I feel like I'm just not worthy of her. I thought the abuse hadn't affected me too much but it seems like I was wrong. Has anybody else's N parent messed with their heads so much it's ruining their chances to form relationships with other people now? Any ideas as to how I can try and combat any of this? I'm a guy in my late teens btw. Thanks a lot [info] None [info] 1516842021
B_33K [info] I don't mean to flex but I was diagnosed with depression at 6 💪😥 [info] None [info] 1562880457
kiwi_goalie [info] How do you get and stay motivated? Hey Reddit,Over the past few years (since senior year of high school) I've found it difficult to the point of impossible to maintain my motivation for anything - school, staying healthy, even activities that I used to enjoy (art, playing guitar, sports).  I have been diagnosed with depression but lately I've felt it's more of a motivation problem, ESPECIALLY with school.  How do you guys stay motivated to do what you gotta do? [info] None [info] 1289864009
marlerr15 [info] My fragile mind So I was ban for an unknown reason on r/offmychest but I figured being a teen myself I'd post it here.I been keeping this to myself for over 2 years now. But it started on grade 7 with this guy name Paul he bullied emotionally and mentally throughout that school year. That the reason why I got to a lower section. It did stop for grade 8 due to Paul not being my classmate anymore. But it came back at grade 9 and even worst from the past 6 month I never felt happiness a chuckle, a smile but not happiness. After talking to some people I was diagnosed with depression. Through the first month of grade 9 I felt unwanted by the whole class uninvited by my friends they just seem to be friends when they want something. My family didn't help due to me being secretive I never told and even if I did they'll just tell me to man the hell up due being a 15 y.old Filipino. Sometimes I find ways to forget my problems by writing poems, bicycling to calm places but I sometimes think of ending it all. I was think of a quick and painless death I also considered drown myself a couple times by thinking of  jumping of bridges. Then it came to me a gun just a bullet to my head can end it all but I then realized it was impossible. Then my next suicidal thought was to crash my bike to a barrier at 30 mph or jumping of the church's roof. But sometimes I get my shit together a calm the hell down by stress eating which damages my savings and health. Sometimes I just go to my room and burst into tears while setting the TV volume to 70. Just as I said never shared about this until today. So this my pain in on paragraph. One question should I end it? [info] 15 [info] 1573394238
Kung_Fu_Kunta [info] Help me Hi I don’t know how to start this post, I’m pretty sad ?I was diagnosed with depression about a month and a half ago. I’m 18 years old, male and live in Canada. I was diagnosed with ADHD (severe) when I was 6. My dad also has a pretty severe ADHD but was never diagnosed until long after he finished university. And two of my three brothers also have ADHD. So ADHD has always been a big problem in my family. I’m also the second child out of 4, just for your info. I also have a Tourette syndrome, if it even matters that I mention it.All my life in school, I was always the moony kid, someone recently told me that I was the most oblivious person he’d ever met, now that really hurt. I once asked a girl in my class if she could hook me up with a sheet of paper and as she did just that she joked with me (without any mean intentions) that this sheet fitted my personality... it was a rough sheet. Now that you know what of person I am.I got through high school with minimum effort, and then I went to college, that’s when my problems really started.Don’t worry I wasn’t bullied, no one ever bullied me anyway, they were just kids being painfully honest with me, And ever since I can remember, I was naturally marginalized. I don’t wanna blame anyone for that. I’m not mad against anyone, I’m just really depressed that wherever I go I always manage to be known as a muddle-head.But anyway, once I got to college I couldn’t handle the work and I would just procrastinate until the last minute to study/work for my exams and essays. And so,on the first semester failed 2 classes And on  the second semester I failed 4 classes, and right now I’m in my third semester and everything was going great, I managed to motivate myself enough to currently pass the first 4 courses (out of 5). But that was until I sensed that the finals were coming, I started procrastinating again, I started to miss classes accidentally again ( by forgetting to set up my alarm, by staying up late and not waking up etc ...)All the while I start having two contradicting thoughts inside of my head; I want to succeed, but at all costs I don’t want to study. It’s hard to describe but when I try to motivate myself to study, I like have the book in front of me, all that’s left to study is to pick up the book and read it, and somehow, I can’t. I struggle to get myself to actually open the book, and study for more than 10 seconds. All I can think of when trying to study are dissonant thoughts, I shouldn’t study; it’s so boring; I should do something else. I have like a 5 second attention span so I like have to read the same sentence like 20 times over just to be able to not forget what it said right after I finish it. This constant rollback when reading only happens when I’m reading something I don’t want to. I have no self-discipline, I’m civilized don’t get me wrong. But I can’t ever guarantee to get something done by a certain date or a certain hour, or guarantee to not forget something. My mind is also very disorganized and my thoughts come in an anarchic order, for example: I never know where to begin to explain a concept to someone, random informations about the concept will just quickly come to me, but in a disorganized way. Sometimes i stare at my study books until like 1 to 2 am in the morning without being able to convince myself to study for my own good. It’s the exact same feeling you sense when you want to talk to a girl you find cute, can’t find the strength to do it. Today I let down my team members in college by arriving 20mins late to their presentation because I forgot to set my alarm. I’m tired of being me, getting up everyday feels like I’m watching a movie, no matter how hard I scream inside my head that I want to change my behaviour, when the time comes to change and take my responsibilities it feels like I’m being asked to put my hand on a burning pan. What is wrong with me? I don’t want to live like this anymore. Help me, please. [info] None [info] 1544224355
CrazyJay5000 [info] Hello, I've been diagnosed with depression and have been taking medication for close to a year now. I've talked to my friends in the past about it, but I feel like I'm a burden and they might not care that much. It's hard to believe that anyone else cares about me when I was taught my whole life nobody will love me if I can't pick myself up [info]  [info] 1561432134
ViiVuN [info] This was the dumbest shit I've ever seen, and I've been diagnosed with depression for years. Seriously, a way to say this is a tik tok? Not to mention "nO oNe eLSe IS sAyIng tHIs". Grow up, it's a pretty well known thing to not take suicide jokes too far. [info] 17 [info] 1566611352
echoshep [info] Good for OP for standing up for themselves. I was diagnosed with depression when I was very young. It fucking sucks. Stay strong. You are worth it.  [info] None [info] 1548113286
OGsupersexybudder [info] Halifax Medical Marijuana I'm a 24 year old male who live in the Halifax area and have been having a difficult time. I've had the same family doctor since I was young and have years of medcial records showing the different medications I was on and the various medical conditions. I was diagnosed with depression as a child and have tried many medications since. The second issue is with my migraines which I have been suffering from since I was a child as well. Although marijuana consistently aids in my symptoms. my family doctor will not even begin to have the conversation with me. I am looking for a friendly doctor in which I could speak to as well as go over my medical history. Also does anyone know if Farm Assists downtown has a doctor on site or will they help in finding one? I've wanted to go down and speak with them but can't find an address or phone number online. Thanks for your help [info] None [info] 1456431065
jewdai [info] Yes and then I was diagnosed with depression. fortunately, after getting treatment I just talked to my doctor about getting off of meds in two months :D [info] Textbook ENTP [info] 1431827658
MaskLad [info] I've been diagnosed with depression by dr. _______ [info] None [info] 1570270544
winter_throwaway [info] I was diagnosed with depression today, but they said they can't give me medication... [info] None [info] 1486696864
JerzBandyta [info] Do you know how to help? So... I'm a trans male. That's probably cause of problem. Although I am diagnosed with depression, GAD and borderline, pills I take for it really help. The real struggle everyday is being LGBT- you see, I live in Poland, which is really "religious" and homophobic country. Government tries to kinda f-up law enforcement and education, and obviously fights with everyone who isn't white cis and catholic...  You can see where I am going with this. I feel like an outcast, when everything I want is just to change my legal name, sex and get top surgery.  But I don't even know how to start.  Anyone on this sub knows *anything* about transition in Poland?  I feel lost and defeated from the beggining. I just want to feel included.  Thank you in advance. [info] None [info] 1561896057
steph_c1 [info] I am diagnosed with depression. It is NOT an excuse for treating people you love like shit.  [info] None [info] 1507797916
Monster716 [info] Does anyone else self harm just because now? Before anyone asks, yes, I am diagnosed with depression. I've had it for 7 years but was only diagnosed a few weeks ago. I used to cut to let the pain out. Then that stopped helping so it was just to feel something. Now I don't even feel anything when I do it. I just do it because I can. And idk why. I feel nuts and I'm just waiting to get thrown in a hospital. [info]  [info] 1521700307
kailinx3 [info] I have no where else to talk about this so I hope this is okay I've been diagnosed with depression for over half my life now. I had a few years of it being very manageable with the bad days few and far between. I was excited because I figured it could only go up from here. I finished college, I moved back home and tried to get a job in my field. I was more hopeful than I have ever been. As a kid you're always told that once you have a degree, you'll get a job, that pretty much everything will fall in place. That if you keep working hard, everything will pay off. 6 months after I moved back home I still didn't have a job. I have student debt, as well as a car payment (got in a car accident the last semester and had to buy a new car. Woo.. I should have known things would get worse from there) so not having a job was freaking me out. I was literally watching my savings melt. My bright idea was that it was where I lived. I lived in the middle of no where, and with my field being art driven, it made sense that I should move closer to a city. Taking a (not very thought out) risk, I moved my dumbass across the country. That was around 6 months ago. I still don't have a job. I can't even secure a job that isn't in my field, like a cashier or something to that effect. I'm constantly regretting everything I've done the past few years. Why did I go into this field and not something I *knew* was in demand? Why did I think it was a good idea to move so far when I couldn't even get a job before? Why didn't I save my money? Why did I buy x when I didn't even need it? My depression has gotten so much worse to the point every day I have, at the very least, one mental breakdown and end up crying in the shower. I can't sleep very well and have to take sleeping pills or I'll stay up all night with depressive thoughts. I can't afford to go to a doctor to get medicine again. I don't know what to do. I hate feeling like this again, and I hate that I can't stop it. I hate that I have absolutely no control. And I hate that whenever I tell somebody I can't find a job it's just "you should do x!" And other obvious and unhelpful things, as if I haven't already done everything I can think of to avoid this situation for the last year. I'm finding it impossible to keep positive that I'll be able to find a job and that everything will be okay. Because at this point, when I think about it, nothing ever really turned out fine for me. When someghing went well, soon enough the good thing ended. So why did I expect something like this to work out? [info] None [info] 1568090944
cosmiccharisma [info] Crying more often when I used to not be able to? Hi, some background (going to make this as brief as possible). I've been diagnosed with depression, GAD and OCD. Have been having symptoms since I could remember. Anyway, I've been going through a very tough past couple of years (I'm 25 and F) - went through a very traumatic breakup from an extremely long relationship with an addicted boyfriend (who hid it from me) who left me for his rehab romance. I quit my job, and while it was a good thing because now I can focus more on finding something better suited to me, I have way too much time to think. I see a therapist twice a week, am on medication, and go to Nar-Anon meetings but I've been having a very rough week. I feel that part of it is due to the realization that I'm not ready to date but I feel entirely helpless just being alone and especially knowing my ex is with someone else kills me. I'm also not where I want to be financially and I am planning to move in a couple of months and now without a job I feel like I'm screwed. I also have very bad body image and self-esteem issues that I've had since adolescence. Anyway, I had been doing okay and I hadn't been crying that much but for some reason the past couple of days I have just felt a serious increase in my depressive moods and I've been crying a lot more. Not sure if missing 1 day of my antidepressant would have this effect on me, or if I'm just getting more in touch with my emotions. Any insight anyone might have would be helpful. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1496024589
ritaorabri [info] Depression relapse? When I was 15 I was diagnosed with depression and admitted to a hospital for long-term care. Fast forward three years, I was first medicated for my depression and continued to be medicated for another year and a half. As I began my first year at college, the change of environment helped tremendously and felt as though I didn't have to take the medication anymore. I spoke to my doctor and she agreed that she felt that I could reduce my dosage to minimal, then eventually none.I am now in my fourth year at college and have found this past semester more difficult than ever. It's strange because I feel stronger since I am not reacting as severely as I used to (frequently crying, loss of interests in activities), but I feel completely alone and as if I want to always hide. I struggle opening up to people because I don't want them to judge me, I've always cared what people thought but this has become so chronic that it's consuming my life and ruining already existing relationships as well as preventing me from making new ones. I'm having a hard time finding a purpose, losing interest in spending time with other people and want to be alone. All of the time. My family is concerned and I miss them, but can't bring myself to really want to talk to anyone.I don't know if any of that makes sense, but I'm in a really dark and confusing place right now. [info] None [info] 1463277967
GayMadMan [info] Yes. As an example, my parents divorced when I was twelve. A year later I was diagnosed with depression. Everyday is an extreme struggle, not wanting to get up in the morning, not having motivation to do anything, loss of appetite, etc. It can come in many shapes and forms and can come from many different things that have happened in somebody’s life. [info] None [info] 1572665861
mof920 [info] Thank god I'm not alone on this. Bojack is VERY relatable for most people on the sub and as soon as I was diagnosed with depression, I picked up the show out of sheer curiosity and well, now it's my favorite because it touches on things that are so deep and emotionally connecting to me. Many times, because I am kinda well off and was once very popular, I feel like I *am* Bojack and his problems seem to reflect mine, in some ways.  [info] None [info] 1446794488
MarieAllis [info] NTA. And I'm so sorry you not only had to endure everything he put you through, but to have his family and friends call you those things? Shame on them!!!! Seriously. As many have said already on here, he is responsible for his mental health, no one else. A support system is essentail, but he seems to be an asshole using the excuse of a mental illness. I was diagnosed with depression around 15ish. I took me a long time to get all the help I needed, but that's exactly it, as I'm sure you know as well, I needed to want the help to really receive it. I had a friendship that became toxic because of just this. He admitted that he probably had mental health problems but refused to get help, and didn't want to get it. I had to cut him off. Haven't talked to him in over 5 years and I know other friends that had to cut him off too. You did the right thing OP. I wish you the very best!!! [info] None [info] 1547481781
kryaklysmic [info] No, it’s not something everyone deals with and it’s really difficult to do stuff when you’re dealing with mental illness. I was diagnosed with depression a year and a half ago, It was absolutely mind blowing to me that normal adults are actually moderately happy much more than half of the time. [info] None [info] 1556427697
Beginning_End [info] I'd like to point out that clinical depression isn't really "being sad all the time."Depression is actually more a sense of emptiness. That feeling of, "Why bother?" It's not being butthurt about your current problems, that's a completely normal reaction. It's about feeling empty, unsatisfied and unmotivated ALL THE TIME, for no real reason. I've been diagnosed with depression and borderline personality disorder and I can tell you one big difference between "being sad" and having depression. When I was suffering through depression, **I wished I could even feel sad, or angry or anything**.Feeling nothing about anything for months or years is far more fucked up than feeling sad.Being sad or angry might make you want to kill yourself, in it's extreme states.Feeling nothing makes you think that there's absolutely no reason not to. [info] Dook Duke [info] 1407664343
Glaivekids [info] I didn't realise how much I believed this until I was diagnosed with depression. You mean, heathens aren't always empty and tired? [info] None [info] 1530553396
cailiestarz [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was around 14. I had it for a few years and it sucked. I stopped eating, couldn't sleep, and just pretty much hated life. The weird part was, was that I had no idea why I felt that way. I came from a good family and had a nice life, but I just didn't feel happy. I pretty much gave up on life and attempted suicide. After I was put of medication and began talking to a therapist for a while, it eventually faded away I guess. I still feel bad sometimes but never like I used too. [info] None [info] 1316324747
Blade4u22 [info] True happiness vs happiness brought on by Adderall *TLDR: Has my Adderall made me ok with living a mundane life or was my thinking pre-adderall the problem and I'm chasing an unattainable /unrealistic form or happiness on days I don't take my pills. Does anyone else feel this way or have any experience or advice*I just found out about this subreddit a couple of minutes ago so I thought I'd get some advice. I've been 25, turning 26 this month, and I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD a few years ago after a trip to the hospital. Since then I have been on Adderall, which has helped me in school and in general I've been happier. My problem arises when I stop taking because I don't have anything going on. I don't feel withdrawals or anything like that, but I start to wonder "Are my pills the only thing keeping me happy?"Growing I've always been a risk taker. From cliff diving to stealing from department stores in high school, I loved the rush of living life close to the edge and being spontaneous. Fast forward to now and I'm with my girlfriend who's the opposite of that. She's sweet but hasn't taken a risk her whole life and judges me when I don't want to plan ahead. I know she loves me and things seem good as long as I take my Adderall. If I don't I get caught up thinking would I normally be with her or do the pills make me content? These thoughts scare me and keep me up at night because I can't figure out which thoughts are the right ones. Does anyone have any advice? Anything would be great even if it's anecdotal stories. I just feel so lost right now. [info] None [info] 1528584060
mbubbs13542 [info] Almost constant diarrhea for exactly 3 weeks now? Please help!! Okay, so a few quick things about me:20 years oldFemale 5'11"170 lbs(ish)WhiteCondition has been going on for 3 weeks as of today- coincidentally after a doctors appointment I had where I was diagnosed with depression. I know this may be gross, so I apologize, but most my bowel movements have been practically complete liquid/very soft. Yesterday, I had one that seemed more solid where one may not classify it as diarrhea, but it still came out softer than what was normal for me before. Other than my mental health, my body has been in almost perfect health and I'm relatively active, haven't had alcohol since august or so, and my diet isn't terrible.Also I should say, I go have a lot of gas and moments where I suddenly have to run to the bathroom to relieve myself. This all has never happened to me before and I'm very nervous, because my mind automatically fears the worst. I fear I might have to end up with a colostomy bag or something. I have another doctor's appointment scheduled in a week or so, but do any or you have any ideas of what could be happening and steps I should take in the meantime?Thank you. [info] None [info] 1541635833
mimidudette [info] I'm sorry you're in that limbo-sort of mood, I've totally felt that weird listless empty feeling before and it's definitely weird because it's not like you're sad and can do something to cheer yourself up, you just feel ... empty???? Usually I smoke pot when that happens but then I end up either sleeping or eating so idk if that's necessary a constructive solution lol. I'm definitely not a psychiatrist but I was diagnosed with depression a while ago and I associate the 'empty' feeling with depression, i.e. as I've started taking meds I've experienced it less and less. Sometimes stretching and going for a walk helps me feel better, or at least makes me feel calm and serene about it, maybe that'll help? Either way I hope you feel a bit better tomorrow. Sending good vibes ❤❤❤ (and congrats on not binging, even if it was "unconventional" it's still an accomplishment to be proud of!) [info] 5'8" | CW: 154 | -12 | GW: 118 | 20F [info] 1491345137
What_Is_EET [info] Well this is about to get interesting. My line of work is in social work, working with depressed people is a lot of what I do (or what I'm supposed to do). It's an awkward situation because my mental health record has everything to do with any jobs I could get. If I was diagnosed with depression I wouldn't be able to get a job in my field. I have no doubt I would get diagnosed, I know DSM-5 top to bottom.  [info] None [info] 1416609730
MrDoe [info] Depression isn't set in stone. I'm diagnosed with depression and yet I don't really relate to any of the pictures.  [info] None [info] 1351943508
lolumadbr0 [info] LP got me out of so many dark places when I was a teenager, before I even knew what depression was or even when I was diagnosed with depression... I am forever saddened by this.😭😭 [info] None [info] 1500600724
awsedrf7 [info] This sounds exactly like me and I was diagnosed with depression recently. Maybe you should get checked in case? Introversion shouldnt make you cry at home [info] None [info] 1484313089
HowlingFailHole [info] I can't handle my life but every way to change it feels overwhelming and impossible I don't even know if I want advice or not... the problem is I feel like each option I have is completely, insurmountably impossible for me to actually do. I am completely stuck and feel my only option is suicide.I have had mental health issues for at least 15 years and was in inpatient this time 10 years ago for anorexia, but bar a month off work for stress when I was about 24 I have held down a pretty high stress consulting job. In the past I have been reasonably successful, but I now feel unable to do anything. I can't do my work. I keep messing up. And I can't interact normally with other people and I feel like a freak all the time. (I've never been able to interact normally, that's not new.)I think maybe I only ever felt like I was worth something if I was achieving something, and now I can't do my job anymore so I feel incompetent, and so I feel completely worthless. I know that's irrational and I would never judge someone else to be worthless just because they struggled to hold down a job, but in my case I feel it's true. I have nothing else to offer. I can't reason myself out of that feeling.I feel like I cant carry on at work. I was struggling massively anyway, have been for months, but then I took on a role that requires 3-5 hours of commuting each day depending on how bad the trains and traffic are and it's killing me. I feel pathetic, like everyone else commutes, I just never had to because I always made sure I lived close to work, even if it meant sharing somewhere really shitty. I can't so stuff normal people can do. I can't talk to new people without it taking everything out of me. And yesterday we had to commute to another country so I had to leave at 4am and get back at 10pm and spend almost the whole day interacting with new people. I spent the entire train ride there and back just going over and over how I have no option but to kill myself.My bf says I should ask for stress leave from work but I feel like I can't. I agreed to this new role and if I pulled out it would screw things up for one of the only people in my company I actually like. It would mean the weeks of induction I've had (why?? so unnecessary) would be wasted. It would be embarrassing for my company. And fundamentally I just can't face having that conversation. It feels like suicide is a much more realistic alternative. I know that's dumb but I can't express how impossible that conversation feels any other way.My bf says to at least speak to my line manager about it but I can't. He's obviously clueless about mental health stuff and I know he'll just react uncomfortably and dismissively. This should be stuff I can handle, it's just not. I know it's bullshit to say I can't and I should just do it but I don't know what to say... it feels so much like I can't.I feel like I have to mentally bully myself every second of the day just to get myself to at least be at work, but then when I'm there I can't so anything because it's really hard to mentally bully yourself into cognitively difficult tasks, even if they're things I would have been able to do in the past. But if I let up on the bullying myself I won't get up, so it's not like I can just do self care or be kinder to myself. I called in sick today which I feel pathetic about but I couldn't face how many people I needed to talk to today. I woke up literally shouting in fear multiple times during the night, then again every 20 minutes even after I'd called in sick. That's how I wake up every day at the moment. Like I'm coming out of a nightmare but I'm not, I'm just waking up to what should be a good and totally handlable life, that I just can't handle. It's pathetic.Oh idk if it's relevant but I've been diagnosed with depression, anorexia, and adhd in the past. I take meds for adhd but I don't want to go back on ssris. I'm in therapy but when I explained this to him last session I couldn't properly articulate this or even properly look at him. And he's not the type of therapist to give his opinion on things or give advice. I think I need to leave my job. I hate it with a passion. It's soul crushingly  pointless. But I can't face the whole process of leaving. I feel like I need to ghost my job. But if I stay for another few months I might get a fairly significant pay out as I have stock options. It's such a privileged problem to have a hate myself for not being able to cope with this. [info] None [info] 1574434144
BubbleMinx [info] Toxic Parents I've wanted to talk about this for a while, but have nobody to speak to. I am an only child and my parents have consistently put me down and blamed me for everything that goes wrong. Here are a few examples of some things that happened while growing up. My parents tried unsuccessfully to adopt children. My dad told me it was my fault they weren't able to. He also told me I have "mental problems" because I hung up on him once. This was after I was diagnosed with depression which he also told me was my own fault. He had a horrible childhood and takes it out on me. I never yelled at them or stood up for myself my entire life. I spent my childhood hiding from them in my room. My household was constant yelling and fighting to the point other friends and family would comment on it to me. My mom isn't as bad as him, but what hurts the most is she would always defend herself when my dad started acting like a child but could never stand up for me. She has more than once told me the dogs ran away when they hadn't. She often called me stupid and tried to put me on diets (I've never been overweight). They are very controlling. I am still financially dependant on them as I am in college, (which they make sure to make me feel bad about) but when i tried getting my own insurance and pay my own bills they flip out. They are so critical that my dad would often yell at me for the order in which I ate my food at dinner. He also got angry I wouldn't watch TV with them so he made me sit with them and yelled at me for getting up to go to the bathroom. I have alot issues surrounding pets. My dad beat my cat and wonders why she's so aggressive. The day after our dog died he dragged me to pet shops while I was bawling to get another dog so our other dog wouldn't be sad. I cannot be myself around them and feel extremely uncomfortable around them. It's gotten to the point I don't care if I have their approval anymore and I only want to build a wall in between us. [info] None [info] 1553008075
zack2491 [info] My girlfriend is a type 2 diabetic. We've been doing keto for ~8 weeks now. Her bg was all over the place for the first couple weeks. Your body is currently freaking out, pulling glucose from muscle stores, afraid it's about to starve. You've taken away the fuel source it's been dependent on for years! The best advice here is to keep calm and keto on. Give your body a week or so to become adapted to running on fat as fuel, and your BG levels will likely stabilize and be lower than ever before.Last week, my gf went to the doc. She'd been taking metformin, jardiance, and injecting insulin on a sliding scale. After 2 months of keto, her A1C is down to 5.7 and her doc took her off all medications. Side note -- I was diagnosed with depression last year. After 2 months of keto I'm completely off my medication as well, with my doctor's blessing. Never felt better! [info] 27/M/5'11" SD 4/30/18 SW:235 | CW:213 | GW:180 [info] 1531205283
bradygeorge [info] Why is this so relatable. I was in a gifted class for 3 years. Made mostly As and some Bs. Then in fifth grade I was bullied. Then I was diagnosed with depression. Now I’m that lonely kid [info] None [info] 1553377397
berimbolo90 [info] Freshman year of both my HS and college career.  My freshman year I was diagnosed with depression and spent some time at the hospital for it.  My freshman year of college I decided to go out of state, my grandfather passed away, a girl I was dating took her life, had my first ever encounter with a juggalo and juggelete. My GPA was horrid too.   [info] None [info] 1383087352
PumpkinManHalloween [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and this just triggers me a bit [info] None [info] 1557404842
Lyress [info] How do I flee my homophobic country ? Hello.I am a 15 year old boy from Morocco, and have known about my sexuality since 4 years, but only came to terms with it the past year.I was diagnosed with depression and almost comitted suicide this summer, if it wasn't for my supportive best friends (I wish I could say the same about my family...).I am no longer happy in this life, can anyone give me some hope, some guidance to how do I get to a better place where I can enjoy the same rights as any other human being ? [info] None [info] 1415478973
spiderlanewales [info] You would be considered a demon on Tumblr, but I agree, especially with the second one.I was diagnosed with depression early on, and it's seriously scary. Oh, and every headache isn't a fucking migraine. Hope you're listening, Facebook. [info] None [info] 1450416065
waww16 [info] Yes the come in bouts, I was actually doing really good for about 6 months but lately it’s been really tough. (And yes I am diagnosed with depression but no longer see a therapist)  [info] None [info] 1533772515
white_crust_delivery [info] &gt;Since they have chosen to kill themselves, why don't they choose to actively improve their situation? Call me an optimist but I sincerely believe that if a person tries with the best of their ability, they can improve how they live. This misunderstands a lot of what mental illness is. Firstly, your analogy with alcohol/drugs is very misrepresentative of the situation. People are accountable for their actions when intoxicated because a) they choose to be in that state, which is also temporary b) this accountability usually applies to the ways that they harm others, more so than themselves. Its wrong to equivocate suicide to a crime like murder. Furthermore, your notion that somehow people can just improve their lives if they're depressed is severely misunderstanding what depression is. For instance, I have been diagnosed with depression amongst a couple other mental disorders. I've worked very hard at self-improvement. I take antidepressants, and I see both a psychiatrist and a therapist regularly. I exercise daily and eat healthy. I stay really busy with school and extracurricular activities. But at the end of the day, I still hate myself. I still think life is pointless. I still don't understand why I'm bothering with any of this, and I constantly think about suicide throughout the day. I can't help it. Depression is feeling like this in spite of one's situation - I have no reason to feel this way, yet I do. That isn't something somebody can just completely change with a bit of effort. [info] None [info] 1427037124
Uncreative_Generator [info] I have been diagnosed with depression. I started Prozac but it hasn't been helping a ton. [info] None [info] 1556427044
jonnystreets [info] I am diagnosed with depression. My condition definitely is affected by those around me. But yes i was wrong depression is not a mood.  [info] None [info] 1542452821
mitchybaer [info] Eh, not a lot. But physically, I've broken my nose once, snapped my tendon once, had multiple surgeries, one on my nose, and one on my "lower back" (really, it's just my ass.)Mentally, I was diagnosed with depression a couple months ago. [info] None [info] 1340464562
fantily [info] I am diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1562128521
FoxForce5Iron [info] Eh, not always.Let me give you my perspective.  I've been diagnosed with depression for over ten years.  I that think that makes me, by definition, chronically mentally ill.  I've never been visibly "crazy" (manic, delusional, out of control, etc.) but I would say that staying in bed all day is pretty crazy.  Missing classes for no good reason?  Also crazy.So I'm a mentally ill person who's engaged in crazy behaviors.  I'm also a successful and considerate person; I'm a med student, I volunteer, I have many close friends and a much wider circle of acquaintances.So, am I crazy?  Possibly.  And that's ok.  Because **that's reality.**  [info] None [info] 1456507798
persistantcat [info] I was diagnosed with depression during my PhD, but did recover from it with the help of counselling that was provided for free at my university. I think there were many factors that brought it on, but one of the things that makes graduate work very difficult is the lack of "sign posts" along the way to indicate that you are making progress. The projects that we work on are so big that it can feel like we will never get results. In other jobs you might get to experience a series of small successes that keep you moving forward, but that wasn't as common in my experience.  In fact, we sometimes get the opposite...experiments not working and it feels like you're moving backwards. The hours can also be long and the pay is very low, which doesn't help either.  [info] None [info] 1491453266
bloublom [info] Hi OP, some of what you say sounds very similar to how I felt before I was diagnosed with depression. Mine got gradually worse until it lead to extreme suicidal thoughts. I also had the horrible crying spells. It interfered with my work and my studies, and it really hurt my relationships with my loved ones. Eventually I went to my friend's house doctor (GP). I told her all about my symptoms and about the fact that I knew if I didn't get meds I would end up doing something stupid. I told I could not afford to see a psychiatrist so she prescribed me an anti depressant and monitored me herself. The medicine saved my life. It has been four years and I honestly have not been experiencing the severe crying spells anymore. The pills do have side effects, I feel somewhat less focused and less passionate about things I always felt passionate about. It's better than being dead or sad though. Perhaps you could see a GP who is not affiliated with your family? Just ask around first as not all doctors believe that depression needs to be treated with sensitivity. As for your parents, I've noticed it's a generational thing. Even my mother has a hard time dealing with it. She seems to think it is a reflection on her parenting skills. It was very hard at first. I think I have finally come to terms with the fact that my mother will never understand my depression. She simply is not able to, and it is ok. I have a few close friends whom I can trust with m depression stories. I usually tell them as soon as I can feel something in my mood is changing, just so they can keep an eye out for extreme changes. Also, I know it sounds quite silly. But when I'm going through lower moods I forget to drink enough water and I stop eating properly. It's really important to try and just at least take care of your own most important and basic needs. Eat salad, drink water, get sleep, and perhaps the most challenging task: brush your hair every day! I easily stop taking care of myself, especially when I'm alone. I can go for three days without showering or brushing my teeth if left to my own devices. It's so easy not to care when you really don't care. Good luck OP, I really hope you find something that works for you.  [info] None [info] 1471817134
rainy-haze [info] Any particular reason? Just don't feel like going? I had a really hard time getting motivated to go to class in college, like could not even make it to some exams although inside I knew I had to kind of troubles, and along with some other things and behaviors I was displaying, some friends intervened and I was diagnosed with depression and once I sought treatment it got better. It wasn't a miracle, over night thing, but with the help of the university health center and support of my friends, I managed to pulled myself together enough to not totally fuck over my future. I did still fail some classes, but I retook them and still managed to graduate. Maybe consider seeking out help! No judgements from me, I just don't want your future to be permanently impacted by this if you're hitting a weird rough patch.  [info] None [info] 1460038715
vurvela_ [info] "I swear to God that I don't think I can go another day." I feel tired of everything, I can not continue more and more and more often I feel like the life is finishing me.I want them to see me happy, but there comes a point where I can not have been 7 painful years since I cut myself for the first time until 3 months ago that I was diagnosed with depression and borderline personality disorder, have been long days.Because of this, I have alienated people I love deeply, have been years that I do not understand how they can improve, years in which I have hurt innumerable people, where I have hurt myself, in less than a week I will turn 19 and I have Fear, fear of failure, fear of believing. Fear of losing myself more and more, afraid of getting to the point where my illness overcomes me. But sometimes I must confess that he becomes bigger than I, he becomes much more serious than I still seem to start, sometimes I just want to cut my arms until all the memories come to me.I do not know how I can find myself, but I am sure that if something does not change if some of this does not disappear I will die in life. To fulfill 19 years terrifies me, I know that no one imporata it to fulfill that age, a few people care, but I really hope to overcome this, I do not want to get to the point of filling my body with new scars. I am sorry to harm my parents and my relatives, but I am drowning in my pains and thoughts. Even at age 19 I look like a little girl lying in bed with some pain, but this time the depression turned to physical pain, a sadness that bites me. Maybe this could change [info] None [info] 1498273299
indianshitsRtheworst [info] Should I trust the doctor about fetzima? I've been diagnosed with depression before. I'm a college sophomore, recently turned 20, and not feeling 100%. Actually, not 100% for a while. I've just been feeling bad, like my body isn't good enough. Or I'm too lonely being a Virginia and single and all, or I just hate myself bc I visualize suicidal scenarios frequently. I've talked with psychs, but idk. My dr. Prescribed fetzima, but idk. I've been on lexapro before in middle school, but idk about it. Pills may have not always been the best for me from my adolescent experiences, but should I try and trust them now? I don't feel like a happy 20 year old. I've never had a girlfriend and I fear I never will. People do like me and say  I'm cool, but I still feel shitty. Lonely and shitty. Ok drinking and typing rn in a bar with some friends and acquaintances, but I feel bad. Idk. I haven't told my parents about me being prescribed fetzima as I was prescribed a few days ago and I don't know what to say. I'm sorry. I'm scared. I'm a fuck. Please just get me away from this. All I want is this weight to go away and to hold a girl. I try, but shit I've fucked up half of college already (?). I hate this. I want to wrong out my brain of all this shit and start anew. [info] None [info] 1430023910
tdot456 [info] Lost friends I’m not sure if this is really a question or a rant or something in between but I feel like I’ve lost a ton of friends over this stupid damn thing and I’m wondering if anyone else has been in the same situation? I was diagnosed with depression and I feel like I’m just not the same person I was as before. I used to be part of a big group of friends but I feel like I sort of just drifted out and now I’m at that awkward place where I’m not feeling like I’m unwanted but at the same time, I’m either not invited because people forget me or because I gusss I’m not part of that inner knit circle.Now I just feel like no one is really close to me anymore. And I know sometimes people will say stuff like oh if they aren’t there for you now, they weren’t really great friends to begin with but we’ve known each other like half our lives (granted I’m in my early twenties).Shit just sucks. I don’t know if it’s fixable. A huge part of me just wants to leave and never come back, start all over. Hit a refresh button. [info] None [info] 1532239525
Flurzzlenaut [info] Having a really bad month. I’ll start of by saying I was diagnosed with depression when I was 7. I’m 20 now and it only keeps getting worse. This month has been especially bad.  I’ve been looking for jobs for the past month since I’ve finished college and was ready to move out on my own. I can’t find anything and I’ve been feeling like it may be because people in this town know me and don’t like me for some reason. My parents are mad that I can’t find a job when my younger sister found one earlier last week. They’ve been yelling and of course this makes me feel like a total waste of air. It’s been keeping me up at night for around 2 weeks now. On top of this I’ve been noticing more and more that my boyfriend finds his work more important than me. He often chooses more time at work rather than hanging out with me. He was supposed to be off this weekend but that ended up changing for some reason so I’m all alone. I have no friends I can go out and do things with to get my mind off of things either. I feel trapped. I feel like no one actually cares about me. And honestly it hurts worse when even the person you thought you wanted to marry chooses his boss over you. I just don’t know what to do anymore. It’s been really hard and I just feel like giving up. [info] None [info] 1558227103
NotARobot-IPromise [info] NTA at all.  I was diagnosed with depression in middle school, major depression in my twenties, and I still struggle sometimes.  When I was going through the worst of it, I’m sure I leaned too hard on my friends; but your reactions / distress are totally reasonable, and the boundaries you’ve set are, too.  It’s really, really hard to be someone’s sole source of support when they’re in a deep depression.  Unfortunately, from what I recall, it’s also really hard to control yourself when you’re in a deep depression, so your boyfriend’s ability to comply may be hit-or-miss; but if it’s too much for you, you’re allowed to set boundaries (up to and including leaving, if you ever feel like that’s what you want / need). I don’t know much about alternatives to SSRIs - they’ve always worked great for me.  (I took SNRIs once for like, three days, and was like *“NOPE, I do not think norepinephrine is my problem”*.)   Hopefully, whatever he’s taking starts working soon; also, hopefully your bf is being open with his prescriber about his continuing symptoms.  Depending on the drug, and how long he’s been taking it, the dosage may need to be adjusted.Also, FWIW - my best friend experienced very severe depression in his teens and early twenties, and he is also resistant to therapy and SSRIs (he had a very bad reaction to Zoloft as a teenager).  He still has days when he gets very gloomy (usually related to politics), but overall, he’s okay now.  I think maybe his brain just evened out as he got older; he mellowed.  (To be fair, I didn’t know him until he was in his late 20s, but  from what he’s described, his depression was quite bad before that.)I’m *not* saying everyone mellows – my parents didn’t mellow, and I have only reached the higher plane of comparative serenity that I am currently delicately balanced on by taking the right dose of SSRIs - but it seems like some people do.  [info] Asshole Enthusiast [9] [info] 1554567406
fuglywugly [info] Warning - This is a rant. **tl;dr** https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=glvdySoLkMkI am so done. Just. Done. Last summer I was diagnosed with depression. Big woop. you know, it only took the fact that I *masturbated* ever since I was *born* literally doing it until I fell asleep in the car seat. Oh but that should just go away on it's own because it is *normal*. If it does not go away and the child is already in grade school this is beyond what any parent should have to deal with. The school counselor should be called. Oh, actually why don't we fucking make that the entire board of teachers? And, even after the parents decide to let the bloody CHILD who is only SIX YEARS OLD decide what TREATMENT SHE WANTS the school is going to go behind the parents back and continue to have "therapy sessions" and just tell the other kids that this is happening because the little girl is *different*. &amp;nbsp;The little girl begs mummy not to go to school every day. She learns how to make herself throw up to avoid all the laughter. She learns how to hide things. She hears adults murmuring sexual abuse and decides to look up what sex is...in third grade. She learns all sorts of awful things and tries a few of them. This is how an oxygen deprivation (choking) addiction is born. She doesn't tell anyone because who is there left to trust?&amp;nbsp;There were signs from early on that something was wrong. What child doesn't want people to watch her when she plays? What child spends as much time alone as possible? What child has satanic dreams and is convinced that anything with black eyes is going to steal her soul? What child wakes up screaming in the middle of the night and muffles her screams in the pillow because eventually the fear of disappointing mum and dad is greater than the nightmares?&amp;nbsp;The Miss Populars decide that the kid should be there new little toy. They invite her into their group and make her feel special. She has to stop hanging out with her neighbor though, because he is a boy and that's just weird. She has to get contacts, they bring out her eyes. Aeropostale is what she has to wear, just so they can all look alike. She can't eat that much, because no one likes people who look like a pig. Oh, and her new nickname is Lucy. She asks what that means and May says it's short for Lucifer. She doesn't know what that means and happily smiles, glad to be included. Later she finds out what that means, and that she can't hang out with the cool people anymore because their parents think there's something wrong with her. &amp;nbsp;Back when the girl was three she asked her parents if they lied, and they said no. Later on that year she is screaming from one of her nightmares but no one comes. She gets up and wanders out into the kitchen. She then sees "Santa Claus". She asks and her parents say Santa isn't real. Neither is the tooth fairy...She tells her preschool class about this and everyone cries. She gets sent home with a pretty letter and has to go somewhere else. Mother and Father tell her that sometimes you don't tell people things. She doesn't understand and begins to become quieter and quieter. Later on that year they buy a black cat. The black cat scares the little girl but her mum won't get rid of it. One night it bites her while she is asleep. She screams and her mum blames her for pulling the cat's tail. The girl hates the cat. She begins to break out in hives and turn blue. The mum takes her and just says they're going for a trip. They go to a hospital. The girl asks what's going on and she is told everything will be fine. The girl doesn't believe her, what if she is just saying that like when the girl wasn't supposed to tell people about Santa? The girl begins to cry and becomes upset. The mum is angry, the girl doesn't know why. The mum says she is scared and to be quiet. Another women comes in with lots of needles and tubes. The girl keeps crying until the mum says she will make her take a nose mask unless she is quiet. The girl is shocked and says nothing. The mask is fitted over her face and the girl becomes numb. She can't sleep all night and is given a remote. At first the mum is careful and makes sure to watch what her daughter sees. Then the mum falls asleep and the girl begins to flip channels. She continues until morning and sees several interesting shows. In the morning she wakes her mum up when she sees daylight. Her throat hurts but she is scared of the lady with the nose mask so she doesn't say anything.&amp;nbsp;The girl tries to hide her asthma. She stops taking her medicine when she does something wrong to "punish" herself. She tries getting straight A's but the allowance of money isn't what she wants. She tries taking her mums sleep pills at night but they make her feel funny during the day. She tries being good and bad but nothing seems to work. She is friends with the outcasts, the popular kids, she joins sports, she tries a lot but nothing helps. Books become her best friend. When she reads she can pretend like she is someone else. The library and the computer lab are her favorite places to hide. &amp;nbsp;She lies about trying to commit suicide just to see if her parents would care. They just get angry. They don't understand and tell her she has everything she wants. She goes to counseling and talks to someone. The first three people tell her they can't handle her. One threatens to call child abuse on her parents and have her put in a hospital. She tries talking to someone but just becomes more confused. Then she sees a gossip from her town going to the therapist and leaves.&amp;nbsp;Her parents throw things at her. They move. They buy her a horse. They buy her a Kindle. They repaint her room. They get her flute lessons. They buy her clothes and more clothes. They get her laptops, phones, video games, books, a new dog, a cat, but the girl doesn't really want any of it. She shrugs it away. Her parents tell her she is rude and other girls wouldn't do this. Other girls would be grateful. She should get a job, her cousin is working AND going to college full time. She should be nicer, their neighbors daughter is on the student council, gets straight A's, works, and has an adopted brother...She should be _______ because ________ is ______. &amp;nbsp;The little girl is mean towards them, because getting yelled at at least let's her feel something. Her mother says she is a bitch. The boys at school tells her she is a whore. Her friends say she is serious, sad, and mopey. Soon everyone slowly leaves and she is all alone. People tell her to buck up and others are starving in the world. She has everything she ever wanted. She starved herself for a while and decided she wouldn't mind switching places with someone. &amp;nbsp;The little girl isn't really little. She is seventeen years old. That little girl is me. I switched to talking about myself in the third person because it is easier to describe things that way, makes it feel less real. I don't know if anything even is wrong. I just don't know anymore. &amp;nbsp;I tried turning to food for comfort, and just made me feel worse. Now I'm sad and fat. Plus my mum went out after she got mad and bought a bunch of food with peanuts in it. (I am allergic to all nuts.) Literally there are no carbs in the house that I can eat now. (Did you know they make peanut flour?) And I became a vegetarian for health reasons soo....XD. Guess I will be losing that weight. Whelp I am doing what every other teenager does when they are sad and feel lonely. Turning to the internet! Yeah! I just don't know what to do. &amp;nbsp;I thought about it, what I want is someone to just give me a hug and say I love you. Then maybe go on a walk with me once a week or so. Just someone who wants to hang out. Someone who will just listen to me, and tell me I'm not crazy, or depressed, or a monster, or selfish...or a bitch when I haven't had sex with anyone ever. I also haven't turned to alcohol or drugs although I have no idea why! Well my family is crazy annoyed by me, my friends all secretly hate me because I am "sad" all the time and don't want to hang out with me. My family's solution is to throw stuff at me whenever they feel guilty. I picked up cooking to take my mind off stuff and try and help not be so "selfish" because both my parents work but my mum pitched a fit when I made pork chops one night and chicken another because she had something else in mind. It is also always about me even though I am not even eating meat?? &amp;nbsp;She gets mad when I don't talk, and when I do talk she got mad at me because I said something that didn't pertain to the conversation. She gets mad when I don't do horse chores in the morning and gets mad when I do because it's her "alone time". She is angry that I don't have a job when I've been applying but continues to pay for a car/gas/insurance when I've asked her to stop because it is unnecessary when I don't have a job. She gets mad when I stay in the house and gets mad when I leave. I can't do anything right ever. I don't even know anymore...I just don't know. Mostly I think I am exhausted. I wish feelings had an on and off button. That would be nice. And I just want a friend. [info] None [info] 1424048377
woot555 [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and OCD. I read *The Bell Jar* so I can convince myself that educated and valuable people too (Sylvia Plath) can be depressed and apathetic.I've tried many games, I can't stand them. [info] None [info] 1495829826
bubble_gum272 [info] Last year I wasn't feeling like myself. I couldn't see it but others could. I was apathetic, unable to sleep, and depressed. My mother made me see my family doctor and within 2 days of seeing my family doctor I had an appointment to see a psychiatrist. That appoitment lasted 3 hours and I was diagnosed with depression that day. I saw my psychiatrist every 2 weeks for 3 months and then once a month after that. Each appoitment lasted an hour. I'm glad to say that I'm doing much better now and am back to my old self.The Canadian healthcare system works when you need it too. My doctors were concerned about me and made sure that I got the help I needed and that I got it fast. I was amazed that I was able to see a specialist within 2 days of seeing my family doctor. That specialist made sure he had the time to see me and that he was there for me the whole time. I'm from Ontario. [info] None [info] 1506781828
stame11 [info] How do you live? Here’s a little info before I begin. I’m 22, I’m constantly depressed and just want to die. I’ve been depressed and suicidal for as long as I can remember. When I started my teenage years I turned to drugs and they made me feel so much better about everything. I’ve been sober for 2 years in a couple of weeks. But it feels like ever since I got sober everything got worse for me. I constantly hear voices telling me to kill myself and that I’m not worth anything. I constantly feel like crying but I have no clue where it comes from. I feel like this life is just torture. I grew up in a religious family besides my mom. I got bullied until I was in 6th grade, which is when I started fighting back and doing drugs. If there is a God then what is this world were in. Satan just sounds more of the person that helps you but with anyone that helps there is always an catch. I’ve tried to commit suicide but it doesn’t work for me. I tried to pop pills but I woke up the next morning basically a walking overdose. I lost my hearing and partial vision. And I went to school but my counselor noticed me and put me into the psych ward. Why can’t there just be a way to end it all with a snap of a finger. I’m just so confused in life. I feel like shit everyday. My chest is constantly tight. I’m always on edge just wanting to hurt someone(no one in particular just an odd feeling of happiness to see someone else in pain) or just take my own life. I was diagnosed with depression and schizophrenia. Sometimes I wonder if I’m the normal one hearing voices. Like maybe the government doesn’t want us to hear them but if I say that they call me crazy and that I don’t know what I’m talking about. I might not but something just doesn’t feel right. Thank you for reading and letting me get this off my chest. [info] None [info] 1544404529
Love_Shaq_Baby [info] &gt;Countered with that and suicidal thoughts don't go away and suicide remains high post ops.When you put a depressed person on antidepressants, they are still more likely to kill themselves than the average person, even though the medication helps.&gt;The other person's right, though too simple, many teens have depression. Blocking their development is not a cure for depression.Really now? Because I've been diagnosed with depression and it has never made me want to get rid of my penis. Not once. [info] 90∆ [info] 1543756418
oziku [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 8. I was in a very bad state. It happens, but a lot of them are just looking for attention. [info] None [info] 1566632140
OutlawJoseyMeow [info] I'm definitely not stigmatizing mental illness. I've been diagnosed with depression so I'm not codenming those with mental health issues. Also, I said "angry...or wronged you feel", those aren't necessarily indicators of mental illness" The El Paso shooter posted a hate filled manifesto before going on his spree-he had unresolved issues.   I'm advocating for getting help before it's too late. [info] None [info] 1565962491
Walda_Hamish [info] I don't know if I would have boiled it down to "superior genes", but my N-mother felt the health of her children was reflective upon her success, or lack thereof, as a parent.She could never, ever wrap her head around the notion that even the best of parents have congenitally sick children, children with mental and/or developmental conditions, etc. These things were an embarrassment to her, a black mark on her image.Bad and trashy people had sick or mentally/physically/developmentally challenged children, not good people (according to her). She felt because she was the "perfect parent" (which she clearly was not), she should have perfect children. She was embarrassed that her children suffered from disorders and congenital illnesses because she felt she exuded perfection and someone as perfect as her could not have an imperfect child.Most of this was beyond her control, yet, I think that is one thing that literally destroyed her for most of her life as a parent, and probably as a person. This is one thing that caused her to come undone. She was devastated and disappointed when I was diagnosed with depression. Not because of her empathy towards me, or because she couldn't watch her child suffer, but because it ruined her reality of her being the perfect parent. Same happened when my sister was diagnosed with a congenital illness. She was embarrassed and shamed by this because she felt it meant she failed as the "perfect parent".Other things she didn't acknowledge...that she came from a family plagued with alcoholism, substance abuse, addictions, compulsive behaviors, mental illness, absenteeism, infidelity. Hell, she wouldn't even acknowledge when family members had cancer, hypertension, heart disease, even arthritis. When one of her family members got stricken with or died from such illnesses, she would say either nothing was wrong or they died "mysteriously" or there was "no proof" they had such illnesses.She would hunt me down and tell me to "never" tell anyone that Aunt [] or Cousin [] had cancer...or had a stroke...or whatever because the world would judge me and put shame upon me. Well, yeah, Aunt [] was clearly at least 150 pounds overweight, had spoken of suffering from hypertension...and Cousin [] was a known lifelong heavy smoker and drinker. How is this a surprise that they died from related illnesses?It wasn't until I became educated about narcissism that I realized how detached from reality my mother really was.And, like your dad, she prided herself in that she wasn't "messed up" like most other kids' parents, she would tell me to be thankful she wasn't one of those "immoral mothers" who had to work, who "didn't care" about their kids, and that her parenting skills were, hands-down, most superior compared to any other kid I knew. [info] None [info] 1519760660
detransama [info] I haven't been to therapy since I detransitioned but suspect I may have ADHD as well. Prior to transition but after coming out as trans I was diagnosed with depression and almost diagnosed with Asperger's (now ASD) but was a hair below the "cutoff" for clinically significant symptoms.  [info] None [info] 1547853736
MrsBadExample [info] SSRIs have saved my life, seriously.I was diagnosed with depression 5 years ago now, and they started me off with Wellbutrin, a fairly low dosage. It worked decently, and I felt a bit better, and had more energy. But it wore off pretty fast. I had an entire year where it wasn't working but I didn't understand, and I dragged back to suicidal thoughts and tendencies, and became a recluse in my own house.My doctor, who is pretty amazing, recognized the problems without me even saying anything to her and prescribed me Prozac. The adjustment period was extremely rough - I was very tired, I felt extremely flat and kind of "bleh" about a lot of stuff. But after being on it for over a year, I feel fairly normal besides being maybe a bit more tired than normal, and I don't want to kill myself every day. I still get depressed, however the suicide thoughts have almost completely ceased, which is *absolutely wonderful*. It's also helped immensely with my GAD, so I've been happy with it.Therapy also helps, but the medication is an insanely helpful tool. Being off of it is terrifying, and the backlash is literally frightening. [info] None [info] 1494328548
thegrimm54321 [info] I was diagnosed with depression in 5th grade; therapy helped me understand more things, but nothing has made me any less depressed.  [info] ♂ [info] 1484815129
the_chocolate_turtle [info] Not feeling like myself in this program...? This may be a post to get stuff off my chest, it's also a post for help. I think I need change, but maybe I'm crazy.I experienced the traumatic loss of a close friend at my undergrad university, and I've been diagnosed with depression, still grieving my loss. At the time, I had to decide where I was going for grad school (HORRIBLE timing), and I made a really bad decision. I had good reasons for the program, according to parents and friends, but I realized that had I been more mentally stable, hands-down I would have stayed at my undergrad for grad school. My undergrad would have given me a full ride, whereas now, I'm paying for my degree. But that's not all. I don't feel like me. I usually love working and love being busy, I thrive on high amounts of stress - this is not true anymore. Everything requires so much energy, energy that I don't have. I'm irritable and want to throw chairs across the room every single day. I am struggling to stay focused on course work and research. I see nothing positive about my research. I am going broke in this expensive area. I don't fit well in my department. I have no friends, I trust very few. I'm mourning the loss of my closest friend and mourning the loss of my Alma Mater. My guardian angel and my strong faith are the few things keeping me alive, but I don't have enough time to devote to these lifesavers in a way that I could help myself. I have felt this way for 6 months. I am getting help from 2 therapists, spiritual and secular. But it's not enough, I need change. I want to go home, reapply to my Alma Mater, where I would be a better fit, have financial security, and feel at home. Is this crazy talk? [info] None [info] 1431066627
Daaylight [info] I experienced the same thing when I was 20, Mood swing, sleeping all day, smoking huge amount of pot, spending the only times awake blazed (including work) and browsing memebase, reddit and all. I decided one morning to go see a specialist (after wrecking the appartment of my one night stand when I realise I sleep through my alarm clock. Fun thing we are a happily almost married couple right now, but that's another story). I've been diagnosed with depression, but still I was remaining pretty lazy, never doing the chores, spending my days off smoking cig and petting my bunny. 3 Weeks ago I've decided to go see a new doctor, he made me do the brown test (Or brawn?) and I discovered I was ADD but not hyperactive, I'm taking a certain form of adderall since then and FUCK MY LIFE IS GOOD. I'm waking up at 6 O'clock, can cook breakfast, sweep the floor daily, doing the laundry every week and I don't feel like a big piece of shit. I even lost 10 lbs. I'm walking a mile every day with my two dog and yeah I feel great. I know that if you are un the US it might be a little pricey to go over this medical process but it's worth it.  [info] None [info] 1372084000
friendlycoon [info] Dang, that sucks. I've been diagnosed with depressionin the past, so I can empathize with you. You said that hearing directly from God is probably indicative of mental illness. However, I don't think I've ever heard God directly like that. It's mostly through other people, or just feeling, I guess? Would you consider that a sign of mental illness too? [info] None [info] 1522285694
gimmeabreaklady [info] In fairness, I've been diagnosed with depression and never once came close to entertaining the remote possibility of suicide. Granted, I've never dealt with anything like the pressures Carrey has, just saying there's no 1:1 correlation. [info] None [info] 1426047602
jenneato [info] I’m 19 and only recently started being 100% honest with myself about no longer believing in the christian god. I think my deconversion process has taken place over the last several years, since I was diagnosed with depression and had to seriously reevaluate life... oh, and the incessant “pray the depression away” attitude from members of my old church really pushed me out the door. I’m gladly done with all the hypocrisy, homophobia, sexism, lack of empathy, blaming people for their illnesses, etc. !  [info] Ex-Protestant [info] 1548471662
ManTheWombat [info] I've been looking for somewhere to share my gratitude as well, guess this'll do.When I was a little younger, I was diagnosed with depression and it fucking sucked for a long long time. Since I was spending a lot of time in my room for a large portion of each day, one of my main sources of escape ended up being the Yogscast, who I discovered through the Survival Island series. They allowed me to laugh for a little part of my day and get away from school and all the other stuff going on in my life. Slowly, my depression evaporated because of a few aspects that made me actually happy, and watching and discovered the Yogscast was definitely one of them. So thanks, guys, for helping to pull me through a really tough part of my life. I'll always feel like a part of this dysfunctional, weird-ass family. [info] Duncan [info] 1441236398
SleepyIII [info] The reason I ask is this-- I was diagnosed with depression in 2001 and put on Effexor (before they came out with Effexor XR.) I was 20 at the time. I had never had any symptoms of narcolepsy or cataplexy, nor did I have a history of depression, but I had just gone through a fairly traumatic experience that resulted in the depression and what my doc considered a form of PTSD. When I would miss a pill, I would have withdrawal symptoms that came in the form of brain buzz. This brain buzz is identical to what happens right before I have a severe cataplexy attack, not the type that is triggered by emotional response and results in loss of muscle tension, but the type that comes in the form of instant onset of sleep paralysis. It is like a hot electrical wire being intermittently plugged directly into the top of my brain at 2 second intervals, then one second, then half a second, and so on until it is one solid buzz and I am completely paralyzed but still partially conscious. I don't think it is a coincidence that the same mechanism that is triggered in the brain that causes the buzz, and resulting sleep paralysis-- whatever that mechanism is-- is exactly the same. I believe that taking Effexor altered my brain in such a way that when I decided to go off of it-- or when I would miss a pill-- that mechanism was triggered. This is not to say that I did not have a genetic predisposition to have narcolepsy or cataplexy, of that I am not sure, but I am the only one in my family with it. But I do believe that taking Effexor was the catalyst for cataplexy symptoms to occur. [info] None [info] 1522043451
hwi_ [info] Thanks.Actually, I was diagnosed with depression and with possibility of ADHD. My psychiatrist set me on venlafaxin. It helps with energy, but not with focus.  [info] None [info] 1552688276
lilronhubbard [info] This is how I realized I had felt for years before I was diagnosed with depression. Try to get help before your motivation and happiness slips too far. [info] None [info] 1568262129
JefferyOHaire [info] Looking for information Almost 2 years ago I was put on antidepressants after my ex-wife and I lost a child to a miscarriage. I do not remember if I was diagnosed with depression, but I am getting copies of my records this week. Does this simply mean I cannot join the Navy? Thank you for your responses. [info] None [info] 1543169590
tamnan [info] I just had what I think was a productive conversation with my dad. I was diagnosed with depression a little less than a year ago. I only sought help (and got diagnosed) after failing out of an entire quarter in college. That’s four classes all at once I got F’s in. My dad started off very upset and pushing me to go straight back into school and get my life back on track. After I was diagnosed with depression, he got a little better because at least there was some reason beyond what he assumed was just me being lazy, but he still wasn’t understanding. He told me to just go back to school and try again, and just do my work this time around. Essentially the equivalent of the “have you tried just not being sad” argument. Hoo boy, did I not realize just how frustrating that actually was until it was happening to me. Shoutout to [r/wowthanksimcured](reddit.com/r/wowthanksimcured)Since then I’ve been seeing a therapist and working to build confidence in myself and my ability to complete tasks. I’ve also learned how to better catch my negative thoughts and analyze them to see if I’m being realistic or assuming the worst case scenario. I’ve learned how to better communicate with the people around me and tell them not just how I feel, but also how they are affecting how I feel. The deadline to apply for readmission to my college for the next quarter is coming up pretty soon and I’m planning on applying. I think once I step back into the classroom, I’ll be able to focus on schoolwork better than the quarter I failed out of. I’m more comfortable with myself and have gotten much better at kicking or controlling my bad habits. I have a solid support system of a few friends I’ve known for years - one of which just transferred into my college, so he’ll be nearby if I really need someone to go to. And he knows what’s been going on with me, so it wouldn’t be a shock to him. And I know me asking wouldn’t be a burden on him (something else I’ve learned to realize through therapy). Just about 30 minutes ago, I had a conversation with my dad about where I was in regards to going back to school. He was upset that I hadn’t submitted the readmission application yet and started to get on my back about it. He did not yell at me, though, which is something that I explained to him doesn’t help when communicating with me. Thank you therapy for teaching me how to approach that one. Really, therapy has been a huge help to me throughout this whole ordeal so far, and I’m still going. Regardless, back to the conversation with my dad. I explained to him that, while I get his focus on me getting back into school (he dropped out of college and is now struggling financially), him tunnel visioning on it makes it feel like all the littler improvements I have been making don’t mean anything to him. He admitted that he hasn’t really noticed these smaller things, which I then had to concede that since they were smaller (I stopped biting my nails, started sitting up straighter, am prioritizing small tasks better, am reading more instead of being online all the time, shorter showers), it makes some sense that he wouldn’t necessarily notice them, but that these are still important things to be doing that help me feel ready to tackle school again. The whole conversation felt a lot more productive since it didn’t turn into a yelling match between the two of us, and I didn’t end up crying myself to sleep. And by the end of it, I think we mostly came to an understanding - at least on some level. But those are smaller tasks, and school is a big one. And I think I’m ready, but I’m also still kinda scared that I’ll fail again. I brought this up with my therapist and he pointed out that I have a longer track record of academic success than I do of failure. That does help. This turned into a bit of a rant, but I felt like I kinda needed to get this off my chest and I’m already in bed, so I don’t have the notebook that I sometimes write this kinda stuff down in on me. If you’ve read through the whole thing, thank you. [info] None [info] 1550041903
Kpopkinz [info] Is it possible to have depression and narcolepsy So like i am diagnosed with depression and doctors have suspected it before but it just never went anywhere. [info] None [info] 1575354593
atk4uk [info] 200 days ago I was diagnosed with depression  [info] None [info] 1553995964
Tustiel [info] This is a massive summary so apologies if it doesn't quite make sense. I am in pretty much in the same situation with a few exceptions. I was diagnosed with depression last year having been un(der) employed for two years now. I can sit here, *know* what I need to do and then not do it. It's as annoying and frustrating for me as it is for my wife. I've pretty much stopped applying for jobs because I never get them (I know, stupid, right?), play XBox and occasionally do some work.While your husband is not a victim he's got a bit of a victim complex. As hard as it is for you right now he probably does need your help until he sees the light at the end of the tunnel.However, he is taking too much for granted. We got rid of cable years ago, haven't been out for a meal in ages and have seriously cut down on non-essentials like alcohol and expensive red meat. It is not unreasonable for you to do the same just don't make it vindictive. You can't stop buying cigars and steak but still buy flowers once a week, for example. Explain to him that you both can't afford the lifestyle you're living and so have to cut back. [info] None [info] 1348034908
W1ther3d [info] Listen alright I have had a crap day my father told my I'm a failure and a disspointemt I have been diagnosed with depression and I wanted to make a joke he came and stated being rude to me I apologize for the things I said to him [info] None [info] 1570720587
Dicksmash-McIroncock [info] Well I was 11 when I was diagnosed with depression. I had no friends and got made fun of relentlessly. I was cutting, attempted suicide and was told by my peers everyday to kill myself. This band gave me something to believe in. There was a reason I was still fighting to live. Slowly slowly, I found their words to be my shield. I was the only kid at my school that knew them (pre-TBP days) so I had this cult of vampires, murder and anger to stand behind. I listened to their songs about how they hated everyone, too. How society was awful but keep fighting. I eventually learned how to deal with myself and started making friends, but almost eight years later I still put on Three Cheers whenever I feel low. That album alone has talked me out of suicide so often.  [info] None [info] 1350275473
MickeyG42 [info] At my first base, maybe did months out of tech school, I was diagnosed with depression. Put me on meds and in therapy. 18 years later I am doing fine. Talk to someone. Get help. The resources are there and you'll be better off. [info] Veteran Egg Flipper [info] 1518026443
mairodia [info] I still have nightmares about my middle school bully, and in a way it makes me feel sort of good? Justified? Idk [Conflicted]**Background:**I was treated pretty horribly in middle school by an entire friend group (*supposed* friend group, I should say), but one girl in particular was very awful. She never said anything outright awful really but she would make sure to purposefully exclude me from things in front of others and would spread rumors about me and talk with the others in front of me about how horrible I was using a different name so I wouldn't know that they were talking about me... Actually now that I write it all out I guess she did do very awful things outright. Hahaha.Anyways, I tried to kill myself twice because of all the treatment I received from that friend group, I felt worthless and horrible. The school found out and I had to start going to therapy and I was diagnosed with depression, but I've never really felt like I... *deserved* to say I'm depressed, I suppose. It's been a long time since then and I've grown up and moved on a bit and generally am less depressed. I still am depressed most likely but I haven't seen a therapist in a few years now and I never took medication for it, and my symptoms aren't so bad that I feel like I can never get out of bed or do anything, so I feel like maybe I'm not *really* depressed, or at least not *that* depressed, and I often shove my mental issues aside and try to discount them because it's not like I'm currently being bullied right now.**The Present:**Even though my middle school bullying is done and over with, sometimes I still have nightmares about that girl who treated me so horribly. One moment that stuck with me in particular is her turning to me and telling me that "You know nobody likes you, right?" And sometimes she'll pop up in my dreams telling me that. A lot of the times I'll be having a perfectly normal and nice dream, hanging out with my friends and my SO, and all of a sudden, she'll appear and tell me that nobody likes me, that all of the people here are pretending to like me, that I'm a loser, that I'm a horrible person, etc etc etc...It's awful, obviously. And I wake up with my heart pounding feeling scared and alone and mostly feeling weak and helpless for still being traumatized by some shit that some dumb 13 year old said to me nearly a decade ago. But in a way, it's also a bit of a reassurance. As mentioned, I feel a lot like I don't really have mental problems or that my mental problems aren't really that big a deal. So these nightmares give me a bit of a feeling like, "Hey, yeah, your brain actually is pretty fucked up," which makes me feel not so horrible about the times when I feel depressed and like I want to be swallowed up by the floor and not exist anymore.It's probably not at all a healthy method of coping, hahaha. But I don't know. It's working. I guess.I feel like this is sort of stupid to post, but when I reread this to check for spelling errors it's making me shake and feel sick so I'm pretty sure I definitely have issues. I'm just in this weird limbo between feeling guilty that I have mental issues and feeling guilty that my mental issues aren't that bad. And the dreams/nightmares make me feel more justified in wherever the hell I am on that spectrum. [info] None [info] 1515627577
FatLute94 [info] Yeah man. I've been diagnosed with depression ("diagnosed" but I don't buy into a lot of mental disorder shit just because of how rampantly people are diagnosed and abuse diagnoses like that) for a few months now and in the past few times I've visited my therapist or psychiatrist I've realized that when we go back to the start of this increased state of depression I was in for a few months, it actually lines up with around the same time I felt that I wasn't getting as high or "having as much fun" at least.Hopefully that makes sense, basically I just discovered that at least for me, personally, my own depression wasn't really being helped a whole lot by smoking. Yes, it totally helped me just zen out and not think about things, but because of my "condition" (again, eugh, but not too sure how to refer to it) I still was exhibiting all the physical signs; not doing anything, not wanting to socialize, staying in my room. Thankfully today I'm doing better *and* have been trying to remedy my depression without medication and doing wonderfully. Again, I mean zero disrespect to those of you that do smoke to help alleviate certain things, it just didn't work out quite as well for myself. I think the best thing someone could do, though, is to see for yourself how you can handle it. Thanks for reading this all, guys, god bless :PP.S. - solidly 8/10 right now, this new nectar straw is great! [info] None [info] 1470024343
Nefeliasi [info] You are the best, thank you. I was diagnosed with depression, I see a doctor from time to time. [info] None [info] 1574792960
111fox111 [info] I keep having those terrible mood swings and almost getting to the point of suicidal. What should I do? So I'm stuck, I know it's normal for teenagers, I'm 16, to get sad, but I was diagnosed with depression. I did therapy for 8 years, and I'm on Zoloft. The last time I cut was around 8 months ago, but the urges keep getting stronger. What should I do? [info] None [info] 1506786461
DirtyDickDurbin [info] Being forced to feel worse I invited my friends over for D&amp;D. When a few showed up, my mom decided to throw a tantrum about how stupid, ungrateful, and lazy I am and for emphasis *spat in my face*. I screamed at her to leave me be, that she broke her promise not to interrupt me when we started the game, and she started calling me names. A friend stayed afterward for some Minecraft to cheer me up.One thing that (should) put a smile on my face-- and it's good I can recognize this-- is that my friends stayed despite the fact my mother decided I haven't been shamed enough in my lifetime.  On the downside, I can't stop feeling depressed about the same thing that's been going on for years; having to live with my abusive mother.I envy a friend of mine because his family is so strong-- and more than half of them aren't even blood related. They care about each other, and they support one another. I supported my friend through school but he had his family there as well giving him the biggest encouragements and 'singing his glories in the mead halls' so to speak.I can realize that some people have it worse. They have both parents who are mentally, emotionally, and/or physically abusive. I know some people starve and live through poverty. (My family lived through 10 years of poverty without aid from anyone). Untold people don't escape from that life.My mother is no different. She's intolerant, she's abusive, she's abrasive, she's an instigator and a traitor; she's a crook, she's a liar, she's a glory hog, and she's not afraid to tell you why you should want to kill yourself. She doesn't care what you think because she believes that if you're not doing something her way, you're wrong. I learned that the hard way.An example: I took Geology in college and learned a great deal-- as much as you can learn from 101 and 102 and some additional supplements here and there. (I was an A student, after all). I was working on a D&amp;D campaign and she decided to take the opportunity to let me know I was stupid and a faggot (she seems to think I like men for some reason) for doing my sediments and minerals wrong. We did a back and forth about it, I showed her my stratification maps and sediment charts and did comparative overviews with real-world geological locales, she told me she saw it on *Jeopardy!* and reminded me that I'm stupid trash who no one loves. After I looked up online the last evidence against her, she did what she always does when she's wrong-- she stands there, huffing and puffing, and screams at you to fuck off.Many people have it worse and I have it no better than many. When I was diagnosed with depression, the first thing she did was blame me, then she blamed my dad, and finally she blamed my friends. She would hear nothing of herself or her daughters being in the wrong and was convinced the cop who delivered me home was being lied to by me. That's part of what upsets me though, the denial of responsibility and the depraved self-centered egotism.When I screwed up at work, I dipped my head, admitted my mistake to my manager, and apologized. We were good after that. She told me to buzz off and get back to work. (We *were* busy, after all) I can't apologize to mom because she won't apologize to me. I asked (read:*demanded*) for an apology when she beaned me with glassware because she was mad I knew more about cats then her. What she told me was prolific."**Shut the fuck up *god dammit*! I don't owe you anything you piece of shit!**" Then she trashed my computer I worked all summer long to be able to afford. Because '[you] deserve it'.My family-- all family topics-- make me sensitive in general and upset me even when mentioned. (I can't *fathom* how I'll react if a girl asks to start a family with me) I'm almost 24 now and can barely function without spiraling deeper into depression because every step I take I have to take a few paces back... because I only receive pain and suffering from my family. There isn't a day that goes by that I don't think about violently killing myself. I wouldn't have to watch my friends and employers walk out on me anymore because of her and people like her. [info] None [info] 1370753738
NinaAmethyst [info] My experience. I was diagnosed with depression when I was around 16/17. Now I'm 20, nearly 21.At some point, when I fell in love I thought I'm really happy and that depression, self harm and other things won't come back.Now we are arguing, he misunderstood a thing and now he says to me that he doesnt know if he still loves me.He said he feels chained to me because he knows that if he will break with my I will commit suicide. That's true, yeah. Because he's the only thing I care about and that can make me happy.But the fact is that I want he's real love, not the fear that he could be responsable of my death.I'm crying all the time. I don't want to be this way, I want to be happy.I don't want to die but at the same time I think I don't have other choices. [info] None [info] 1525700396
roarImadinosaour [info] I don't get it I just don't get it. I used to do well in school- now I'm failing all my classes. I used to be able to laugh with friends- now all I can do is sit on my bed, staring out the window. If I had to guess where it all started, it would be my former best friend. I was really close to her. We did everything together. Then, all of a sudden, we were fighting and then we simply stopped talking to each other. She's just one person. Friends come and go. So why does the leaving of this one friend leave me broken? Ironically, at the start of summer, she and I were saying it was going to be the best summer ever. Then my parents divorced. And I started fighting with her. And then I was diagnosed with depression.It's almost funny, how it works. One second, you feel on top of the world. The next, you feel like you're holding the weight of the world on your shoulders. They make life sound so damn simple. Go to school, get a job, have a family. I used to see myself doing all that.Now I don't even know if I'll make it to my 20th birthday.I'm not wanting to die right now- but I do just want to fall asleep and never wake up again. I think the two are different. Most wouldn't say so. But I do. Because death is final. Never ending. And no one knows what happens after it. But sleep... sleep is wonderful. Again, people know hardly anything about it, but you can dream. And dreams, for me, are so much better than real life.That's why I want to sleep and never wake up.Sleeping isn't dieing.Let me sleep. [info] None [info] 1366853321
yourdefenselawyer [info] from the guy who made this "meme"&gt;I’m the guy in the picture. I have been diagnosed with depression. I made this meme to make light of a dark situation. Everyone handles it differently. It’s just a meme. Chill out and quit trying to make this a who is sadder competition.lmao dude you're the one who made this into a "who is sadder competition" by posted the meme in the first place ffs. I can't believe 70k people upvoted this garbage. [info] Dissenter [info] 1568395941
fuckinglonerRIP [info] Planned Future Hey, so I wanna talk a little about myself here, this seems to be the only place I can, though I may be wrong. I'm young, late teens (19), and I have my future planned out, as much a possible anyway. I was diagnosed with depression last year, but I feel it has been affecting me for much longer. I have no job, I only have a temporary home. This is one of the reasons in writing this I guess. I have no motivation, no aspirations for life. I've already ruined whatever small chances I had at living a normal, decent life. I have 'friends', people that come to me when they are upset, when they need someone to tell them everything's good, and to make them feel better, but none of them are willing to do the same for me, after being ignored in my times of need, I thought "why would anyone want to help me?" I am a drug user, although it used to be worse, and I was living on the streets for around half a year, maybe longer, I can't remember anymore. I was made homeless just 2 years prior to writing this. That in itself is something that makes me upset, just thinking about how my parents don't want anything to do with me, how they would have rather seen me in that helpless position than just talk to me, to send me to a therapist, anything would have sufficed. It breaks me, knowing that I'm truly alone. Countless hours have been spent, sat alone in my small, pathetic excuse of a room, thinking about what I should do to repay them. I tried to kill myself multiple times last year, and luckily I have kept myself busy, tried to keep my mind busy, for the better part of 2018. But alas, I think I was wrong to back out. I was 'saved' by a 'miracle' on my last attempt. The wind had pushed something underneath me, allowing me to stand on something to ease the rope around my neck. Just enough to allow me to reach back into my bedroom and grab a knife to cut said rope. I truly felt alive that moment. And it's with a heavy heart I say this, you cannot save everyone. Some people are my cut out for life. Some people truly have nothing to live for. After losing a close friend recently, I have come to the conclusion that the only way I can make people happy, the only way I can make people glad to have known me is to remove myself from their lives, to quit being a burden on them, to stop negatively influencing their lives. I don't know the rules of this subreddit much, I have never posted here before, nor have I visited it much. But sometimes planning what little future may be left is the correct decision. Is it wrong to be accepting of my inevitable suicide? I plan on killing myself on my 21st birthday. I don't want any sympathy, nor do I want to be referred to suicide watch, it's a decision I've been struggling to make for a long time now, since the early teens. I don't want to be told not to do it either, I have my reasons, please accept them. Is it wrong? Is it strange to be forgiving of myself and to let my dreams come true for once? I am truly alone in this world, so why should I keep on residing here? I'm not religious, so I don't believe in an afterlife. But surely the empty nothingness of what comes after is better than this. Constant reminders that I am nothing, that I will never amount to nothing. I don't want to share this with anyone irl, and maybe I'm not allowed to share this here, but sometimes you gotta let it out ya know? This post is unstructured and scattered, I'm sorry. I wrote the title thinking I would give the post some sort of template. But again, I couldn't do what I set out to. Seems like a reoccurring theme.Everyday I try to listen to music to distract me from my own head, but tonight I've had enough, I haven't been out in public for around a month now, and I feel like I'm deteriorating already. Just decomposing slowly in my room. Maybe it's better to do that in the ground, to give up my space in this household. I will attempt to be an active member of this subreddit for the next 2 years, my only wish is to show others the support I was never offered. To those of you suffering, keep your chin up. It's a hard life, but I'm sure you guys can keep pushing forward. Thank you for reading this, it's all I wanted, for someone to give me the time of day, to let me express myself without being 'weirded' out by me and forgetting about my struggle. I love you all, have a great evening. - /u/fuckinglonerRIP [info] None [info] 1541643929
ianratman [info] what the fuck is up with me okay so I paint I guess? And I've been in my room for a whole week without really doing anything. Then today I had to draw something because I got inspired out of nowhere and I drew 5 digital pieces on my drawing tablet real quick but then my nose started bleeding. I didn't have a tissue, but I did have an almost empty cup of water next to my bed, so i just kinda let it drip in there til it stopped. Because I didn't want to get out of bed. Then I did anyway because, hey, god or the force of the universe or whatever has given me free paint (dumb-assery starts about here)! I started painting with the noseblood/water, but I didn't like the red because it was too diluted, so without really thinking I snipped a cut into my arm with a pair of scissors I had on my table. Mind you, I don't self harm by cutting. There wasn't enough blood to deepen the color as much as I wanted and then I??? took a sip???? What the fuck? Now I'm just sitting here with noseblood in my paintbrushes and throat and I'm not sure how the hell to process this lmao.I'm not trying to pull a WebMD, but what the fuck? Am I just an idiot with one brain cell or is this something else? I'm diagnosed with depression, but depression doesn't usually make me into a gross fuck :/ [info] None [info] 1546633397
7thingsthathedetests [info] Thanks for the response. I'm diagnosed with depression and getting treatment but this certain symptom has gotten a lot worse. I was just curious if it was normal or maybe a sign of another issue. I can bring it up to my doctor when I meet with him in a few weeks. [info] None [info] 1511806971
kwarner93 [info] Hormonal birth control Hormonal birth control almost ruined my marriage. My husband and I have been together almost three years, married for two. After our daughter was born I went on “the pill.”It was a gradual change but we began fighting. A lot. I was mad and sad and depressed all of the time. No motivation to do anything. I began to pick apart every little thing my husband did. He finally demanded I seek help &amp; I was diagnosed with depression &amp; PMDD.My doctor suggested I go off of my birth control for a little while as the synthetic hormones in the pill adversely effect over 50% of women on it. My husband agreed.I’ve been off of hormonal birth control for two months now. I haven’t felt this happy in ages. It’s like a fog has cleared in my brain. My sex drive is back, I’m motivated, I don’t pick fights anymore. I can see how I was spiraling, when I couldn’t see it before. TL;DR Never going back to hormonal birth control. [info] None [info] 1543288813
juice9555 [info] That's one thing I've always feared about the antigun lobby. "We can't let people with mental disorders have guns." I've been diagnosed with aspergers or at least that's what my mom told me, but I do know I was diagnosed with depression. I've dealt with bullying and still kinda deal with it, sometimes the things people say  make me wanna grab a rock and knock them out because I don't really know how to talk smack right back. In the end though, I don't think people understand people who have mental disorders and all I can say for myself is leave me alone, I don't want to hurt anyone [info] None [info] 1556968650
wolfhunter2828 [info] I definitely know the feeling.  I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago, and my emotions definitely can be backwards with my physical reactions. It's really annoying. [info] None [info] 1322982652
youngest_wren [info] 1. To Kill a Mockingbird by Harper Lee—read this religiously in middle and high school. 2. Leaves of Grass by Walt Whitman. Some of the first real poetry that I read. I was amazed by how much Whitman loved the world. 3. The World According to Garp by John Irving. Such a strange and awesome novel, and one of the first great books I read on my own as an adult. 4. One Hundred Years of Solitude by Gabriel Garcia Marquez, for the same reason as above. 5. The Bell Jar by Sylvia Plath. It was really important to me when I was diagnosed with depression. 6. The Virgin Suicides by Jeffrey Eugenides. I thought the narrative style was so interesting and unsettling. 7. Wild by Cheryl Strayed. One of my all time favorite memoirs. 8. Hyperbole and a Half by Allie Brosh. I think this counts even though it started out as a blog. I’ve never read a funnier blog, and her posts about depression resonated so much with me. 9. The Son by Philipp Meyer. Anyone who has been even vaguely interested in Native American history should read this book. 10. The Poisonwood Bible by Barbara Kingsolver. Searing and haunting novel.  [info] None [info] 1529255877
trapped_ [info] Mood cycling? I was diagnosed with depression last year and I've been on celexa since then. It helped with my mood a lot at first but now I don't know. I feel okay in the mornings and then at some point in the day my mood just crashes - if I'm at home I'll just sit and cry or if I'm working I have to fight with myself not to. I get all the usual "what's the point in life, I'm never going to escape" sort of thoughts.The weird thing is that after an hour or so of this "crash" I feel fine/happy again and think positively about life etc. Is this normal? [info] None [info] 1295601718
plasticinaymanjar [info] I talked about this with my doctor when I was diagnosed with depression, and she told me that it was fine. First of all, make it clear you're not crying or upset because of them (unless you are, of course), and tell your baby sometimes people feel sad and cry, and it's ok... specially with boys, the "boys don't cry" speech and mentality is too common, even if you don't believe it yourself your son will hear it elsewhere eventually, so make sure you let him know people have emotions and it's normal and healthy to identify them, and sometimes it's ok to just cry without being judged...My son is 5, and whenever any of us is angry or sad, when we feel we're going to start crying or yelling, we sit together and hug in silence, until we feel better. Sometimes when I'm starting to lose my patience he'll tell me "mom, let's hug until you're not angry anymore", and it reaaaally helps me... in the same way, I can tell him to come hug me mid-tantrum and he'll stop and breathe in my arms... Emotions are real, we all have them, and it's healthy to let them out and let our kids know it's fine to feel things [info] mom to a 5 year-old  [info] 1535831760
pyperproblems [info] My dad has dad jokes -- he has a restaurant joke, a golf joke, etc. just depending on what we're doing, he'll pull one out. He has a joke about counselors, "if you can't get the help, get the degree!" I've probably heard him say it 100 times. When I was 16, I was diagnosed with depression and had to take medication. I also started really getting into my Psychology class in high school, and I wanted to do counseling. When I told my dad this, he pulled out his dad joke. I ended up getting a bachelor's degree in psychology, and always maintained that I didn't want to be a counselor. I never wanted to be that person my dad talked about. So I applied to 10 different PhD programs, all revolved around research, and I got a job working with autistic kids. The place I obtained my undergrad just opened a new clinical program a few years ago. I spoke frequently with the director, asking a lot of questions and telling him my dilemma. Right before graduation, he offered me a spot in the program, and I accepted. So now I'm enrolled in a masters program, intending to do clinical mental health counseling. I'm home for Father's Day, and last night some talk show host was giving people advice. I made the comment, "I hate when people without real degrees, who aren't qualified to do counseling, do it in a public forum and tell people what to do." He said, "even people with the degrees aren't good enough to fix people. If they were, they wouldn't make any money so they have to keep people screwed up." My mom says he "doesn't know what he's saying." IDK I think that's bullshit. I've tried to chalk it all up to him being a traditional conservative dude but it's definitely affected our relationship, unbeknownst to him.  [info] None [info] 1497794357
QueefMayonnaise [info] I was diagnosed with depression about 5 years ago and I still have it, never in those earlier years have I felt this way. [info] Dolphins [info] 1571511022
OBSDEC [info] PSA on depression. PSA: if you have depression, seeing a doctor should be your number one priority. Number. One. See your doctor regularly, too.Backstory: I was diagnosed with depression many years ago. Got on meds, saw my doc regularly to check up, and all has been good since.My work life has gotten super hectic lately. I figured that was why I hadn't been sleeping well, and why my spiritual life seemed so...empty. Like I was going through the motions. This feeling is not unusual for a Christian, so I did my usual and made sure I was extra-disciplined in my prayers. I also haven't seen my doctor in awhile, because my schedule is ridiculous.I am taking a weekend-long class soon, so I was getting together my medications to pack. While looking at the dosages, I noticed that with the brand-switching on my antidepressants, I had started taking only half my usual dose. For at least three months, and perhaps longer.Of *course* I can't sleep well! Of *course* my relationship with God feels different. If I'd kept my doctor appointments, this probably would have been found out long before now.Depression affects your relationship with all facets of reality, including your spiritual reality. God can slap down a miracle right in front of you, and you might be totally blind to it. At its worst, you can feel like everyone and everything has abandoned you, when it is *not true.*Sorry for the ramble. I just see people post about depression in here often, and while I am always happy to pray for someone's well-being, depression is an illness, and like any illness, it requires a doctor's intervention.Please, from someone who went from the verge of suicide to living a pretty decent life, God calls people to the medical profession for a reason. Please see them. [info] Episcopalian (Anglican) [info] 1569557171
adaurable [info] [Personal] My Skin is Making Me Extremely Depressed, Advice Appreciated. I'm really sorry for the long rant up ahead but please bear with me, I'm just really needing any form of advice or encouragement at the moment because I'm really at a loss about what to do next.&amp;#x200B;So about two years ago I was going through a rough period of my life and I was diagnosed with depression during that time.  The first year, I was so out of it that I just stopped caring and I'd completely stopped washing my face or taking care of my skin at all.  I would only shower twice a week at most usually, and during showers I would just rinse my face with water, so I wasn't washing my face enough or properly at all.  I didn't use sunscreen when I went out either, overall I just made so many bad choices and completely ruined my skin.  I went from having minimal acne on my forehead, to having acne on my cheeks, to having acne all over my face, all over my shoulders and upper back, on my chest, and on my neck as well.  Over the course of two years, my lack of self-care is now reflected in the fact that my skin sucks and I am covered in acne.  I have so much acne now that I don't even feel frustrated anymore, just hopelessly distraught.  It isn't even just my face, but my back and shoulders and chest.  I have to avoid wearing low-cut tops and shoulder-exposing tops because the acne in those areas.  My acne is not cystic, but there is so much of it all over these parts of my body, and it is very, very persistent.  As soon as some of my acne gets better, more comes along.  I am covered in acne scars and pimples and sometimes I wish I could just rip my skin off and have a new layer of skin grow back, like my hair.&amp;#x200B;However, acne isn't the only skin problem that arose over the past two years.  The skin on my face is hypersensitive, meaning that it's extremely sensitive to the extent that anything I use on my skin hurts a little bit or tingles. Yes, even Cerave's Hydrating Cleanser can make my skin sting a bit when I'm washing my face, and supposedly it's one of the most mild cleansers out there.  Anyways, my skin is also very, very dry.  I live in Washington State, which is a temperate rainforest climate, so a dry climate is definitely not the issue here. My skin is so extremely dry that any foundation I use clings to my acne spots and dries out completely in a very short amount of time.  I use an expensive foundation that is supposed to have a dewy finish, finish it off with a dewy setting spray, yet in less than an hour, the foundation will completely dry out on my skin.  It'll end up looking super cakey, dry, and overall horrid.  My acne ends up getting exposed after the foundation dries out.  It is the absolute worst feeling and my skin feels as if I have smothered dirt all over it instead of foundation.  The dry foundation on my skin feels so unclean and like powder on my skin because it's so dry.&amp;#x200B;Going on, I've been seeing a dermatologist about my skin issues for the past two years, and he's prescribed me Spironolactone + Birth Control Pills (tried several different brands as well) and topical solutions like Benzoyl Peroxide.  He has also tried prescribing me several different types of antibiotics, but I had an allergic reaction to one of them and my body doesn't tolerate antibiotics well at all, so we stopped trying them.  I did ask for Accutane, as it worked for my sister who had some very persistent acne in her late 20s that wasn't going away (although the severity was nowhere near as bad as mine), but my dermatologist refused at first as he said that my skin already very dry and that Accutane would make the dryness much worse. I decided to find alternative solutions and I found this subreddit about a few weeks ago.  At first I went through plenty of posts trying to figure out some good products to try for my skin.  I started out with Cerave's Foaming Cleanser, but it was too drying so I switched to the Hydrating Cleanser and used Cerave AM and Cerave in the tub for my AM and PM routines, respectively.  None of it felt like it was absorbing into my skin, everything just felt like it was sitting on my skin, rather than being absorbed into it.  I got some products that were relatively popular on r/AsianBeauty as well, hoping that adding some extra steps to my routine would help with the dryness of my skin.  Same issue, none of the stuff felt like it was absorbing properly.  No serums, essence, emulsions, or creams felt like they were absorbing properly, and my skin always felt sticky or had a film of product left behind on it.  I found a thread where someone had the same issue with products not absorbing, and people suggested they use a hydrating toner to help absorb products better, which I tried, but even the toner seems to sit on my skin and not absorb.  I've tried so many other things as well.  For about a month now, I've switched to a very healthy diet where I've cut out dairy entirely.  I don't eat any fast foods, junk foods (like chips, pizza, microwavable instant meals), or soft drinks/soda.  I eat lots of fruits and vegetables throughout the day and only drink water and tea.  I try to wash my sheets, pillowcases. and blankets once a week with a fragrance-free laundry detergent. I got the ventilation in our home cleaned. I have done so much to try and help my skin, both internally and externally, but none of it seems to work.  My only hope right now is a proper skincare routine, which I just started about a week ago, but the fact that none of the products seem to absorb and my skin is still dry as ever is really getting me down. &amp;#x200B;As stupid as it sounds, my skin makes me cry some days and I feel so ugly and defeated, not to mention hopeless.  I really, really just want to give up on trying to make it better at times. I just feel like I'm at the end of my line and that there's nothing else I can try -except for Accutane- but I want to avoid drying out my skin even more if possible.  My skin feels so unclean and dirty all the time, especially when I have makeup on because it becomes all cakey and disgusting-looking.  I really just don't know what to do anymore. Is there anything else I can try?  Should I keep going with my skincare routine and see if it works, despite all the other failures I've encountered trying to make my skin better?  Is my skin just a lost cause? I feel as if my skin is really affecting my mood tremendously, as I've never felt so ugly and insecure in my life.  It's affecting my daily life to me just actively trying to avoid going out, even if it's for groceries.  I find myself more nervous than ever talking to other people throughout my day as I'm afraid they're going to notice how gross my foundation looks, or all the pimples that my makeup can't cover up. &amp;#x200B;If you've read all of this up to this point, I'm grateful that you've stayed this long to hear me out. I would love to hear if you guys have any advice to offer, or any solutions that I can still try that might bring me hope for a resolution to my skin problems, because I'm really desperate at the moment.  Thank you guys so much in advance. [info] None [info] 1554378681
crustybagells [info] This shit isn't normal. This is going to be long, but I really need this.This happened in 2018 on Christmas day. It was late at night and we had finished opening our presents. My dad was asking when the grading period was ending and what my grades were. I told him I had three B's while the rest were A's (I raised one B up to an A later on). He then said "Do you have any excuses for your grades?" I replied with a no and he said "I bet you would find an excuse." He continued his rant saying things like  “What? So you need tutoring,”  “I don’t know how you could be in 10th grade and be making those grades,” “You’re a disappointment,” “You have money, you don’t have a job, so there is no excuse,” “If your brother can get an A so can you,” “Look at what you did to your hair and other girls would kill to have that hair.” I had cut my hair over the summer because of a breakdown. I wanted to see myself in the mirror for once. (He had given me the silent treatment for over a month but I'm not going to get into that mess)My mom watched as he continued yelling harsh words at me, degrading me. I had told her before that I didn't like the way he would yell at me and she said, at the time, "Then you should tell him how you feel." Apparently this all of a sudden didn't align with her thinking now and took his side telling me I needed to do better. She then blamed the phone as if it had anything to do with the situation (and it has parental controls on it anyway so it doesn't make much sense). She even said that I had been downloading a lot of games on my phone and when I told her that I wasn't able to delete apps I didn't need because of the parental controls she replied with, "Well, that's not the point."Fast forward to the next day my mom calls me into her room to have one of those "talks." She complained to me about how my sister was doing better than me (she's in 6th grade) and why couldn't I be doing the same. She said that it was not fair that my dad was stressing out about me and getting angry because of me.Now before I get into this next bit, over the summer of 2018 I was diagnosed with depression by a doctor. Before the diagnosis I had to fill out a form about it. My mom was slouching over me the entire time, looking at the answers I put down. Then she said in a criticizing tone, "You're back into this depression thing again?!" Later on she basically used my illness against me saying things like, "How come you don’t take care of yourself? Your sister takes care of herself why can’t you?? What? Are you depressed?" She complained about how I napped too much and said, "What? Are you depressed?" in this irritating tone. I tried telling her how I was feeling once and she looked very annoyed saying, "Make up your mind." She gaslighted me, telling me that she apparently asked if I was okay and if I wanted to hurt myself which she did not (it made me feel insane cause I know she didn't). Another time my dad yelled at me about grades she said "You shouldn’t be counseling other people when you yourself need therapy." My dad replied with, "He doesn't need therapy. It's an inferiority complex." It's funny she said that because she had NO intentions of getting me therapy anyway.Back to the argument I was yelling and crying at her, trying to tell her I didn't like their attitude and the way they were treating me. Somehow it got onto the topic of my illness and she said:  “If you want to kill yourself right now then get an Uber tell them your mother and father don’t care and tell the people at the hospital that you need to be put in a psychiatric ward,” “I’ve seen people who are depressed and you are not depressed,” “You are doing it for attention,” “You are manipulating me into getting what you want,” “If you're so depressed then go kill yourself!,” “I’m not playing this game with you,” “If you were depressed there would be nothing stopping you from killing yourself.” (She's a nurse by the way)I left the room and heard my mom and dad laughing at me outside. I told her I was sorry, just to see her reaction when she thought that she was right. She went back outside, laughing after me with my dad. She came back in and said I was a manipulator. My dad had came back inside, giving me a hug.Then afterwards, we went to the movies.That's when I realized that this shit. This shit that I've had to deal with was NOT normal. After they verbally abused me they went on to pretend nothing had happened and their toxicity had disappeared. This shit isn't normal. It's funny how I thought it was...&amp;#x200B;Edit: I just wanna thank all of you for commenting it has really helped me. I'll try to encourage myself to do the things you've said even though I'm scared shitless but it's something I need to do. I can't give into the fear. Thank you from the bottom of my heart &lt;33&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1552343541
NewBelieve [info] In a similar situation, consultation regarding scheduling of the sleep study is in 17 days, worried I won't have it.  I've been fatigued almost my entire life, originally I was diagnosed with depression, but even in times of my life where it had faded temporarily I still have been so damn fatigued.  I remember being much more energetic when I was younger, around ~7, maybe all kids are like that. I hope I'll be able to have an ounce of that energy again.The issue is that after losing weight I no longer snore, even if it isn't necessary for sleep apnea.  Each day I get more and more stressed about this, I've been trying to get a consultation for around 3 months and now that it's coming up soon it's just a waiting game.  I'm 17 at the moment, 140 pounds, male, healthy on blood tests as well. Studying for the career I want to pursue has been hard, I have such intense brain fog that absorbing information is difficult and frustrating. Have you had this issue as well?  It takes me about 3 hours to consume the material it would take a normal person 1 hour (from anecdotal experiences). Surprised my GPA close to 4 considering how hard it's been.  My diet is fine, and others have recommended exercising, which I took up, even after a month of running every day there had not been much change in energy levels. I don't fall asleep randomly like most people with sleep apnea (from what I've read). I'm just insanely ~~tired~~ fatigued  and if I have the opportunity to sleep during class and such, I always will.  It's frustrating really, I wake up with a really fast beating heart, lasting for around 20 minutes+ and I'm always extremely thirsty regardless of the nap/sleep length. I expect it to be UARS.I read your follow up post, and I wish you luck in that your case will be resolved. [info] None [info] 1573959298
UrbanMonkeyWarfare [info] Personally, I think the biggest problem is that the only one who can truly "diagnose" and understand the individual form of depression in a patient is the patient himself. The "outside-perspective" of this illness is not sufficient for an accurate diagnosis but too few patients understand themselves and take charge of their mental health.Doctors first choice always seems to be SSRIs, although they only treat a specific kind of depression and can cause a lot of harm if applied wrongly.I'm diagnosed with depression myself, but as a very self-reflecting person who is interested in psychology, the workings of my own brain and their effects on my perception, I probably have a far better understanding of the situation than most patients - and possibly doctors who never experienced the inner view of depression. They are essentially guessing.I knew from the beginnings that SSRIs would not help be, but that I needed a DNRI. Still, the doctor wanted to test a SSRI first, and so we did. It made my symptoms worse (not feeling any emotions mostly), so I canceled the treatment ASAP. Now I got a DNRI prescribed, am doing much better and have a new perspective on life.If I would not have taken the direction of my treatment into my own hands, I doubt my treatment would have gone well. [info] None [info] 1471969685
TheSpaceNewt [info] I was diagnosed with depression about one week ago. [info] None [info] 1519688539
Khazar_Dictionary [info] Unemployment is soulcrushing I've been unemployed for a while now, graduated in a master's degree, sent tons and tons of CVs and I barely get any answer back. I can't even get work as a waiter or doing dishes. I feel crushed. Today I wasn't able to get out of the bed. When I meet my friends they are all very well employed and full of plans and I keep saying "yeah, when we get stable...when we get a fixed income..." I feel like a failure repeating this Everytime, for almost a year now. I was diagnosed with depression for about two years and I thought this was getting behind me. I even quit my medicine (following my doctors advice). I'm feeling like everything is coming back though. I don't want to go through all I went again. [info] None [info] 1538403470
Saratonein [info] &gt;I was diagnosed with depressionLMFAO I'm laughing so hard I woke up my neighbors! [info] None [info] 1483948775
mmicoandthegirl [info] It's like it's all just gray, nothing is nothing anymore. When I was diagnosed with depression, I couldn't feel nothing but this gut wrenching feeling. I hadn't felt anything in a while and as I felt that feeling I was happy until I realized it wasn't a good or a normal feeling. Then I just got that I was depressed. Cried on the floor for 8 hours and went to hospital.  [info] None [info] 1397421113
greaseyspoonbob [info] When I first went to the dr about my mental health I was diagnosed with depression and put on an SSRI and it put me into a manic psychosis.I've only recently gone back on one (2 months ago) and this time I've avoided the mania, probably as a result of the mood stabilisation of the lithium.It took about a month to get the dose right and then a couple weeks for the dose to have the effect bit the last couple of weeks I've felt better than I have in years. Obviously it's too early to say whether this will last but so far I seem to be managing both mania and depression really well. [info] None [info] 1567909470
WryLeo [info] I was diagnosed with depression in college, and spent some time with a therapist, but it’s been years since I’ve been to one. After the last few months I’ve been through, I’m too exhausted to try and search. I’ve been experimenting with different boosts for my shakes, but I know I can do much better. The prices are so expensive, so I’m hesitant to try a bunch unless I do research first. I’ve been enjoying bananas in my diet again, and maaaaaan are peanut/almond butter and banana smoothies the greatest. I really appreciate your advice, and it really helps just being heard ❤️ [info] None [info] 1551484622
dfalcone [info] Well Reddit, I finally came out to my mom as an atheist this last week, and her response has me worried for the future of our relationship. Anyone have some advice for how to deal with my strictly-Catholic Italian mother? I'm a 20-year-old female, and I'd been struggling with my faith since I was diagnosed with depression my sophomore year of high school. I tried very hard to push myself back into the religion, to learn to love God again, if I could. The last five years have been hell in terms of deciding where I stand when it comes to a higher power, but my surroundings have really helped me decide what I think is the truth (for instance, this website; I also go to U of Wisconsin, extremely liberal). I have five siblings, only one of whom is an outspoken atheist, four of which just kind of go along with whatever my mom says, and an older sister who is the definition of a Bible beater.For clarification, I waited a long time to tell my mom because she has numerous sources of stress in her life: My dad has diabetes, my mom has multiple sclerosis, four of my five siblings have a Cystic Fibrosis (a chronic lung disease)--of those with the lung disease, one is an alcoholic, and one's liver is failing. I didn't feel like being so selfish as to pile on my atheism to a woman whose only hope left in her life is her belief in God. I reached the point, however, where I realized it is actually selfish of her to judge me for losing my faith--something I did NOT choose.Did I mention I had to explain this to her in a well-worded facebook message because I'm studying abroad? Makes me feel like a giant pussy, but it honestly couldn't wait any longer. This way, too, I feel like she can get her initial reaction out without me having to watch her cry about it and beg me not to think like this.TL;DR My mom has a fuck ton of stress in her life, and the only thing she feels supported by is her belief in God. Her response to my atheism so far is that she's been "praying for guidance and strength." My main fear is that she won't love me like a mother should anymore. Advice? [info] None [info] 1350899571
MDWerk [info] Reddit- I'll be going on antidepressants soon. Can you share your experiences? So, I've been diagnosed with depression, and it appears that medication would be the best course of action for my particular malady. Since I'm positive a lot of you have experience with them, would you mind sharing? I'm a little nervous about this.Some basic things-What medication were you on?Did it help or hurt?What was your behavior like before and after?What side effects did you experience?Thanks, sorry if this is a repeat question.EDIT- To address some questions, I've been afflicted with depression for as long as I can remember. My depression isn't environmental. In even the best situations, I find myself descending into hopeless bleak despair. [info] None [info] 1258492440
Zernos [info] Isolation Recently, I have been wanting to isolate myself from people. I feel like if I talk to people, my opinion won't matter. I try to make friends but they all end up hating me for some reason or thinking I'm a creep for no reason at all. I have had enough, and I just want to isolate myself. I just don't really like life in general and don't really care anymore about socialization and all that unnecessary stuff. I have been hurt too much to point where I just don't see goodness or benefits in this so-called "Socialization". I just think that I would be better off not talking to people. Of course, if I am in a job area I will, but out of that, I won't. One more thing, I haven't had a girlfriend in 3 years because I just gave up on that too. I have been diagnosed with depression and that is probably a part of this. This depression causes me to get away from people. I don't really like myself because I have pushed people away and I have been hurt so much to the point where I don't want to make contact with any human being ever again. I just have so many regrets and I really, like I mean...really hate myself and this so-called "special" life that was given to me. I honestly hate God for making me this way. How would a loving God make me this way? I don't see no light at all at the end of the tunnel. I have never attempted suicide because I am too scared, so I am just patiently waiting on death to come. [info] None [info] 1539394996
CaptainHoof [info] I think it is, partly,Does depression take your thoughts away? I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago, it was a slap to the face. I didn’t even know I was depressed, I thought I was just... neutral.I have tried many anti-depressants, and have not seen any long term results.I did cipralex, and after a month of use (you must take most anti-depressants for a month) it started working! It worked for two whole days, then it stopped working and my depression  came back. I gave up on it immediately.Tried several other prescriptions.Got any advice? Sorry for being needy, I’m just *very* sick of being unhappy. [info] None [info] 1516990204
samreturned [info] Just after first year of uni, I was diagnosed with depression the year after, I stopped being able to perform every day tasks. I was in and out of hospitals and prison cells. For obvious reasons, I lost my job and had to leave uni. I'd like to relive it, knowing my mistakes and making it better [info] None [info] 1550923001
Sexykangaroonurse [info] Should I say happy birthday? Have you guys ever felt for a short period of time that your depression was gone for good? Well sometimes I get that feeling. And for that split second in my life I can really smile and put an end to all my problems.  Today is one of my best friends birthday,  I basically grew up with him we knew each other since elementary. I shouldn't say happy birthday to him. I haven't talked to him in months.  When I was diagnosed with depression and had my suicide attempt he left out of my life ( or so I thought ) he saw my suicide attempt as a form of a mid life crises ( I was 18 at that time)  and the only real support I had in my life was my ex girlfriend. I really loved my ex girlfriend a lot she was the only person who would make me feel like there was something  to live for. We where together for almost 3 years and that was something really rare to be seen as a teenager. We really did love each other but my depression made me feel like a burden to her life. Scared of her falling out of love with me as well as breaking up with me, and feeling like a burden to her life I decided to break up with her. While we were broken up we would still hangout kiss and do boyfriend and girlfriend type of stuff. She would mention that my bestfriend would constantly message her. And after a few months passed by she told me he asked her out and she rejected him. Then after that I started to notice that my bestfriend would start to message me only when me and my ex and i would hang out.  I found out that he would say stuff like "I really feel bad for him and I really wish I could help him with his depression " to her,  and she would say that's so sweet of him...I started to feel like he was just using my depression to get closer to her. I never thought it would have worked or that he would go that low to use my depression as a tool to get closer to her.  After a few months passed I felt like my depression was going away and that me and my ex and I could be together and start a normal life. She rejected me,  I was really destroyed but I began to move on. I started seeing another girl( who has a boyfriend ) and it made my ex girlfriend really jealous. My ex started giving me more attention but when she found out that I had sex with the other girl she cut me off from her life for about a month . As cliché as it sounds I really liked my ex girlfriend,  not just as a lover but a bestfriend,  after all she was the only person who was supportive when I had my suicide attempt. We arranged to hangout before Christmas and that's when I find out that my ex girlfriend and my bestfriend had been kissing and going on dates. When I found out that they kissed my body turned pale and cold.  I felt so betrayed on both sides. Why him? He used me to get closer to you? Do you know how much of an ass he's been to me? All these questions would spiral out of my head. I felt like I stabbed in the back while I was already on the ground because of this stupid depression. Out of desperation I tried so hard to win over my ex,  it made me look so weak and desperate,  but I really didn't want to lose her. I would cry for nights,  then to add insult to injury my bestfriend would send me messages like "she was never truly happy with you... Ect" . I didn't realize that by trying to get her back I would appeare as desperate,  as well as needy... And soon the pieces of the puzzles  began to  click. She didn't have feelings for me anymore and the final piece of the puzzle was found when she chose him to be her Valentines . I decided to move on with my life after that, it's been hell. I feel like I will never be able to date again. I don't have a close friend anymore. I hardly text people or go out , I dropped out of all my classes this semester in college because I  just feel like  an emotional wreck, but today is my bestfriends birthday. The scum who I needed support from when I was at my weakest. The scum who was my bestfriend for 10 years.... the scum who I wish I was still bestfriends with. The scum who used my depression to get closer to my ex. I just don't know if I can text him happy birthday...  It hurts too much... [info] None [info] 1460293387
xoxo_gossipguuurl [info] I don’t know Hello. I don’t know where to start. So maybe a little background about me?I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago. Back then, I religiously went to my psychiatrist, I jumped from one meds to another to see what would work best for me, I tried my best not to self-harm. But last year, despite everything that I was trying to do to feel better, I tried to overdose. But yeah, unsuccessful. After my OD experience, I told myself that I wouldn’t do it again because I got really scared dun sa mga ginawa sakin to save me.I suddenly stopped taking my meds and seeing my psychiatrist after that incident. Ayaw na ng mom ko because my psychiatrist wouldn’t answer her phone nung nag-OD ako. Kabilin bilinan niya pa naman na once I try to do something, inform siya agad. That’s why my mom decided to stop everything and give me all the support system that I needed instead.I thought I was getting better with all the love and support that they’re giving me. Plus, I got into my dream job.But as time passes by, I can feel again that I’m starting to go back into that darkness and I’m becoming too moody. I try to mask it by cleaning and decluttering my stuff the whole day so that I’d get distracted, or I drink lots of alcohol with my friends and go home drunk, or impulsively buy anything even if I’m way overboard into my budget for the month, or I try to convince myself that my moodiness is just plain PMS even if kakatapos ko lang ng period ko.Ilang beses ko inulit ulit sa utak ko that I’m really okay. Kasi okay na ako diba?But I don’t know. Sometimes no matter how hard I try to convince myself that I’m okay or mask it, hindi pa rin talaga eh.Ang hirap pala.Right now, I just want to isolate myself from everyone because I feel like I’m becoming too toxic to myself and to all those around me.Yakap? Ang lungkot. [info] None [info] 1570537579
LordNez [info] Need help with life problems. It all started a few months ago. My friend and I played World of Warcraft and wound up in this guild. Long story short I met this girl in the guild. She was beautiful. She was married, or so I thought. I had played the game with her husband who seemed pretty cool. Turns out they weren't married just engaged. She and I became very close friends. So close she confided in me things like she wasn't happy with her fiancé. I told her one day I had feelings for her. She was flattered but she said she wasn't going to leave her fiancé without having a real reason to end the relationship. Time went by and we would hit on convos. About me trying to cope with my feelings for her. We had a convo like that Friday. She asked me if I needed space. I paused for like 15 minutes thinking I need to end this. I need to stop putting myself through this. I didn't of course. The next day I found out via Facebook that she got married. I was devastated. Such hurt has never washed over me. I felt betrayed and heartbroken all at the same time. I messaged her to congratulate her. Few days later (today) I messaged her saying I was happy for her and her fiancé, well husband now. Also that I needed some space from her. She replied with how she didn't know how to tell me. She didn't even tell her parents. Then she got snippy and said she didn't think it would affect me like this and that ok whatever take care and unfriended me. So, now I'm not just dealing with the fact of betrayal, but now the hurt of losing her as a friend. At this point I'm freaking out. I'm having a borderline panic attack and all I want to do is pace the floor. I do this when I have no control over a situation. As if somehow pacing back and forth like a mad man will give me control back. All the while in my head I'm playing the hurt back over and over. The loss of her over and over in my head. Right now all I want to do is message her back and say hah just kidding! Just so I can be with her in any way possible. I know this is not healthy. I need help. I start counseling next week. I'm going nuts right now. Anyone have any suggestions or tips? Also I'm diagnosed with depression and am currently on poraxetine (Zoloft).  Can anyone reach into this stupid darkness I've put myself in and get me out? [info] None [info] 1453784059
Mcheetah2 [info] I can never have what I've always wanted in life. What do I do? Okay. So I spent the whole entire summer depressed about something that I will never be able to physically change about myself. I didn't realize this was a truth about me until senior year in high school, so it's been between 5-10 years now and thus, I haven't had an entire lifetime to get used to it/adjust to it, yet. However, in "getting used to it," this also means I have to give up a pretty-much lifelong dream of mine and accept it will never be a reality.However, the problem is, I still can't shake the idea, the longing, the *desire* of chasing after it, even though my genetics limit this from ever happening. Other men like me often have no problem with it and live life around what they were born with/without or what health they have or even what they look like. But I can't "adapt" like them. As I said, I was diagnosed with depression because of this. The unfairness of it all often makes me furious!  I tried one Subreddit on here which I thought would help, but they seem pretty petty and cynical and jaded and are not much support. They often attack each other, rather than offer support.My brain and logic tells me to stop pursing this goal/dream of mine, but my heart/spirit truly cannot. What do you think I should do with this massive clash of internal interests? Help, please.(*If details would like to be known, I am willing to share a little, bit by bit.*) [info] None [info] 1412601583
Tenoshii [info] Standard self-pitying rant Dear Reddit,I've been feeling very Unwell this past week and I Just need somewhere to splurge my pathetic bullshit.I was diagnosed with depression just over two years ago. The catalyst was a very messy breakup that resulted in my ex attempting suicide twice. I have semi-regular nightmares about laying next to her lifeless corpse, I'm terrified of getting seriously involved with anyone in case it goes wrong and they end up dead. I've never improved someone's life by being with them and I don't want  damage anyone ever again. I'm just so fucking lonely.I'm not on any medication anymore, I can handle things on a day-to-day basis most of the time, I juist feel like putting some words down makes me feel less shit. [info] None [info] 1465126771
ashion101 [info] Oh believe me I feel you. Had a huge break down a few years ago when it all just hit me at once the dream I worked so hard for since I was a little kid, to be an animator, wasn't going to happen, let alone ever have a proper job or even go for my back up plan of getting my certification to be able to work with animals. All that involves activity and stress which makez things 10x worse  That was the closest I've ever come to suicidal thoughts since I was diagnosed with depression the year before.Had my moments in recent times of feeling useless and a failure as a wife and partner not being able to do anything to supplement our meager, unreliable income on top of general living assistance and just lumping around the unit for days at a time. Broken down in tears more than once in sheer, hair ripping frustration and rage directed at my fibro.Best thing that has happened to me of late was taking up advice on seeking cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) with a therapist specializing in depression, fibro and general pain management. Been going about 3 months now once a week and even though my health has gotten worse (add recently diagnosed of POT Syndrome &amp; Elher Danlos Syndrome on top of fibro, the other two exasperating the fibro effects), yet despite the double edged sword of 'yay I have a diagnosis and name for what's wrong' but 'no medications available and no cure' I can accept that now and do what I can to move forward, starting with very simple physio and not sink down into that pit of despair again.Honestly having CBT has helped immensely with understanding my own thought patterns, and recognize when I'm slipping into another bad mental loop driven by fibro and depression and how to stop it, and alternative meditation and relaxation techniques that genuinely help when meds are failing me or just having a particularly bad day/night.If you're up for it, look up CBT and maybe ask your doctor for a recommendation to a CBT therapist, emphasize that they need to specialize in fibromyalgia and possibly depression management.**TL;DR:** I feels ya and know/understand the frustration. Possibly consider looking into CBT for fibro/depression/pain management [info] None [info] 1457003975
beav1982 [info] Thanks for the support. I was diagnosed with depression and panic attacks however the therapist I started seeing feels like the attacks aren't behavioral and there might be a physical problem behind everything but so far nothing has been figured out. I've done a variety of stuff for work, training coordinator for Walmart, Service manager at FedEx, most recently moved to working at home doing closed captioning because of these issues that have gotten worse over the past 13 years.   [info] None [info] 1450807864
downfallndirtydeeds [info] That I was diagnosed with depression. Honestly my parents are two of the most selfless, loving and dedicated parents I've ever seen. I had the best childhood in the world. They'll blame themselves and that would be so unfair and wrong. Just thinking of a policeman turning up on my mum's doorstep has stopped me doing so many things.  [info] None [info] 1409478380
mazzaboo1 [info] For me I was diagnosed with depression at 21-22 then spent my 20s engaging in super risky behaviour super promiscuous drugs and was a party girl hard with bouts of depression in between. I wasn’t diagnosed till I was 30 and was in a shit controlling relationship that got me addicted to crack and when I went to the doctors they asked me about my history and referred me to a psychiatrist. All those fun party girl antics were manic behaviour but was mistaken for my drug use and being a slapper lol 😂 it all ended well kicked the arsehole to the curb went into rehab (4 years off crack as of yesterday) came out of rehab and go rediagnosed to make sure it wasn’t just the drugs making me cray cray 😜  [info] None [info] 1551492502
Upgrade30 [info] Extremely contradicting I’ve been told I was extremely handsome since middle school but now it seems no one is impressed by my looks and I’ve only had one girlfriend my entire life. I’ve been flirted with a few times but now I get nothing. Since I was diagnosed with depression I have gained some weight and now my confidence is lower that ever. I feel like girls is the only thing that’s keeping me alive and if they lose interest in me I’ll have nothing left to live for. [info] None [info] 1554906861
onedayitgetsbetter [info] Struggling to maintain friendships Hi, does anyone else have a hard time keeping up with friends?I live with 4 of my best friends that I've known for 10 years and my boyfriend. I was diagnosed with depression last year and I'm pretty sure it's low functioning, apart from that I still show up to work. Other than that, I just want to make sure people are happy and a lot of the time that manifests in keeping to myself and out of anyone's way. I hate conflict and my friends have had disagreements with my boyfriend. I stay a neutral party but do also tell my boyfriend where he has messed up. He means well but his actions can often be misinterpreted by my friends. Anyway, they don't really like my boyfriend and so it's caused a rift. They refuse to come into my area so any time I want to see them I HAVE to go into their spaces. This becomes so tiring to me because a lot of the time I just want to keep to myself. I hear the others have so much fun together and then when I try to join them I feel shut out. When I try see them I try to match their level of happy. They've told me I need to not sweep things under the rug and pretend like things are happy, and that I should always acknowledge when something is wrong. It's becoming so draining because I feel like I'm constantly messing up and draining them, keep to myself, hear them have a good time with each other, go back to them acknowledge that I've messed up somehow, only to have it feel like a huge task to catch up with them, feel excluded, feel like I'm draining them, - a vicious cycle. They tell me I just need to try. All I want to do is just go back to my own little bubble where I can't bother anyone. Then I hear feedback from them that I'm not doing enough as a friend and that I'm never there. I can't help but think that it's feeling really one sided that I always have to go to them to catch up. I get that they may be hurt by me and my boyfriend, but I just genuinely don't know what to do anymore. It feels like if I don't try, I fail, and if I do try, I fail. I just want to up and leave all together and get away from this shit show.This whole thing has also made me too anxious to reach out to other friends outside of my house, because I don't want the same thing to happen with them. When people message me, I ignore it for a few days because I'm scared of disappointing them somehow. But then I know that ignoring them is going to disappoint them. I just feel like I can't do anything right any more. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1585513600
Jmus792 [info] I'm not sure about your interests and skill set, but have you considered meeting with a temp agency? Temp positions can be easier to secure initially and a great way to get started at a company if you're looking for something outside of retail. To answer the "What job is good for someone with CD" question, I find that the more online/working remotely friendly jobs can be great. I work for a website, and while being in the office is ideal, I can still get my work done from home on days that I don't feel up to coming into the office. If you're able to score a full time desk job, the health insurance and disability benefits are a huge help. I know this disease can be quite literally shitty, but try not to let it get the best of you. I was diagnosed with depression five years ago after my worst flair left me feeling socially isolated, insecure and hopeless. I saw a therapist who gave me some good coping strategies. I cope by attending a local support group. It is so great to speak with people who better understand what I'm going through and have similar experiences. Yoga and meditation have helped to relax my mind and improve my stress-induced symptoms. Ultimately, I try to focus on what I can do instead of what I can't do (i.e. I don't feel good enough to run but I can take a walk, I can't work a physically demanding job but I have good computer skills) and play to my strengths. I hope that helps!  [info] C.D. Remicade [info] 1494950930
alhayes1023 [info] When I was 14, I dated a girl who was a rape victim. I knew the guy who did it, he was only a couple of months older than me. Nothing can compare to the trauma she must've gone through, but staying with her was definitely the hardest thing I'd done to that point. The entire beginning was just me trying to help her cope with what he had done. We didn't even hold hands until about 4 months, and I never kissed her. Eventually, I let her lean on me too much, and I was diagnosed with depression, and became addicted to pornography. She ended up leaving me for someone who was less depressed. After we broke up, I took it upon myself to personally talk to and want every girl who was thinking about dating him. I was a stupid kid, and should've done it. One day, he came by my house with a baseball bat and beat the shit out of my car. I felt bad about ruining his chances with those girls, and he had apologized to me and to my ex about the rape, so he doesn't know that I was watching him the entire time he was wrecking my car.  [info] None [info] 1483939257
Pragmaticom [info] It's been a struggle, but honestly now I can say I'm happy. It was rough at the end last year. I was working at a McDonald's which slowly fell into disrepair because of how ignorant the owner was, and the only thing that kept me there was my co-workers, and my then partner whom I also worked with. Later that Winter, I learned about how bad my best friend's abusive relationship was. She was horribly manipulative, and it went almost to the point of him committing suicide, but now I can gladly say he's out of that relationship and is doing markedly better. During this I was diagnosed with depression by my therapist, and when brought up to my PCP she prescribed me Zoloft, and at the time my head was so clouded with emotion that once the meds took full effect I thought I was fixed, I felt better, didn't want to die, and thought that I made it. I thought I was happy again.I was back to normal, is what I thought. Because what's the likely-hood of having two mental illnesses, right? I've already got one, so since that's fixed now my thoughts and actions must be those of 'normal' people. So if I'm normal now why do I wake up in the morning angry over literally nothing, as nothing had even happened that morning? Why did I want to cry for seemingly no reason? How come my brain still goes back to my ex's and I's last fight, focusing on what went wrong, and what did I do to make her lose interest in me? I found myself in the same spot I was before I started on depression meds. But this time I thought everyone felt like this, I must just be too sensitive, or too day-dreamy to get anything done.A few months ago my therapist diagnosed me with ADHD after doing the "Adult Test" or whatever it's called and scoring pretty high (At least it's one test that I can get a high grade on). After some consideration I told my parents about the diagnosis because It was getting to be too much for me to keep living in an endless cycle of pure unwarranted emotion, I was burnt out. It was a two month waiting period for me to meet my new psychologist, which is why I regret not taking action earlier. I started Ritalin last Monday, and it's like a huge weight has been lifted and I'm no longer being weighed down. I exercise every morning now, I enjoy sitting still, I read a book (hadn't finished one since 4th grade, I'm 18 now.), and I've drawn more in these past two days than the last 17 years of my life. I want to live again, and this is something I never thought I'd see for quite some time, and although it was terrifying to admit I had issues and get the required help, I am so glad to finally start working on living 'normally'.I still hate the fact that I can't tell a story without making it waaaaay too long, because God knows if I tried to go back and proof-read this I'd probably end up doing something else.TL;DR Last year sucked and I wanted to die, but after being diagnosed with ADHD and Depression, and being prescribed the proper meds, I like doing things and can function semi-normally now.Bonus Story: So I started typing this with the intent to ramp up to and tell this little tidbit of a funny, but ended up just writing my life's story... so ooops. Anyway, this is the story I \*meant\* to tell.I had been diagnosed with ADHD for a couple of days, and my best friend mentioned previously and I were driving around as we like to do some times just to get out of the house. I decided it was time to bring up my diagnosis while there was a lull in conversation. I turn to him and explain my situation and he replies, "Wait you didn't know? You've been like this your whole life I thought you would've realized by now." I start doing the half-angry-but-not-really sort of laugh-tone I use when we dicker about something obvious that I didn't realize before and say, "No I just thought I had a shitty brain and forgot stuff easily! Isn't everyone like that?" Apparently everyone else had noticed I had ADHD but me, it would've been nice for at least someone to tell me.Bonus TL;DR My best friend knew I had ADHD since I've known him, he never told me. [info] None [info] 1531762659
AT-ST [info] &gt; And I am curious what types of mental illnesses he had and what types of illnessesIt could be anything really.  He could have been diagnosed for depression or PTSD years ago and has since recovered.  He could have also been diagnosed bi-polar recently.  The term "History of mental illness" looks scary and is really a hot button issue.  But the truth of the matter is that there are plenty of mental illnesses that shouldn't prevent you from buying a firearm your entire life.For instance, I was diagnosed with depression in High School which was over 17 years ago.  This means I have "a history of mental illness."  Should that preclude me from buying a firearm?  No, I have since recovered from it and not currently taking any medications for depression.One of my best friends was diagnosed with PTSD back when it was the cool thing to diagnose every Veteran with.  He didn't think he really had PTSD so he got a second opinion and that doctor said he doesn't exhibit any signs of PTSD (which he didn't).  The doctor diagnosed him with PTSD simply because he had trouble sleeping, something he had been dealing with for years.  Even though a second doctor said he didn't have PTSD that original diagnosis still follows him around.  So he "has a history of mental illness."So whenever I see an article say "has a history of mental illness" I roll my eyes a little.  It is such a vague term that most readers don't understand.  There needs to be more information given before you can determine if that history should be taken into account.Now I'm not saying mental history shouldn't go into background checks for firearms.  If I was currently being prescribed medication for depression sure don't sell me a gun.  If I had a bout of depression 10 years ago, then I think it would be reasonable for me to purchase a firearm. [info] None [info] 1459374719
AlCrawtheKid [info] Oof. I'm from Alberta too and I'm worried about this happening to me. I'm so close to ruining myself. I can't focus in class. I can't do my homework. I can't focus. I used to do well academically too \(I'm a highschool stuent, mostly honours classes, a lot of 80s and 90s from elementary until grade eight because I never had to try at all\) but I was always disorganized and all of my projects were always late. I just had really forgiving teachers who were glad I handed it in well done instead of staying up all night and handing in a half\-assed piece of work. Now I can't get my notes done, I can't do my homework and I've been diagnosed with depression, get 70s in math class, one of my best classes and I'm scared I'm progressively getting worse and worse and worse. I hope you find a doctor before you run yourself dry and end up in hospital like me, dude. Any doctor who brushes you off is not worth your time. Push and push until you get to see a psychiatrist.  [info] None [info] 1526358102
statsigfig [info] Have you been diagnosed with depression? I’m not trying to diagnose you, but that’s pretty much what happened to me before I was diagnosed with depression in my third year of university. I think you should talk to a doctor and an advisor at your school to try to figure out the best way to deal with this. At my university, if something like what you described had happened, and you were diagnosed as having an issue by a doctor, you could typically get your courses from that term wiped away. You’d need documentation and to be getting help for your issue to show that it wasn’t likely to happen again, but it’s definitely better than failing your courses and losing the entire term. Every school is different, but most that I’ve seen have some sort of policy like that.On positive side, you had control before. That means you can get there again. Living with a brain that’s inconsistent is really hard. You can’t be too hard on yourself if for no other reason than it will make it that much harder for you to pick yourself back up. Talk to people around you. Tell them what happened. Work on getting supports in place so that if it happens again, you’ll be ready for it. [info] ADHD-C [info] 1552961760
ItsSaturdaySunday [info] 5 hours of hypomania daily with Lexapro I’m wondering if this is normal. I was diagnosed with depression and GAD so I was prescribed Lexapro (Escitalopram). It’s been working well for me and I’m near 6 weeks. Although I noticed that I’m too happy and too chatty at night as if I’m tipsy/drunk. Also too engaged and adventurous. I usually can’t sleep without a sedative. Friends find it uncharacteristic of me as I’m usually quiet. It only happens in the evening after 7pm. I take Lexapro at 9pm. Is this a normal side effect of the drug or is this something that I should take up with the psychiatrist? I’m normal and relaxed during the day. Evenings are just weirdly manic. [info] Lexapro [info] 1550867100
wes124 [info] That i was the only thing to blame when it came to my mental illness, and that I was going to have to change everything to be okay. I was diagnosed with depression, ended up in and out of hospitals. Never truly taking responsibility for it and blaming my depression. Ended up in a hospital, isolated from everyone, family, friends, even the outside world. I couldn’t talk to other patients unless it was in a therapy room. I hated it there and was told that I would be able to talk to other patients outside therapy if I “leveled up”. This meant writing a confession in how I had brought myself to that place. I wasn’t allowed to blame anyone else. It seemed harsh at the time and everyone I tell that to always say how wrong that is, but it isn’t. I realized there were so many things I could’ve done to prevent that. I could’ve gotten help earlier, I could’ve told someone, I could’ve done so many things, but I didn’t, and so it got worse. I learned that by taking the responsibility for my mental illness made it so I had the power to control it. I can’t change the shitty things that happened to me, nor can I change the people around me to be healthy, so that I can too. I just have to suck it up and change myself and my perspective to be healthy, no matter who’s around me at the moment. It’s hard. It really is. When someone is screaming at you, telling you how shitty you are or how horrible you are, it’s not easy to be calm, collected, and sometimes even nice to them. And it’s not easy to objectively look at what happened and to accept blame when needed, but also to know when it isn’t your fault. And most of all, it’s not easy to show your weaknesses, saying you were wrong, or you don’t know how to do something. It’s taken years, but slowly I was able to change myself for the better, and I couldn’t be more proud of myself for it. [info] None [info] 1548232859
ddixonr [info] I feel like this guy. Although, while I'm worse in that I can't keep a job for more than three months, I do a little more than he's described doing with the kids. I only have one toddler-aged girl, but I still relate. Once the wife gets home, I do tend to get lazier with my daughter. I've been diagnosed with depression, and have tried therapy and meds, but neither took. The therapy went well, but I eventually needed to take a job and they don't have a whole lot of non-business-hours appointments. I would say that you should plan more events, social things with the entire family. Get him to work harder with the kids while you're all together, and hopefully it leads to improvement all around. [info] None [info] 1298863808
FukkenDesmadrosaALV [info] I was diagnosed with depression in middle School and my mom told me to stop acting so dramatic. I once heard the word, "scandalous" while watching TV with her and asked what it meant. "It's what you are when i hit you". Sorry i cried and begged you to stop beating me with a coat hanger. [info] None [info] 1555511001
MossWolf [info] My mom has also been a bit resistant too, although I think she's getting better lately. Still not 100% on board, but she's not being negative about it anymore, so that's good. I was diagnosed with depression and GAD by a different psychiatrist than the one who suggested OCD. I've lost contact with the first one because I moved away. The second one I was referred to by a GP, and she was fucking terrible. (She straight up asked me "Are you even depressed? Like you don't look depressed", and when I pulled out a list of symptoms I was struggling with, so that I didn't forget any, she looked at me and went "Uh, well, I don't have much time today. You were just kind of squeezed in for 15 minutes between my other appointments"). Soooo I'm never going back to her lol. I haven't found anyone else yet. A true formal assessment won't ever happen though, because of that good ol' $1-$3K price tag. I would like at least a nod of "Yea, sounds about right" from a professional, that would be good enough for me, but I don't know how to go about it. I'll likely have to go see another GP and see if I can get another referral to someone who isn't that terrible woman.I do feel like our experiences sound pretty similar too, thanks for sharing yours! I don't want to necessarily explain myself to everyone, but at the same time, I have some *extremely* "autism-phobic" family members, if I can make up such a term lol. One of my cousins is even the type that refuses to vaccinate her kids at all, ever, because of the autism fear mongering. They're not hateful people though, just ignorant and misinformed, so part of me feels like... it would be really nice to be able to show them what autism can actually look like, that it's not some guaranteed life sentence of being a screeching vegetable like so many people believe. Basically I'd just like to feel like I *can* tell people if I need/want to.I get the looked down on thing though. Especially when people try to make light of or dismiss your problems because you're "high functioning", but then at the same time still treat you like you're just a little bit stupid. People are dummbbbbb.Edit: Forgot to throw this in, even though I know you're not a professional, I still appreciate the validation of you saying you think I'm on the spectrum. It's nice to hear, from anybody, especially when others keep giving you that suspicious side eye. p: [info] None [info] 1518578268
CluelessBlue215 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and was on medication for a while. I moved town though and never registered with a new doctors so I’m having to start the process from scratch.And we’re talking over the conflicts and stuff. That’s the reason I haven’t just left as I said in an earlier comment.  Just a lot of talking now. [info] None [info] 1509532444
Throwaway31528 [info] (21 F) I don't see a point to this anymore. I'm posting this on a throwaway because multiple people I know are on reddit, and I'd like to conceal my identity. Lately I've been thinking more and more about just ending all of this. I don't see a point in living anymore. I'm 21, but I'm not good at being an adult. I'm working a shitty job barely making ends meet. I've stopped taking care of myself physically and have gained a significant amount of weight to the point where I can't look in the mirror without being absolutely repulsed by what I see, but I have no motivation to actually change it. I no longer find enjoyment in anything, and my relationship is falling apart because of my terrible mood swings. I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 13. It's been one hell of a battle, but I just don't think I can do this anymore. [info] None [info] 1438925491
Libertatem_aequitas [info] Thanks for reading and keeping an open mind. I wouldn't have any problem with the mental health system if it wasn't for the involuntary part. From my perspective the involuntary aspect of psychiatry/mental health is made possible by the idea that mental illness is a tangible thing that you either have or you don't and if an "expert" determines that you have it but you don't accept that, then you are viewed as being in denial. That denial is what allows for someone to remove your agency and take over the decision making for your treatment. The thought process is that this illness or malady in your brain is preventing you from realizing what you need. This is what allows professionals to determine that you are a danger to yourself even if you tell them you aren't. The most concrete example of this is when I was in the hospital before my hearing to determine if I could be released or would be held longer. I saw an "independent evaluator" who asked me three questions. Are you having suicidal thoughts? Are you having homicidal thoughts? Are you having hallucinations? I answered no to all three. That was the entire evaluation. Her recommendation was that I be held for further treatment. There was no factual evidence there to support her recommendation.  It was this idea that she is an expert on mental illness and I am not and she can see something there that I can't. ABOUT MYSELF! So even in a voluntary situation where a person isn't advocating for anything their account can strengthen this belief in my opinion. Say their account is something like, "I was diagnosed with depression and COULDN'T even get out of bed. My psychiatrist put me on antidepressants and now I can. If I stop taking them, I will get worse." That lends support to the idea that mental illness is a tangible thing outside of yourself that controls you (CAN'T get out of bed) and requires external intervention to remedy. I don't want to take that remedy away from people as I think it can be effective, but I think their wording supports a certain view of mental illness or omits other explanations. For example, I get somewhat frequent headaches usually brought on by excess stress or dehydration.  The solution is to mitigate my stress or take time to deal with it or to drink more water or take breaks from exerting myself physically. These are things in my control that I can do to get the desired outcome. When I don't do them I might take an NSAID to help with the pain. That doesn't mean I have a disease where I need to take a certain medication to stave it off. The root problem isn't inflammation. I didn't drink enough water. But the aspirin gives me relief and helps me function better until the root cause is addressed. It also doesn't mean that I have a headache inside of me all the time that has to be constantly suppressed. I don't mean to blame people with different experiences than I've had. I also don't pretend to know everything there is to know about other people's situations. I just know from my experiences that every time someone shares a "status quo" mental health story it strengthens this belief that anyone with a diagnosis has some external force acting against them that has to be remedied with an external intervention and the strengthening of this belief greases the wheels of a system that removes people's agency. I've had my agency removed and it was extremely damaging. Life changing in a very negative way. I think that's a hard idea to get across. To be told by someone who/what/how you are without them being able or required to give any real proof when you know they are wrong. And then almost everyone else accepting their account of the situation and rejecting yours because you supposedly have this invisible and unprovable external force acting on you that doesn't allow you to know your own self.By the way for anyone reading this who is angered by it, please don't be. It's just my opinion. I want a system that works for everyone. Just not sure if that's possible. Everyone (diagnosed or not) experiences some form of suffering at different points in their life, and for anyone who is suffering I hope you get through it with whatever works for you.  [info] None [info] 1526822206
Graiid [info] I am glad the subreddit exists because the YT community scares me to talk about this kind of shit. I know what that kid is feeling. I grew up in an abusive home. Long story short my mother favourited my older brother, claiming I was the "daddies daughter" (cause they had it worse before I came along) but my dad was the primary abuser growing up. As such, all sides were against me. The Mom/Bro duo would verbally/physically abuse me, (respectively) and my father would as well. When I would get upset (a lot like this kid did) I was told I should quit my crying because it was worse for them. Then my brother would come home from school and kick the shit out of me because he had a bad day, and no one would believe me because "he wouldn't do that". When at the age of 11 I was diagnosed with depression and my mother was told I was told that I "shouldn't be depressed because your brother had it worse" and later told to just go kill myself if I was so depressed. I was an emotional kid. I spent a lot of time crying and being told to stop. I spent a lot of time screaming like that kid was on the toilet and hitting myself because I was told I wasn't allowed to cry and be upset.To this day, years later, no one will ever admit to what happened. No one will apologize or acknowledge the shit I had to go through. That kid needs his parents to fucking listen to him and stop focusing so much on their god damn fame. They do not give one shit about their kids well being. Phil is right, it's like "I'll give you $50 if I can slap you". You are going to say yes. Kids even more so. We don't know if they told their kids "This is how we make money. You don't want to end up on the streets do you?" When they bitch. Fuck, that kid saying "at least you don't beat us like everyone else" sounds like a line fed to him because that really doesn't happen as much as that. It pisses me right the fuck off. Sorry for the language  [info] None [info] 1492464788
Wyntarian [info] Today is the day I cried. My life cannot be compared to others who have lived.I only know my own experiences, no one else's.This is my story as of so far. I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 14. For almost 45 minutes I had watched a man whom I called "Dad" brutally beat my mother within an inch of her life. I have walked in on a friend who hung himself in his room. My best friend throughout all of my school years died the morning of my 18th birthday due to a drunk driver running a stop light. I was sexually assaulted by a man I thought was a dear friend to me, but no one believed me.March of 2016 I could feel myself slipping away into something. I did not know what my was, but I did not like it. I ended up moving out of my Mom's house into an apartment with my girlfriend. About six months later I ended up dropping out of college because I did not have the drive to show up. Shortly after I ended up getting fired from my job. I had to look for a new one. I found a replacement. It wasn't good but it was a job to help pay for rent. I wasn't making the same amount of money that I previously was. My car ended up getting repossessed by the bank. My phone got shut off. My bank account was almost always in the negative. My credit cards got cut off because I couldn't pay them off. All of this drove me deeper into this thing. I cut off all ties with my family because I felt like I was a disappointment. I was at my lowest of lows for the past two and a half years.I walked 2.5 miles to work everyday. My girlfriend was stressed because she was working overtime to keep up with the bills. I became closed off. She was drained. I believe she only stayed with me because she felt bad. I contemplated suicide many times. She was the only reason I couldn't go through with it. After a year of having a crappy job, no car, no phone, and no life I ended up getting a job offer from a person who was friends with my girlfriend. She managed a restaurant and told me she would move me up to management. I took it immediately. It took about 6 months to make it to management. I ended up being able to get a phone again. I still walked to work everyday. Shortly after becoming management I was able to get a beater of a car.  I was finally able to pay more than my fair share of the bills. I wanted to make it up to her. Life was looking good again. I thought we were doing better. I started looking at engagement rings. We had been together for almost 4 years. We made it through all of this. . . together. I had one picked out. One day she comes to me and says, "We need to talk." My mind went blank. I did not know what to think. All I knew was that it was not good.She ended things. I now sleep In the office. Luckily, we had a spare mattress. About a week later she had a new boyfriend. After finding this out I saw how delusional I was to think that she would ever say yes to marrying me. To think that what I had done to her wouldn't have had a huge price to pay. People kept telling me that she was shitty for having another boyfriend after only a week when she was in a relationship for almost 4 years. I defended her saying it was okay. They did not know what I put her through. I couldn't blame her.She is a good person. She waited until I was on my feet again before ending it. I still love her. I tell everyone that I'm fine. I'm not.I go about my days now working on myself. I finally got a haircut after a year of not having one. Just the other day I went to the bank and opened a checking account and savings. I got up today 2 hours early before work. I turned on some music. I got into the shower. Then it hit me. I haven't done this in almost 2.5 years. I started crying from what this meant. I'm getting better. I have been crying this entire time. I have to keep wiping tears from my face because I cannot see what I am typing. Today is the day I cried.Today is the day I cried for making an improvement in my mental health. [info] None [info] 1562773122
Elentuile [info] If I'm 18 with a history of mental illness and leave home, can my parents file a missing person report and get me institutionalized? (USA) As the title says. In 2017 I was diagnosed with depression and anorexia nervosa. I am not currently receiving treatment but am planning to leave home and my parents know this. They are threatening to call the cops on me and have me institutionalized against my will. If this happened, could I actually be put into a hospital? I wouldn't say I'm an active risk to myself or others. Could my parents still get the police to search for me now that I'm 18? They have been abusive in the past although because it was never physical DYFS/CPS kind of just shrugged it off.Thank you in advance. I'm really stressing about this.Edit: I'm from New Jersey in the US. Good bot :)Also... I realised this is really similar to another recent post but I'll leave it up for now because mine has the added twist of past mental illness. [info] None [info] 1580742897
squishlurk [info] * Yes to the helicopter parent. My mom has been trying in vain to manage the lives of my dad, brother, and me. It's been very stressful for her, and contributed to my parents divorce. Although, I was dxed in college, and my parents haven't been informed of it yet (I'm still trying to persuade them that ADHD and similar conditions are real). And since I left home, I've been the one in charge of my life, even if it means getting in arguments with my mom. * As for scheduling and profs: I think some types of teaching methods are better for different students, so it would make sense to try to place students with someone they would be more likely to learn more from. An international student (with or without ADHD) still learning English would be at a disadvantage in a fast paced and highly interactive class, while that would that would be exactly the kind of class another student with ADHD could finally concentrate in.* I hate the idea of back to back classes. It would prevent me from forgetting my next class, but it would also burn me out. And that's not even getting to part where I finish some assignments right before class. I can only see that making life worse, and its one of the things I hated about my schedule. What I do think would have helped: block scheduling, where you study one or two subjects intensely for a month, then something else the next month. For my major, I had to intensely study 4 subjects, while juggling 3 other classes on top of that.* I was diagnosed with depression before ADHD, and I definitely think there's a link. However, the thing I think contributed most to my depression reaching the severity it did was the lack of mental health education. I grew up surrounded by the stigma of mental illness, and it took about 4 years for me to rise above it enough to get help. I see my relatively minor ADHD as the catalyst for my depression. [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1363304111
Bucktown_Riot [info] No, I was diagnosed with depression and a trauma disorder, but I definitely had some borderline traits back then. [info] None [info] 1567087034
BLUE_WAFFLE_GANGRAPE [info] Welcome friend! All I can give you are my personal experiences and observations as they relate to my recovery.1. I stay away completely from anything that has anything to do with drinking. This includes not using non alcoholic beer or anything like that. Sparkling water, coffee, and cigarettes replaced beer for me.2. I have, yes. Some people have them for years and years, others (like me) have the craving removed very quickly. That being said, my alcoholic brain loves latching on to anything that might change how I’m feeling. So while the craving for alcohol / drugs might be gone, I definitely see when I get the craving for other things (gym, women, sleep, sweets, etc).3. Being able to live honestly. Factual honesty and emotional honesty. Being able to ask for and receive unconditional help from people who I can relate to better than anyone else. A sense of belonging and community through shared experiences and thoughts. Knowing that I can never actually let myself believe that I am alone again.4. I was diagnosed with depression during my drinking. I have over the last 6 years gotten off my meds. I don’t know for sure if I have medical depression, and I CERTAINLY get depressed from time to time - but that’s life. I didn’t get sober to make my life perfectly happy all the time, I got sober to be able to handle life on life’s terms through relying on the fellowship and my HP. I need help with a ton, and I have the resources available to not only be comfortable asking for and receiving help but to also get through the best and worst life has to throw at me, all while knowing that I never again need to drink to cope. Keep coming back and keep asking questions. [info] 2203 days [info] 1555871053
RoastedBroccoli [info] Hello, I'm not quite sure what to do. Hi, I am 17 years old. About a year ago I was diagnosed with depression and started medication for it. But for about the last month, I've been hearing voices and most recently having delusions. I'm not quite sure how to deal with it all. It's very scary for me and I tend to overthink everything lately. I have only told 1 close friend and I am debating telling my mom. Any tips or suggestions would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1501919510
sadomasos [info] [Sexual issues] Masochist sexual desires (male, 19) (sorry for eventual bad english, it's not my first language)Hello I'm male and 19. I've been diagnosed with depression at 16.Since puberty I've always had problems with my sexuality. I have fallen in love several times with many girls (and never with guys!) but I couldn't interact with them because I felt deeply ashamed about myself.At first I thought it was bisexuality but it isn't.. it's self harm due to repressed energy which I address to myself.. I've talked about this on a psychology related forum and found a guy who felt something like this and talked about this 'inverted sadism', and I felt it matches with me so much. I think it could be related to my relations with my parents.. my brother (told my mother who told me when I told her this) has 'bisexual fantasies' too and knowing how similiar he is to me I thought they're the same as mine..It is so humiliating. If you want to understand what kind of kink this is, it's called 'sissy porn', or 'forced feminization porn'.. the constant thought makes me act passive during all activities different than sex and it doesn't fit with my personality.. these behaviors also match with the description of masochism.Yesterday I've also talked about this with my therapist and since it took me long, for now she suggested me to try to avoid thinking about it during other activities, but masturbation isn't a problem.. the only idea that came to my mind is that I should masturbate only to heterosexual thougts (oh for now I'm not watching porn, I don't think that changes something) What I'm asking is if there's someone who had to deal with something like this and what he did [info] None [info] 1484847460
OneRepulsiveFlamingo [info] Does anyone else’s depression get worse with PMS? I was diagnosed with depression last year but I’ve noticed especially recently that it’s worsened. Normally I am still able to function though I do have less energy and feel sort of empty, but the days before my period starts it feels like I’ve been whacked. I have no energy whatsoever, I feel miserable, I get really existential and I don’t see the point in doing anything at all. Is this common for depression? Is there anything I can do about it? I’m not currently seeing a therapist. [info] None [info] 1565369883
EianSiCK [info] I'm a chronically ill non-binary trans guy, and probably would never have come out without the sudden influx of trans/non-binary people in the media and online. I had a conversation with my queer godfather(in his fifties) who told me that if there had been the vocabulary when he was younger he would have identified as non-binary. The world is getting smaller and the queer community is getting bigger because we have the vocabulary to define ourselves now. More people are being exposed to it and therefore more people can say "hey that's me." Also mental illness rates have gone up over the last several years due to economic decline and life-quality decline. I will probably never own a house, I can't afford to finish college and if I did I'd be in debt my entire life. I've been diagnosed with depression and panic disorder, along with OCD. I can't speak for other physically ill or disabled folk but I'm sure there are rising statistics there too. [info] None [info] 1542870511
moochiemonkey [info] &gt; I was diagnosed with depression, obsessive disorder and borderline personality last year and I've been getting extremely better but she triggers me. Say exactly that. It's definitely not the first time I've heard someone say that btw. Family can sometimes be the worst to live with because they see you as you were as a child and try to "fix" you. But a lot of the time you don't need to be fixed, you just need to adapt to living your life now. [info] None [info] 1474554940
CrisisOfConsonant [info] Oh I'll share, although I feel my story will probably be very different from other people who post about it.So I've been mildly depressed pretty much all my life. The only time I wasn't mildly depressed was when I was deeply depressed. I was diagnosed with depression around 18 by a psychologist. I had to see the psychologist because I got arrested and kicked out of school and it was part of my probation. He prescribed me anti depressants but I never took them (I don't really like mild altering drugs outside of alcohol). Although my psychologist did mention that my depression mostly manifested it's self as me not feeling anything at all. I don't really feel happy or sad the vast majority of the time. I tend to come across as very even keeled to most people. I rarely ever get mad (a lot of people tell me they can't even picture me angry) but I also never get particularly excited about anything either. I pretty much always have what feels like a neutral face, but everyone tells me I just look sad. It also means I don't get overly attached to things or people. If I have a falling out with someone I've known for 5 years and we never talk again, it doesn't rattle me much.And a lot of people would find this a very depressing life style. But for me it's sort of empowering. I really only have to manage one personal relationship and that's with my girlfriend. If everyone else in the world thinks I'm an asshole, well what's it matter to me? I maintain my professional relationships by being competent at my job and not letting people know too much about my personal life. I've also developed a sarcastic dry wit with dead pan delivery that matches my personality well. It smooths over professional interactions because it makes people think I'm funny (I've found if your a guy you really want to be funny, it's the easiest way to get people to like you/be nice to you) but doesn't make me an inviting person to try and befriend (and I don't really want them trying to befriend me).I make sure I keep enough money to do what I want with very minimal reliance on other people whom I don't compensate. I tend to live a very drama free life since I don't have a lot of people to bring drama into my life, and I tend to keep my life pretty simple. I concentrated on my job for a few years and now I'm in the top 10% of all personal income in the US, so I can live fairly comfortably like this.To fulfill basic social needs (which I don't seem to have as much of as most people) I meet random people from the internet or whatever and have a few drinks. But personal relationships for me tend to be temporal things and very fleeting. Now days I find it easier to just go to strip clubs and have a few drinks though. Strippers kind of fill that perfect role of someone to talk to that isn't really going to try and get involved in your life and doesn't want you involved in theirs.So I guess in the end I just kind of rolled with it to see where it'd take me. It's kind of an interesting path.TL;DR; I zen'd out. [info] None [info] 1397503208
My_brain_is_tired [info] Update to [24f] mood swings and struggling at life Last weekend I posted [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/mentalhealth/comments/4e3fhb/me_24f_mood_swings_and_struggling_at_life_think/)I thought an update may be useful to anyone who identified with what I said because I saw a psychiatrist last week.**Summary of my old post:** I felt like I didn't have control of my emotions. I'd be fine then I wanted to kill myself and be down for a few days, then I'd be ok. I also have done erratic things like taken overdoses before, broken things (many times) and cut my hair off in emotional fits. I constantly feel like my life is spinning out of control. My GP said cyclothmyia and others on here suggested bpd.**Update:** My psychiatrist diagnosed me with depression. I was under the impression that with depression people tended to be on a constant low and have trouble getting the energy to do anything. A lot of the time I don't have that problem. The thing that worries me is when I tend to get right down and act impulsively. But apparently this can all be part of depression because of the way you get so worn down, people can just snap. I guess it shows how interrelated a lot of mental health conditions are.To be honest I felt a lot worse after seeing the psychiatrist because I felt like I'd already beaten depression less than a year ago and here I was back in the same situation. After I left her office (crying) I was meant to go back to work but instead I called in sick and wanted to be self-destructive. I felt like I was just lost in the system again and there was no hope and this was a problem I was always going to have. I got drunk and was trying to think of ways I could harm myself but luckily I spoke to my mother on the phone and she pulled me out of it. I've been feeling down but ok since then.I'm now on anti-depressants and on the waiting list to start therapy.Sorry for the self-indulgent update I just needed to get some things off my chest and thought it would help if someone identified with my other post.**Tl;dr I was diagnosed with depression** [info] None [info] 1460930647
cunseytupo [info] I've been feeling down lately. (height, looks, social life) Hello everybody,I wouldn't consider myself as a short person. I'm average I guess. (16 Yo, M, 5'8 / 173ish cm) But it does drag me down every now and then when I see 6'0+ people. My growth plates have closed and I have no clue how to deal with that. I mean I shouldn't be complaining. I'm happy to be average height and healthy but still I would love to be a few inches taller. 5'11 would've been amazing. I guess that goes for every height though. I don't really have much confidence and I was quite chubby in my school days and I've been telling myself I'm ugly over these years. (That changed though, I'm working out 3 times a week now and I'm starting to at least like my body. Face wise I'm probably average)And getting jealous over classmates getting girlfriends and hugging girls and whatnot probably didn't help me. Looking back it was pointless to get hurt over that I think. Throughout the last years of school I was diagnosed with depression so that time was a pain (grades went to shit too) and after finishing school I haven't been doing much with my life. (Though I'm proud to be working on myself and I'm even trying to find internships and so on)I did have friends but I was mostly sitting in front of my computer so I kinda lack of social skills. I rarely went outside or to parties or participated in any social activity. Lately I've been feeling very lonely. Pretty much the only person in my life I can talk to is my loyal doggo and my dad but I've nearly lost him a couple of times already and at home my parents are fighting often. I catch myself daydreaming about having a girlfriend, doing couple things, cuddlingI daydream often in general. Even built my own fictional self. (I hope I'm not sounding weird) I listen to music many times while thinking about a scenario in my head with my fictional self. Scenarios like saving lives, fighting along with people in a battle. I imagine myself being part of a world from an anime too and having friends that care about me and stuff. I don't want to get too deep into this and it might seem cringy, but I've spent a big part of my life with tweaking my fictional self and world. Like, it's really confusing.I wish I could just go out of the house and meet people, make new friends. I text with the ones left from school sometimes. Though my "best" friend hasn't replied in a long time. And again, I am really a noob at talking to people. Especially to girls. Being insecure about my looks and height is so annoying. In my damn head I think girls would turn me down and not give me a chance because of my looks or height if I'd try to talk to them. It's just stupid, really. Maybe I'm in a depressed phase at the moment, I don't know. I just really struggle with that shit, you know. I feel like no one really is there for me in my life if I need them. Except my dog I guess. But he doesn't talk much.The thing is that I think I'm a good person. I am depressed frequently, I'm highly sensitive and I might be a tiny little bit weeeeird but I always tried to offer a helping hand to my friends. I'm a good listener and I can empathise others. Animals seem to like me too which is nice. I lack of education, yes, but I wouldn't consider myself as stupid either. I quit the ramble now though. I could write for ages probably because sometimes it just starts to flow, you know? And to anyone who has read through this wall of text, thank you. I hope it's not too big a mess and also I apologise for any grammatical / spelling errors. I'm not a native english speaker. :)Thanks again and have a good one. TL;DR Weirdo struggling with life wrote something off his chest. [info] None [info] 1498698665
DarkHippie420 [info] New motivation Hello all.So I started reading about how alcohol affects one's mind. I learned a little about depression (I've been diagnosed with depression for a good ten years or so), gray matter and sensory perception (I'm a synesthete so this really hit me hard) and "brain fog" and such. I want my mind back and feel like I've wasted so much time, money and potential just to get heavenly highs and hellish lows from alcohol. I also changed my phone's lock screen into the art on this card, because that's THE picture I relate to most when being hung over. I wish it helps if and when the cravings hit me. Here: ( http://gatherer.wizards.com/Handlers/Image.ashx?multiverseid=86&amp;type=card )I guess I would like to discuss about what kind of changes YOU have experienced mentally after quitting, and what was your biggest motive to do so. For the former I would especially like to hear from fellow synesthetes.Thank you, this support group rocks. IWNDWYT. [info] None [info] 1526489503
RipSteel [info] Before anyone freaks out, YES that puppy is too young to be away from Mom. He is with Mom until August when I pick him up. I was diagnosed with depression and decided to get a dog. I went with a Boston because I love my parents dog. This is my first Boston. Any Advice?  [info] None [info] 1468196505
Rosxjun- [info] my mom. She should  have been more self aware to how she treated me especially after I was diagnosed with depression as a teenager. She had this "good supportive" façade when it came to counseling but it was literally a fucking nightmare once no one was around. [info] None [info] 1538616463
miaman [info] Hi! I felt a lot like what you just described when I was diagnosed with depression. It might be a good idea to talk to a doctor.  [info] None [info] 1519385169
space_island [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12, tried to hang myself when I was 13 and almost succeeded, the hook I had hung the belt from pulled out of the piece of wood it was attached to.  That might not sound too serious and looking back I can see the flaws in my plan, but I had a scar around my neck from the belt for a month and spent 2 months in a psych ward.  My motivations at the time are no longer entirely clear(family shit and bullying at school were contributors) but what I do know is that I just needed an out, so I took the belt.  Afterwards I saw some therapists went on some meds, went off the meds, got better for a while, finished high school, met a girl, moved out and into the city nearby. Things got bad again much worse than before and I found myself back at life square one.  I'm pulling myself up and out of it but it takes work and perseverance. The specter of those previous years still haunts me, but I have goals now and actively work to avoid relapsing into depression because I know now how susceptible I am to it.So all I can say here is that mental illness affects people differently, even the therapist I saw all those years said that most diagnoses of mental illness are basically umbrella terms that encompass multiple symptoms and psychiatric institutions are constantly reassessing the diagnostic criteria as their understanding of mental health grows and changes.  I was just summing up what my experiences were like and what I was told by the various medical professional and psychotherapists I have seen over the course of my life.So its great that you managed to work through your problems, I too am currently doing that.  The point of my original comment was just that when you are deep down in that pit and looking for a quick way out and suicide seems like your best option, it is definitely not something you can just think your way out of because you are not thinking clearly.  However just because your experience differs from mine does not mean that mine is null and void, its just different   Different strokes, glad to hear you are doing well, but its a shame you came out of that as such an asshole.  cheers.&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;Edited out a bunch of the more personal stuff i wrote originally(don't need that lingering around on my main reddit account).  Hopefully you got a chance to read it and know that I was not just talking out of my ass, but was speaking from experience.  Also after rereading your comment a little more carefully it does not sound like you had clinical depression, from the way you describe it sounds like you were in a shitty place in your life and that was making you depressed.  That is something different from clinical depression. [info] None [info] 1317753746
Redrogue2291 [info] I can relate. I have been depressed since I was 10. I experienced a lot of sexual abuse from age 11-16. I could not trust my family, and I couldn't be truly close to anyone because of the pain. I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD later. I did the same thing you are doing, but with a different medication. I even made the attempt and took the pills. 4 years later and I'm still here. There are days where I feel like total shit, but I'm glad I made it. Life is not bright and beautiful for everyone, but every day there is opportunity for change. You are most likely going to have another episode, and it will continue until you get the treatment you need. There is always help. I don't know where you live, but the US has many phone numbers to call and speak to someone about your feelings. Don't give up dear, it is possible to feel better than how you are feeling.  [info] None [info] 1550810670
princessofrlyeh [info] I Feel Empty For the past three weeks, I have felt so incredibly empty and alone. Constantly tired, constant physical aches and pains. A few years ago, I was diagnosed with depression and I was suicidal... but this time I'm not feeling suicidal at all. I don't want to die. I just... I'm not myself. I can't place it. I don't really know what's wrong with me and I don't know how to fix it. It doesn't feel like depression because it felt so much "worse" years ago. Am I just crazy? I have a boyfriend and a few close friends I talk to regularly. They've all noticed I'm "out of it" and genuinely care about me and ask what's wrong. I just don't know. I don't know what to do anymore. I have no energy. I have very little motivation. I don't get it. [info] None [info] 1532317510
swimmerboy5817 [info] Right? I've been diagnosed with depression for almost 6 years, see a therapist every week, a psychiatrist every month, and was even hospitalized for it 18 months ago, yet sometimes I still wonder if I really have depression or I am just a shitty person.  [info] None [info] 1547051847
PckMan [info] After 24 hours, I can finally say goodbye It's been about 24 hours since I read about Monty. Over these hours I have tried to come to terms with it but no matter how much I tried, I couldn't accept it. It wasn't denial, it was simply not being affected by him in my day to day life that his absence from this world made a noticeable difference. But finally, after being redirected by Meg's journal entry to Monty's entry about his mother's death, I have finally come to terms with it. Achievement Hunter and RoosterTeeth are the two channels from the total of four that I watch on Youtube, and I watch significantly more of them than anything else, I pretty much follow their daily schedule. I've never met those people but I feel like I know them. And so when I read yesterday that Monty had passed away, I was in shock. I had not heard about his hospitalization and last I'd seen of him he was dancing away like he used to do. I have never felt so sad for the death of someone I have never physically met or talked to.Over the following hours, the internet has flooded with mourning and support and sharing of fond memories of Monty. I have read extensively about him from his colleagues and friends who have made posts about him over the past hours. Monty was not a very visible person in the roosterteeth network, they always talked about him but he rarely made appearances in videos. From his colleagues that was attributed to his obsession with work. Over the many podcasts and videos I've seen, they always talked about him with absolute admiration and talked about how hard working he was. I thought they were joking, but as I've read more and more about him from people that had met him, I find that this is actually completely true. He was a person that went after his goals and aspirations and would not stop until he succeeded, and he did. The reason that is important to me is because in the past 5 years that I've been diagnosed with depression, I've gone from bad to worst. My life right now is mostly just sitting at home watching RT vids. I only go out for groceries and I have no friends because I am in a foreign country. I dropped out of University because I could not keep up, so now I literally do nothing. After reading about Monty, I realise that he was in a very similar situation as me, in fact he was worse than me. But his resolve did not only get him to succeed but inspire so many others to do so.As I've been trying to process the death of someone that does not significantly affect my life, alive or dead, I came across this text that he actually wrote. It's weird how it is just so fitting in the current situation, almost like he is signing off his own death. After reading this, and everything else I've read about him in the past day, it's gotten me thinking about what I am doing with my life and my time. I feel like I have an obligation, not to him, but to myself, as does everyone for themselves, to do their best and not resort to excuses and self pity. We mourn for him but I do not believe he would mind going as he did. He might have not finished his work but he made it happen and that was more important to him, not making excuses, not feeling inadequate, just going for it.Overall, even if you did not know him, he was certainly an inspirational person and his text is definitely worth a read. I wish I can reach a point in my life where I am so content with myself that I can send myself off with no regrets, just like he did.Good bye Monty. [info] None [info] 1422987649
almac26 [info] Thanks for taking the time to share your story. I'm actually already in therapy, and I was diagnosed with depression after all of this (long time coming too, I'm on meds now for the first time in my life). She's blocked on social media, but I keep having slip ups checking mutual friends profiles in fits of masochism. I'm having good days and bad days too. Your post means a lot to me, thank you again for sharing.  [info] None [info] 1486424961
topdeckisadog [info] I was diagnosed with depression over 20 years ago and I think it is a joke. Which one of us is right? [info] None [info] 1573694886
scaura [info] Hi Mr. Whitacre! This will probably get buried, but I wanted to THANK YOU for all of your work! I had the opportunity to go to Carnegie Hall last year with my high school's band, and I was given the opportunity to play the euphonium solo part in October. I was diagnosed with depression at that time, and your work really helped me get through a tough time. It's my favorite piece of all time and it's something I'll never forget!Second, what was one of the greatest, most memorable moments you've had while composing or conducting? :) [info] None [info] 1424053552
Roundhouse1988 [info] This still doesn't make sense to me. If you underwent treatment for a disorder, but you no longer show negative symptoms, it means your disorder is under control, but you still have it; if you stopped taking hormones and the treatments that you underwent, you would start showing these symptoms again right? I understand that trans people don't want the stigma of having a mental disorder, but I think the problem is with eliminating stigmas against mental disorders in general, not to to classify people who have this disorder as nothing being wrong with them. I am diagnosed with depression, but I feel fine now; that doesn't mean I no longer have a mental disorder. [info] None [info] 1485879457
CapComOnTheCob [info] Age 13, mum was emotionally abusive and step dad was physically. Not so much physically but little bits here and there. Any argument, whether I was right or wrong, ended in me being stripped of all privileges and my mum acting like she won. This went down to the point of me sleeping on carpet in an empty room when I ran off out the window and stayed with my dad full time since then. I always thought how it wasn't fair that my life was like this for me where even after I left my mum still controlled me, while my friends houses were in complete harmony. Had a wake up call when I was diagnosed with depression later that life wasn't fair to anyone. [info] None [info] 1544963497
Baloogab0t [info] I have been diagnosed with depression by a few different doctors. Once when I was twelve and a few other times since. I started taking Zoloft last year and it helped but the script ran out and I can't afford to make an appointment with him yet. I just came here because it helps to just put it out there. And as the great user below your comment said, my wife's behavior can be toxic but I don't think she is. I think she just has trouble understanding. I mean I hardly understand it and its been going on for 25 years. I mean she let's me rant and then when its over we let it go. She never hits me with the "just calm down" and I like that about her. She makes me feel justified until I finally relax and realize I wasn't justified at all and then we talk. It really is healthy how she handles it, truthfully. [info] None [info] 1545696729
Fairelabise17 [info] As a woman in the church I was diagnosed with depression.  I am going into a doctor again and being re-diagnosed because I no longer feel the pain and suffering I felt then.  So unfulfilling.  I am not saying it is easier for men in the church, the same sexism and detrimental gender roles exist but she will live a much happier life unrestricted by what she thinks she can and can't attain.  It was so limiting and now I feel amazing.  [info] None [info] 1491072392
camdogg05 [info] I need to go for a while :-( There's two reasons why I leaving. Firstly, I failed a module at uni, so I need to focus more on my studies from now on Secondly, and probably more important, I've been diagnosed with depression, and right now, everything seems kind of black and to be honest, I'm not really in the mood for this at the moment.So basically I'm not saying goodbye. Just, see you later.Adios Amigos [info] Verified [info] 1455059281
elalmohada26 [info] In my early 20s I was diagnosed with depression and went on anti-depressants for a while. In hindsight I think I was just overly self-centred, had an unhealthy lifestyle, and in a funk and needed to get my life back on track. Only when I realised this did I start truly feeling better. It sounds mean to say, but I know lots of people who say they have depression who eat like shit, drink/smoke too much, and never get any exercise. Then, you have the real depression sufferers. The ones like OP's boyfriend who suffer terribly. They constantly feel unfathomably bad, potentially driving them to suicide.  I feel like as a modern society we normalise the first type too much, over-diagnosing depression, and meaning many people are all out of empathy for those who really suffer. I guess what I'm saying is the lack of common appreciation for the difference between serious, clinical depression, and the low mood (often somewhat self inflicted) that many people feel at some point of their life is harmful. [info] None [info] 1524516023
BobJuan0902 [info] I am living breathing proof that people can overcome mental disorders of almost any type. When I was two years old, the doctors told my mom that I would not intellectually age past 5 years old, obviously that didnt happen since here I am typing. In 2nd grade the administrators said that if I kept on the track I was on that I would need to be permenately institutionalized by 16, or put in a home. Once again obviously that didn't end up happening.I can still remember when I was younger being restrained, and locked in a closet by my teachers. I  still remember my only assignment being a cursive book being handed to me, every day I would trace and write in cursive. (Its the only reason I know cursive to this day) I was so lonely and spent so long in that closet that I would talk to my hands (specifically my knuckles and fingers) I can remember my special ed teachers names, and some of the only memories I have of elementary are the long days I spent in that closet. I can still remember that patterns on the wood in the walls and the texture of it. It was only big enough for me to sit with my legs scrunched up against myself and had a single barred window with  3 old wasp nests on it.But, I bettered myself. Even at that young age I knew I didnt want to spend forever in that closet. Every time I saw that damn cursive book was only further motivation. Eventually I started going to regular classes, I managed to eventually leave with top percentiles on my STAAR tests (standardized testing)In middle school I was taken from my mom, my cousin committed suicide, my grandparents had to move because of taxes, I was bullied to hell, and all sorts of other unpleasant things happened. I still remember being told to go to the bedroom when the cops arrived. A few years later I was diagnosed with depression. I managed to get over it and got off of my anti-depressants within 2 years. Recently I got off of my ADHD medicine. While I might seem a little odd the long story of my mental health issues has finally come to a close. You can fix yourself no matter what you have, you have to just want it EVERY single day. Every day that you wake up until you go to bed that is your goal that you are working towards. Dont let go, if you want something remind that person every day until they go insane but never EVER give up.It doesnt matter whatever experts tell you, you can accomplish anything if you put in the effort and want it hard enough. [info] None [info] 1568956084
harley_love25 [info] I've never understood why people do this as well. It's not okay and it's just annoying.  I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD from being in a very mentally/emotionally abusive relationship. It's been two years since I got out of it and I still struggle on a daily basis not to cry or react because something small triggered me or brought back a bad memory. But besides this post,I have never posted my mental health issues anywhere for everyone to see mainly because I don't want anyone besides my close family and my boyfriend knowing.  [info] None [info] 1538777169
Icey505 [info] I suppose I'll chime in here. If someone has the money to spend on a game like this, good for them. There's no reason to shame them for getting enjoyment out of this.But for me, it's a different story. I've spent more money on this game than I'd like to admit, and I got enjoyment out of my pulls, but I had to force myself to block iAP's due to the fact that I have a general spending problem. I kinda always have, but when I was diagnosed with depression and OCD, it kind of made sense. It's more controllable now, but people are right when they say we should get more opportunities like JP does.Their mercy pull is 5 now, right? [info] wow help am addicted [info] 1474052319
rish166 [info] Dyspraxia and social skills After receiving my diagnosis last October I have noticed my 'slow mental processing' much more, especially in social situations. I have realised a lot of social situations rely on quick comments injected with wittiness and humour and the ability to recall information or anecdotes within a few milliseconds. Due to this I often fall short and is causing me to become more reclusive and unwilling to interact with the world. I have 5 jobs at the moment (yes 5) 2 of which are teaching/tutoring, another 2 are till work (customer service) so I am constantly exercising my communication skills. I am not seeing much improvement and this 'slow processing speed' is really the limiting factor for my happiness (alongside my shoddy memory). I was diagnosed with depression last year and even though I have semi-crawled out of that abyss, going into social situations keeps bringing me down and making me feel terribly about myself. I know it's futile to wish to be normal, but it is something that crosses my mind everyday. I would love to just interact with people like normal human beings do and not have to worry about having conversations with people.I do apologise for ranting on, I just don't know anyone who truly understands what I am going through. I would love to hear if anyone has any similar experiences or has any advice. [info] None [info] 1551054378
SeeYouSpaceCorgi [info] My discovery of Yatta and how it helped change my life for the better. When I was 14, 2008, I was diagnosed with depression. I was going through a pretty tough time and life was pretty dull. I remember I was pretty new to the internet, so before any entertaining websites were discovered, the only whackey stuff I got to see on the internet was the Friday Funnies on The Age newspaper website. I was super excited to see this stuff every friday, and I asked dad every friday to go check to see if they'd put more funnies up. One week, they posted Yatta. And that was the week that my life started to improve. I don't know if it was the cheery nature of the song, the obvious parody of it all, or the 6 Japanese men dancing around in a nappy and a leaf, or a bit of all of it. However, when I saw Yatta, I felt so happy again. I began to smile and laugh, I couldn't believe what I was seeing. I wiped the tears from my eyes and hit the replay button, trying to make sense of the lyrics on the 240p video fuzz. "We are the world", "I drink water that's tasty!", what the fuck was this? Why were they so happy? I heard they were comedians but jesus, they were really fucking committed to their act... whatever it was...I downloaded the song to my iPod Mini, and listened to it every morning on the way to school. My spirits were immediately lifted, and it felt like every line I learned by heart, a little chunk of depression was lifted off me. Soon I was able to see so much happiness and was a much more open happy person. There's been bumps in the road since then. But whenever I listen to this song, for at least a little while, my life becomes just that bit more bearable. We did it! Yatta! [info] None [info] 1437309187
walkingupstream [info] Yes, I was diagnosed with depression 25 years ago, and again about 18 years ago. This past summer i was diagnosed OCD. Depression never really explained everything, but absolutely my main symptom is rumination. Depression hits when my ruminations are allowed to persist too long. The biggest difference in the treatment of each is that medication for ocs is 3-4x the dosage of ssri than for depression. Anyways people here dont seem to care to hear about OCD, judging by the downvotes, so I'll probably just quit visiting this sub in the future. Good luck to you, im doing better with the whole mental heath thing than ever before.  [info] None [info] 1538771439
Hailey_Stix [info] It's very hard to enjoy food! I basically just eat to survive. I don't have a favorite food based on taste on smell because it doesn't apply to me.Yes, my moods have changed. I have been diagnosed with depression and I am seeing a psychologist and and psychiatrist. I'm not sure if it is connected to my loss of smell, but it if definitely possible! I wish I could have a craving like the people around me do. [info] None [info] 1358203784
Know_What_Fvck_This [info] Well, my parents don't want me on anti-depressants, I don't trust my friends, at least not after the last one to know I had depression, and, I haven't seen my therapist in months, not that it matters, all they care about is money, they don't give a shit about you personally. I'd try group therapy, but, my mom says changing therapists is too hard. My parents, despite knowing I was diagnosed with depression, would rather pretend I don't have it, so, if I live they'll at least notice, and, if I get committed and put away, I finally get to escape. Not to mention, I'm about to fail a midterm so, either death or commitment gets me out of it, even if I fail I don't have to think about it nor any of my other failures. I have one person I trust, I love her, we're not together, and, she doesn't love me romantically, but, I do consider her one of my closest friends. She knows about my depression. However, after my best friend, my former best friend, up and abandoned me, I don't want to get too bad around her. Which is why, I wanted to thank her for her friendship and go away so she doesn't have to see me bad. [info]  [info] 1448288981
Lynkeus [info] For me it is overthinking. Kinda obsession. I have been diagnosed with depression and mild paranoia (it was beginning of it, but it was there) before and have been treated for it but occasionally I see it re-emerge. I start to say "what if -?" to things that normal people even shouldn't bother. I am still using my meds at low dose but sometimes I feel I go down after a triggering event. And start to question things, almost exclusively about myself. [info] None [info] 1568287769
lizlegit000 [info] Dogs are amazing, I got mine when I was diagnosed with depression &amp; honestly getting a dog has helped me much more.  [info] None [info] 1414241039
yourdadsotherkid [info] I've been diagnosed with depression multiple times in my life. After awhile I got sick of people treating my generally cynical outlook on the world as a disease. It isn't. I've been through a lot of shit in my life, I've seen a lot of horrible shit, I had a rough youth, etc etc. Anybody who lives through that crap and *isn't* prone to bouts depression is probably superhuman. We keep falling into this trap as a culture of treating human emotions like some simple either/or thing. They aren't. You can be a little sad and a little happy at the same time, you know. You can have one emotion pop up and fade and another one get stuck for awhile and then fade again yadda yadda yadda. We all go through multiple states of being per day, even if our worse moments end up receiving most of our attention. I don't think responding to every negative emotion with trying to drug ourselves into numbness is doing much good. Medication can help you get a handle on your problems, but it can't solve them. And you aren't broken to begin with.  [info] None [info] 1504941076
RevengeVagina [info] I've been diagnosed with depression (moderate) and PTSD. I realise that I could be doing a lot worse than I am, but I'm still optimistic, cause things will have to get better at some point, right? [info] None [info] 1527592602
JackDukes [info] Nicotine &amp; Other Drugs Hi Reddit. Just over a year ago I was diagnosed with depression. I took my medication for around 2 months. It didn't work so I started smoking instead, which worked for me as an alternative, however, I really want to quit, and starting today i'm going to try. If any of you have been in a similar position to mine, please help me out, as I really want to do this, not just for me, but for the people around me too.Thanks! [info] None [info] 1408507636
deltadiamond [info] Grandmother miraculously understands depression A little background here: I was diagnosed with depression a little more than a year ago and for personal reasons I was raised by my grandparents.Anyway, depression has been really hard on me (by which I mean I mean ruined my grades in uni). My grandmother loves to tell me about how I was so lucky to be born in the situation I was and how I need to start trying harder in college. At which point I try to explain how hard it really is to cope with depression. She never understands, and usually *refuses* to understand by saying that no, she gets it completely.Well yesterday was the worst time of all. After rehashing the same tired old argument, she told me exactly how she understands depression. Because sometimes in the morning she doesn't want to get out of bed. Because apparently laziness is the same thing as a severe mental illness. The worst part is I can't tell her she's wrong because then I'm being mean to her.So what the hell am I supposed to do? I depend on her for a place to live, so It's not like I can just cut her out of my life. [info] None [info] 1485442761
huoyuanjiaa [info] No one said it was just a mood. I was diagnosed with depression myself and someone having no sympathy for people who do not actually have clinical depression and those who self diagnose would not have made me any worse. [info] None [info] 1496043004
kelbarbs [info] Tired of my parent's decisions constantly having negative impacts on me. First and foremost, I'm F19, about to go into University soon. Perhaps saying I'm from an Asian family might help too. My parents had 4 children, all girls. I am the oldest, middle two are 14 and 13,and then 8. They told me they kept wanting a boy at the time. When I was in my teens, my parents were constantly fighting and the family was dysfunctional. I had nobody to turn to when I was sad. Later dad was diagnosed with Bipolar disorder. Episodes come and go throughout my teen years. I was diagnosed with depression myswmd at the age of 16. It's a lot better now. I've also been having to step up to the mother role lately by being the confidant to my sisters, which I'm more than happy to do as I only want the best for them and I know growing up can be hard, and I always tell them they can tell me anything and I would never judge them.  This all happened because my mother said she was burnt out from raising kids for 20 years and wanted to take time for herself. So she's hardly at home and also very short tempered and judgemental all the time. Fast forward to now, I'm looking at going to university abroad. They've agreed to pay for it (money is no problem in the family) very early on and promised me a university education. Some years ago I took a major exam and had to choose between 3 years in a specialised course or 2 years in a generalised study. 16 yo me had no idea and just agreed with whatever they recommended. I was miserable the whole 3 years as I hated the course of study and the school and it was a very toxic environment. I know where I want to go but it would require an extra year of study as whatever course they asked me to do doesn't qualify me for university right away. Initially they agreed but then now they are saying otherwise as they have this delusion that if I spend an extra year studying I will not get hired into a good job out of university. Keep in mind because of their decision at the time for the specialised course I'm already a year later than my peers  who went to university. At this point im just sick of it. Sick of the one taking the emotional burden of the decisions they push onto me. I feel like as an adult now I should have the say of where I want to go in life. I also constantly worry for my sisters not having anyone to confide in when I move out and they bottle it up.I don't know what to say them anymore. I just want to have a say in my decisions, for once. I know they mean well but id rather face the good or bad consequences of my own decisions than theirs.Thank you for hearing me out.TL;DR I'm sick and tired of my parents poor decisions constantly having negative impacts on me. Need to make life decision soon and don't want them to make this decision for me but it seems like it and I don't know how to stop it. [info] None [info] 1578498943
19sharmau [info] I can’t build a relationship to save my life. I (18) honestly feel that I’ve never had any real connection to another human being before. I’ve been distant from my family for as long as I can remember and it only got worse when I was diagnosed with depression at 12 years old. I don’t think I’ve ever had a real friend or group of friends, I’ve been perpetually lonely and starved for affection for what feels like my whole life.I came to college thinking it could be different and I could cultivate at least one real relationship where I wasn’t being used or taken advantage of. So far all I’ve gotten are superficial friendships and being used for other people to make friends. I don’t know what I expected but I see everyone around me forming such close bonds with people they’ve just met and I feel like there’s something wrong with me. Why won’t anyone be my friend or be close with me? I feel like I’m just a stepping stone for other people to create real friendships or that I’m stuck at being an entry level friend only. Or that I’m like a free one week trial that people don’t care to make a new email for. I don’t know, I’m sorry for this being so sad. Thank you for reading this far. Please don’t tear me apart for this, I know it’s probably something I’m doing that makes it this way and I wish I knew what it was so I could fix it. Anyway yeah thank you for reading, I hope you all have lovely days, afternoons, nights etc. [info] None [info] 1582874099
luxcsia [info] My old friend is back!!!!!! I was diagnosed with depression at like 16 and i went to therapy and all that and I’m on meds and shit and it worked really well. Well, it did. My depression just came back and I’m pretty sure I have a minor case of it (I don’t get suicidal or self harm, and I work very hard to keep myself in check) but it’s still annoying as hell. I’ve noticed that once it came back my cognitive skills are nonexistent. I can’t read very well rn or do any schoolwork or do anything because my brain just stopped working and it sucks. Have any of you noticed a cognitive shutdown when depression gets bad? [info] None [info] 1553706851
FredTheManiac [info] I went to therapist once. I was diagnosed with depression. A week later i was hospitalized to get BLOOD TRANSFUSIONS (after a pre-op for a surgery)!!!! Turns out I have iron deficiency anemia and my RBC was very low, which is why I was so fatigued, etc. I don't trust those therapists one bit. [info] None [info] 1443795601
shaza420 [info] Thank you kind internet stranger. I was diagnosed with depression several years ago and was in a really bad point in my life then. I worked myself out of it then, I know I can do it again. This is not a setback; it's just something that happened.Like I said, one day the sun will shine again in my life. It might not be today, and tomorrow doesn't look promising either, but eventually it will happen. Everything happens for a reason. [info] None [info] 1409854603
JayleenSmif [info] Yeah, I really need to get back into therapy. I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed pills with my family doctor. Not to discredit him or anything, but I would have felt a lot more comfortable being placed on medication by an actual psychiatrist since they'd be able to more accurately assess what is going on with me. Thank you for reasserting the importance of therapy, though! I really haven't thought about it much these last few months. [info] None [info] 1529962755
Valdream [info] What to do... I recently started to really question myself about my life and where it is going. I'm a 29 yo french cop, working at the child protection services, and moved to Paris 4 years ago for work reasons and also to join my then recently met gf who lives there. We moved in together and back then everything was perfect. I was in love and my life was finally starting. But now everything is different, my gf hates me, my work is wearing me down, and i have nothing left to cheer me up. I promised her that i'd stop smoking, but she caught me twice cheating this promise, ruining her trust towards me. We had some bad arguings sometimes even ending by me sleeping outside. We live in a small appartment and she's still a student, so I'm the only to rack some cash to make a living for both of us. She even hitted me sometimes but I live by the "never hit a girl" thing so I never responded with or to violence.I left all my family and friends behind me when i moved to Paris and barely keep in touch with them anymore since my gf dislikes them. Now all i have left is my passion for video games which doesn't realmy amuse anymore since I get constant complains from my gf about playing too much or playing crappy games she doesn't like.She has some severe health issues which means she has to be monitored 24h/day. I knew this when i moved in with her and did it willingly, as I thought I was up to the task. But today everything seems different and I don't know anymore. Doubt is gaining me and even after all the harsh stuff we've been through, I think I still love her. I'm a total jerk, I misbehaved a few times and broke her trust, i have memory problems so I often forget important things to do and I fel I deserve her hate. She threatend to leave me twice and she almost did if I ha't run after her in the streets after she left. But now I don't know anymore. I'm not happy with my life and she's not either, but I always get this feeling of "Don't let her go !" whenever we ge to this point of a discussion.I was diagnosed with depression lately and I'm just down all the time, I have to fake smiling and happy feelings just to not hurt her. I'm tired of all this and don't know what to do...I do know that writing all this for some complete strangers to read me will certainly not help me, but I have no one else to speak to about my problems. Suicide is of course not an option and simply thinking of it makes me sick, but I must find a way to adress this issue.Thanks for reading me anyways, feels good to get that off my chest.Yours,V. [info] None [info] 1386581183
shiftius [info] I know, I should have phrased better. I've been diagnosed with depression in the past, and maybe I still have it. But I don't feel sad, which is what a lot of people think when they hear that you're depressed. [info] None [info] 1461076926
CorporalCrazy89 [info] I stared at the thin slip of paper in my hand. Never had this happened before. I have heard of and seen many things in my life, but this was something I never would have expected. Every person receives a card on their 18th birthday, sometimes left in the mail, or delivered at your door. My friend had gotten his a month ago, and it told him the sad truth that he would die on September 8th, 2025, in red text. Two days ago, he was hit in a head-on collision with a drunk driver and died a few hours later in the hospital. Today is September 10th, my birthday. I thought I was prepared for anything. I could not have been more wrong.I've been living alone in a rough neighborhood. My parents had both died, my father when I was little, my mother recently. Seeing as they knew the date of their death they put in all their last efforts to make enough money for me to inherit so I could live comfortably for however long I was given. My mother didn't make much, but she worked her heart out in her last year to do whatever she could for me. I will always be grateful for her despite her overprotective nature she held over me, and her attempts to control my decisions. She always just trying to keep me safe.However, I am, and always have been, a broken man. Things in my life have hardened me far enough where I felt nothing at my friend's funeral. Not a single tear or any identifiable sadness. Just a cold, hard feeling of constant misery and suffering - something that has been plaguing me ever since I can remember. Last year I was diagnosed with depression, but it never came as a surprise. I promised myself to keep going for my mother's sake so she would think I was happy before she died. I didn't want her to know I was considering leaving this corrupt world by my own means. When I opened the mailbox and pulled out the unlabeled envelope, I fully expected to see a date that was very, very soon, in red text. That, I figured, would be the day I decide to end it all. If I tried to commit suicide earlier, I wouldn't be able to die. If I didn't commit suicide on the date given to me, something would happen that would kill me anyway. People have tried both - they never escape the date given to them. Expecting the red text, I opened up the letter, dreading whatever was coming. More than anything, I was fearful of green text. I did not want to be trapped in this world any longer.So there I was, staring at the card. It would either be red, or green. There were no other options. The date on the card read September 10th, 2007 - the day I was born. Even stranger was that the text was neither red or green, but blue. I went to see the doctor and showed him the card. Normally, people don't share their date to others, and many tear their card up rather than reading it. But this was something that had never happened before, and I needed to know if the doctor knew what it meant. What did it mean I would die 18 years ago, the day I was born? Why was the text blue, and not red or green? The doctor stared at the card for what seemed like an eternity. "It can't be possible," he mumbled to himself as he grabbed a book and began flipping through the pages. "What does this mean, doc?" I asked him worriedly. I did not fear death - I feared life. My worst fears were about to come true."I have never seen anything like this before," he replied breathlessly. He simply could not explain it.I went home and looked at my desk. The gun I had been hiding from my mother for years stared at me. I picked it up and stared at it, thinking of what my card meant. There was only one way to find out. I fired the gun and collapsed to the floor. The pain was monumental. But I was alive - fully conscious and alive. I jumped off a cliff, got myself hit by a truck, poisoned myself, and attempted suicide so many times over the next few days. After all these attempts, and staying alive, I finally realized the truth of what the card meant.I was immortal.Why me? [info] None [info] 1557938082
psychotiki [info] Hey there. I'm so sorry you're going through this, and that you feel so alone. The first thing I'll say is that there are thousands, if not millions, of people who feel the same way. I often feel as lost and alone as you do, and I often feel as if I'm losing it. I've had thoughts of giving up, so many times. Feeling worthless is something I have to fight every day. I was diagnosed with depression a few years back, and have been picking myself up ever since. It's hard, and it seems hopeless and never ending, but there are ways out of what you're in. But you can't do it alone. You need support. If not from your family, then from a professional, but preferably both. You sound extremely confused, and I think you would benefit a GREAT DEAL by going and talking to someone (a professional, not just a friend). It does sound like you have some worrying symptoms, but so does most of the world's population, that's the problem with the diagnostic system, almost anyone can qualify for almost any metal disorder. So be wary of self-diagnosis. It could be that because you are unable to talk to anybody and work through all of these thoughts and feelings in a healthy and adaptive way, things are getting exaggerated and confused inside your mind, which is not a good place to be. It could also be that you're seeing the early stages of a psychotic disorder. There is only one way to find out, and that's to go see a therapist or psychiatrist and get yourself properly checked out. Just out of curiosity, why don't you want to talk to your family? How is your relationship with them?Are there any metal health professionals you can speak to? Maybe a school counsellor?  [info] None [info] 1448969440
slop-pail [info] The last horror picture I saw was The Ring. It affected me so terribly, that for 3 years I had to sleep with a light on. I also avoided TV's. I don't know if this had something to do with the schizoaffective disorder, at the time I was diagnosed with depression only, but my imagination used to run uncontrollably wild in the dark. Since then I refuse to watch anything even close to horror.By the way, having animals really help with the night terrors. I'm pretty comfortable in the dark now, because I know there's two dogs and a cat to protect me. :) [info] None [info] 1382624798
Administratr [info] I've been depressed all my life and managed to find sexual relationships and been in love once or twice. As I've gotten older I find myself like you falling head over heels with girls who show the slightest interest in me which worries me cos it's obviously very weird behaviour and not normal. I think as a man we maybe confuse ( I don't know why) simple kindness with attractiveness. As I consider myself worthless and literally don't leave the house unless it's for essentials, it's likely we have trained ourselves down to a very, very small likelihood of interaction occurring and therefore feeling like a lottery win when it occurs.Maybe I'm wrong. I have been diagnosed with depression clinically and was told I have " insight" and with that comes an understanding of the triggers and dangers.There is nothing wrong with feeling attracted to others, it's how we deliver it, saying nice things, compliments and thoughtful conversation instead of " omg boobs marry me" which is likely what our brain is telling us. [info] None [info] 1537880407
SkunkMonkey [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and can say for myself that it does wonders. Every pharmaceutical I was prescribed by doctors had horrible side effects and stopped using them. [info] None [info] 1306211420
xbleach272x [info] Mental Health. A few years ago I was diagnosed with depression, ever since I can remember I've always been depressed and wished to no longer get exist but recently something happened I think other than my mother's death it was probably the worse thing that ever happened to me, I no longer feel strongly about anything.. I no longer care to have any interaction with others, I no longer have any desires I no longer feel depressed because I honestly do not feel anything.. I use to be so emotional but the passed year I haven't felt anything at all and I don't think it's normal. I am just curious to know if this is a red flag? [info] None [info] 1477888918
Phalco [info] Goodnight sweetie I'm tired of telling my wife and daughters goodnight over the phone. I work at a major isp/phone company. I leave for work at ~6:30 in the morning, and it's a guessing game when I will get home. Example: currently it's 7:10 in the evening and I have an hour and a half drive back to the garage where I park my company truck. When I get there I have about 30 minutes of work to do. Once I finish that I have another 30 minutes worth of driving to get home. My wife called me a few minutes ago so she and my girls could say goodnight. I make good money. And my wife does as well, But, I was out of work for about 8 months before I got this job. That put us so far in the hole financially that I'm thinking about getting a second job so I can hope to get above the red sometime in the next few years. I'm already missing my daughter's growing up. I don't know what to do anymore. I don't know why I'm even posting.EditI guess I didn't explain anything, I've been diagnosed with depression in the past. Can't currently afford treatment. The depression is so severe I can't concentrate during work. I've tried to explain what's going on to my wife and she doesn't quite understand what I'm going through. All she thinks is I'm stressed, which isn't necessarily false, the stress is just compounding on the depression. All she knows to say is it will get better soon, and she just kind of looks at me like a deer in headlights.Edit 2:I guess I'm just using this ass a chalkboard. My brother used to understand what was going on and pulled me out of my shell. He's been missing for the last 7 years. Other than him I really don't have any other family. [info] None [info] 1412295421
Torvaun [info] I was diagnosed with depression in the hospital following a suicide attempt.  A month later I tried to follow my plans, and moved away for college.  A fortnight later I called my parents, sobbing, and needing to come back home because I was clearly not up to the stresses. [info] None [info] 1331749774
beauty_from_pain [info] You're definitely not alone. My Nmom did the same thing. She also threatened to take me to a mental institution and leave me behind when I was diagnosed with depression at 13.I'm sorry you went through this. It's emotional abuse and no child should ever be told that they will be abandoned if they do not behave. [info] DoNP [info] 1418856958
FrontpageWatch [info] &gt;So a little bit of a preface:&gt;&gt;I'm 19, a student in the UK, I was diagnosed with depression at sixteen and I'd dealt with it by overeating, skipping on medication and locking myself in my room whilst playing videogames. I used to use dumbells when I was bored, and I paid for a gym membership when I got here in October. I went a few times in the first couple of weeks, but a heavy workload and a lack of motivation (as well as a relapse into depression) meant that I stopped. The Christmas break is over and I got back to university a few weeks ago. I quickly fell back into old habits and was ignoring my work.&gt;&gt;This week, I started going to the gym. I'm not sure why, really. I suppose I got tired of looking like a slob and feeling alone. My New Year's 'goal' as it were was to get healthy, or at least fit, and, like lots of people who start exercising, I suppose I was hoping for a bit more attention from the ladies.&gt;&gt;I've gone five times in the last five days, mostly working on upper body (triceps, biceps, pectorals and lats). Tonight I'm trying legs and core, and here are my thoughts so far.&gt;&gt;1) if you are feeling depressed, you should really consider exercise as a viable aide (though also, certainly see a doctor or professional, SSRI antidepressants have been hugely beneficial to me). It's been about a week, and I feel more motivation, more passion for life, and I no longer lie in bed and think about how shit my life is, I think about how sore my muscles are and how I'll look six, twelve or twenty weeks from now.&gt;&gt;2) There is *NO NEED* to fear being judged at a gym (particularly a university gym). I'm a pretty chubby guy. I wouldn't say I was fat, but I lack any noticeable muscles and have a bit of a beer belly (university). I was really quite worried that people would look at me using the 15kg barbell for curls, particularly the guy stood next to me curling waaaay more. Since I've been going, I've not felt judged or intimidated at all. I've asked a complete stranger to spot me on a bench (even though I was benching very, very little) and he was really up for it. He gave me advice on how to improve my form and kept pushing one last rep out of me. I don't look at the people squatting enormous amounts with fear, I look at them as a goal. A year from now, I won't be there, but I'll be closer than I am right now.&gt;&gt;I went for a 5am jog the other night and, as an ex smoker, I was coughing and panting after a hundred meters. I stopped in the middle of the pavement and felt like I was dying, I was coughing up phlegm, and a jogger passed me. He was in his forties, and he gave me a thumbs up and told me to keep at it.&gt;&gt;3) **Anything is better than nothing.** I might only be curling a 30kg max right now, but it's 30kg more than I was curling two weeks ago. I feel endorphins when I leave the gym and just feel better in who I am, more confident, more motivated. I feel like one day, I'll be comfortable in who I am.&gt;&gt;This really wouldn't have been possible without the /r/Fitness community, where the FAQ and exercise tips have really helped me sort out how to get started and the /r/EOOD community is great for anyone in a similar situation. Thanks, everyone. [info] None [info] 1453226849
harperthepumpkin [info] Took a 2-month T-Break. Decided to come back after I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1452736622
A_Tempting_Ledge [info] Or how about you go be offended on behalf of someone else? I'm diagnosed with depression and autoaggresive behaviour and yet I dont need any keyboard warrior stopping someone from making a joke. Not to mention the joke didn't even put any one in bad light or anything. I don't need you to be offended for me as I'm sure many others would say. Seriously, mind your own business.  [info] None [info] 1529521357
kkburch [info] Is it possible I have some kind of fatigue disorder? I was diagnosed with depression and take low doses of both Cymbalta and Wellbutrin. I'm also anemic and take iron supplements everyday. I'm still exhausted all the time. I could sleep for days on end if I were able to. My family always remembers me being a sleepy person. But around 20 I almost dropped out of college because going to classes was physically exhausting. That was when I was diagnosed as anemic and being treated for other emotional issues. I started taking iron supplements and that as helped some. Just this year (at 27) I started taking anti depressants again. The goal was to increase my interest levels and energy levels. It has helped to some degree as well. My sleepiness is interrupting my ability to live my life. I'm working from home half the week so I can nap during the day. At this point am I just being lazy?   I'm practically connected to a caffeine IV all day long, not sure what else I can do. I eat healthy and workout regularly (I always do when I have the energy to do so). I'm not overweight.  I work a desk job. 27 year old female. Any advice on whats causing this persistent fatigue would be very valuable to me. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1520386480
iGuy243 [info] Hi,You are never alone. Not on this Subreddit, not where you are from, or where you reside. I can relate to the emptiness feeling that you are having. Feeling like you don't know where to go next, it be a convenience store for some milk, or the next chapter in your life.I was diagnosed with depression when I was 17. I fought hard to keep it away by myself. But, it always takes for anyone to have somebody by their side to talk to in these circumstances. If the people you talk to have a feeling you need someone who is medically authorized to tell you what to do next, you should listen to them. Ask your friend to take you to the doctor. They should see your pain and have the care to bring you there.Stay safe. Shalom. [info] None [info] 1530895135
SkyBlueWhale [info] Fuck man. I feel for you. I've been diagnosed with depression for the first time in my life and its fucking weird. People left and right are telling me I'm not depressed. Go see a therapist and keep doing your thing! [info] None [info] 1369006044
GamersBest [info] Lost, confused and ready to give up I posted here once before under a different name when I was at my lowest. I hoped I would never have to post here again, that the help I got would make me a little bit better. But the truth is there is so much wrong with me that I literally cannot take it any more. It's not just the depression for me. There's one other nagging thing eating away at my happiness, that I find it difficult to admit to myself sometimes.I was diagnosed with depression after a failed attempt in October of 2014. I was in hospital over night, observed at almost all hours. I felt like maybe people would be able to help, and because of the diagnosis, I was able to get therapy and medication. I hated the thought of both, but hate depression just a little bit more. I tried to stick with the therapy, but both the therapist and the environment done me no favours. As for the medication, after my second prescription, I have not taken any as I cannot afford to pay almost £15 for two weeks of tablets.But the proper mood breaker is because I can't afford to get the medication, I become more unstable in my attitude. I just want to curl up and be left alone. I can't find work, and am behind on rent. I found out today that I'm overdrawn too and the stress is just getting too much to bear. To top it all off, and this is something I struggle to comprehend 90% of the time is that I am, by all definition, an ephebophile. If that word is unknown to you, by all means google it. I've tried explaining it to people so much recently, to no avail (no surprise there). It's not something I want to be, but I cannot escape the facts.I wonder most nights if I could just be normal; that maybe I can end now and start again.Depending on how today goes, I might post in /r/SuicideWatch if shit gets real bad. [info] None [info] 1423734677
Aliisonify [info] When I was diagnosed with depression at 5 months into the pregnancy it was because I was taken to the emergency room for attempting to overdose on sleeping pills. I didn't take any pills but I was still taken there. In the ER I was just asked a bunch of questions and people evaluated me to see if I needed to be an in-patient or be released back home. They recommend I take anti-depressants but being pregnant it's not safe so the next thing was for me to get counseling. And they agreed it was safe for me to be sent home. If I go back and repeat all that I'm assuming I'll be kept as an in-patient and even though I probably need that, I'm so damn scared. [info] None [info] 1422538154
bozongle [info] After denying it for so long, I was diagnosed with depression last Friday. It feels all too real now. [info]  [info] 1520991044
IamAFortress [info] After 5 months NC... My expwBPD and I broke up about 5 months ago. Life had been wonderful and I've literally been basking in my newfound freedom and life without his insane toxicity and abuse. I was diagnosed with depression and ptsd after our 2yr relationship so needless to say I've had things to work through. I was finally getting to the point where I was beginning to feel completely moved on, where my mind wasnt constantly reminded of him and I wasn't always looking over my shoulder until 2 recent incidents. The first one I saw him waiting at a bus stop very close to my house. He saw me drive by and knows I saw him there. It was the first time I saw him since we broke up and my body immediately went into fight or flight mode again. Heart racing, muscles shaking, lump in my throat. Then about a week later out of nowhere he sends me an email with a simple "look what I came across " and a picture of a valentine's day card I'd given him.I didnt respond so he has no idea I read the email. But it seems to have triggered my mind to be constantly worrying he will show up again. Everywhere I go I'm watching in case he shows up. I've been feeling depressed and anxious again because just those small incidents made my brain snap into a place where hes suddenly occupying space in my mind once again and it's awful. I have no desire whatsoever to have his abuse and dysfunction back in my life and I'm realizing how mind fucked he had me. [info] None [info] 1563890675
Sukram85 [info] Got a job that is perfect on paper. But i hate it and it makes me depressed. What should i do? Hi folks, I work as a Projekt engineer ant a power plant. I earn quite a lot of money for the little work i have to do. What sounds perfekt to most people is really bringing me down. I am bored as fuck, dont like the people around me, I don't do the tasks I am given and i am starting to back down from social stuff and sports.I have been diagnosed with depression a year ago and take herbal medicine and practise daylight therapy. My depression might be relatet to winter blues, because i do not get enough daylight or simply not beeing enough daylight sensitive. Since my treatment thing go pretty well. I got married, became a father and began to study for an MBA title. Everything worked out quite good for a year. But right now I am really feeling bored and down. My Doc said I might suffer from bore-out. Might be similar to burn-out, but you feel depressed because you are bored.I have to say i took a parenting time from my job for 6 weeks. The time with my baby girl was great. But since i came back to work things are becoming dark.Right now i always wake up at 03.30 am and start thinking about problems I don't really have. F.e. how I would solve tasks in the next job i am not jet appliing for. Or for me the worst thing: I think about what i am thinking.I don't really know what really the question is I want answers for, but maybe a discussion might help me overcome my downness and i hope to start doing things again, like continue studiing, doing the tasks I have at work, appliing for new jobs. [info] None [info] 1415263491
CurlyMcSwirls [info] A lot of the people on meirl use humour as a coping mechanism for depression which is absolutely normal. I have been diagnosed with depression and use humour to cope, I understand it's not normal to think like that, and I can guarantee that 90% of that sub also realises that it's not normal.We're not normalising or romanticising Suicidal thoughts. Lots of us legitimately have intrusive suicidal thoughts and humour is one of the few ways we can openly talk about it and feel comfortable.  [info] None [info] 1528468636
monkout33 [info] Never felt so low in my life, hit rock bottom and can not see any point in living. I was diagnosed with depression early last year after suffering from it for years beforehand, ever since then my life has been a constant struggle to keep myself from ending it all. I barely made it past my final year of high school last year, I always felt anxious and uneasy at school probably due to the social aspect of it. I just could not focus on anything at all both in and out of school. There were times when I had to ask the teacher to go to the toilet only to lock myself in and bawl my eyes out because of how miserable I was feeling.My doctor put me on Zoloft for the majority of last year but to be honest the only thing it really did was make it harder to masturbate. It also made me feel like a zombie in school which made it even harder to focus on studying. As I graduated and carried on with my life I watched as my friends and schoolmates went on to study at uni/college, making me feel like dirt as I procrastinated at home without a job or any form of studying.Earlier on this year, my father passed away, leaving a massive hole in my heart that constantly gnaws away at me, the way it sneaks up on me from time to time is very painful, I'll see my friend argue with his dad and just be reminded of how I once was doing the same with my father.I was seeing my school counselor and a psychologist at the same time at one point, and while it did help to talk through some of my issues, I often left feeling unsatisfied and still depressed.My depression often comes and goes in waves, some days I'll be feeling happy and carefree, while on other days I'll just want to stay in bed and never come out. I mostly waste my days playing video games, guitar, and watching tv shows, I think sometimes it's a nice escape from reality.The friend groups I hang out with are completely different from each other and sometimes I feel like I'm losing my best friends and distancing them by hanging out more with other groups. I feel like shit for not communicating more with them.All attempts at finding a part time job have been unsuccessful despite applying at a huge amount of places, I'm beginning to think that living off government funding is what I'll be stuck with forever.It has been a year since I finished high school and in that time I have drifted around doing absolutely nothing productive at all, sleeping during the day and procrastinating at night, feeling like a piece of shit for being alive with occasional suicidal thoughts entering my mind. If anyone takes the time to read all this I really appreciate it, it made me feel better even typing it all out, I just really need someone or something to vent to right now, I honestly have no idea what to do with myself. [info] None [info] 1418237552
Thecleanbubble [info] Talk to a bartender.  Or look around a college campus.  But tread lightly when mixing weed and depression.  I smoke weed and I'm diagnosed with depression.  It's a very rocky road for me personally.  There are some days where weed works wonders for me, and then there are other days where weed makes it a lot harder.   [info] None [info] 1491528147
Swordildo [info] I don't know why I'm often suicidal in such an aggressive and paralysing way and I don't know why. I've been diagnosed with depression, I'm in treatment and overall I can see that life is pretty good but HOLY SHIT I WANT TO DIE [info]  [info] 1470611408
GunsAndKnives [info] Dude, that's exactly my problem. Driving to work/to and from school, I sometimes have just a mini breakdown. I'm diagnosed with depression though, and my therapist said this is definitely a symptom of it. It's not all the time, but the weeks that are extra depressing it happens to me.  [info] 18 [info] 1495584761
drostie [info] I was clearly an atheist when I first frequented this reddit; I now awkwardly frequent a Christian church and have spent a lot of time chanting Mahayana Buddhist mantras and meditating. Mahayana is the more-spiritualist Buddhism where you believe in celestial bodhisattvas who you can e.g. implore to help you.The central aspect in my adopting Mahayana practices was curiosity. I first off felt like as an atheist physicist that I had found a basic five-pointed formula for understanding the essence of what is righteous; I figured that these concepts could be found within all religions and they nicely sidestep the bullcrap about "all religions are correct!" with a nice "all religions are good flawed ways to point to the correct thing." That is, the purpose of our lives is to live heroically and religions put us on the path of heroes and maybe give us baby-steps on how to walk it.I therefore got very interested in comparative religions. I amassed a lot of knowledge about Vedic religion and a good chunk of those many postVedic religions that we lump together under "Hinduism." A man who once ridiculed his a girlfriend for having a statue of Ganesh in her dorm room and reading the Upanishads was now reading the Puranas. The problem here was that even though I had a concrete understanding of the belief clusters, the practices of the faithful were much harder to come by. It's not just that you enroll for a yoga class and have no idea how authentic any of that stretching actually is; it's that without being immersed in that culture and festivals and such, you just have sort of a daily Puja that reminds you that you are testing the waters and that's it. I longed for a nearby Hare Krishna temple so that I could immerse myself that way, but no dice.So then since India had captured my heart but Hindu practices seemed so impossibly inaccessible from the city that I happened to be in, I took my 5-points analysis and bought a buckwheat-filled *zafu* and started meditating. And this was wild and unfocused and not very meaningful, so I went to that Indian-religion-that's-since-disappeared-from-India known as Buddhism, started to try to learn more about how they meditate, and what they believe. Except, even there, you need to make choices about whether you want the modern conservative antispiritualist Theravada tradition of Sri Lanka and Thailand or the older but more subversive supernaturalist Mahayana traditions that became more popular in China/Japan (Zen, Tibetan, and Pure Land Buddhisms). Before I could choose and was still learning, what I found was a bunch of really wise teachers (Ajahn Brahm and the Dalai Lama, if you want to look up some basic talks), who had seemingly discovered how to make anyone listening relax, open up, and smile. It was Tara who captivated me. She is depicted with green skin to remind you that she is out of this world, on a lotus to show that she has sprung up out of the muck of this world, and her leg is hanging off of the lotus to let you know that she is ready to spring up from meditation to help normal people out. Her power is embedded by sound into the cosmos, the sounds *Om Tare tuttare ture svaha*, and she comes in many other colors besides the Green Tara mentioned, depending on what precisely you need. But suddenly whenever I was in a calm green place, I found myself muttering that mantra, quieting my mind, seeing things far off rather than being consumed in my thoughts of the moment. Tara-devotion then got me diving more into Tibetan Buddhism in particular. I still think fondly of those days, as they coincided with me getting my life together: in a couple short years I went from living in my parents' basement in upstate New York to living in my own apartment in the Netherlands; from having no degrees at all to a Master's in Applied Physics; from being 123 kg (271 lb) to being 92 kg (203 lb) and athletic; from having a few scattered friends to having a strong social life with lots of people of all stripes. I have been diagnosed with depression, which for me takes the form of negative thoughts multiplying and multiplying until they fill my head. This shift towards mindfulness really gave me a place to sit where the negative thoughts would stop multiplying and slowly fizzle out.Then came a relationship which has been equal measures of amazing and toxic. I uprooted myself from this life in the Netherlands to live near Kansas City, Missouri -- to be with a girl I had met while writing novels online. She made it clear that she was deeply Christian and deeply convicted that we were doing a Wrong Thing according to a popular misinterpretation of 2 Corinthians 6:14. I knew the scriptures pretty well from being a Christian fundamentalist apologist in high school, before I had a political catastrophe which I resolved by attempting to blaspheme the Holy Spirit to prove a point that I was never going back to fundamentalism again (the sequence of events that led to my atheism). I tried to point out that one of her favorite verses, the oft-quoted Jeremiah 29:11, is actually in the context of God saying that it's good for believers to date pagans, and that St. Paul's advice in 1 Cor 17 directly contradicts this, saying that it's okay for Christians and nonChristians to be married; v14: "For the unbelieving husband has been sanctified through his wife, and the unbelieving wife has been sanctified through her believing husband." Moreover there is a clear connection between the themes of 1 Cor (against people pretending to be both part of Christianity and other mystery faiths, eating at the other faiths' meals to get some delicious grub) and that this seems to be the clearest understanding of 2 Cor 6:14-16, which does not mention marriage in the slightest (unlike the quotes I was providing) but rather seems to mention idols and temples and Belial (hence being about keeping on with pagan practices now that you're Christian).Alas, I'm a big softie and she couldn't trust my advice because I wasn't a committed Christian, so I started to go to church again and profess my faith in Jesus. My exercise dropped to near-0, my weight skyrocketed back past where it was (I am now 133 kg, 293 lb.) and my sense of inner peace is pretty eroded. I grasp after the hope that this Creator really wants to be in a relationship with me, but I feel only the most muted strains that might be that; and I worry that possibly in committing an unforgivable sin, Christianity might be 100% right but also 100% inaccessible to me. Following love has not been kind to me, but what other option do I have? The tip of the 5 points that guide me is transformative love, and it is the deep reason why I followed this crazy path to the Netherlands and got my life together. Moreover, I'm well enough trained as a scientist that I know that none of these correlations are necessarily causations either way.I'm considering returning to chanting, though, even if I risk destroying this thing with my girlfriend with this dangerous experiment. That applied physicist in me basically still wants to run a test that controls for change-in-country even if I cannot properly double-blind myself or anything. [info] None [info] 1463594174
jsk108 [info] It's helped me when I've been depressed as well. In fact, that's when I used it and it helped me the most. And I know there's a difference... I was diagnosed with depression, among other things. [info] None [info] 1500290804
colexthoughts [info] Yeah I was diagnosed with depression last year. Haven’t really been the same in a while. I used to love Christmas, but now I just see it as another reminder that no matter how many people I’m surrounded by I’ll still always feel alone. Anyways thanks for the nice message. Merry Christmas.  [info] None [info] 1545708450
Alavea [info] Hey thanks for replying,And yeah, I've been diagnosed with depression and PTSD, some other unimportant stuff too but thats not something I wanna go into.I've been struggling so much with self worth, like you apparently, and currently don't have a therapist or anyone to talk to really.I think that helped a little, your reply I mean.Look, I'd like to talk and talk about a issue I have, but if you're struggling yourself this might not be for you.I'd like to write it down, just for my own person peace of mind, but this isn't anything you need to bother with or even read.So thank you very much for answering me :) [info] None [info] 1573245155
RacyFry [info] How to cope with ADHD without medication in a country where mental health care is stigmatized? I live in a small town in India. Here  amphetamines are illegal and methylphenidates like Ritalin are not supplied to common pharmacies as ADHD is not a popular diagnosis. People talk about making schedules to cope but not able to stick to schedules I make have been my primary problem. Earlier this year I attempted suicide and ended up in therapy. I was diagnosed with depression and some levels of OCD traits. Turns out my undiagnosed ADHD was the root of all problems. I cannot continue therapy any longer as there is a lot of stigma attached to mental health problems here and my parents want to cut off therapy to save their face (I'm a girl in young 20s, it will affect my family's reputation). School and college was easy for me, I never paid attention to any classes but I could get away with enough marks by cramming the night before exams. But adulting has been tough. I've not been able to stick to a job, I've been disappointing loved ones and colleagues with my chronic inattentiveness and procrastination habits. I've tried things like yoga and meditation but I'm just not able to stick with something for long. How can I cope! Please help! Seeking medical help is out of question! [info] None [info] 1545933842
rtjy [info] I went against my own rule I went on tumblr (yeah I think you know where this is going) to follow up on some art blogs I follow, when I came across a post about a recent spike in hate crimes.  What followed was an hour of hopeless article hopping just to feed my bias and possibly raise my self esteem.  Thankfully, I stopped myself from going down the political rabbit hole before it got any worse.As I snapped myself out of it, I felt upset at the world but mostly with myself.  I  broke my own rule of avoiding political posts.  Sometimes when I do come across one, I just scroll right past it.  Because if I do, I'll relapse into a bitter ball of hatred.  Ever since my diagnoses of depression, I tried to avoid things that trigger me.Why did I start a tumblr account despite me being fully aware of its reputation for being politically correct to a sickening degree?  Well I joined to follow artists who... ummm... let's say draw "very lovely" art.  Maybe some funny memes, but that's it. But why did I look at the post despite my pledge to avoid all things political?  Well, after both this and last presidential election, I made a vow to always avoid polarizing politics.  That belief hardened when I was diagnosed with depression.  But there was a side affect to this vow.  I grew this nagging inner voice that scolded me every time I avoided political discussion of any kind.  It would always say that I am some stupid blob of a person who doesn't care about my country and would rather lounge around and watch tv instead of fighting for the rights of other people.But the thing is I do deeply care for other people.  I empathize with hate crime victims and others who are/will be hurt by Trump's presidency and my heart goes out to them.  The thing is that I avoid politics because I cannot get angry over things I can't control; that's what led me to have depression in the first place.  Another reason is.. well.. this is going to sound both bold and sappy, but... I want to be one of the people who wants to heal the political divide, and one of the many things that is creating it are the toxic political posts on social media.Besides, I need to focus on me right now.  I have to work on my career goals, get money for taxes, and work on moving into a new place.  Also, I just racked up $650 in unexpected expenses this past week and I don't need politics making it worse. [info] None [info] 1488916766
KAMIKAZEOVERCOMMAS [info] I understand, it's a motivational issue. I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago. I'm good now. One thing I'll tell you is that you'll NEVER be "ready" to get out of bed. It's really a matter of forcing yourself out of bed. You can't "think" yourself out of these issues. That's why it's rare for someone to fully crawl out of it. I don't blame this guy for his depression, if anything I empathize with him and would love to talk with him anytime. BUT, you'll never "feel" ready to overcome this, your mind will give you a 1000 reasons to stay in the state you are, but you have to rewire your mindset through exercise, a healthier diet, a better lifestyle, etc. There's no magic pill no matter what people may claim.  [info] None [info] 1447081165
kittenmommy [info] Welcome!  I'm so glad you found us!  And thanks for Business!Kitteh! 😹&gt; Is it weird that I don't feel any love towards my mother. No, not at all.&gt; I don't feel hate either - I just feel nothing. Do you feel any love towards your mother.I used to hate my mother, but like you I'm now indifferent. &gt; I've been diagnosed with depression. . and I am currently taking antidepressants. My mum says there is nothing wrong with me and that I've had a wonderful upbringing and that I'm just ungrateful. Is this something that resonates with you guys?Her attitude?  Oh yeah.But she's wrong.  Depression is a brain chemistry thing; it really has *nothing to do with upbringing*.  Even people who had picture-perfect, non-abusive childhoods with supportive, loving parents can develop depression.  You can even tell her this!But yeah, IMO being raised by a BPD certainly doesn't *help*. 😒Welcome home!*hugs*PS.  If you have any other Reddit account(s), please [message the mod team](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fraisedbyborderlines) to let us know.  We promise to keep this info in the strictest confidence - thanks! 💗 [info] Your Fearless Leader, Survivor of uBPD Mom [info] 1513548626
vero13 [info] If you're not already in therapy, and can be, do it. I was diagnosed with depression and severe OCD when I was 18, and even though the medication helped, therapy was the key. I'm still in therapy 5 years later, but I have made so, so much progress. If you ever need to talk to someone about it, please feel free to contact me. [info] None [info] 1409064925
hero-but-in-blue [info] Very angry music. It sounds like bs but it actually helps to just sing a song that is just brutal with the lyrics. I have been diagnosed with depression and my mom had me tested by two different doctors because she thinks our (middle of the middle class) life style is so perfect there’s no way her son could be depressed. Because of that mindset I probably won’t get any meds until I’m 18. When I got the news it’s almost as if things got worse because I actually knew for a fact something was wrong. One day about two months after my diagnosis I found Eminem  on my music app and the anger in his lyrics actually changed something in me. After I found him it was basically the only thing I listened to until I memorized all of the parts to all of his songs. Sometimes just being angry and getting it out of your system is all you need.Now I’m not saying that angry RAP music is the only genre that has this effect, also indie rock music also does the trick as well as some sad music. This is what works for me at least and I hope op can get through what they are dealing with. music is not better than medication if you have access to it use it! [info] None [info] 1558014965
frostfluid [info] I hope to kill myself by next year I'm just tired of living. I was diagnosed with depression in 10th grade and ive been feeling this way since 9th grade. My mom was evicted from our apartment, so we had to move in with grandma. I was expelled from school in 10th grade. My mom and dad are fighting in court again. I'm always subject to be complained about by grandma because I'm breaking the house. Despite the fact that whenever there is a problem like say the house is infested with fruit flys she just ignored it so mch until it doesn't register to her as a problem. My dad once showed me a documentary about people in Liberia and how I shouldn't be depressed because there are people who have it worse then me. Honestly I'm planning on killing myself by either my 17th birthday or early winter next year. Nothing has gotten better despite the fact how mother tells me thing's will get better eventually. And the worst part is I have people who tell me I'm not depressed despite being medically diagnosed with it. I'm done [info] None [info] 1574018574
_chirpchirp [info] I’m not supposed to be here and I need help I don’t really know how to get people to respond on here cuz I’m sorta new, but I really need to talk to someone. I have this issue that I’m never able to process. So I was diagnosed with depression when I was very young (I’m 21 now) so it’s always been an issue. But about 4 years ago I suffered from meningitis. I almost died. I don’t remember much because I was so sick l, but I do remember when someone came to talk to my parents and told them to prepare for the worst. I don’t know how to explain it, but one minute I was scared I was dying, but the sicker I got, the more comfortable I became with the fact I was going to die. It felt comforting, like it was supposed to happen and I was ready. I was in so much pain, but when my subconscious finally excepted it, the rest of me did to and I stopped feeling the pain. It’s hard to explain the feeling of knowing you’re dying unless you’ve been though it. But long story short, I survived.  I was happy to have survived and so grateful. However, since then, and I don’t know if it’s because of this situation or something else, but I can’t shake the feeling that I’m not supposed to be here. Everyone tells me it’s Gods way of saying I’m supposed to live, but I feel so out of place. Like my mind and body are separate. I don’t want to die, but yet, if I did.. I’d be ok with it. Like I feel like I was supposed to die when I was sick and I’m being punished for surviving.. I never really talk about this but it’s something i think about when I’m at my worst and I need opinions that won’t say “it’s Gods way” or “ it’s meant to be” anyone else been through something like this??? [info] None [info] 1573100125
BraveSink7 [info] Idk why no one is reading my post or maybe I just didn't write it correctly. I am diagnosed with depression (runs in the family) I'm also diagnosed with tons of development disorders which makes socialising hell, especially with women. I wouldn't want to date someone because they are emotionally vulnerable, but rather we both may have the same day to day issues and can empathise and relate to each other greater. Sort of like dating for people whom are hiv positive. It's not a good idea for hiv positive people to date people but I see nothing wrong with them dating others with the same condition [info] None [info] 1564581941
PooSham [info] I'm embarrassed too. I was diagnosed with depression last year, but I really think the problem lies in my disability to concentrate. I've tried to give some hints (like usual ADD-symptoms), but he just said I'm depressed. Now I don't feel depressed any more because I took a year off and didn't stress over stuff, but I still feel like I can't concentrate, and I know I've been like this my entire life. I don't feel like calling him again and telling him though. [info] None [info] 1332953437
thatkittymika [info] 2 days sober and got not much information to help. But hopefully i can help your perspective. You sound exactly like me. You want weed not to be the problem so bad you've convinced yourself its not. I've been smoking on and off for two years and recently became a chronic user. I was diagnosed with depression and could barely work. I blamed it all on my "illness" even though I'd had depression before and it felt different. Depression is way easier to blame because we all hate depression - weed is harder to develop a negative view of. I've also had a pretty cruisy life. Nothing like yours - yet i was still ensnared by the black hole. For me it made less sense - "i am so happy! Or my life should be... Why am i not? Weed will help me forget the fact that im not."Please be honest with yourself. It seems shocking that such a small thing is affecting you so much, but it is. Smoking isn't helping your emotions. It isn't helping you get to school. All these commenters are right. I am 2 days sober and already feeling so much better. Please, please, please, try to listen to all the other commenters - they have very good advice.  [info] None [info] 1540945809
miles49503 [info] I was diagnosed with depression 4 years back, still suffer with it quite daily. It is more than just being sad, its the loss of all feelings, its like a cloud of gray that floats over me, blocking out all the color of life, I don't even cry anymore, I don't feel pain, happiness, sadness, or anything. I hope your friend feels better [info] None [info] 1574296912
bichimiAllen [info] There is no justice anymore So, last year I found out my dad is suing me for "taking advantage of him" by taking alimony ever since I was 13 years old when he left. I'm 26 now. And the thing is: for most of my childhood he abused me and my siblings constantly, him and his brothers and my older cousins would do things to us, from sexual abuse to just physical and emotional abuse. For almost all my childhood, I was in kindergarten and learned to make myself so small I would not be seen or noticed. My older brother got frequently humilliated in public by my dad and we'll, he was just a bad person.Eventually, my mom was able to get us away from him and set herself free. I'm still scared of loud noises because it reminds me of his outbursts sometimes. Im also scared of the dark and when men try to be intimate with me I almost always have panic attacks. On top of that I was diagnosed with depression and it got to a point where I couldn't finish college because I just felt like dying. I just.. suicidal thoughts were so common on a daily basis and I was basically just thinking "soon,soon I'll die" but at the same time I didn't want to die. I just didn't. So I dropped out of college, and tried my hand at being a freelance artist, still receiving alimony from him because I know is the one thing that hurts him. It has been rough, but it's what I dreamed of doing ever since I was little, I've wanted to tell stories, and I've loved to draw. But sadly, the world is not nice to artists and it doesnt leave much money. Well, now he's suing me over it and it looks like he might just win and stop paying it or reduce it considerably. Today my lawyer told me that. And I know it makes no sense to feel bad over it,but I do.I can't feel any other way about it. I feel is unfair because I've got to live my entire life with what he did, what him and his family did to us, and the one way he could pay for it was that, because he didn't care for anything ever other than his own money. It's the one way I can hurt him in an even remotely similar way than what he did to us. And now even that I won't be able to do. I must admit I knew I couldn't keep doing it forever but I never knew it'd end like this.it somehow feels like he wins, like I have no chance to win against him ever  and now he's even dusting me off, the one repercussion he had for all the awful stuff he did to us, just like it's nothing so he can finally forget about us while we have to live with what he did forever. I feel trapped and completely crushed and I feel like he will always win and no matter what I do hell always be present even if he isn't, like he ruined my life and then gets to feel the satisfaction of winning again. I want to die. I think if I had died then it'd be easier. If I had died back when I was little maybe my mom could've had a case against him and people would've believed her and then at least he'd be in jail and my siblings would have justice. But I didn't and now justice doesn't exist and even more so, he gets to win again. I'm sorry, I just wanted to vent and I didn't know where to do it. I just had to get it all out of my chest. [info] None [info] 1580112132
dirty_hanzo_mains [info] I was diagnosed with depression and ADD, it really only affected the medication they prescribed me.  The ADD has never really come into play, it was the depression that was weighing me down.  Bupropion is magic. [info] None [info] 1492729827
InquisitiveAboutYou [info] If inflammation might be an issue, look into intermittent fasting. That's something I do for health benefits, it's been known to severely decrease inflammation. I had the same problem. I was diagnosed with depression but no medicine or therapy helped me. I looked into alternatives and found seasonal depression. Still no medicine or therapy worked (vit D supplements, light therapy etc). I've had a total of 26 diagnoses tested on me, nothing stuck. So in the end I just left, went to a warm country to test it out. Good idea.Just go, if necessary only for a few months. Rent a flat or something and see how you're responding to the different environment. [info] None [info] 1560253813
uncomfortablebases [info] I have borderline personality disorder. Before being diagnosed I saw the symptoms listed in a class and I was like: "Huh...I do most of that..." (at the time I was diagnosed with depression). So I made an appointment and my psychiatrist officially diagnosed me with bpd and I was just like "lol I knew it" [info] None [info] 1502586252
puuvillakoira [info] I have a question I don’t actually know what I should do. I’m kind of struggling whether should I keep trying to contact my violent, alcoholic dad or should I just let him do his thing. He has not contacted me in 6 years. Not even when my mom, who raised me all by herself, died on cancer two years ago when I was 18. I have been diagnosed with depression and PTSD. It just starting to feel like nothing is really helping. Kind of ironic that I am living in Finland, which is officially #1 happiest place on earth.EDIT: I'm on medication and have been talking to a therapist for over a year. Sometimes it all just comes crashing down since I'm broke and currently unemployed. I was doing pretty good for over a year but then my depression hit again. [info] None [info] 1565807306
IfYouHaveGhosts824 [info] Four years ago, I was diagnosed with depression. I was managing a work project and it failed miserably. Some employees quit, we lost money – it was awful, and I had nobody to blame for it but myself. I was convinced my dreams were never going to come true and that I was destined to be a failure. Right as I was about to kill myself, a thought popped into my head: “If I'm dead, who's going to take care of Mom and Dad when they get old?”Just like that, it was over. Something changed in me. I was still horribly depressed, but I knew killing myself wasn't the right option. I was sick and tired of being depressed, and I was desperate to make a change for the better. I went to the doctor and they prescribed me Zoloft. It wasn't a one-and-done fix, but it was the first of many steps towards feeling better. I opened up to my family about what I was feeling. Not only did they take sympathy on me, but they gave me the finances to get my life together. It would've been so much easier to slam the door in my face, but they called me to check on me and offered me a place to stay when I needed it. If it wasn't for them, I probably wouldn't be here. Fast-forward several years. My life is now better than it's ever been. I have my dream job and I'm happier than ever before. Things are so great, I honestly can't imagine being gone. I've made it my mission in life to help other people who are struggling, the same way my family helped me when I was struggling. In a weird twisted way, I'm grateful for going through depression when I did. I had to be broken before I could be made whole again. It taught me some valuable life lessons and changed the way I look at the world. It taught me how to appreciate the good days and realize the bad days are only temporary. Being in a dark place taught me how to be more sympathetic to other people. It taught me everyone is fighting a battle we know nothing about, and sometimes, something as simple as a smile or compliment can make somebody's whole day. If it wasn't for going through depression, I doubt I would be as happy as I am now. In the end, it made me into a better person. I'm sorry for what you're going through, but I hope you can find it within you to keep pushing forward. I wish you all the best in the days ahead. You can do this – I believe in you! [info]  [info] 1533758027
flyingspaceheaters [info] Holy shit one type of pill I was on made me nearly suicidal. I was diagnosed with depression 10 years ago, and I *still* have never felt so low as I did on that BC. The last straw was when I randomly burst into tears while driving and had to pull over because I couldn't stop crying. Switched to an IUD and have had no problems since. It's some scary shit.  [info] None [info] 1502763227
fifififi100 [info] Honestly I don’t think I made any. I was diagnosed with depression near the holiday season in 2017 so I didn’t feel like I should. That’s definitely changing this year and I will follow through with my resolutions no matter how hard they might seem at times [info] None [info] 1546365794
albinisweenie [info] Vent &lt;3 I was diagnosed with depression when I was around 13 and I will be 19 in a month. I’ve experienced many traumas due to shitty family life, abusive relationship that completely ruined my mind and I feel that I can never mentally recover from that caused me to drop out of the 10th grade, abusive and toxic friendships, etc. this coming January, I am scheduled for a psychiatric evaluation to see what I’m dealing with besides The aforementioned depression and ADHD I was diagnosed with at around 7. I was on ADHD meds until about 14. I was recently prescribed Vyvanse but it makes me too anxious to function. I have never been as productive and stable as I was in elementary school and I don’t know how to get that back. At this point, I feel that I will never accomplish anything because I make myself feel that I’m not equipped to handle even the simplest jobs. I’ve quit smoking and drinking and gone vegetarian but I’m still 40 pounds heavier than I’d like to be. I genuinely feel that I peaked in intelligence when I was 12 and in terms of looks when I was underweight at 16. I have no idea where I am headed in life, I doubt that I’ll able to find a decent and successful career path that I’ll be able to handle. I’ve been in a mental fog for the past few years that I don’t think I’ll ever escape. I have an amazing boyfriend that lived two states away who is the love of my life but I’ve felt him pulling away for the past two months and possibly getting bored of me and it’s making my extreme trust issues and paranoia resurface so I’m not sure how long I can cope with these feelings. I barely leave my house at this point, compared when I used to go see friends and drink every single weekend. I feel like I’ve destroyed my life before it’s even had the chance to truly begin. [info] None [info] 1532977729
ChookityPOH [info] Should i get into poly although i didn't even try monogamous? Hey there, I'm a 22M who recently met an amazing poly 34F, i've never did sex in my life and i have zero experience with relationships. I feel like i want her so hard but i'm not sure if it will be healthy to me to get into a poly relationship although I've never experienced a monogamous one with literally zero experience. We met at some kind of a 2 day event (I'm not sure what is the right word for this at english but whatever), and i had the most amazing night with her in my life, we curled up and had a very deep conversation through almost whole night, she told me she is interested in a relationship with me and i feel like i want this too but the poly part is kinda scaring the shit out of me. I'm diagnosed with depression for almost 4 years and relationship issues can deeply hurt me (even the most common ones), I'm very sensitive and emotionally unstable and i'm not sure what should i do.I'm not a poly adverse, i simply don't know if it is the right thing for me specifically at this part of my life considering my experience with relationships, i'm very open minded about everything, i hate rules (especially social rules) and i'm not willing to deny ideas only because most people do, but I'm not sure if is this one of those cases. [info] None [info] 1581887876
xxxFanFic [info] I mean I've been diagnosed with depression so yeah  [info] 15 [info] 1500059941
windy_beans [info] Oh, no not at all. I hope you don't mind a rather long text.tl;dnr: Can't tolerate people,  alsmot complete isolation, breakdwon, medication. TR: Deprression, Psychotherapy and ClincI find it extremely hard to be in places with a lot of people (not like a sold out stadium neither  10 just in the same room). I seem to see and smell everything. I thee public Transportation for everything (it's quit normal in Switzerland, there is no need for a car in the city)and therefore I see a lot of things, that make me so angry and lost. If someone puts his shoes on the seats or if some speaks obnoxiously loud and (I am absolutely aware that this is what I feel) talks about annoying and (to me) irrelevant stuff, I can't shut it out. OR if I see an elderly woman alone in the city (they are just minding der own business, not looking sad, ill or anything) I could just start to cry because I am convinced that the person is so sad inside. And again, I am aware that this is exactly what I feel inside but that normally does not help a lot. It just confirms my inner feeling of not fitting anywhere and not being able to understand how everyone seems to really want to live. I am very lucky and privileged, I have a very nice job, an amazing supporting family and a hand full of very close and understanding friends and a loving Boyfriend (we've slit up last year).But that brings me to another point where I struggled hard with my strict schedules. I try to be on PT during rush hours and I had to be at home am 05:00 (in the evening) even if I was bored at home and would liked to go shopping or anything else. I just wanted to make sure, I can avoid people and therefore be a little bit less stressed. In the end I isolated my self extremely. I could barely make a date with my friends because it was so exhausting to be out there and  having to absorb everything around you 24/7. No one else seems to notice all the smells, the sounds and all the conversation near by. My friends never gave up  on me but I had huge arguments with my family (consisting of my Mom and my beloved Twin sister who is the bright opposite of me and understands me the most, no jealousy from me towards her, never. She is just the most lovable person out there) since I would cancel most of our family diners on a short-term (we all live close to each other) because I was already worn out by the normal day and knew I would want to leave after maybe 1-1.5 hours. My mum always gets so mad about this, she finds it unacceptable to be invited and the leave quickly. Kinda absurd, because the 3 of us have a very strong loving bond but my mom switches to a very angry sturdy person she normally never exhibits if the topic is about me and my ways of living (not wanting to have diner often with them or cancelling on a short note and not being able to change the day I wandet to do laundry (which would absolutely not be a problem  technically and stuff like that. Chores or ideas that I had in my schedule and the longer I did this, the closer those schedule time windwos became. I am in therapy since 22 Years (I'm 29 now) and it never was visible that I live inside my own space where I could tolerate very few people.I have to say I am a librarian and talking and working with people is not a problem at all, I love all of my colleagues we have a very caring office. So yeah, sorry, getting sidetracked ;-) Suddenly I could not go out with my BF and his friends and then I could no longer go out with him, because I was mostly on diets and I was miserable often around food and just did not want to have to endure that and decided to stay in. And in 2017 my carefully planed and developed Schedule system just broke down within days. I ended up in a psychiatric clinic  (I was diagnosed with depression since I was 12 years old and  on softly changing medication since then) I was very devestated because I do not fit in the depression clinical picture nore in any others. So no medication ever really helped me.Until I've me a fantastic Psychologist  during my second week in the clinic. We had 2 sessions and then he put his note pad down, looked my in the eyes and said "You are not mentally ill, you most certainly do not have manic disorders, you have a very distinct ADHD with a depression because of that. And then I remember taking Ritalin during my professional education shortly and that I was diagnosed when I was in Kindergarden. But it never occured to me, that this would be more than not being able to focus (which I felt was not that bad). He proceeded to give me methylphenidate and within dayys I was feeling so much better.Since then : I have found a new Psychologist and Psychiater who are specialised on ADHD in adults. She changed the medication once and it made so much easier. I am able to tolerate people way more, I can at least bring my thoughts in order. I can decide if a chore is super important or if I could go out with friends and dust the bookshelf the next day.I also have a faint feeling of what it is to be "normal" I noted, how different I see and experience the world. [info] None [info] 1570373818
The_Korean_Zombie [info] I used to trust my gut in terms of acting impulsively. As I gotten older, I like to get feedback from people more knowledgable than myself to assist me to form conclusions. A lifetime of experiencing consequences from my actions conditioned me to this point.I am not sure if I am introverted. My whole life until I was diagnosed with depression I was energized by people and would get bored outta my mind without them. Nowadays, I appreciate alone time as long as I have internet and games. I can only play multiplayer games, not sure if that means anything. I chill with my girlfriend on the weekends.Whenever I take online tests I land as a STP or NTP. It's like I grew up as an ESTP, then turned into an INTP, ENTP, then an ISTP. Appreciate the feedback. [info] None [info] 1571374018
bisonyourface29 [info] Yes the drug causes depression, yes I have been diagnosed with depression, no the Dr has not said the drug caused the depression. I got the drug and diagnosis about 12 years apart from different Doctors.  [info] None [info] 1453398894
akadani [info] I think you just described me. I was diagnosed with depression almost a year ago, and what struck me with Bojack is how they handle the illness, compared to other TV shows. Bojack doesn't lie around and wait to die, and if you watch any other shows with a depressed character, you can see that that's all people think we're capable of doing. Bojack isn't an angel, but he's not as huge of an asshole as most people make him out to be. He just lets his emotions dictate a lot of what he says or does. The point is, he isn't some generic depressed character who's recovering from trauma and can't even leave his house. He acts like a real person. (Or horse, I suppose.) [info] None [info] 1431384575
Perthguv [info] In the past I was diagnosed with depression by a GP but he didn't suggest any treatment or anything else at all. He just said: you have depression. I have had it off and on ever since but have never sought treatment. With anti-depressant drugs, you don't have to be scared of them but you do need to pay attention. When you start taking them you may have some strange side effects or they may not work. If either of these happen then talk to your GP. There are a lot of anti-depressants and it might take a few times to find the one that works for you.https://www.mayoclinic.org/diseases-conditions/depression/in-depth/antidepressants/art-20046273Something to consider is that research shows that cardio exercise is also an effective treatment for depression in some people. "For some people it works as well as antidepressants, although exercise alone isn't enough for someone with severe depression," https://www.health.harvard.edu/mind-and-mood/exercise-is-an-all-natural-treatment-to-fight-depression [info] Kewdale [info] 1573531183
arxius2000 [info] First time post I was diagnosed with depression in February after I tried to kill myself. I've lost relationships and I've pushed away people I care about because I feel like I'm going to hurt them if they get close to me. I'm scared to get into new relationships because I don't won't them to worry about and trying to work out a relationship with someone that wants to die. I just want to lock myself away from everything and die in a corner. I'm sorry if this sounds dumb I've never done anything like this before. [info] None [info] 1562207028
Jydani [info] Jesus Christ, this pisses me off. What's worse is when DOCTORS do the same thing for normal emotions! I was diagnosed with depression around the age of 9-10 and bi polar later. Why? Because my grandmother died and I moved in with my aunt and uncle. I was sad, but I wasn't fucking depressed. That's where the diagnosis for depression came in. The bi polar came in around preteen years, when my aunt and uncle didn't understand what it was like to raise a child my age (they had an almost 1 year old when I moved in). So they thought me growing up was a sign of being bi polar. Actually, a lot of the way I acted to be diagnosed with bi polar was from the anti depressants. They really messed with my head in too many ways. Around 15-16 years old, a different doctor told my aunt to take me off of all my medication, that he believed I didn't need it. She didn't want to, but tried it anyways (can't tell you how many times I begged to stop taking them, ending with being threatened to be put in a fucking mental hospital).Guess what? I developed a fucking appetite, made friends and became extremely social, and acne literally stopped appearing like magic (the medicine was affecting my skin pretty badly). I don't understand how people can joke around with that shit. No one fucking wants to be depressed or bi polar, and I sure as hell didn't want to be diagnosed with that shit. Sorry for the long rant. [info] None [info] 1351313897
Noxwalrus [info] I've given up on almost everything... Can anyone spare the time to talk to me? Well her it goes. First time posting here. I was diagnosed with depression after a suicide attempt  late 2007 or 2008 (since early freshman year basically).  Math isn't my strong suit right now (I mean I'm a math major bit that doesn't matter). Any way, this whole last week I haven't been able to do anything but sleep and huff some duster for about 12 hours straight/day, until I noticed my long time crush/semi-bestfriend blowing me and a couple others off for some "douche bag guy" (those were her exact words). I'm super bad at dealing with this kind of situation. I don't know how to feel... On one hand I feel relieved, but on the other hand, All I can think about is suicide, advice, etc. I mean, basically, I've lost at least 80% of my respect for this girl. If not all of it... I don't feel like typing any more. It's too much. If you want to help or talk (except emma); pm me. I'm just sick of this and that. It would be nice to hear from others that feel the same way, or close enough. [info] None [info] 1323511731
avvstin [info] I wish my friends cared about me The majority of my online friends (i have no irl friends) are aware that I have been diagnosed with depression. idk why this matters but i dont know how to start this and this is really just a rant to get this off my chest more than anything. i always ask my friends if they want to do stuff or just to try and talk to them even, and i always get ignored or an excuse is given to me about why they cant do stuff with me then they go and do things with other people even though that wasn't their excuse, this wouldnt even upset me if they didn't lie about it just because they didn't want to talk to me, they could've just said it and it would've hurt less. then i have like one online friend that talks to me regularly but i feel like they online do out of pity and not because they want to, this is due to their actions and the way the word things but more specifically probably how i over analyze every single thing that happens to me. then when i tell this person that i feel like they dont actually care about me and that they only talk to me out of pity they tell me the opposite and then they feel bad because they feel that they act that way when really its just my fault for over analyzing everything. idk what the point of this post is but i just cut once and instead of doing it anymore i decided to take time to write this because im just upset with myself and wish i thought differently about things and maybe i just idk i just wish my friends cared about me.edit: sorry for this worthless jumble of a rant i feel bad that i even posted it [info] None [info] 1495156711
sndndspls [info] It's a coping mechanism, I've learnt to joke about stuff to get through it. I was diagnosed with depression, professionally and I find jokes about depression, suicide and self harm funny and did massively when I was going through it all.Taking whatever "diagnosis" you've been given too seriously and allowing it to define you will only make matters worse for yourself, moving yourself away from the diagnosis and laughing at it is a healthy way to cope with shit. [info] None [info] 1524656772
Milk-Witch [info] I was diagnosed with depression at around 9 years old. Its really upsetting when people say "you're too young to be  depressed/sad/etc" you have no idea what goes on in other people's lives :/ [info] None [info] 1549560152
ShabbySheik [info] I have been seeing a therapist and a psychiatrist (for ADHD medication, and I had seen him years ago for anti-depressants)  but I don't feel they are giving me what I need. I've been seeing them since October. This was my third long term relationship I've been in. I was in a really bad place after my second one (after I broke up with my first LTR, I met the second girl two months later.) For well over a year, I hated every day. I hated myself for remembering something that reminded me of her. Her nickname was Pi, so whenever the time was 3:14, or I saw Pi being mentioned in my math classes/work just to give you an idea, not to mention all of the insides jokes you develop and the fact that I shared all of my favorite things with her over our two years.I thought of ways to hurt and or kill myself a dozen times a day, I was diagnosed with depression, but couldn't stand the medication as I couldn't eat anything more than a few small bites.I'm just trying to make sure I don't go down that road again. [info] None [info] 1333111122
kurocat [info] Seeing a therapist next wednesday Hi,I've been diagnosed with depression last April, but my depression goes way back, I think it most likely started since I went to college two years ago. My humor used to fluctuate a lot: some days I was the happiest man on Earth, some days I felt I was stuck in the bottom of a well. I couldn't sleep, suicidal thoughts become ever more frequent.He putted me on antidepressants (mirtazapine and ethyl loflazepate - dont know the international name for these drugs, google them if you're curious). The drugs miraculously lifted my mood and overall self-confidence, I felt great about myself. I was genuinely happy. Unfortunately the effects didn't last much, after a month or two, the feelings of emptiness, loneliness and low self-esteem came back. And these feelings are just getting worse everyday.  Last Friday I went to see a psychiatrist. I was terrified. My best friend (and also ex-girlfriend, but that's another story) came with me. I wouldn't be able to go trough that alone.He doubled my doses. Advised me to workout and to seek comfort in my few friends (relate to people and building relationships was never my strong point). It all seems like bullshit, I can't have a decent conversation with anyone these days, I barely have any motivation to even leave my room. Anyways, he also advised me to seek a therapist, which I did.My first appointment is next wednesday. I don't have much expectations that that might help me, but I'll give it a shot.Anyways, I just wanted to vent out a little. I don't have much people that I can talk about this with. I'm just afraid I'm unfixable and that my live will be spent stuck in this dark corner of life. [info] None [info] 1407190359
throwaway96034596 [info] Does anyone have experience with CAMH's Emergency Department? Hey folks,I'm seriously considering going to CAMH. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 11 or 12 but have been having hallucinations and very intense mood swings for the past year or so and am kind of scared. My GP won't send my to a psych because he says I'm "put together" and I don't need help, but I've been self harming, thinking about how much I don't want to be "present" (not suicidal per se but not really digging life either - can't really kill myself because I have so many responsibilities lmao), and generally feeling pretty awful.I want to go to CAMH's emergency department, but I don't want to get stuck there. It's exam season and because of my 5 exams and the fact that I work in my school's exam department and am therefore busy through exam season, I can't really afford to get stuck at CAMH under supervision, even if it is for my own health.I was wondering if anyone here had ever been to CAMH's emergency department, and what their experience was? I just want to be assessed and have some sort of diagnosis/recovery plan to present to my doctor so that he'll take me seriously, but I really need to be able to go home afterwards.Thank you. [info] None [info] 1512424166
porchy12 [info] No, they didn't say.I was diagnosed with depression about six years ago, and this started two years ago, so they could quite possibly be related!  [info] None [info] 1458662332
FrequentSyrup [info] Yes for sure; I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago and part of it has to be from the way my mum has treated me my whole life by constantly comparing me to my brother, never being satisfied with what I do and never validating anything I do. It sounds stupid but I really think over the years it’s taken it’s toll and has now manifested as depression. [info] None [info] 1522241049
2JMAN89 [info] Unfortunately they tend to have too many patients, and many people who need help fall through the cracks. This is how I almost killed myself the first time. I was diagnosed with depression and given a prescription. I was told not to stop without talking to a doctor, and that they would send me an appointment time for a week later to check for side effects. I was never contacted, but the meds.made me very suicidal. After a week and 2 days I tried to kill myself (obviously I failed),then stopped the meds the next day. [info] None [info] 1460980364
throwaway29254 [info] Thanks. Yes, I was diagnosed with depression ten years ago, have been in therapy for nearly 4 years after that, but I can't say it helped me much, neither did trying out medication for depression. So I tend to be wary. I'm much better now, no suicidal thoughts or anything, even though my life is still a mess. But I credit getting older, better coping mechanisms and less dramatic in my mood swings, not my therapy back then.Anyway, my futile experience with therapy is what makes me want to avoid another waste of time and money. Apart from that I don't think I could afford it right now, this stuff is very expensive. But I'm thinking about giving it another go once I have the money, this time more focused on getting an ADD diagnosis (or ruling it out). But sometimes I wonder... I don't know if you're familiar with Gretchen Rubin's Four Tendencies, but I'm a "rebel" in her terminology, which makes me quite resistant to advice from others. ;) [info] None [info] 1551215523
throw-away-trasher [info] I've let my hate for someone haunt me There's a specific person in my life I've been mad at for a while. This person was in my life for a long time, but was distant, abusive, and tore down everything I did if it wasn't good enough for their standards. They were violent, and I'm still afraid to be around them. They're verbally and emotionally abusive, so I'm afraid to talk to them. And they're stubborn as fuck, so if I ever try to talk to them about this, they ignore it, blame me, and act like it's my fault that they're the way they are, or start telling a sob story about their life like it somehow excuses them.&amp;#x200B;3 years ago it came to a point where I was diagnosed with depression stemming from my poor relationship with this person. Every time I let my mind run, I'm suddenly angry and thinking about everything I wanna say to them, all the things I wanna call them out for, and all the things they've done to make me so angry. This person is the reason I've tried to kill myself before. There's so much bad blood and so much I've never gotten closure on that I don't feel like I can ever have a healthy connection with this person.&amp;#x200B;This person? That's my dad. He has his good moments, and I love him as much as I can, believe me. It's just that all the shit he's done to me has made it really hard for me to remember that. I really wish I could be a better son and forgive him, but I can't right now. Idk what to do anymore. I'm trying so hard to get over it, but I can't and now it's ruining me because almost every quiet moment is spent  thinking about all the anger and fear. [info] None [info] 1554714239
aceheartmagic [info] I was diagnosed with depression but I hide it from my friends, parents and better half. I don't want there pity or to treat me differently. I think about suicide everyday but pretend to be happy, I don't take any medicine because I don't want my mind and body to be changed.  [info] None [info] 1478108072
rude_alpha [info] The thing that helped me most was psychedelics. I was diagnosed with depression this year altogether I knew I'd had it for longer. After tripping quite a few times over the course of a few months and even having one bad trip, I can say that in my experience, tripping has helped me overcome depression and understand life as a human a bit better. Just make sure you take all of the precautions if you plan on tripping in the future. Stay safe and have fun. :) [info] None [info] 1499281260
rdmacph [info] My stepdad is the only one for treating me like shit over my mental health and having a panic attack and taking 2 months off work with stress. Made worse when he took 9 months off with stress a little over 2 years later. The difference being everyone always asked him how he was even now. No one in the family ever asks me even though I was diagnosed with depression 15 years ago when I tried to kill myself age 10, it’s like because he’s older it’s acceptable for him to have mental health issues but as soon as I get quiet everyone takes the piss and tells me to cheer up. [info] None [info] 1507237303
IntrospectiveSelf [info] I'm 35 and grew up not with a Boomer parent, but with a Soviet era parent, had a traumatizing childhood yada yada...as a result I suffer from C-PTSD ...in my 20's when I was diagnosed with depression and told my mother, she told me it was "all in my Head" and even threw out my anti-depressants saying they changed me. Now 35, have been seeing a therapist, received EMDR therapy and am on my way to learning how to live a happy life, and I love how much more open people are about their struggles...doesn't make me feel so alone and isolated [info] None [info] 1564237012
zombiezz805 [info] I'm in almost the exact same position...I'm only 5 weeks away from being the first person in any of my close families to graduate from college and the pressure is killing me.  I was diagnosed with depression only about a month ago but I've been there longer. I literally just told my girlfriend about it a few nights ago, but I can't really talk to her about it.  I also have no best friend.  Mostly thanks to my girlfriend. I love her, but I kind of resent her for making me lose all the close friends I had.And hey I'm a metalhead too.  What are the odds.  If you really feel like being a musician, go for it.  Sure, you'll likely never go Platinum but why would you wanna whore yourself out like Metallica anyway? If anything play just for fun. I wish I could do the same.If you have any demos, I'd honestly be interested in hearing them.  Just know that there's billions of people still left in this world. We're bound to find at least a few with some similarities who wouldn't mind hearing what you have to say.  I'm one of them.Good luck with the depression, man. [info] None [info] 1367836751
Claire2209 [info] Hey sorry to hear of your troubles! My mother is a psychiatric nurse, and she herself suffered from depression. About a year ago I told her I had fleeting thoughts of suicide and her response was 'doesn't everyone?' in November when I was diagnosed with depression I thought she of all people would understand, she practically ignored me, like she didn't want to hear it. But she started calling me more, asking how my day was, she even got my sister to call me and text me. But other than that she always seemed aloof. Today I figured out what her problem was. I was put on new meds today, propranolol, it's usually to control high blood pressure, but can also be used to treat panic attacks. When I told her that I was on it she told me 'I hate that they're pumping meds into you and your just a child'. I'm 21. But I'm her baby, she still dreams of me being 4 years old. Long story short, I think it's hard for a parent to see their child suffer, especially when they think there's nothing they can do to help. Maybe your mother is in denial because she doesn't want you to suffer, maybe she feels guilty, as if she's the reason. You're a strong person, and I'm sure you're going to get through this by yourself, but maybe don't be so disappointed in your mum and try to make her listen  [info] None [info] 1429104760
chaansan [info] I was diagnosed with depression about two years ago, and tumblr really fueled a lot of that self hatred. I've seen a lot of blogs on there that glamorize self harm and eating disorders, and it really is just one huge shit show a lot of the time. That being said, I think a lot of the people under tags like "pro Ana" and "cutting" are undiagnosed, yet in their "about" section they go on to say that they have depression. And they're probably right.  But until you're diagnosed by someone who has studied medicine for several *years* and *knows* what they're talking about, you can't go around saying you have this and that, because you might have something completely different overall.You can do your own research. You can have suspicions; many doctors actually appreciate it when you try to find it more about how you're feeling. But you cannot diagnose yourself and expect to be medicated and recieve the help and care you deserve. And I don't care whether you're from /r/TheRedPill or a Tumblrina Femmikin, you *do* deserve that help. [info] trashkin [info] 1416753145
Size666 [info] I was a severe nail-biter until I was diagnosed with depression and put on Wellbutrin. Weird side effect is that I don't have the compulsion to bite my nails anymore.  [info] None [info] 1504730449
afterliving [info] I was diagnosed with depression a few years back. MD came around when I was 11/12. When I was going through a harder time, I went into it with a lot of daydreaming. I didn’t realize that it was a way to cope until I wasn’t able to daydream  given certain environments- when I wasn’t in a place that I could daydream for hours, I would sleep instead. I went from not sleeping as much for daydreaming time to sleeping through the day until I could find a place to pace again. It was hard to be up. I’m still leaving there. I guess what has helped is not telling myself I need to love myself, but reminding myself to love myself for what I am and what I’m not. And even if I’m not there yet, remembering to forgive myself and keep moving. I feel slow next to the rest of the world right now. It can be easier to leave myself behind once and awhile in dreams. But I’ll come back. [info]  [info] 1562109263
IceMetalPunk [info] Nope, me too. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 21, and man was this scene too relatable. I cried when I saw it the first time (and also maybe a little the second and third times). [info] None [info] 1573427970
starlicky139 [info] I was diagnosed with depression years ago and my brain chemistry is pretty fucked up at this point but I can see where you're coming from and no, I don't think I've ever completed anything I started...  [info] None [info] 1470743682
80217991090108020703 [info]  Please read what I write you, maybe it can help you! This is my story and how I managed to fight it, and I am living proof that anything can change to the better!You see, I used to have the exact same train of thoughts. I was diagnosed with depression and Borderline Personality Disorder. I resorted to self-harm way more than was manageable, and one day I had to go to the emergency station because the voices in my head and my suicidal thoughts were getting too agonizingly loud to ignore. I was planning to end it right then and there. Luckily, I had seen my therapist on the same day, and I told her about my thoughts and plans..She escorted me to the emergency room. I talked to some doctors, and there I was in the waiting list for a nuthouse, a mental hospital.I was told that the waiting list would last about a month, and I didn't know If I could wait that long, as my thoughts have been getting worse and worse, and I just felt so *shit* . They offered me to go to this "advanced" nuthouse where the walls were literally soft..and the strapped you to the bed at night..yeah I said I could handle a month to get into the standard asylum.A month passed, and nothing. I was still in the fucking waiting list. It was hard to resist to self harm. And I relapsed many times, nights were the worst for me. At night I would lie in my bed, try to fall asleep, and soon as I knew it, I would start crying violently, bashing my head, pulling my hair and screaming inside of my head, the voices they were destroying me. I was not myself. I was en-capsuled, trapped inside this curse. One thing lead to another and there I was in the bathroom having a bloodbath..Two more months have passed of terrible waiting. I had quit school then. I hadn't been going to school for three months at this point because my head was just too fucked up to do anything. So I get this call from the clinic, they say I should come to them in three days, finally the time came. Long story short, let me tell you that, I do NOT recommend going there to be honest, that place was a shit-hole, absolute prison, literally. They would serve absolutely terrible food three times a day, which fucked up my stomach big time, I only went to the bathroom like twice a week, and the workers were a bunch of unqualified retards who did have the **slightest** idea how to deal with people with mental problems. None of the therapies there helped me, they were all pure bullshit to "distract" which did not help in the slightest fucking bit because the whole atmosphere of that prison made you feel like the scum of the earth, mix that in with the low self-esteem that everyone already has there, and you get nothing good out of it.Two weeks in that prison passed, and my older brother, who is twenty-three years old, visited me. I told him about it, how I hated that shit hole, how it is all feeble attempt at brainwashing you to down those synthetic pills every fucking night so you get addicted and continue paying and paying, that money is all they are after, they do not want you to get healthy, they do not care, trust me, I saw it all. So I told him I hated it there, and I told him "Tell our parents what I said. I want to leave that place, please.". He did. The next day, my mother apperead and told me "Pack your things, we are fucking off". I smiled and went to my prison cell to get all my things. You see, at this point of time, I made many friends in the nuthouse, specifically in the group I was in. I liked all of them, they were awesome people, and they liked me a lot. The only thing that helped me in the slightest, were the friendships I forged within these walls of torture. No therapies, no pills (I took one to record the effects, next days I kept the pills under my tongue when I was given them and spat them out later), nothing helped, except my **friends**! They all started criyng and cuddling me when I told them I was suddenly leaving, at first they did not even believe me, but then they saw my mother standing there talking to the head-therapist.I packed my things and went to my mother, the head-therapist calls both of us into her office. We talk, she asks "Michael, why the fuck have you suddenly decided to leave!? I think this is a very stupid idea, you need those pills, you are going to cut and kill yourself if you leave!" Can you actually believe that she said that? Fucking unbelievable of her.. I smiled into her fucking face and said "I'll be fine without all this useless crap. This place made me realize how brainwashing and manipulative you fuckers are. I'll be good on my own thank you very much". My mother tore up the contracts and we fucked off.When I was talking to my older brother when he visited me, I had this realization. This is the most important part of the story. I had this REALIZATION what life was actually about. I spent an entire year, and entire year being depressed as fuck, cutting, crying and living in a trap in my mind. Things happened a year ago then that made me like that, but that is another story for another time. When I had that realization, I realized what life was about. That life shouldn't be decided from your past, the actions in your future should NOT be influenced by your past! Of course, trial and error, yes that should be there, but do NOT give up, do NOT sit there and do nothing all fucking week! You want to go to your friends house? DO THAT! You want to go swim in a lake naked? Do that! You want to meet new friends at a pub, get drunk and get random bruises the next day you do not know how you got them? DO THAT! You want to leave you job, find your ambition and work for it? DO THAT FOR FUCKS SAKE. We are alive right now, me you, everyone is, and we should fucking use that. My priorities for life are:FamilyFriendsExplorationI love my family and hold them dear in my heart, I used to not have such a great connection with them, but now I completely changed that! I talk to them a lot more now, I know a lot more about them now, they are AWESOME!My friends as well! Since I left the nuthouse I made so many new friends! I have experienced so much more! My whole motivation to be here on this subreddit is because I changed myself, because I wish to spread happiness and I want people to fucking BELIEVE that life can ALWAYS be better if you just fucking go for it! And exploration, Oh boy, I fucking LOVE nature, that is my drive, the one thing in life I want to do, to venture the highest mountains, the forests and jungles, hike across landscapes and be one with the nature, that is the greatest fucking thing ever for me! Just please know that we care about you here in this wonderful subreddit, and the people around you do too. If you need someone to talk to, I AM RIGHT HERE, do not hesitate. Tell me what bothers you, tell me what you think! I know that you can change your life to the better, I know it, because everyone can! It will not be easy, but trust me when I saw this, spending time being TRULLY happy is a trillion times better than spending time feeling like shit. And now go and rethink your routines, what you truly want in life! What are your hobbies? What new hobbies do you wish to take up? Anywhere you want to go?  [info] None [info] 1406467867
molgera85 [info] Anyone else feeling depressed during quarantine? First and foremost, I’m not looking for any sympathy or anything like that. Just wondering if you guys are experiencing something relatively similar. For some context, I am diagnosed with depression and occasionally go through those stereotypical depressive bouts. Quarantine has been a good and a bad thing for me. I’ve been able to study a lot more effectively for my calculus class and play guitar more often than usual. But at the same time, I have had no social interactions with anyone (other than my family, and even then, it’s pretty rare, I’m usually isolated in my room for the majority of the day) for the past like 2 (maybe 3?) weeks. I don’t know, it feels a lot longer than that. Fuck, I’m not even a social person, I’m ridiculously introverted, but having nobody to talk to is pretty weird. I’ve also been noticing that I haven’t been eating as much recently. Like, I haven’t had a proper lunch during the majority of quarantine. Sorry for that long winded rambling. I needed to get this off of my mind. Let me know if anyone else is going through stuff like this. Sorry if this is the wrong subreddit for this kinda stuff. [info] None [info] 1586819723
XWUWTR [info] I was always a tough kid. Never a scratch or a broken bone. I walked away from wild accidents untouched. Other kids seemed to be made of glass in comparison. But it frustrated me that I never got my own special cast for friends to sign with different-colored pens. I never got to show up with crutches to school and bask in that attention. Somehow people were less interested in how you were thrown off your bike and down a twenty foot ravine unless you had some physical evidence weighing you down. They thought you just had an active imagination.The first time something like that happened I was a baby and a drunk driver smashed his truck into the side of our station wagon. My mother had to wear a neck brace for three months but I came out of the ordeal laughing. Years later while playing football in high school a 200 lbs tackle flattened my scrawny ass on the field. Everyone who saw it kept telling me I should have had a concussion. But once the apologetic man-child from the other team helped me to my feet and the coach checked me for injuries I went right back to playing. These experiences were littered throughout my past. Probably because I never learned. I was always getting into wrecks. Nothing ever left a mark.Except things in my personal life were never as forgiving. My mother died when I was in college. I never really came back from that. My girlfriend left me for someone else. I was diagnosed with depression. I graduated and moved to the city to look for a job and ended up working two and a half to make ends meet. I lost touch with my friends and watched the months slip away, grayer than sheets of ice drifting on cold water. Things weren't okay for me for a long, long time. I finally decided to do something about it.I sat in a dark motel bathroom, having looked out of that keyhole at freedom from a life of pain. But I was still trapped somehow. It wasn't so much disbelief that I was still alive that surrounded me; rather a sense of delay, like a man waiting at a bus stop to go home. The gun belched curls of smoke from its nozzle. Its caustic incense filled my lungs with a smell I shouldn't have known. My ears were still ringing from the report of the bullet. As police sirens seeped distantly in, my eyes stayed fixed on the hole in the ceiling from which a beam of daylight percolated through. I raised my hand through it as if in a dream to my forehead. The gun clattered away on porcelain. A warm round indent sat dead in the middle of my forehead like a third eye, the size of a bullet that never stood a chance.I stepped out of the tub and got dressed again. Policemen were knocking at the door. They would have questions. And I had no answers. Just, as people always liked to call it, an overactive imagination. [info] None [info] 1389360443
Tyrinnus [info] Oh, yeah. The first neurologist I saw AFTER turning 18 told me I don't have tourettes, after it took me about 20 months to get in to see him. He spent 5 minutes taking to me. Told me my tourettes had gone away... Moron... The second one was at a walk in clinic in Michigan (1300 miles away while at college) when I was 21... I'd been off my meds for 3 years at this point, RIP me... Anyway, he recognized it almost instantly. Rediagnosed me... Funny thing is, I didn't need the meds anymore, as I'd been off them so long... But 6 months later, I was diagnosed with depression, and coincidentally the meds I'm on now are also occasionally used to treat tourettes. 2 birds with 1 pill.  [info] None [info] 1499001741
oobydoobanooby [info] I had diverticulitis that became infected and had emergency surgery, a stoma and reversal.  During that time I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed anti depressants and counselling.   Still on Meds but in a much better place. [info] None [info] 1464012475
jjdurandeau [info] It was hard but I did it, I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 12, suffered bullying at school, inestable family and even tried to kill my self once at the age of 14, made a huge effort to push my self forward because I thought there had to be something good in life. After 10 years I could. Be patient and push your self to be happy by exploring everything, cause you will find something that will help you for a while and then keep going.  Now that I’m 30 years old, I don’t regret nothing that happened to me or that I did, I wouldn’t change nothing from the past, because it made me the person I am today and I’m happy. [info] None [info] 1562054453
Bassdragon88 [info] You are absolutely not alone. I've been diagnosed with depression and PTSD. The PTSD directly from the several times I had a vcug done as a kid. Three times between six and eight, and I have another memory in between where they forced the tube in me but I'm not really sure of the reason it happened. I am 31, it has been over 20 years, and I still have nightmares. My psychiatrist actually put me on a medication a couple months ago to help prevent nightmares before they blow up. This is the longest I've ever gone without having the nightmares. [info] None [info] 1563591326
smilingbuddhist [info] Thank you so much I actually didnt start smoking weed till last year I was very misinformed on marijuana until I received my card for my ptsd I was diagnosed with depression borderline personality disorder and suicidal ideation I have my hard days as well as my amazing fantastic good days but I am falling harder due to the pain of the chronic pancreatitis . I am so thankful for your concern and even if it didn't apply to me someone reading this could apply to them so thank you so much!! And thank you very much!! [info] None [info] 1556425320
rabbitrainbows [info] I think it's all correlated? I was diagnosed with depression 4 years ago, then adhd-pi 2 years ago and surprise surprise, narcolepsy 2 weeks ago. I assume if I had decent sleep and didn't feel like garbage during the daytime, I would've dealt with my issues during the time of depression much better. I would've been less passive, indecisive, and have more confidence/energy. Because I was so tired all the time, I procrastinated dealing with my problems which made them drag on and the self loathing increased. I honestly think my depression really resolved after I got diagnosed with adhd-pi and the meds (+ consistent therapy) helped give me the energy to tackle my issues. &amp;#x200B;Ironically, during the initial chat with my sleep specialist was confident I DON'T have adhd-pi, but the narcolepsy caused my adhd-pi behaviors lol. The medication I took for adhd-pi also works for narcolepsy tho, so yeah.&amp;#x200B;I'm surprised you sleep specialist didn't want to give you a test, it's much easier/straight forward imo to test for narco than depression. The only drawback is the test was really expensive.. but if you think your case might be a sleep issue, i'd push harder for a test. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1559680587
hereicomeandgo [info] It doesn't give you attention, make you cool, make girls appeal to you. That's a middle school phase that all girls/boys phase out of. I was diagnosed with depression, but I got over it. Probably the only one with it, a lot of the people faked it. Took months but I ended up getting out fine. [info] None [info] 1549504036
CAUK [info] A.B.D - I dropped out of my Ph.D program because of mental illness, but I'm better now. I finished all my coursework, achieved candidacy, did my research, and started writing my dissertation. I invested over 7 years of my life and accrued six figures in student loan debt. However, during the final year I floundered. I was diagnosed with depression and my marriage was in trouble. I dropped out. I broke off contact with my adviser and avoided contact with anyone associated with my program. My spouse and I separated, and I was in deep-deep trouble with debt collectors. I was getting back on my feet for a little while, but then I was abruptly laid off from my job. I became suicidal and had to move in with relatives (at age 37) to support and keep an eye on me.That was three years ago. My finances are now in order, my divorce is almost final, and I feel like my mental health is in a good place. Last year, just the thought of reaching out to my adviser, or anyone else in my old department would cause a panic attack, which would take hours to subside. Now, I've reached out to my adviser, who dispelled my fears that I had permanently soured that relationship. My adviser is still just as supportive as ever.So, does anyone have any advice for trying to re-enter my Ph.D program and finishing after 3 years absence? [info] None [info] 1500682097
ProfessionalBinger_ [info] Coincidence? I think not... my step father bullied tf outta me and I was diagnosed with depression at 5 after getting into an altercation with him. [info] None [info] 1572665622
Zorocan [info] You're college advisors? you mean academic advisors?In any case, if they're professionals, I think it's pretty safe to tell them about your mental condition. I know this from personal experience since I am diagnosed with depression and is currently in college.  [info] None [info] 1450068113
mybosspartieshard [info] I thought I was a chronic procrastinator for my entire life up until about a year ago when I was diagnosed with depression. I was prescribed Welbutrin and since then have been surprisingly motivated to study, eat healthier, get chores done, etc... Not saying you’re depressed, but it’s a thought to consider. [info] None [info] 1556662497
hacker0426 [info] Everyone says I was so young that I didn't understand. I was diagnosed with depression PTSD and i stopped eating after I we got away from him it's messed me up i was also molested by another ex and it put me into  very dark place I was suicidal for awhile before I got help it still crosses my mind though [info] None [info] 1560223040
ifixpedals [info] It's kind of a weird story for me. I was diagnosed with depression by a therapist after a bad breakup where I just wasn't moving on. He prescribed an antidepressant, which I took briefly, but it seemed to mess me up more. Plus, I just don't like the idea that a pill is the answer to all that ails you. Then I watched the movie A Beautiful Mind, and saw how Nash learned to recognize his delusions with logic. Once he could distinguish delusion from reality, the delusions had no power over him. I then recognized that my depression was a result of my brain being caught in a loop of negative thoughts. It created a negative feedback that in turn fueled more negative thoughts. The biggest step was learning to recognize these loops AS THEY HAPPENED. Once I mastered this skill (and it was a skill that required practice) I could pause the loop, and ask myself a pair of logical questions: "Q: do I want to feel better? A: yes. Q: Is dwelling on this helping me get better? A: No." Once I could break the feedback loop and answer those questions, I could move my thoughts and feelings into more productive directions. It was like realizing I'm only dreaming in the middle of a nightmare. Suddenly the dream becomes lucid, and you can fly. Once I became aware of my negative though cycle, could control it. At least that was my situation. I am not suggesting that this would work for anyone. But I do think that for some personalities, a little introspection can go a lot further than drugs or therapy. [info] None [info] 1437352166
teewadd [info] Unless you withheld serious information, do not stand during the moment of truth, and do not fall asleep either. They will try to make you feel guilty for anything you ever done in your life. I accidentally withheld that I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12, and it was a huge fiasco trying to deal with it but I was honest and upfront and I made it through, as a nuke at that.  [info] None [info] 1485724169
lewdaiko [info] I'm a man who rarely sleeps. I've started seeing some stuff A quick disclaimer, there will be a lot of typos and stuff so just bear with meI'm not from an English speaking country so typing in this language is kinda weird for me since I don't know many wordsNow that that's out the way let's startI'm someone who rarely sleeps nor walks outside so staying in my bedroom(or even workplace)I'm always tired and quiet. I've tried getting some help but it seems it doesn't help much so I resort to pills or whatever helps. As well I was diagnosed with depression a few years which makes things hard for meBut let's get back to the what the title says... I sometimes start seeing stuff or even hear that others don't. This week it was slightly worse. A week before I started seeing floating shadowy like hands, I didn't care much but a voice irritated me "come outside" is what the voice always said and I generally wanted to grab whatever is near me that's effective at piercing the ear and just... End it there but I was hesitant and really I wanted to just end myself years before as well but I'd always fall to the ground crying... So I did what I could and kept ignoring it while watching some movie After 3 hours of the constant "come outside" it went quiet until my room was pitch black as some sort of reddish light went through the gaps of my curtains, I thought I was dreaming but I didn't remember falling asleep, of course I slapped myself and welp I wasn't dreaming. I heard some knocks on the door and scratches out the window, thinking that I'm surrounded by two spirits really made me chuckle... "open up, open up" was the next thing I started hearing, like it was behind me at all times, even if I looked behind myself there was nothing and I still heard it coming from behind as the light kept shining even brighter until it as well turned pitch back and all went quiet once more. I called my neighbor is she could come over and help open the door (I don't know why but I couldn't open it from my side) she eventually did and for her atleast it was easy to open it. I asked if she heard or saw anything and as expected she didn't. I clearly thought I was losing my mind, that I was going insane She went home and I went and made myself cappuccino(I really fucking hate coffee)while talking to some friends over discord, few fights here and there no biggie until I heard a knock once more, I went to look and there was no one until I heard someone knock on the table I was sitting on. Went to check and nothing, I ignored it from there on out and went back to drinking and talking to friends. I eventually went to sleep for an hour or so, got ready for work as until I felt pain on my left knee and saw a cut, fresh but it wasnt bleeding. I went over to my bathroom and washed my face, looked back at my leg and it was still there... I went to work and acted like nothing happenedAnd well that's when I started hearing blood curdling screams after each hour(atleast it stopped today) "I will be seeing you" was the last word I've heard from whatever or whoever uttered such wordsI guess I'll have to wait, until the day happens I'll probably keep you posted [info] None [info] 1566917418
personalist [info] I mean I was diagnosed with depression, but Cal didn't have much to do with that—UCLA and Cal are both top public schools and neither one will *cause* you to become depressed. The stress of maintaining good grades and ECs can certainly provoke someone's mental illness, but Cal doesn't cause anyone to become depressed more than any other top ranked school. Choose between the two based on other, more meaningful criteria (do you like Northern or Southern California more? Westwood vs Berkeley? Medical school on campus vs across the bay? Etc). [info] psychology/chemistry '17 [info] 1491948471
parsnippity [info] &gt; However, an emotional support animal is in fact a "service animal" for purposes of the Fair Housing Act.I'd correct that to an emotional support animal CAN in fact be a service animal under the Fair Housing Act. An animal isn't necessarily automatically a service animal if it's an emotional support animal. You still have to have a disability and the animal has to alleviate one or more issues the disability causes. I'll give an example. Let's say I have a cat. I am diagnosed with depression and I love my cat, and getting rid of the cat would upset me, but the cat itself doesn't make my depression any better. That's not an emotional support animal.I'll give an opposing example: I have a cat. I'm depressed. My doctor recommends focusing on the animal as a creature that needs me and stroking the cat when I get anxious. This alleviates some of my symptoms and I'm better able to cope on a daily basis because I look forward to time with my cat. That is an emotional support animal.Finally, I'll give an ADA example. This one actually applies to me. I have a seizure disorder. Seizures are uncommon for me, but they do happen from time to time. My doctor talked to me about dogs trained to work with and for patients with my disorder. Together, we found a (ridiculously expensive, but that's off topic) trainer, and I bought a dog. My dog can break my fall if I have a seizure, go alert my husband if he is with me, he can press a panic button to alert EMS, and he can guard me while I'm having a seizure. He has been specifically trained to carry out tasks that relate to my condition, and that's what's required under the ADA. Edit: I want to note that the ADA doesn't actually apply to private apartments. It's for public housing and transient shelters and what not. However many, many apartments follow ADA rules because they want to be sure they don't run afoul of the law.I suspect you know this, so please don't think I'm saying you're wrong. I'm explaining it for the benefit of everyone reading this.  [info]  [info] 1381951129
joho3883 [info] I was diagnosed with depression In 1st grade so I was about 7 years old. I started antidepressants in 3rd grade so about 9 years old. I do believe I still had my sense of smell. But thank you I will try to find more info [info] None [info] 1573012617
Salaia [info] I was diagnosed with depression in my teen years (diagnosed when my parents divorced but was present before then).  From experience, counseling has been the best thing since I started going this year.  They can better identify ALL of your issues (I thought it was just work stress but it is hard to deal with work stress when your childhood was stressful) and as long as she goes to a non-LDS-appointed counselor, she can start working on how to deal with her mental status, rather than how she's currently dealing with it.  I know it isn't always cheap and had not tried to find one while I was a minor, but it was the best route I could have chosen. [info] None [info] 1379389875
saltwatermonkey [info] Thanks. I was diagnosed with depression for right years, until last November when I was finally diagnosed BP after a long while trying to get to see a psychiatrist. It's just the time waiting to find the right meds [info] None [info] 1456689804
S2S2S2S2S2 [info] &gt;I am totally not trying to be a smart ass, but I can't help but ask: Do you have a psych paper due?Nope, I've been diagnosed with depression and it's something I've struggled with for quite some time.  I figured I'd ask some generic questions to get an idea of the book to help evaluate if it would be personally beneficial for me to read. [info] None [info] 1301000321
liyqd [info] How do I know if I have borderline personality disorder? I've always known that my unbalanced emotions weren't normal but I've been to scared to find out about it. I was diagnosed with depression but not with BPD. I keep changing between loving and hating everything around me, including my family and friends. One minute I'm happy and good and the next minute I'm depressed and hate everything. I keep changing between loving myself and hating and crying for hours because of the way I look and the person I am. I feel like abusing drugs most of the time when I'm feeling like that (I've only done that once though).I tried to commit suicide multiple times before and I have suicidal thoughts from time to time. I am extremely scared of people abandoning me and being left alone, I always think to myself that I'd kill myself if I was all alone and had nobody. I can't control my emotios and sometimes smash things when I'm frustrated.  My family doesn't care about mental illnesses and other things like that and I'm too scared to see a doctor. I don't know what to do. [info] None [info] 1550436031
vikkivinegar [info] Major issue- there was no place to note that, thought I've been diagnosed with depression in the past, I've been on medication for years. I'm afraid the results may be very skewed since my responses do not indicate a person currently experiencing depression. [info] None [info] 1565101324
Markupoiss [info] Sudden urges of depression I am diagnosed with depression, but it has got much better over the past months. Sometimes I still get sudden urges to shoot myself or slit my wrists in a forest, I don't know if it will get worse, but I hope it doesn't. Best of luck to you all. [info] None [info] 1553542067
MrTimscampi [info] Experienced that a couple of years ago.Had major depression due to sleep apnea that was amplified by a few things in my life at the time.My group if friends basically imploded around me when I asked for help.  I warned them a few months prior that I was diagnosed with depression and got the usual "we're there if you need to talk".Well, after something happened with my best friend (I was down one time too much, she got fed up and wanted out), I went to them for help to cope... All but one were "too busy" or didn't care.I have a lot less friends since then. [info] None [info] 1568703572
pgsab [info] Depression makes me feel so unwanted... So... Where do I start? I was diagnosed with depression in 2016 and I'm now taking mood stabilizers for it. Only they work for my ups, not for my downs.As for my life... I have no job. I've been actively looking for jobs since 2015, without success. So I took a masters degree to help me find a job. Only it was a colossal waste of time. And now I'm probably overqualified. I feel like I'll never get out of this unemployment situation.My friends don't care about me. Actually, I feel really unwanted by them. They never talk to me, and when I do start a conversation, it feels like they're only talking because they feel they have to. Or because they pity me.My ex broke up with me via text on January 2nd. And I told a friend of mine and was met with a suggestion it was my fault for not talking enough during the relationship. Well, I tried. It just didn't work.What's the point in trying? I do take my medication. Does it work? Probably not the way they should. I don't even know why I'm reaching out. Probably this post is gonna get lost somewhere in between other posts and it'll make me feel even more unwanted.Anyway, if anyone is reading this, I'd like to thank you for being a kind soul. [info] None [info] 1579472980
awhite025600 [info] Should I tell my parents...it's kinda complicated So, I've been diagnosed with depression. And I think I'm manifesting bi polar disorder at 17. I found this all out over Christmas when I just broke and tried to kill myself. I spent 2 days in the ICU and 5 in a in patient facility. I used to self harm in June. I burned myself where my watch sits. And know I am impulsively cutting to deal with anger and grief. My mom never found out about it in June and I've been lying to her face the whole time. I feel like shit about it but she is going through s ok much with the attempt. She's reading books and stuff and I think it makes it worse. I should have just told her. But she already thinks she's a worthless mother and is just now starting to cope with knowing everything else I've hidden from her. I just don't know. [info] slicie boi but nicie boi [info] 1548025161
Boxers10 [info] You have described high functioning depression to a "T". I was diagnosed with depression about 5 years ago after a life time of wondering what was wrong with me. It is hard to put on the face every day...a lot of days I just come home and crash, BUT there are good days...just enough to keep me pushing. It was a relief for me to find a doctor that listened to me. It was hard hearing you have "Depression with fear" and the big one was when therapist updated it to "Depression and passive suicidal"...BUT it does get better so hang in there you know what is going on and can work on it. I hope you are younger than me when I found help at 55. [info] None [info] 1569290292
DaCrispyBacon [info] How about a story? I was diagnosed with depression a long ass time ago, I can’t even remember any tests that were done to get the official diagnosis. So it came as no surprise when I first said to my therapist “hey, I don’t think existing is as good as everyone says and I kind of feel like ending my existence.” You want to guess what was done? They locked me up in a mental ward in the hospital that made me feel even worse. The fear of being locked up in a mental ward again has made me keep all of my emotions I myself, meaning that when I start to feel suicidal all I can do is open up the “suicide resources” bookmark folder on chrome and cry my feelings away. I try to use humor to ward off all of these shitty feelings but eventually I’ll run out of jokes, eventually I’ll lose the battle, eventually, I’ll take my own life...This is why when Instagram thots decide claiming they have depression would be a good idea because it’ll get them a few extra followers it brings my blood to a boil. Waiting to find out my mom stalks my Reddit and I get locked up again... That’d suck. [info] 16 [info] 1556869725
EarthToKepler [info] I live in the UK, I have been diagnosed with depression and I am going to see a doctor tomorrow or on my day off.Thank you for your comment, I appreciate it [info] None [info] 1546174499
baladora [info] Does this sound like CFS? I have been diagnosed with depression for over 2 years now and despite alot of treatment it has made zero affect, but as i have done more research online my symptoms seem to match more with CFS then depression, or the CFS may be causing the depression. I have written a list of symptoms i have to show the Doctor tomorrow (Assuming i get a appointment). But how does this sound to you guys? Main difference i see is the kind of muscle pain i get, no website i have found is specific on how the pain is. I would not classify myself above mild by any means either."*Bad memory, can easily remember conversations but not what i did yesterday.*Often troubles with speech, and explaining things when im on a “tired day"*Constantly tired, even in the mornings. Girlfriend has had to wake me up and pester me for over a hour in order to get me out of bed. I thought it was just lazyness/lack of motivation but i think its because of just how tired i am. (Medical records should show constant mentions of tiredness and sleeping problems)*Trouble getting to sleep.*Been on a large number of anti depressants and don’t find they help, only ones i have stuck with are the ones which have helped with sleep. They haven’t helped with mood.*Muscle pain in legs when im laying down/sitting for more then 20 minutes (Impossible to have a lay in in bed), so constantly have to move and/or stand up.*Reason i left the NHS was because it was impossible for me to be awake enough to get to work on time, often several hours late and even changed working hours because of this. I thought it was due to my tablets (mirtazapine) at the time, but when i stopped them the symptoms stayed the same. Often left my current work early due to how tired i am. *Doing simply two hours of work (mental) will wipe me out for the rest of the day. I used to be able to move 1000+ hay bales in a day, tried 6 months after i got diagnosed with depression and i could barely do 100 before i was too exhausted  to do anymore. I thought it was because i was unfit but i don’t think thats the real reason. *Sensitive to noise*Constantly feel sick, will always puke if i don’t get enough sleep. Again, medical records to confirm it. *Will often not shower or do things because im simply too tired to do it. Even during the middle of the day. If it is CFS (This is now using direct symptoms listed for CFS):*"psychological difficulties, such as depression, irritability and panic attacks” (Quoted off NHS website)*Terrible attention span, confirmed by multiple therapist reports/medical records as i have said several times how i can’t watch a movie in one go or play a game for more then 20 minutes. Unexplained:*Suicidal symptoms"Honest opinion guys. Just exploring a different path of options here to work out what could be wrong with me and try to get on some sort of path for recovery. Edit: Sorry for the poor formatting. No idea what is going on. Fixed it the best i can. [info] None [info] 1437082648
PancreasPillager [info] Someone else here commented this, but to reiterate—depression is depression. It’s a chemical imbalance in the mind related to serotonin and other neurotransmitters. Sometimes there are triggers (major life changes, serious problems at work/school/home, etc.) that can cause an imbalance, and thus an episode, and other times depressive episodes will just creep up with no discernible external cause. In my case, some of my depression triggers are linked to bad ADHD habits. For example, letting my schoolwork spiral out of control (due to ADHD) can launch me into a depressive phase that will last months, even after the problems are resolved. Other times I just wind up depressed just because, which is why i take antidepressants along with Adderall. **If you believe you are depressed, its absolutely worth seeing a psychiatrist**. Depression is its own diagnosis and illness that requires its own special treatment—even if it may be “caused” by ADHD.On a side note, I just want to toss out something i think is interesting! I was diagnosed with depression long before ADHD. After some trial and error with medication, I found my magic combo—Effexor and Wellbutrin. Pretty high dosages too. Most antidepressants just target serotonin, but these 2 target norepinephrine and dopamine! When I was diagnosed with ADHD, it all made so much sense. In fact, I cut my antidepressant dosages in half when I started taking Adderall and I feel wonderful.  [info] ADHD [info] 1548355617
whitetee02 [info] A burden. I was diagnosed with depression at 14 but have felt these feelings of extreme sadness and dissociative since I was 10. I am now soon 18 and suicidal thoughts are usually what I have on my mind every day and I can't figure out what to do. I'm too much of a pussy to kill myself but I'm too weak to continue on and on with these thoughts and therapists don't seem to help. [info] None [info] 1575331005
Cryocal [info] Oh! In that case i completely agree with you :). I am diagnosed with depression, but actively try to get more help for it. People with depression who mope and tell everyone to fuck off.. eh.. not big on that... I understand your point now, and agree! :)  [info] None [info] 1540056514
SarahC [info] I *can't* do jury duty in the UK because I've been diagnosed with depression. =DYou've got to be of "sound mind and body" to sit on a jury in the UK.Phew! I'd lose a shit-ton of money from work if it was a long case. [info] None [info] 1306071191
Chillin_at_Work_ [info] Thank you for this. I am 12 days in. I thought I was over the hard cravings but yesterday was really rough for me. My problem has been the depression. I did not expect the depression to be this intense. I have been diagnosed with depression earlier in my life and have had it managed for years now, but this depression was unexpected and crazy. I also have lost close to 80lbs in the last 9 months and have gained almost 10 since I quit which is making me extremely pissed off because I know how hard the last 10 lbs was to lose. I feel like I can not be losing weight and quitting smoking at the same time. But this post helps a lot. Just waiting for the depression to start getting better. Thinking about going to see someone about it. Partially for the mental health aspect but also to see if there are any recommendations he has about how to replace my eating when i have cravings to something else or just a healthier way to deal with all of this. Thank you again and you are an inspiration and role model for me right now.  [info] 42 days [info] 1496412342
Ethicusan [info] &gt; Psychology and psychiatry are a lieDefinately. Pure quackery. I was diagnosed with depression and suffered those quacks for years. The meds they gave me caused all manner of problems from impotence not being able to orgasm even made it worse sometimes. Finally I realised by myself it was possible I had low testosterone. Took a test and I was right. Started taking testosterone, blackmarket stuff cause the quacks wouldn't give it to me and all better.And don't start with the old I had bad luck choosing my quack. I saw dozens of different quacks. As for the rest of what you said literally noone said that. I'm just challenging the portion of your comment where you make authotative claims about a huge number of people. It would be as offensive as me telling cancer sufferers I believed most of them would get better if they just had more coffee enemas. [info] None [info] 1560767545
EphemeralRepose [info] I was diagnosed with depression in 2010! Then I went through the rest of high school frequently switching medications because clearly if one antidepressant wasn't keeping me awake, a different one would help. I also went to college and dropped out after a few weeks. Came home and six months later I was diagnosed. [info] None [info] 1565975266
BodoInMotion [info] Hi, thanks for your comment. Yeah, I've been diagnosed with depression about a year ago, my doctor gave me pills, they wore off after few months. I was thinking about changing them because as I understand it, they do that sometimes. But at that time I was already into my therapy and my doctor asked me if I wanted to keep using anti-depressants. I thought I'll try it without them, seeing as I felt as if they don't help anymore anyway. I was okay for a while with my therapy, but then it all came back, so I just gave up on both therapy and pills. [info] None [info] 1447662059
hmw1597 [info] I feel like my boyfriend has me cornered, &amp; I'm not sure which way to move? I'm 20, my boyfriend is 21. We've been together for almost 3 years. We are in college &amp; live together. I have a puppy, Denver, who is due for 2 shots. I am a server, so I pay for rent, food, gas, &amp; my credit card bills as my parents pay everything else. Today, I set up an appointment for Denver to get the next round of his shots. It would take about 90 of the 130 bucks I have to my name, but I work tonight &amp; tomorrow so I'll practically be immediately reimbursed. My boyfriend retorted that he wanted to go look at apartments for next semester with me today &amp; that he wanted us to hang out, so blowing my money is a dumb idea. I asked what we would be doing or eating that would cost me more than 25 dollars. It would only take 30 minutes out of the day to take Denver to the vet. He said that since I made that decision, he was going to binge watch a tv show for the remainder of the day. Frustrated, I proceeded to call the vet to reschedule for another day this week. My boyfriend then got mad &amp; told me not to do that. So I hung up before the receptionist answered. Puzzled, I asked what he wanted me to do. He was flustered &amp; rambled about it not being a good idea to take Denver today. I asked him what he wanted me to do, since taking him or rescheduling both seemed to frustrate him. We briefly stopped talking, then he asked me to go to the grocery store for him. I groaned, not understanding why HE couldn't go considering that he was just sitting on the couch watching tv &amp; that he almost always sends me to fetch something. I groaned &amp; said yes. He grew angry, again, &amp; asked me to go to our bedroom away from him. I went &amp; got in bed, unsure what else to do. He then came in to grab his shoes, scoffed at what I was doing &amp; said that he was tired of being in a relationship with someone who is like me &amp; is always in bed.I was diagnosed with depression about two months ago. I decided to see a psychiatrist when my frequent napping became excessive, I never knew why I was always tired. Since then, I have not napped during the day so I am confused as to why he said what he did.I don't know what he wants me to do. It seems that either way, he's frustrated. [info] None [info] 1494259854
woowoowoogirl [info] My therapy was cancelled last minute today I'm posting this through mobile, so if the format is strange I apologise in advance.I have been diagnosed with depression and ptsd from childhood sexual abuse this year. This is my third therapist that I've talked to about it in the past year and half.I hate recalling the abuse so much, but my therapist actually makes me feel like I take a step forward after each session. We have been seeing each other once a week and I've also been taking Zoloft to help manage my life. I'm leaving for a family vacation this weekend and she was all about seeing me before I went. Two hours before the appointment I get a call from the receptionist saying she has cancelled our session today with no explanation. It was over voicemail though and I haven't contacted her back yet. I'm trying to calm down, because I don't trust what I would say. I'm very upset.I have horrible problems with abandonment alongside depression, panic attacks, etc. After listening to the voicemail I got those feelings all over again. I'm not worth anyone's time. Telling a 'stranger' about my abuse is already humiliating. My family and friends were the people to convince me to see someone. I never wanted to go through this. I was happy pushing it aside. Has this ever happened to anyone? How did you cope? I won't be seeing her until May 15. I also want to point out that she doesn't give out a way to reach her after office hours and she is constantly late to our appointments. I feel very disrespected, but also trying to understand that she's human and life happens. [info] None [info] 1525353264
Beckshniddley [info] I'm so sorry youre going through these new emotions.  It's interesting how, I think we feel once we are adults we're "done cooking" so to say.  Of course, that's not the case unfortunately. I have felt similarly recently.  I had a rough start to my marriage but it has grown and is amazing now.  There is trust, stability, structure. But also, a childhood friend died. Fragility, death, sadness.  And one night I just fucking broke down.  HARD.  Like.  Cried.  And I'm sure in another language a word suffices that would describe that feeling.  And I was diagnosed with depression in high school.  Idk if that's true sometimes, because I've been very happy in my 20's. Can anyone really tell you how you are feeling?  No way.  And I hope that doesn't make you sad but instead liberates you.  Instead of the external, think inwardly.  You should know yourself best. And sometimes, sure, that comes from therapy if you think that would give you insight.  But processing emotions is so important.  I hope you can feel these emotions, understand them, and move on. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1557662157
DarkVioletCloud [info] Bro when I was that kid’s age, I was diagnosed with depression (actually a few years prior) and given meds and it’s saved me from so many breakdowns and suicide attempts. You have no idea if the diagnosis was given out like candy. The gal could’ve gone through a ton of testing, or maybe she’s just on trial meds. In any case, it’s not your business nor your place to judge. [info] None [info] 1563336684
JaneLane87 [info] Pregnancy and depression....what coping skills has help you most? I was diagnosed with depression years ago. This is my third pregnancy and its the first one where I was actually being treated for my depression. I have since stopped my meds which came at a time i felt i was ready. But this all day sickness aka morning sickness is way worse this pregnancy compared to my other two. I go to my doc on the 9th but i wanted to hear some moms who deal with depression in general and how you coped through your pregnancy. Im 8 weeks and i finally admitted I’m feeling depressed.  So I’m just looking for support or encouragement that it will get better from moms who have been here before. [info] None [info] 1562201838
The_iron_mill [info] This comment really speaks to me. I was diagnosed with depression in 2008, and narrowly avoided doing something drastic... I think that working on my channel gives me something I can point to as an outlet for creative energy and socializing, and demonstrate improvements too. I've been really fortunate that my depression's all but gone now, but one of the most helpful things towards making that happen is surrounding yourself with people who lift you up, and don't drag you down. If this community can do that, then I'll be even more proud to be a part of it. [info] https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCK8bIv-GUqtBMgc-SYH3hUQ [info] 1496784048
Setsand [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and insomnia is one of my issues. I'm currently starting a new anti depressant regiment that is slowly fixing my sleep schedule.I've tried depriving myself of sleep but need a 2 hour nap right in the middle of the sleep deprivation to be able to crash at a descent hour at night. But once I'm down for the nap, it's nearly impossible to feel motivated enough to get back up. You need to talk to a doctor about this. [info] None [info] 1465145336
tarantulawarfare [info] Today I’m going to start teaching my son how to cook. He’s 9. My boy isn’t into sports or band or a lot of the other usual extracurricular school activities. I’ve never tried to push them on him and overwhelm him with things he doesn’t like to do. I had him in wrestling briefly, but I could tell he didn’t like it and only went along with it to please me. He Iikes being outside in nature to catch frogs and bugs. He’s artsy Iike me, and enjoys spending his time doodling or building with LEGO. I keep a lot of scraps of junk and cloth that he builds zombie hunting weapons or dolls based on video game characters. He got a tool kit for his birthday last year. Lately I noticed he’s been helping himself to the kitchen. He’s still little so he has to push a chair across the room to get into the cabinets. One day I could hear him working in there, and next thing I know he shows up with an entire snack tray for everybody, full of assorted fruit and veggie snacks he’s washed and chopped up all by himself. I’m not a great cook. I’m ok, and I can do a decent job when I’m inspired to. I was diagnosed with depression and had PPD shortly after giving birth to him. Cooking is one thing I have to force myself to do because I’d rather make some quick ramen and be done with it, and many times I’m not hungry at all and have to force feed myself just to get minimum calories in. I’ve got a husband and two kids and our well being and nutrition requires more out of me. My husband has no problem stepping in, but I’d rather do more because he’s just as tired as I am at the end of the day. So I’ve got my boy wanting to learn. There’s a new place opening up soon that offers cooking classes, and he was so excited when I told him. Meanwhile, the obvious thing to do is teach him what I know. So tonight it’s meatballs, my boy. Roll up those sleeves and prepared to get all up in the spices. I’m hoping this will be good for both him and me. [info] None [info] 1551810164
lazulies [info] I was diagnosed with depression/dysthymia for years and my psychiatrist didn't know what to do with me after I failed to respond to 6 different medications. He now thinks that it was a complete misdiagnosis, but I still feel as depressed as ever on the days when I don't take stimulants.I've yet to find a med that keeps me awake without giving me daily panic attacks, but both ritalin and modafinil seemed to significantly lift my depression, which is not an effect that they're supposed to have lol. I hope my narcolepsy and depression aren't the same thing since that means it's never going away. [info] Narcolepsy w/o Cataplexy [info] 1551143919
HanCurunyr [info] My mom is a narcissist, since I was a kid (27yo now), for my mom, I was never good enough, never smart enough, poor grades (even if I never failed any classes in school and college). I always was a little sad kid, at 13 yo, I was diagnosed with depression, and spent the next 3 years of my life fighting that goddamn disease, and fighting my mom's bad influence. Fast Forward 14 years, I am graduated, have a nice paying job, depression still lurks from the back of my mind, like a caged animal, I got promoted on my job, earned a health insurance along with the promotion, nothing fancy, but better than a public hospital, the downside, the insurance covers only me, no other family members. When I got home yesterday, I shared the news with my mom, and, she got pissed because I had the audacity of getting a insurance that doesn't cover her, shut herself from any interaction, and we haven't spoke since that. I never had the chance of saying that I can now look for a insurance for her, since I got a better paycheck and my insurance is covered by the company.&amp;#x200B;Well, Here I go for another week or so of tolerating my mom in complete silence, until she asks if I want to say sorry, because I am always wrong, even if the decision is not mine to make. [info] None [info] 1560968116
E_empress [info] He's been always like this. I can't live alone, especially since I've been diagnosed with depression. They won't allow me and if I tried they'll probably drag me back home. [info] None [info] 1492069594
limonalvaro34 [info] How does a male go about searching for help regarding mental health issues? I was already hesitant to even come in here and ask, even if this sub Reddit is specifically for things you were too afraid to ask. Some background, I am a male, 24, and used to see counselors and therapists when I was a teenager. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 13 years old but refused to take any sort of medication because at the time I thought that was for pussies. To this day, I don’t talk to anyone about what is killing me on the inside because I was raised to believe that of you talked about your feelings you are a pussy. The most I do is give small and subtle cries for help. I can’t come to any of my friends about any of my problems because I feel like we are all too manly or they wouldn’t care. I’ve been a wreck recently and all I have been thinking about is death and suicide. Sorry for the inconvenience everyone. [info] None [info] 1562096160
hermitsociety [info] When I was diagnosed with depression and went on medication my father started telling people I was "on drugs" and acted like I was being a baby, essentially, when I was genuinely struggling and unwell. That was the first time I tried to kill myself. Ptsd is a real illness and this kid had a real trauma. Please seek therapy yourself and try to find a shred of decency before someone really gets hurt.  [info] None [info] 1537079269
oregon_braille [info] tldr; feeling like I need to share before leaving the sub for a while.I know this is a meme but I'm actually closing the charts and ethtrader for 1 month. Over the past 3 years I taught myself decently advanced programming and systems architecture, got in to serious running shape, and learned to cook; so I'm looking at this as just another challenge. I owe the last of my taxes in October and I will have to check in anyways to see if its worth selling a small bit before doing so.The last time I got this distracted from real life was during the very first bull run in 2017, but for the opposite reasons. I can no longer enjoy this community in small doses throughout the day. I got some glares when I found myself standing in the middle of the grocery store aisle staring at cbp on my stupid fucking phone. Also been having some dark thoughts about what all my friends and family who knew of my investments must think. I was diagnosed with depression a few years back so I know I am entering a dangerous territory and need to take concerted measures to reduce my exposure to this part of my life. If this resonates with you, do not wait to respond. Do something now. Trust me, I've let this go before and the consequences can last a while.I know this is the millionth time someone has said they would take an extended break, but I have to put this down so that there is at least *something* to keep me honest and not coming back to this fucking thread. Best of luck to all you crazy bastards. We may be headed to double digits, but hopefully I will have my mind back at least. You can only lose so much if you spend your time stocking up on intellectual capital. And that is what I will continue to do.Peace and good luck out there, gents. Stay away from margin and keep your heads up. I will see you all on October 11. [info]   [info] 1536695337
ImInFrenchBread [info] Wife isn't fond of me going to therapy again. Thoughts? So, I'm thinking about going to therapy. I already did once about 7 years ago, when I was diagnosed with depression, but it didn't help me at all. Now I live in a different country with my wife and our two small children. I only work part-time about 3 days a week, so I feel useless  the rest of the time. (My kids visit a nursery school so I'm alone at home doing chores) on top of that I don't have any friends or hobbies. All my friends are just my wife's friends that I got kinda close to.I asked her how she felt about me going to therapy and she's absolutely against it. She said that I'll feel like shit again due to my last experiences, and told me that I won't be able to get proper help since English isn't my native language.Don't know what to think. Do I have any other options besides therapy? [info] None [info] 1583170672
Falconhaxx [info] To my family: I love you and I hate you. It hurts. **Context**: My family consists of me, Mom, Dad, my little brother A, and my 3 big sisters(actually half-sisters) P, E and T.**Dad**: Dad, you know I love and respect you, but I also loathe and despise you. I don't really know how to feel. You were never there for me when I was a kid, you worked from 8 in the morning to 10 in the evening. Also, you're 47 years older than me, of course there is a disconnect there. But when you were there, you did everything right, and for that I love you.But now? You retired 3 years ago and now you suddenly think that you can make up for all the lost time when me and A were kids. We don't want you to make lunch for us, we don't want you to drive us to all places, and I don't like that when I point that out, you hurt me by saying stuff like "What else can I do, when you're so helpless on your own?". Why do you have to be such a perfect example of a man who thinks that all men should be manly, everyone should man up and that men are superior to women? You also make too many jokes that target me, and they hurt. For this, I hate you. I HATE YOU.**Mom**: I want you to know that I love and respect you, but you can't seem to understand that and it kills me to not have the ability to just straight up say it. For this, I loathe and despise you too. But you were there for me, you were a great and patient mom, and you're a truly good person. You do deserve the love I have for you.On the other hand, you obsess over everything and lash out at me when I just want you to feel happy. You joke around at my expense, and you never confront Dad when he makes an inappropriate joke. You also make no effort to get to know me. Do you know how much it hurts to hear it when you think I'm a communist, when you think I'm an anarchist, when you think I support internet piracy? And then you have the guts to praise me when I do ok in a university class. Not when I do well, when I do ok. Sometimes last year, I thought that you knew a lot and trusted your praise, thinking I was doing well enough. Then, out of the blue, you scold me for not putting in enough effort. WHICH ONE IS IT? You allow everyone else to tease me, and you're never there for me emotionally. For this, I hate you. Not as much as I hate Dad, but I still hate you.**P**: P, you're very dear to me. You're 15 years older than me, but you've still always been a good sister to me. However, you suffer from the same problem as our Mom in that you don't really understand how I view the world. I've tried explaining, but I can't. This kills me inside, because I think you understand me best out of all the family members. You've dealt with problems too in your life, but as far as I know, you've always tried dealing with them yourself, at least at first. I don't know if you've gotten professional help, but at least you don't, at the first sign of an issue, go to a psychiatrist and say "medicine, please". You're smart, funny and generous, and I look up to you.**E**: E, you too are dear to me. I envy the fact that you tried to create a life and family of your own. You failed somewhat, and it left you as a single mom with a tiring job. But, I'm happy that I have a nephew who is just as kind as you. At no point did you shut the rest of us out, you accepted help from the family when you needed it, and for that, I envy you more than anyone else in the world. Not in a bad way, though. You've always been nice to me, and you don't participate in the hurtful jokes.**T**: T, you're a good person at heart, but I can't help hating you sometimes. You join A in teasing me and when I retaliate, you accuse me of trying to be the center of attention. Or worse, you reference the fact that you've been diagnosed with depression and get medicine for it. You're the "medicine, please"-kind and I hate that. It makes you basically immune to any criticism in this house. It's ok to go to a psychiatrist if you need professional help, but don't use it as a permission slip to do everything and anything you want. You're a bully, and I hate you for it. YOU'RE MY SISTER. I'M SUPPOSED TO LOVE YOU BUT I HATE YOU, AND I HATE MYSELF FOR THAT TOO.**A**: A, I like it when we play video games together and you can be a funny and interesting person. However, right now, I hate you. You also use the "I'm diagnosed with depression and get meds for it"-card all the time. You tease me all the time, together with T, and everyone just laughs at it, because they're too scared to make you sad. The worst thing is that you don't realize that you are hurting me, and I don't want to correct you, because I've given up hope on you. You're my brother, but only by name. I hate you, I despise you, I loathe you, I HATE YOU, I HATE YOU, I HATE YOU. I wish I could run away, far from you.**Me**: I'm smart, and my face has a few features that could be called handsome. That's all I've got going for me. I've either pushed away all of my new friends or ignored them completely. My old friends are still my friends, but when I quit drinking, a chasm appeared between us. I have seen them twice this year.For years, probably since the age of 12, I wore a happy face, a face that absorbs almost all insults and hurt thrown against it. I wore the face for so long that I forgot how to feel, and that further pushed away any possible friends. At some point earlier this year, I even claimed to be a psychopath, because I forgot that the happy face was just a front. I also pushed away my family, permanently. I can't talk to them about my feelings, because I've convinced them I have none. And since they don't trust what I say, at all, once I convince them of something, anything contradictory will be ignored, completely. No, I need someone else to talk to.And that's the problem. I don't know how to find someone else like me. Someone who just needs a shoulder to cry on, another person to hug, someone to talk to, or just sit quietly, leaning on each other. A true friend. I hate myself for letting this happen. I feel like I fell into a hole I dug with my own hands. I don't know how to get up. [info] None [info] 1356463183
heyheresmythrowaway [info] I'm openly gay at university and still feel lonely Hey r/depression, long-time lurker but first-time poster here.The title is essentially the tl;dr. I'm in my third year of a degree at university (in the UK) and started coming out gradually about two years ago. I'm now at the point where my friends know and I'm recognised as a regular on the "scene", but I still feel really lonely.I can't name my university, but to give you some idea of the kind of place we're talking about, it's somewhere where people are driven to succeed, to the point where 1 in 3 have/will leave with a mental health problem. I was diagnosed with depression before the summer, and as much as I wanted to believe it was a "one-off", it's something which I've been battling with for the best part of a year and a half now.This all makes it even more important to have a good support network, and part of what brings people together here is the sense of camaraderie because we're all going through the same thing. The problem is that there isn't much of an LGBT scene - the only real activities are drinking and clubbing (I don't enjoy clubbing but make an effort to go to drinks every once in a while), and everyone here seems to be a radical - and I mean **radical** - feminist. Our university was due to host a talk by Julian Assange, and the people I met on the scene were some of the first to label people attending as "rape apologists". Understandably, I don't want to associate with people who have such strong views that they're quick to point the finger - but this post isn't about their views.The thing is, I recently tried online dating out of desperation, and came across a girl who seemed really down to earth and friendly. We went on a date which went really well, and she agreed to a second. Cut to a few days later when she's telling me that she's too busy to see anyone at the moment because of her work schedule. I know it's possible since I have two friends in a relationship studying "our subjects" (and they were in the top of the year last year!), so I'm upset and angry that she doesn't even want to try and make it work.Worst of all, though, is the prospect of being stuck here for another 8 months until I graduate and move cities, with nobody who *truly* gets what it's like for company, and no prospect of finding a partner who can offer the kind of romantic support you just can't get from your friends. My best friend tried to cheer me up, but his "it wouldn't have worked out anyway" didn't do a great deal. I can't believe that I'm the only LGBT person to feel like this, so I'm sure there'll be more of them, but I'm not sure how to find them in a city of over 10,000 students without making a more open statement about my sexuality (to the extent that it almost takes over my personality). Does anyone have any advice as to how to meet such people? Hell, I'll take advice on how to survive day-to-day too. I'm someone who thinks about things a lot, to the point where I can't really switch off, so taking up a hobby etc. isn't really an option (although I've recently signed up to a sports team to see if it helps). Anyway, thanks for reading, and thanks for all your support. [info] None [info] 1359209321
20-CharactersAllowed [info] DAE have their illnesses take turns? I've been diagnosed with depression, DP/DR, BPD, Gender Dysphoria, and panic disorder.The only one that's really constant is some parts of the BPD. Everything takes turns of about a month or so. August was panic, September was, DP/DR, October was dysphoria, November and December were a combination of depression and BPD. Now I'm feeling my DP/DR start to come back.For all of them except bpd when they're off, they're almost completely gone. Got a while I was taking clonazepam at least once a day. Now I've hardly touched it since September. Same with dysphoria. It's been completely fine for the last two months.Anyone else have similar experiences? With illnesses taking turns at the reins? [info] None [info] 1577416683
CeboMcDebo [info] Considering that after my dad committed Suicide when I was 12, and I felt abandoned and all these other things that made me a recluse. Barely had the energy to get up or do anything. Tried to kill myself thre times, nearly succeeded on my last attempt after which I was diagnosed with depression... I am fairly certain that death makes me "funky". I speak to my psychologist regularly about this and how after I lose someone I have more will to join them then to stay alive. [info] None [info] 1522015033
imekon [info] I was taught by my parents that I'm stupid and lack common sense. I was taught by christians that I'm an abomination and a monster.Just after I came out to my parents, I stood on a bridge and thought about suicide. I knew if I stayed on the bridge, I'd jump so I ran away at the time, and went on to have several huge rows with my parents.I was diagnosed with depression some time ago. It's effect on me is that I cry without reason.I feel a lot better now after years but I just wish things had been different. I'm a happy person I think who got burdened by junk at the start and had to fight my way through it. [info] Ex pentecostal, Agnostic [info] 1508911931
Coolfoolsalot [info] Hey! I was diagnosed with depression a week before I went on a trip to Japan. When I was there I saw lots of beautiful traditional pieces that had patchwork incorporated into the designs. Someone explained to me that continually mending the clothing over time was the reason why each piece was unique. So I decided to make the patchwork out of Japanese fabrics to reference the concept of mending. It’s a bit indirect I understand aha [info]  [info] 1537253136
sewagemonster [info] I'm tired. All I want to do is sleep. That's what's going through my head 90% of the time. I'm just *exhausted*.I'm normally good for a few hours in the morning, but when the afternoon hits, all I want to do is lay down and sleep. I try to stay awake by doing things, hanging out with people, but all I'm thinking is, "can this be over? I'm tired...I want to sleep."I try to eat right, I'm guilty of being a lazy ass and not exercising...I've been diagnosed with depression, yes, but when I sleep it's because I don't have interest in my hobbies. I'm starting to get my interests back, I want to do them but my brain's in a fog.I guess the next step is to get into a doctor and test for vitamin/mineral deficiencies and hopefully that'll pull up some information...I'm lonely, too. It all goes back to not having the energy to partake in hobbies or meeting people, though. [info] None [info] 1456025766
askoso [info] are shrooms for me? I am diagnosed with depression should I wait to take shrooms or would it be okay if I did some. [info] None [info] 1347392593
Notagamer [info] Ever since I've been diagnosed with depression, I went to a class at my school with other kids with similar illnesses. I was surprised to see a lot of the kids I see laughing and smiling were siting there crying. [info] None [info] 1319163510
comicBookJargon [info] I was diagnosed with depression. I hope you are able to talk to someone, and best of luck.  [info] None [info] 1451979431
PMeinspirativityness [info] A big reason to why so many people have depression is that people actually get diagnosed for depression now.  I was diagnosed with depression but (atleast on the surface) I appear way less depressed than the alcoholics in my family who are 20-40 years older than me and never got a diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1550750688
BonBonVivant [info] When I was diagnosed with depression while at university, Campus Health gave me a 10- or 12-item list of symptoms to check off. I went right down the line like,  yes, yes, yes (only I was super depressed so it was like, yeah... uh huh... guess so...). Until that moment I didn't realize that all the feelings and behaviors I was experiencing were all related and were all red flags. That was a turning point for me and helped me realize that I could benefit from treatment.On mobile right now so I can't link, sorry, but try googling "depression symptoms checklist" and pick one from a reputable hospital or university. [info] None [info] 1494920050
throwawayjewfro [info] Recommended first psychedelic for someone recovering from depression? Hi. I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago. Today. I am about 90% recovered primarily through cognitive behavioral therapy. I have decided that I am ready for my first trip. What would you recommend as my first psychedelic? Don't bother telling me not to do any, because I've made up my mind. [info] None [info] 1511839463
CoconutFoxes [info] Lost and confused TL;DR: a vent that might not make sense about surprisingly making it to 18, several suicide attempts, severe depression &amp; suicidal ideationSo.. where do I start?Well. I made it to 18 last month (honestly shocking since I didn’t think I’d be alive once 2018 ended) and I made it to 2019. I was diagnosed with depression back in middle school and it’s only getting worse. I’ve had a few suicide attempts, most of which were trying to overdose on Zoloft/Lexapro (fun fact: that shit clearly doesn’t kill you and Lexapro is a bitch to overdose on, it’s not fun). Honestly, I didn’t think I’d make it to where I am now. I remember the hospital stays, the attempts, the nights I stayed up feeling so anxious or depressed and breaking down. I wanted to die so badly. I cut and pushed people away. I had no hope in getting better. I tried to kill myself again towards the end of 2017 but that didn’t work either, only made me feel even more like shit. Fast forward to early 2018. Finally started to feel better and left an abusive/toxic 2 year relationship. I was hoping things wouldn’t be as bad as they were before. Guess who’s hopes were crushed! Me. Halfway through 2018 I got sucked back into an abyss of depression and suicidal ideation. I’ve tried to talk with a therapist, I’ve tried to get in contact with a psychiatrist (gave up on both since we can’t find a psychiatrist that’ll accept our insurance and I had a really bad experience with my last therapist). My parents almost got a divorce, which in all honesty I wish would’ve happened—my dad’s one hell of an abusive parent. I lost all hope again. I tried to kill myself again but it didn’t work and my depression got a lot worse after that. I was sure I wasn’t gonna make it to finish the first semester of senior year. I’m not sure how I did it but I managed to pull through and here I am now! 4 months away from graduating but I’m still getting worse.  I don’t know if I’ll be walking with my friends, I don’t know if I’ll be in that stupid red cap and gown. Will I make it? Probably not. If you’ve made it to this point of my vent, congrats! I have no idea what the mess is above me. I’m not sure if this is a cry for help because I’m constantly thinking about killing myself, no plan or anything, just wanna die y’know? These thoughts scare me a little and sometimes I wish I didn’t even exist cause I’m tired of feeling this way. Feeling depressed, anxious, numb, etc. I’m lost and confused. Why do we have to fucking deal with things like depression and suicide? [info]  [info] 1546612382
xAstrologyx [info] Yesterday I was in crisis... Today I feel fine? Hopefully someone can help to reassure me that this is fine. I'm 26F living in the UK. Yesterday during work, I confided in a friend about how I was feeling and stated I was having suicide thoughts. We ended up calling my GP who told me to go straight to the Crisis Team at my local hospital. I got my mum to pick me up and we went. It wasn't the best experience ever and caused a lot more stress than it should have. Today, I've been to see my doctor to get more antidepressants. No support was given, so mum being mum really wasn't happy. However, I'm feeling a million times better today. Yesterday I was thinking how I was going to do it. Today I'm not happy, but I'm not sad. I suppose I'm a bit numb. It's making me feel like a fraud and that how I felt yesterday was exaggerated or faked despite me knowing it wasn't. Is this normal? I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 18 but this just feels... Odd. Hopefully someone can help! [info] None [info] 1582316149
milkyixing [info] Advice for parents with no knowledge on depression Disclaimer: I'm not a native English speaker, so I hope you don't mind some mistakes I'm bound to make in the process of writing this.First of all, I'd like to clarify that my family isn't really informed about depression and mental illnesses in general, that means they're not familiar with the symptoms or anything to do with the medication, so their knowledge is limited to what my doctor has said.I was diagnosed with depression about four years ago when I was 15, I didn't know what to do and my family environment wasn't the best, I hid it and pretended like I was ok. Clearly, I wasn't. Four years later and here I am, second time being diagnosed with depression and being prescribed with antidepressants. I've been getting informed about depression ever since I got diagnosed for the first time, but I never talked about it because I thought no one would care or that it would make my parents more worried and I didn't want to be a nuisance. My parents, specifically my dad, don't know much about depression, so they get desperate when they see that I don't do anything. Ever since I was prescribed the medication, they started relying on them (which is ironic because they also thought that I would be the one who would rely on them but, so far, the dose that I have been given hasn't changed much of my usual mood. I'm still having depressive episodes three times a week, but that's another topic for another time) because they wanted to see a change, a result, and now they're desperate because I don't show signs of improving. My dad is now sitting in the sofa, staring at the nothing, because he's worried. One of the main topics that we always argue about is my weight and exercise. Now, I know he wants me to be healthy, and I want that too! But it's difficult for me, however, he sees that as a failure so now, he's retorted to offering me to eat what I usually eat (what he always complains about) because it seems like he's given up. He doesn't know how to approach me when it comes to my depression, he doesn't know the symptoms or what causes me to be like this. I just want him to stop thinking everything is a failure if there aren't results but I truly don't know what to tell him. Does anyone have an advice? [info] None [info] 1543466824
LisaArouet [info] I have episodes of severe depression lasting around two weeks or so. The rest of the time I’m extremely happy and energetic to the point where it’s sometimes overwhelming, but the downside is that I get angry easily, engage in impulsive and attention seeking behaviors and feel that everyone is jealous of my greatness and out to get me.I’m in therapy but do not have an official diagnosis yet so no medication. I was diagnosed with depression previously but we believe that there is something else going on outside of the depressive episodes.Your problems don’t pale in comparison. Everyone’s struggle is valid. [info] None [info] 1519879517
schro1995 [info] i don't know if it's related but i never wanted antidepressants (even if i'm diagnosed with depression) because both of my parents are addicts, and i'm afraid to become like them. I prefer to work with a psychologist on my problems so that I can really balance my mental functioning and start over on a more stable and healthy basis. [info] None [info] 1558814099
thenametheroyalty_ [info] Just a thank you [0] My name is Thenametheroyalty_ and this is my story.A few years ago, I was diagnosed with depression. and I've never really had a stable life. I was put on Zoloft, and taken to a therapist. Blah blah blah. And after 2 suicide attempts and a collection of scars on my left wrist, I was introduced to the world of trees, and I can honestly say it changed my life. I just wanna give a big thank you to r/trees for making my life that much better. I can always count on this community to put a smile on my face. I started off thinking about ending my life. Now, I have straight A's, I just got back from studying in Europe for about a month, and I'm releasing my first album next summer. I'm a singer songwriter, and I love nothing more than getting baked and playing piano for hours on end. I love you guys. I really do. And you may not know it, but your helped me through a lot. Thanks. If anyone ever needs someone to talk to, please, I'm begging you, talk to me, or anyone that can help, before you do something you can't take back.Toke on ents, and stay fly. [info] None [info] 1379977695
DexterMcSnuggles [info] I'm 19 And Completely Fine With Death... Even though I've been diagnosed with depression, most of my family thinks that it's just an excuse to do what I want; as if I wanted to lose that scholarship and forfeit my future, as if I want to be terrified of leaving the house, as if I want to contemplate death for this long...  Suicide is not an option for me; my religion (Islam) forbids it, and I very much care about my afterlife; I'm just waiting to die, preferably doing something heroic like saving someone's life, and dying in the process.  The way I see it, if I die, 1 of 3 options will happen:  1: My religion is the right one, and I will most likely go to heaven, the odds will be amplified if I die heroically.  2: My religion is not the right one, but I've done good with my life, I'm a good person, I help people when I can, and most religions show god as a merciful being, so my chances of going to heaven are reduced, but I still have a good chance.  3: I'm completely wrong and there's no afterlife, would it be so bad? Was life bad before you were born?  So yeah, 19 and ready to die, anyone else here had similar feelings? [info] None [info] 1390364749
cantfindtheacidhouse [info] Because the day I was diagnosed with depression, he came into my room while I was lying in bed, put his paw on my hand and made a funny face that he hasn't done since.   [info] None [info] 1509844656
Potatoguy123 [info] Hm. After I was diagnosed with depression they put me on something. A week or two later I was feeling like shit. A coworker said something that set me off. I went outside and literally destroyed a six foot wide, eight foot tall section of slat fencing with my bare hands. My boss called 911 and I had to look cops (including one that arrested me before) and paramedics in the eye and lie, telling them I didn't want to hurt myself. Obviously Charlie had his medication regulated. I just stopped taking mine. Over a year later and I'm still here. [info] None [info] 1367938323
DaddysLittleShadow [info] Emotionally Abusive Mother Hello... I just recently found this sub. Whilst I’m looking for places to vent. I’m 18F and the other Important figure is my boyfriend 22M.My mother has been a huge cause of chaos in my house since I was younger, I’ve always been a daddies girl, and bonded with my father because he worked less than my mom. All of the emotional abuse became apparent once I was in middle school, essentially as soon as I got an iPhone/iPod, I was bullied all my life of course which doesn’t help the fact either... so I was diagnosed with depression when I was around 11/12 I had recently come out as Bi-Sexual to both my parents. And had a girlfriend at the time. My parents are both Christians and my mom took it the worse, she took my iPhone away, broke up with my girlfriend on me, and stuck me in therapy because she thought I was confused, I also was of course the Emo kid... which didn’t help with my taste in music. My mom did nothing but shame me for my choice, and she still does. And she tends to “forget” when she insults or berates me. Anyway, skip to now, I’m 18 and my boyfriend whose 22 moved in with us a few months back. He had broken his hand and he was staying with us so I could help him out. My mom has done nothing but diss on our relationship and cause havoc, everything in the house is left for me, my boyfriend and my father to do while she sits in her room, when she does come out of her room, she starts some sort of fight with anyone she can. She blackmails me because I don’t have a job due to being in school. She pays for my truck, my horses and everything else in my life essentially, which really makes my situation worse. If I don’t do something she wants she’ll take the truck from me, and then demand I go take care of my horse....which I can’t do if I don’t have my truck to get there.Skip to yesterday, I’ve been sick all week with the flu and a kidney infection, I asked her if she could feed my horses and let them out. Because I haven’t been able to get out of bed. She agreed originally but yesterday she forgot and blamed it on me, and said I abuse them, and that I’m cruel and don’t love them (they are my only therapy) she also says she wouldn’t care if I killed myself, after an attempt causes by her 2 weeks ago. So I had gone downstairs to get something and she started a fight with me, eventually with her getting in my face and hitting me. All I did was push her away from me and she threatened to call the police and said she could hit me because she’s my mother. She has continued on today to call me dilusional and say my mental illness is fake and it’s just an excuse. That I’m lazy and going down a dangerous road. She has cornered me and I have no way to leave, currently I’m trying to set up an escape plan with my boyfriend and one of my friends. But I’d have to drop out of school and get a full time job....I know this has all been one big jumbled mess, but I don’t feel safe at home, and calling the police really isn’t an option... [info] None [info] 1571941255
presidentalice [info] This could be a sign of a deeper issue he is dealing with. I did this a lot before (and, if I’m being honest, after) I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1558412998
SaturatedPhats [info] I was diagnosed with depression 9 years ago when I was 16. Many books helped me depression--if only through escapism--but I'll throw down one that's very different from the others: *A Confederacy of Dunces* by John Kennedy Toole.My favorite fiction books can essentially be parted into two categories: Books that make me confront my depression (The Bell Jar, Nine Stories, One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest, The Corrections etc) and others that lifted my depression (Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy, any Ray Bradbury, etc). Dunces, however, is perhaps the first and only book that required some very deep introspection.The novel is about an intellectual in 1970's New Orleans who, through his own laziness and arrogance, is forced into situations very unbecoming of a man of his intelligence: working in a pants factory, selling hot dogs to tourists, etc. The book is enormously funny yet also a heartfelt journey into a deluded mind. The main character (Ignatius J. Reilly) and his behavior opened my own eyes to the shortcomings as a person I shared with him. He's supposed to be this offensive oaf, some cartoonish version of the sort of person who considers themselves above actual work and worthy enough to criticize everyone around him. Basically, he's an asshole. I, too, am and asshole. I was indifferent as my parents suffered from addiction then died two years apart, I regularly push people away by being snotty, rude, and just plain trying too hard. I've worked only a handful of jobs anyone would consider "real" work and bet on the idea that politeness, empathy, and love can be replaced by intelligence, cynicism, and the absurd notion that I am better than anyone (I've had at least one therapist float the idea of NPD as a diagnosis). While somewhat aware of these facets of my personality, Dunces drove them home in a way I never could've expected. It's a very difficult thing to despise a character yet relate with them. It's a feeling I haven't really felt since I realized Michael Scott was the character with whom I related the most on *The Office*. To realize that you are alone because you deserve to be alone is a harsh reality to confront, and one I likely wouldn't have without Dunces.I think a lot of depressives tend to feel subjugated for who they are, and oftentimes the response is to blame the outside world. Fuck that. I'm a bad person, and I'm going to continue being a bad person if I don't respond to criticism well and assess what is true and what is simple trolling. Other people are the best read of your behaviors and accomplishments, and until you can allow yourself to trust them, you'll be left as ugly a person tomorrow as you were yesterday. [info] Pan-Galactic Gargle Blaster [info] 1395173577
ezraxcore [info] I was diagnosed with depression a month ago. I started taking Sertraline. It kinda worked i guess? The only problem is that I cant feel emotion that much. Im better off like this than being overwhelmed and wanting to kill myself. Also, my mother is my strength. If you need someone to talk to, OP, you can send me a PM. [info] None [info] 1521385417
thundershaft [info] Shit I had a year of therapy after I was diagnosed with depression but it didn't do me any good. Granted I was 16 and a closed minded little prick. I've always avoided going back, but honestly the way you described this might make me reconsider. [info] None [info] 1550272321
charizard334 [info] I just need someone to listen for a minute (Ramble) I’m 22. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 15 and have had on and off suicidal thoughts ever since. Some days are worse than others. Some days aren’t so bad at all. I take medication but I don’t think it’s working.I work in radio. I’m a full time employee with benefits and paid time off but I don’t find my job fun at all. I fuck things up all the time. I barely get any recognition for anything that I do but any time I screw one little thing up the world knows. I want to find a job I enjoy but I’d be an idiot to quit this well paying job with the rent I have.I have no problem telling people I’m introverted. Whenever I go out and spend time with others it completely drains me, regardless of if I had a good time, so I often cancel plans just because I don’t want to be exhausted afterwards. I fear this has made a lot of my friends secretly have a grudge against me because I’m just avoiding them.I’ve been dating on and off this past year, with 0 luck. In the back of my head I’m thinking I’ll just be single forever. Anytime I get someone I just never find myself content and cut things off, making another person who probably views me negatively.The idea of growing up and taking responsibility for things sounds so awful to me. Like we don’t have much time on this earth, so my viewpoint is why don’t we spend our time here doing what we want? Of course I don’t do anything that harms anyone else, but I think if I’m still gonna be here, I might as well enjoy myself, because if I’m not then why am I even living? Often I think I’m not cut out for this world we’ve created, and that I should just kill myself before I can cause anyone else any problems.However our 2019 civilization thrives on everyone working themselves to death just to scrape by while hoping that your children will have a better life; while they just do the exact same shit you do and hope for the best with THEIR children.If you can’t tell I don’t want kids. I can barely take care of myself and I really feel like I’d just off myself if my own child was brought into the mix. My life would be over. I would have no more enjoyment in anything. Living would be pointless.Man I talk about myself a lot, huh? I don’t exactly know why, but I love telling people my story. How I work. What I like and dislike. But at the same time I feel super bad because of how self-centered it makes me seem. Hell, I probably am and I’m just using sadness as an excuse. This probably was all over the place but I just wanted to lob a lot of the thoughts I’ve been frequently having to the void just to put things into words, and maybe see if someone out there relates or has some nice advice.Thanks a ton for reading this, friend 💜 [info] None [info] 1577656594
icequeen85 [info] I lost my mom when I was 16 after a 6 year battle with a chronic illness. I’m 33 now too. I can completely relate. I grieve the loss again and again with new phases of my life. And as I near the age of my mother when first became ill, I’m feeling it in a whole new way. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 17 too. It took me too long to get the help I needed. I still struggle in various ways even though I feel as though I’ve healed a lot. It’s comforting to hear someone else’s story who is so similar. I didn’t know anyone my age who experienced anything like this and still really don’t. It’s sadly something that defines my life and who I am still. [info] None [info] 1569122528
thecarrotsgrew [info] I agree with you *and* I think your counter-argument could be viable. Anecdotally, I did very poorly on timed, pen-and-paper writing tests because I am a scatterbrain and need a lot of time even to understand what I’m thinking. I also need to be able to go back and edit, which you can’t do as easily on paper. Once I got to college and started to have longer take-home writing assignments, I realized that I could in fact write. I’m one year into my first job and have been told by two supervisors that they’ve put me on an assignment (writing a report, drafting emails etc.) because I write well. Granted, I work for an engineering firm so the competition isn’t exactly steep, and I’m not a native English speaker so people generally have lower expectations of me. At any rate, I learned, much to my relief, that in the real world I’d have time to reflect.  I also thought I’d point out the nature of the condition that necessitates the accommodation. I received test accommodations for the first time as a Master’s student when I was diagnosed with depression and put on medication. In this situation the condition was acute and temporary rather than chronic, and I felt that extra time would help reflect what my performance would be if I was working at full capacity. I’m not sure that it did, though. [info] None [info] 1564588464
ManSoldWorld [info] Kobe really inspired me during a very tough time in my life (long). Back in December 2017 (my first semester of college), I came home for winter break a complete mess. I just managed to keep myself from having a nervous breakdown that semester, being 7 hours away from home in a whole new world and having a hard time adjusting. I came home and sought medical help, and I was diagnosed with depression and ADD. After I started going to therapy and taking medication for my ADD, I was ready to go back to school for the spring 2018 semester, but I was really lost. I didn't know who I wanted to be and the kind of direction that I wanted my life to go in.It was this search for direction that led me to a motivational video made around Kobe and this mentality. I found myself agreeing with everything he said - that you should strive to be the best at whatever it is that you decide to do. That you should look to constantly improve yourself day after day, month after month, year after year. That you should stay curious, fearless, and unperturbed by what other people think. All these things and more opened my eyes and I started realizing the direction I want to go in. As you can imagine, I tried to watch as many videos centered around Kobe and his thought process as I could. He was one of my favorite basketball players growing up, and I loved trying to mimick his moves on the basketball court, but I never thought too heavily about his thought process until I focused on trying to find my own direction.It was his words and his approaches that led me to decide to be an Accounting major before my sophomore year; even when people told me it would be tough and that I'd constantly be busy, I didn't care one bit. I was determined to pursue the toughest business major out there, work hard every single day to absorb as much as I could about the subject, and sharpen my professional demeanor as much as possible. Most importantly, what I've taken to heart the most from Kobe's words were to never take shortcuts - it's paid dividends as I've built my academic and professional reputation.I want to retire someday knowing that I gave my all to my passion in the same way that Kobe did with basketball. Whether that's as a CFO, a CEO, or a partner in an accounting firm, I want to look back many years from now knowing that I lived with the Mamba Mentality, and that I gave every single day my best and looked to improve myself every step of the way.I'll always be thankful for what I learned from him even if it was through a screen. He impacted my life in a way that no other celebrity has before, and I'll carry his lessons with me forever. [info] None [info] 1585854768
Ctuck19 [info] Thank you for your input. I have been on many different medications until we finally found the right ones (the ones I’m currently taking) that actually help me. I think I was on Paxil after my son was born which is when all this mess started. I was diagnosed with depression and GAD two years before I got pregnant but I wasn’t having any problems with this then. I wish I could get off my medications (if they are the cause) because I’m so tired of this. I can’t wear makeup, I can’t wear my hair down or do anything with it because it gets ruined the minute the sweating begins. I just want to not sweat! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1570503913
TheAmazingJuicyBeast [info] A little while ago I took 300 mcg of 1P LSD and it got me thinking about my life. I realized I have always felt kind of unhappy; below where I felt the average should be. It wasn't a sad or bad trip in any means but it caused me to seek mental health. I was diagnosed with depression and was given medication. I feel much better now and I believe a big part of it was the acid making me think about who I am and where I want to go [info] None [info] 1533216211
milkspectre [info] Is it stupid of me to want to stay in high school when I'm not longer eligible to graduate?  I'm 17 and a senior in high school, and for the past 3 years, I have screwed myself over by taking challenging classes and failing most of them. I'm not dumb, I swear..I just didn't have enough motivation to do the studying or turn in assignments. I've been diagnosed with depression recently, if that's much of an excuse.Last year, I passed a test called the [California High School Proficiency Exam](http://www.chspe.net/about/), which granted me a Certificate of Proficiency, a legal equivalent of a high school diploma and GED in CA. I plan to study at a community college and pursue nursing as a career. I've learned that I don't need a high school diploma to do it.My counselors talked to me today and told me that I have 2 options: (1) To continue taking classes in my high school and not graduate, or (2) transfer to the local continuation high school, where it's possible to receive my high school diploma there.They tried REALLY hard to convince me to transfer there, and stressed how important a high school diploma is. They're really nice counselors, and I know they only want what's best for me, but I feel they exaggerated the importance of a high school diploma..I know it's crazy, but even though I dislike high school, I don't want to leave. I want to experience this last semester with my friends. I like the classes I'm taking. Most of all, I'm scared of what people will think of me if I transfer to the continuation school, which is infamous for the "delinquents" and "dumb people" that go there. I know that's not how they really are, but I'm selfish. I don't want to be put in that category. I've told only one friend about how bad my grades have been. Nobody else knows. I'm too ashamed.I'm taking 3 AP classes though, and I intend to pass the exams so I don't have to take those classes in college, so I guess it isn't entirely pointless?Are my reasons justified? I have to give my counselor an answer by tonight, and I'm wondering how irrational I'm going to sound to them when I tell them that I value my rep over a high school diploma. [info] None [info] 1295923811
slanghype [info] I'm looking at applying for vacation work (summer long internships here in Australia) and grad work in a couple of years time. My GPA is abysmal, and I have very little hope of puling it up - it's less than 2 at the moment. However, there are reasons for this (in my 2nd year of uni, my mum was diagnosed with lung cancer, I had to look after my 17 yo sister and my mother, who passed away midway through my third year, then I was diagnosed with depression). I know that's all really intense stuff and I should have taken time off uni at the time, but it was a case of not knowing how bad things were going to get - also in Australia you only get some social security benefits if you're studying full time, and I couldn't afford to support my family without the benefits from being a full time student. Do I have any hope of getting vacation work from this with a medium-large company? Are there many companies that don't take marks into account or have equity based positions?I study mech eng, and I spent a year working with a student club on student FSAE, and a lot of leadership positions with university clubs, and when I graduate I'll have a bachelor of science (with a physics and maths major, and an astrophysics minor) and a bachelor of mech eng - I also do coding and a little bit of software eng in my own time. I have ok marks in my later year subjects, all my GPA issues are due to about 10 awful marks surrounding the family situations mentioned above.  I'm also a female. So I'm wondering if there's anything I can do to improve my chances to not be overlooked by companies, without saying outright in interviews the reason behind it - I don't want it to sound like a sob story I'm using to try and get a job if you know what I mean. I may be able to pull my grade up to a 2.5, but even that is pretty low. Should I wait to apply for positions until I do have a higher gpa, or just apply everywhere until I get a place? Will me applying this year with a low gpa effect my chances next year even if it's higher then?  [info] None [info] 1346081177
PulsingCatButt [info] I don't know what to do with myself I was diagnosed with depression almost a decade ago. I've had my good times and bad. There was a point that I spent my days drinking and ruining the relationships in my life, but I pushed through that.However, today broke me. The winter has been bad. I have been feeling numb to things and I haven't been myself. I was feeling insecure and made the mistake of checking my partners phone. We were together 5 years. I don't know how long he had been telling these girls how much he loved them, but the first couple messages was enough. Even this post feels pointless. I thought writing it down and having people see it will stop myself from just going back to him, and maybe clear my head. Nothing is going to fix how much pain I am in. I know I should call my doctor and make an appointment with my therapist. But I just can't bring myself to do it.This is my first time posting here and I'm really emotional so I'm sorry if this is the wrong place [info] None [info] 1575830005
whiggie [info] you can be an edgy teenager and also be depressed. I've been diagnosed with depression but I'm only 17, I know that in a few years I will be fine and that it is just my own body and mind fucking with me right now but that doesn't make it any less real. [info] None [info] 1391643403
Storm_Theif [info] I've been diagnosed with depression and mild levels of PTSD. I usually feel happy or at least ok most the day. It's when I'm alone or bored that I really feel it.Of course there's always ups and downs with days. Sometimes I'm happy all day. Sometimes I sleep in until 5 PM on a weekend because I can't find the energy to do anything. [info] None [info] 1489564267
Jumpropes [info] I was diagnosed with depression, our family income dramatically increased and I was cheated on and broken up with all in the same week. However, this summer I got my first job, and now that I'm back in school I am succeeding and I found a great and really nice guy that I like to talk to! All with cutting out friends who weren't right for me (part of the group of the guy who cheated on me). Some days I still struggle and my mind sets me back, but I'm way better than I was months ago. No matter how stupid it seems [info] None [info] 1504910155
tanaquilseagle [info] Honestly--you can't. Believe me. I have tried for over a year. Sometimes telling myself things like "mom will be disappointed in you if you don-t get out of bed" forces me to get out of bed and try to be normal, but it doesn't always work. The one thing that has helped a bit for me is seeing a therapist. I started seeing one after I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD and that has helped a little, but sometimes all you can do in the low periods is pray for it to be over.  [info] None [info] 1495776006
grentacular [info] I could say that it was the fact that I was diagnosed with depression and she didn't know how to handle that, but that's not entirely true.  That was what finished it, but there was some deeper underlying incompatibility between us.  She was pretty resistant to thinking on her own, and I wasn't responsive to her desires.  We probably stayed together out of stubbornness more than anything else.I learned a lot, though, so it was worth it. [info] None [info] 1396443325
yourdepressedacctant [info] Thanks &amp; your welcome!At first I was disappointed. Then I was diagnosed with depression. I was put on Prozac. After getting rejected by my ex at an event when I was trying to talk to her I looked at myself in the mirror. I realized I was better than who I had become. I was stubborn and arrogant. I took all the feedback from my ex and made sure those flaws would become my perfections. I made sure to become a  better me. I learned to love myself by improving my talent and skills. I met new people. I realized that she was too weak to confront me and not strong enough to work things out. She lacked the will to keep “us” together. That’s where strength, will, and priorities lie. I wasn’t a priority. So I came to the understanding that I rather be with someone better.Wish you the best!  [info] None [info] 1540356746
sybildb [info] Has anyone here tried lithium or ECT therapy for depression? I was diagnosed with depression at a very young age (as well as DPDR) and have been going to therapy consistently for the last 5 years as well as trying Zoloft (which i’m currently on) as well as Wellbutrin &amp; Effexor (neither responded well with me). I’ve been considering seeing a trauma specialist and I’ll be visiting a neurologist soon. I’m considering discussing ECT therapy or lithium with my therapist/neurologist. Has anyone here tried either one for treating their depression? I’m kind of going to the ends of the ropes and will try anything to get out of my depression, everyday is miserable and is only getting harder. I’ve been experiencing brain zaps from my Zoloft and am looking into trying a different medication, yet again. [info] None [info] 1556030086
4nnaxD [info] not suicidal, just sad and lonely. I'm 18.67 years old and I was diagnosed with depression over 5 years ago. I've been on an SSRI (zoloft) for 3 years, and for the past 8-9 months I've been on wellbutrin and adderall.In August I moved from my small farming community hometown to Chicago, 300 miles away. I haven't made any friends, I had a crazy ass of a roommate for the first month (switched and now she's nice), I broke up with my mentally/emotionally abusive boyfriend, I somehow got off my medication regimen, and (due to having a panic attack during the midterm) I'm about to fail a 5-credit class. I'm stupid and lazy and useless and I've been sleeping 16-20 hours a day. I'm stuck in a hole and I don't even know how I got here. I just want to sleep until I feel better.I don't know why I'm posting this. I don't even know what I expect out of the comments. I just want to complain because nobody listens anymore, everyone just wants to tell me what I SHOULD HAVE DONE. As if it matters now. [info] None [info] 1384409076
Frag_Owt [info] I was diagnosed with depression 6 years ago but I know I had it for at least a few years before. I applied for my PAL 4 months ago because 1) while not 'cured', I am much better than i was because of therapy and meds, and 2) ive been shooting with friends several times before and like you i find popping gophers, clay discs, cans etc to be a release and quite enjoyable. I can't see your guns being confiscated unless you either have any violent history (not likely seeing as you've owned guns this long), or pose  a serious and explicit threat to yourself or others.I don't know where you are with your condition but speaking as someone who has been through therapy and all that fun stuff, my advice is as follows. Seek help and be honest. Your therapist/psychiatrist won't have your guns confiscated unless they absolutely deem it necessary so it's better to just put it all on the table. If you're really worried about confiscation, turn your guns over to a friend or family member until you feel comfortable handling them again and tell the therapist you've done that.Good luck on you're recovery! [info] None [info] 1486442898
Mewli [info] Same here, OP. I'm diagnosed with depression for years and Wow is really helping me.  [info]  [info] 1500320286
poolmyfinger [info] I was at 6 flags with my family. A kid left the line to use the bathroom before we got there. When he returned he jumped the line to rejoin his friends. I called him on it and wouldn't let him go in front of us. I was a grown ass man ruining this kids day for a very trivial reason. I still feel terrible about it. I did some other irrational stuff later that summer. It made me realize I had something wrong with me. I was diagnosed with depression later that year. Not using that as an excuse, but it was an asshole move. [info] None [info] 1534867966
j-american [info] Headaches and medication I've head pretty consistent tension headaches over the last couple od years. Usually I feel it at the temples. Lately it feels like my head is being squeezed or a burning/aching at the top of my head. I've been diagnosed with depression. My question is if anyone has had similar headaches and if you've had any success getting relief from them. And if you got relief by medication, what worked for you? Thanks [info] None [info] 1509671471
Ojirou [info] I work my ass off at work, but it doesn't change the fact that I am too "unhappy and unreliable". **I apologize for my novel of a rant. It just gets so hard to go on every day with no one to talk to about this stuff in my personal life.** I work in a restaurant, so I work with customers and coworkers directly on a daily basis. When I come in to work every day, I throw on my happy face, act as polite as I can possibly manage, and just try to survive the day in general.You know how you sometimes get those days in which you are on edge, at a breaking point, and you can't really help it? The kind of day when one, small thing could easily send you into an uncontrollable fit of tears. Well unfortunately for me, I've been having those at work recently. Usually I can sneak off to the restroom for a few minutes undetected, clean myself up, and head right back out to continue the rest of my shift. However the most recent time it happened, I felt as though is wasn't going to stop any time soon.Now, why was I so upset? My childhood friend's pregnant girlfriend went missing a little over a month ago. They found her body in a corn field on New Year's Eve, and it has been ruled a homicide. I was informed of this, but mustered up the strength to go into work. I didn't think to let my managers, or anyone else know about this, because quite frankly it I didn't feel it was their business.It was a fairly slow day, so quite a few were told they could go ahead and go home instead of finishing their own shifts off. Since the person (we will call him Phil) who puts the orders together was told they could leave for the day, I decided to help out the servers by doing the job he was doing before they let him clock out. But who comes to continue doing their job after clocking out? None other than Phil. He rips the ticket out of my hand and starts putting it together himself, even though I had it partially set up in front of me. I tried explaining, "Hey, I was already working on it right here. I almost had it ready." Apparently he didn't agree with me on that, because he started yelling that it was all wrong.I tried starting to set up another order, but I quickly became so angry and annoyed at him for yelling at me for just trying to help, that I just stopped and walked directly to the restroom and started bawling. I am treated so horribly by my coworkers and managers constantly, no one appreciates how damn hard I work every day that I come in. I don't even get nice things said about me by the guests when they write reviews unlike so many others. I take as many shifts as I can without going over on hours even when I don't particularly feel like going in, work my ass off, and I just don't know what to do to get a little appreciation at this point. I have only called in sick to this job once, and I rarely ever ask anyone else to take my shifts. This day, I had enough. I found someone to finish my shift off for me and, with a manager's permission, I left early. Sure, it wasn't very professional, but neither is sobbing while handing change over to a customer. At least I didn't leave them high and dry without someone to cover the rest of my shift. At least I didn't walk out the door, or just not show up again, like so many others have in the past.I came in the next day, and at the end of my first shift of that day I decided to explain everything to my managers. Absolutely everything. That's when they bombarded me with, "you don't even seem happy here" and "you leaving in the middle of your shift was very unreliable, and we don't know if we can trust you". I have told them I have been diagnosed with depression, I've ever told them that I have an appointment at the end of the month to go see a doctor about getting something to help my mental health. But I am just not happy enough. Never happy enough. What do I have to fucking do to make them happy? Jesus Christ, I want to leave this job and go do something else, but I will never be able to get a new job with a reference that says I am unhappy and unreliable. What the fuck do I even do? Why should I even bother? [info] None [info] 1420401173
LaughingBadgers [info] I was diagnosed with depression and went on a 4 year trip with anti-depressants. &amp;#x200B;Depression isn't just sadness, it's the emotional equivalent to watching paint dry. It's a the utter feeling of "meh". It's not controlable, something that one can just snap out of. It's the absence of a chemical in your brain, so just as physical as a broken arm.Anti depressants doesn't make you happy per se, they put a damper on bad feelings ASWELL as the good ones. Essentially they prevent you from emotionally crashing, at the cost of never feeling really overly happy (I'm exaggerating a bit here). What those drugs do, however, is make it possible and easier for you to live your life, have a normal day, which in turn gives you the peace and quiet you need to deal with the depression itself.&amp;#x200B;Now I'm drug-free (been for 5 months) and I can honestly say I owe my life to those anti depressants.  [info] None [info] 1543947484
MediumOstrich [info] Reasons for quitting? I’m at a place in my life where I’m happy and am on track with what I want to do. I feel mentally able and don’t see how weed is affecting me negatively. I have been diagnosed with depression and I find that weed helps with it sometimes. I’m only 17 and have been smoking dabs almost all day every day. Money is not an issue at the moment either. What were your reasons for quitting as I’m 3 days sober now and I’m still searching for reasons to stay sober. All answers are appreciated and congrats to everyone who is staying sober. Edit: I don’t feel the urge to smoke but I feel as if there wasn’t a reason to stop. I still enjoy everything the same and I don’t waste money when high or do unproductive tasks. I also have a gf and a job and workout and do sports daily so I’m really just trying to see some of the reasons you guys quit. [info] None [info] 1557348193
AnnaSuehiro [info] I have to be honest, it sounds like you should talk to your therapist about possibly having adhd. Those recurring problems that you have sound strikingly on point (I have severe adhd, and also simply can not remember things or stay motivated on long-term tasks). I was diagnosed with depression 3 years earlier than with adhd and while therapy was helpful in some ways it wasn't useful for tackling the underlying long term brain stuff that caused the depression in the first place. If not adhd, then you should still definitely talk to your therapist about the possibility of there being more happening than only depression. That way you and your therapist can give you the support you need and deserve. Mental health stuff is messy and hard. [info] None [info] 1557189382
Ananiujitha [info] I was diagnosed with depression in my teens. Psych didn't even *ask* about bullying. I was actually getting beaten up in school, was dealing with the wrong puberty, and am autistic. [info] None [info] 1548540014
Falark [info] Tomorrow I will go into stationary therapy - and I am scared shitless I have been diagnosed with depression for a bit over a year now, and since then have been on and off with therapy and medication (more off than not recently). Therapy hasn't helped me in 99% of the time I've put in (except when I was with a private therapist who I can't afford). I'm 22 and in the past year I've dropped out of university, worked a bit (but mostly did nothing productive), moved back to where my dad lives, all in order to get better. It did shit for me. So I tried getting into stationary treatment, and it worked. Only that they told me yesterday that I will get in tomorrow, which comes a bit sudden (thought it would take another month). I'm happy that it worked, but I am scared as hell by the fact that I will have to address my depression on a daily basis now, in a foreign environment - even though that's the reason I wanted in there anyway. I think I have never been this scared in my life. [info] None [info] 1400626002
sofakingrighteous [info] Guys.. I just need a few helping ears.. So about a year ago I was diagnosed with depression.. Can I have some sound words of advice? Something to make me laugh? I would appreciate it.. [info] None [info] 1365634387
petitchaperonrouge [info] When I was diagnosed with depression, having school and working part-time was too much for me, so my doctor gave me a paper for a three months off work. My boss said it was fine, and was compassionate with my diagnosis. When I came back, I noticed that I was getting less hours, that the new employee could have Christmas and New Year off but not me (was there for 2 years), and the overall mood seemed tense. Another of my boss was telling me things like "you don't smile as much, where is the usual you?" I had other bad comments from my colleagues, and after a month of this shit I quit. One of the good decisions I made. [info] None [info] 1504156075
polarisnico [info] I'm just gonna say it: Being that judgemental won't help a person out, who considers rehoming their puppy. In fact, your tone will raise the frustration in people that already take rehoming into consideration and make it more likely. I have 3 dogs, one of which is a puppy, and every time puppy blues hit me pretty hard. I'm good at dogs. I'm well-informed. I know they're work. But: A puppy almost always takes a part of your freedom and it's always easier said than done - that's why so many things in life fail. I've been stripped of my freedom two times now and it was messy; I'm diagnosed with depression so even worse for me. If you never felt what true helplessness felt like, you will at the moment you sit in front of a puppy with massive diarrhea at 3 AM when you just got home from late shift and have to work early shift (6 AM) the next morning. You will feel like shit and overwhelmed at work when you didn't sleep. You will consider rehoming at least a dozen times when frustration hits damn hard - but considering does not mean acting out on it. Every little thing that's a step forward nullifies a month's worth of consideration and frustration and makes it better. When my first puppy didn't go potty for a day because he was stubborn and shat and pissed all over the place, when he kept me awake the same night - I asked myself if this was worth it. When I checked his crate and saw, how bad he felt upon doing what he just did, I knew he understood. I was disgruntled, cleaned it al up, went to sleep for an hour and he did the same thing again. He barked at every little sound. But when he fell asleep in my lap the next day for the first time it was all worth it. The night before I always told myself I'd rehome him tomorrow. Never did it. It's been a good one and a half year.  [info] Owner of 3 :ExpOwnerBlack: (Chihuahua adult &amp; BMD puppy) [info] 1547189056
chronickiddo [info] Corona Virus has ruined over two years of mental stability I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12, things were really bad for a long time but I started feeling in control again my freshman year of high school. I’m now a junior, and I haven’t had bad depression in at least two years. Being stuck inside with my less than supportive parents while attempting to force myself into online learning is sending me in a downward spiral. I’ve never had any motivation for school, I also have Aspergers and ADHD which makes focusing on things I don’t care about impossible. When I’m at school I have friends and counselors to help me get things done, but at home I just have frustrated parents and the occasional email from a counselor. What’s getting to me the most is that I don’t feel like taking care of my pets anymore and I hate myself for it, usually they are the most important thing in my life. I’m so afraid that I’m not going to take good enough care of them, but at the same time I feel like I don’t care anymore, and that’s what hurts the most. I don’t know what to do, sorry for the rant. I just don’t know where else to go besides here. [info] None [info] 1585611290
ZeroNihilist [info] I was diagnosed with depression five years ago. If I look back at my past (which, since I have depression, could be overly bleak) I would say I'd had it for at least five years before that.However, I was so relentlessly friendly that it was never caught. I would hurt myself in private, as was the angsty-teen way. I idly contemplated suicide pretty much every day in the year leading up to my diagnosis (and much more actively towards the end). "You should kill yourself" was and still is my mantra. In the end I was only diagnosed when three things happened: first, I stopped smiling; second, I finally opened up to my friends; and third, I slept for a total of 8 hours in an exam week (i.e. 7 full days).Of course, by then it had progressed to the point where I had to 'volunteer' to start taking anti-depressants gradually in a mental health clinic (I'm not sure something can be considered volunteering if the alternative is involuntary commitment to a psychiatric ward). The point is, I would have greatly preferred it if I'd either had the presence of mind to talk about it or if people had acted on any symptoms I had displayed earlier. So while I think that many parents go too far in the other direction in pre-emptively medicating teenagers who are even slightly moody, you have to be careful not to miss genuine warning signs. [info] None [info] 1329477493
Chosenminecraft [info] Trying to get into a decent relationship, any advice or tips? M/18. TL;DR have had only shitty relationships, would like a dating 101 so I can have a decent, local one. Alright. I'm not even sure if this is the right sub so if not, let me know where I should post it and I'll move it there. I am a 18 year old male, and have been in 2 relationships in my life. First one lasted 10 months, it was long distance. (I'm in Minnesota she was in Ontario) While it started great, over time the relationship started going south and she was starting to abuse me mentally and emotionally.I first noticed it about 4 months before I broke up with her. After I did break up with her, I felt really guilty about it. And beat myself up about it. Afterwards I was diagnosed with depression. I didn't take anything to regulate it, I relied on friends and basically talking issues out with them. This worked great when I was with them, without them, however I was definitely feeling the effects of depression. I got into another relationship over a year after the break up and that lasted 4 months after she cheated on me and lied to me about having a boyfriend the whole time we were together. Needless to say, that didn't help either. I eventually dealt with the core issues I was facing at the time and now am reasonably happy again. I feel that I am ready to start dating again. The problem is, I have absolutely no idea how to do it. Both of the girls I have been with came onto me and made the first moves for everything. So I'm trying to figure out what cues I should act on. I'm looking basically for a fresh start on what I should be looking for in general. Kinda like a dating ELI5 if one of you would be willing to do that, that would be great. Thanks!EDIT: I am also looking for signs that women would likely give off if they're interested in me. I know I said the last 2 came on to me first, but I only noticed after they explicitly told me that they wanted to date me. [info] None [info] 1442544521
BastianBa [info] i worked in 7 different call centers that basicly worked all the same way, outbound, inbound, telecomunication, assistance (like getting cars towed and organizing leasing cars), directory information etc.all were just prioritising their revenue over the customer support.One supervisor told me back then to only help my customer if he buys something from me. Another one fired me bc i missed to call in late bc my mother died. One manager attended the funeral of my best bud and colleague who committed suicide without being invited and layed me off afterwards 'cuz i took a month off bc i witnessed his suicide. the manager even yelled at his dad who had to travel 1.000 miles to get here. "your son is absent from work without notice for 2 days - why do you inform us this late".The directory information line did an assessment at how good i am with googling and layed me off later bc i was too fast with finding and giving information (bc they got \~5$ per minute on landline) and bc i put too little customers through to their wanted number (which is impossible when doing night-shifts).If someone would've asked to escalate something we were ordered to tell them to write either a letter or an email.Funny thing was, that we were also the guys who worked on that in times with low call volumeand in none of the above mentioned companys a single supervisor knew how to use the CRM or what the processes are. Only AHT, CHT and sales figures.now i'm diagnosed with depression and been off for about a year and i guess for atleast two more to come - payed by german health insurance and pension fortunately until i'll be able to start again. [info] German Brotherhood [info] 1538630246
prismaticbeans [info] Well, I haven't been formally diagnosed with SAD, although I have been diagnosed with depression and other disorders I won't go into here and now. I still definitely get depressed and anxious​ in other seasons as well, but there are generally as many good days as bad. In winter, I just constantly think about all my fears, and wanting to die, all day every day, and barely function at all until spring. [info] None [info] 1489438901
sinskariboy [info] Thank you Reddit. You've been a major support in my life. Hi Redditors,It's my first cake day and it is really special for me. I joined my first company last year but was on the bench force (when you have no project to work on) since 6 months and today, for the first time in 6 months, an interview was scheduled. I aced it and finally got into one. It's a blessed day for me and I wanted to share this happiness with someone but I have no close friends in real life. Last one year has been tough on me.I was diagnosed with depression in October.I have been working on it since then and now I've started feeling better. I was raped in my childhood once, by my Uncle. I never told this to anyone but reading the posts on Reddit gave me enough courage to finally tell them. I told them about the misfortune incident. They were shocked but gave me all the support I required. I felt better.All this while Reddit has been a constant support in my life. Reading everyone's stories gave me the strength to sail through life. I just want to say that I love you all dearly. May you get the best of what you deserve. I love you guys. Thank you being a constant support. [info] None [info] 1583943830
Alypius [info] About 4 years ago I went through a really bad breakup.  I was diagnosed with depression and GAD shortly before the breakup and was put on remeron as well as weekly visits with a counselor.  The remeron made me feel totally numb to everything and I was off it within 8 months (it was also not available in the country I was moving to).  Shortly after that I moved overseas and started working.  I did see a couple doctors in relation to some stress-related incidents about a year ago, I was prescribed Valium, or something similar, for a couple weeks.  We discussed other long term medications, but the medications that were available, I had already tried back home and they did not work with me very well.  They had some weird side effects.I haven't been to a doctor since then about it.  I don't think any medication that is available here will help me. [info] None [info] 1423977070
licked_cupcake [info] Your mother might have borderline personality disorder.Not that it really changes anything - borderline treatment is just another form of narcissistic abuse, and borderline personality disorder is another cluster B disorder, right up there with narcissism and histrionic.  They are different sides of the same coin.  So I only offer that as a possible roadmap to understanding the specifics of her behavior - although I couldn't say for sure, it's a theory and I don't know.But some things made me wonder.  She threatens suicide manipulatively - that's a hallmark of borderline.  You feel that you are walking on eggshells with her - that's utterly borderline, for loved ones to have to tiptoe around a minefield of triggers to approach the borderline.  In fact the definitive title written to loved ones and family members about how to handle a borderline in their life, is called "[Stop Walking on Eggshells](http://iostopensando2.files.wordpress.com/2012/01/levenmeteenborderliner.pdf)"  This line in particular made me think she might be borderline, "You isolate yourself from people by consistently demonizing anyone and everyone you don’t get along with, making you feel constantly targeted by the world around you. Instead of taking responsibility for your responses and actively working to change the way you think and act, you justify your irrational behaviour by blaming others for provoking you."That's just classically describing what borderline looks, feels, acts like.  The heart of borderline is an almost-delusional perception that the world is attacking you and being rejecting and hostile when it simply isn't happening and there's no reason to think it is happening - but borderlines get extremely triggery, defensive, and lashing out against anybody they perceive as turning on them.Also, a hallmark of borderline is "demonizing" those who they believe have turned on them.  Borderlines split people black and white - they seem to only be able to see people as all-good and trustworthy, or all-bad and demonized.  It doesn't matter how much positive history a borderline has with someone, if they perceive in this moment that you are doing something against them, you get "split black" and demonized, and they perceive you as completely their enemy, out to get them, hostile, the devil.  And they turn on you with ferocity.  &gt;You are verbally abusive. You do not “yell and curse,” you belittle, you threaten, you scream, you break things to establish control and dominance over any given situation. Threatening to kill yourself, screaming about how your situation makes you want to die openly in front of the children, is not “venting.” It is a form of emotional abuse.Reminds me of borderline rage.  When a borderline is triggered and on a rampage, they take it to such extremes.  Threats of suicide, which are typically manipulative and designed to get a certain reaction from those around them.  They terrorize everyone in order to keep everyone reactive to them and under their control, ready to cater to their moods so as to avoid the next explosion.  Oh...as I was skimming your post for examples to back up my thoughts, I came across this, "I can say with certainty that you have expressed a range of both narcissistic and borderline traits that you should seek help for.""  So it looks like this isn't a new thought to you, it sounds like you've identified this as probably being borderline, as well.&gt;The first thing you said to me once I told you I was diagnosed with depression is, “What do you have to be depressed about?”In a borderline world, whatever you are going through is insignificant in their minds, compared to what they feel they are going through.  They feel entitled to be the center of your focus and care and concern because there's no way that anyone else suffers more than they do, and so they are entitled to make you suffer like they are, and entitled to take all your care and help at any cost to you, and this is ok because they just suffer so much and you should feel bad for how much more they go through than you do.  The borderline mantra is "Can't you understand how hard this is for me?"Borderline abuse is extremely similar to narcissistic abuse - it's kind of a form of narcissism of it's own.  It's in the same Cluster B, for that matter.  It's extremely self-absorbed, it's abusive, it sacrifices the needs of others to serve itself.  And, like narcissism, the only way to win is to not play.Congratulations on getting out.  You've done the right thing.  And if you ever want to talk about borderline in more detail, reach out to me - it's something I (unfortunately) have some experience with. [info] DoNM [mod] [info] 1401834727
SyrusDrake [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for years but I'm only now starting to understand that my **constant** exhaustion is a symptom as well. I always thought it was a separate issue and I was simply a lazy fuck. And I could never understand how people can take care of multiple tasks a day and then still have enough energy for hobbies.  Just getting up and preparing for the day already drains me of most of my energy. [info] None [info] 1540891662
5hxdoe0vakil [info] Don't.Sounds dumb but thinking negatively is doing nothing but making you more upset. Without going to indepth. Whatever you think your primitive brain will think is happening. And it will realise the right hormones for that situation.Just be positive, forgot any crap that made you feel bad and if you simply can't. Try just smiling at yourself in a mirror for agess until you start to laugh. The more you do this the easier it will be to just be happy always. And if you have any potential yo be depressed this will alliterate it.For credibility sake I have been diagnosed with depression before so I know how hard it is. (If you are depressed). [info] None [info] 1498769843
PorcupinArseIHateYou [info] Already seeing one, I've been diagnosed with depression, I dunno if it's getting better [info] None [info] 1534273420
ZevranArainai [info] Struggling to read!! Female, 23 , 160cm, 170lbs. Been too afraid to ask anyone this since I feel like it sounds stupid. Not sure why but for years I have had trouble reading. I have loads of books on my bookshelf I want to read but I just know it is so frustrating to try and even get through one page. The problem isn’t with my eyesight, it’s just a weird mental block. I can recognise singular words instantly, it’s more like when I’m presented with a sentence my brain takes absolutely ages to register the meaning. If I’m panicking and need to read something fast I can... but in most circumstances my brain sees a chunk of words and gets overwhelmed and I have to read a sentence at least 5 times before I have confidently got it. All the words just jumble around or I just interpret it completely the wrong way or my brain just switches off half way through the sentence and then turns on for the last bit. Even if someone shows me a meme that has literally 5 words and a picture I take aaaaages to understand it.I basically only read stuff I absolutely have to read or am seriously interested in. I was always top of my classes in English at school, and have two university degrees. I became a master of skim reading articles being able to search for important bits without reading the full thing as it would take me more time than I had to read everything I was supposed to. Nevertheless I always struggled with exams, never fully completing them as there wasn’t enough time. I always felt jealous of the people who got extra time and felt like I needed it too but never had a diagnosis to allow me to have that.I have been diagnosed with depression previously but I’m not sure to what extent that is the issue. I can’t think of anything else it could be. My mum is a really fast reader but my dad is slow at processing things like me.I also have been getting problems with forming sentences when speaking... can’t find the words I’m looking for and everyone just seems to think I’m incredibly awkward or just talks over me because I take so long to articulate what I want to say.The only thing I’m good at is writing. I write incredibly fast and prefer chatting to people online. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1578354199
sand_sux [info] Let me be the first to tell you...I'm a depressed man. I was diagnosed with depression at a young age. 17 years later, I'm still hanging in there. Without the help of medication, I would be dead and gone by now two or three times over. It has literally saved my life. I have no idea what it is like to be genuinely happy either, none whatsoever...but I do know whats it's like to come out of a deep, dark depression. The feeling is amazing. The meds take some time to work and they come with a few side-effects, but they are well worth it. Sometimes it's hit or miss with the meds so you have to be patient while you and your doctor try to figure whats best for YOU. Take care and hang in there...tomorrow is another day and things do get better. [info] None [info] 1348717463
sacct [info] Relatively new to benzos, am I experiencing withdrawals? (145mg of Valium over 28 hours) I’ve tried Valium once before and took 20mg and it didn’t really do anything. I think I naturally have a bit of a higher tolerance to most benzos (comparing it to my friends reactions on similar doses/the dosage guides on psychonaught wiki). Also, I know the doses I’m talking about aren’t massive in comparison to what most people on this sub take, but i don’t have too much experience with benzos.Anyway the second time taking them was to help me sleep and I basically just ate them with the pure intention of blacking out (I have insomnia), 55mg over the course of an hour did this (after taking 25mg a few hours earlier). When I woke up I had 30mg more during the day and felt fucked and stuff, but none of it was fun, it didn’t feel recreational at all. I have experienced the same effect with Temazepam (60mg wasn’t recreational then I ate 40mg more and just blacked out for the night). I don’t really get tired on them and they don’t feel recreational so basically the only reason I take them is I take enough to black out so I can sleep because I have insomnia. Couldn’t sleep that either so I ate 35mg at 6am and blacked out. During these days I felt physically fucked up and don’t remember much of it at all (I typed down every time I took some and at what time though) but nothing recreational, just shitty. And I usually get a good afterglow from Xanax the next day(s) but this was just pure shit.I have been diagnosed with depression also and ended up checking myself into the ER because I felt suicidal about a day after I’d taken the last one. So I’m just wondering if I’d be experiencing withdrawals from Valium from taking 145mg over the course of 28 hours and that’s why I feel way more depressed then usual? It’s been about a week though and I’ve been barely functional, skipped 3 days of work and have lost my sense of humour, creativity and pretty much any feeling of happiness. I’m feeling better though now as I assumed it was withdrawals that weren’t too servere and I just had to wait it out until it passed. Interested in people opinions? [info] None [info] 1518778610
shitscray [info] I was diagnosed with depression and it is my big dreams that keep me going. She just has to remember all of the things she is going to do and how she needs to be alive and healthy to do them.  [info] None [info] 1339568293
JoslyneD [info] Please help a newbie with depression/hormone problems... I'm still pretty new to this keto business, and I dont have a clue what keywords to even search for an answer to my problem, and the "Top Five..." link in the sidebar helped with part of my issue but not all of it. Halp!I get the feeling that maybe hormones/chemicals that were bound up in the fat cells are releasing into my body now that the fat cells are going away. I don't know any of the science behind this so I may be completely off the mark here, if so please tell me! I'm trying to figure out if I need to schedule a dr appointment, which I don't want to do since it means taking time off of work.I was diagnosed with depression about 18 months ago and have been stable with my meds for about 8 months...but all of a sudden I'm feeling depressed again. Literally all I want right now is to go home and be a blanket-burrito in front of my computer or tv.I'm also spotting in the middle of my month of birth control, and although I saw where the sidebar post says that shorter periods are common, my question is if it takes time to stabilize or if spotting randomly is normal for awhile. I used to not start until a day or two into the next month of pills so this is definitely abnormal for me. I need to lose about 120 pounds, and I'm down 15 after lazy keto/trying to strict keto and failing for about a month and a half. I don't know if I can handle this unpredictable hormone/depression crap for another 105 pounds :( Do I wait it out until I've successfully strict-keto-ed for a month or so, or make a doctor appointment sooner rather than later? My dr. is not on board with the keto thing...so theres that too... [info] None [info] 1469543226
wasnhierlos [info] I am very fortunate in that my father is a doctor and when I was diagnosed with depression he told the rest of my family "It's as if she has broken a leg only inside. Eventhough we don't see it, she is hurting and needs therapy." I feel for everyone who is not understood with their mental illness. Wish you all the best. [info] None [info] 1386090338
KingJosephKony [info] Antidepressants don't always work. I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 14 and I'm 18 now. I thought for sure I was going to kill my self before I was 25 ish so I never really tried academically. Now I'm much better off because when I had those thoughts I was on the chubbier side, now that I'm in shape (not on gear now, all natty but that may change in the future) I haven't had those thoughts and am getting my shit back together.  [info] None [info] 1455742494
foonsirhc [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for years but never actually thought I was at all. It really until I started vaping throughout the day that I realized how much potential happiness  I've been missing out on. I guess I've got some lost time to catch up on! [info] None [info] 1561009471
UnoriginellerName [info] Is it possible that I was traumatized by this event, or was it too miniscule? (info in post) Basically when we were small children, my older cousin (m) and I (f) often hung out at my grandparents house, because both of our parents worked. One day, cousin said he wanted to play a game with me called "present hiding" (something he made up). We went into the basement, into a room and he closed the door. He told me to close my eyes and to lay on the floor and I did. Then he sat on my chest, pulled of his pants, pulled out his dick and told me to put it in my mouth. I refused of course, and he told me it was a "rolled up piece of pizza". But I had my eyes opened a bit, and I knew he was lying.I don't remember how the whole situation resolved, but in the end, he never actually did anything to me and let me go. We were still friends afterwards too, just went back upstairs and acted like nothing ever happened. I was 4 or 5 when this all took place, and he had to have been like 8 to 10. We were literally two clueless, stupid children.Yet nowadays I think about the whole thing a lot, and for a while I cried about it from time to time. I'm also asking myself if this thing also contributed to my shyness growing up, and to my self esteem issues. Is it possible that this actually contributed to anything, or am I making a mountain out of a mole hill right now? After all, nothing ever happened(I also posted this in tooafraidtoask, but didnt get any response over there. Sorry if this is the wrong place to post this, I don't know where else I could. I am diagnosed with depression though, so maybe it fits here?) [info] None [info] 1585705170
DeepSpaceQueef [info] I feel your pain, as I was very much like your son. I was not diagnosed with ADHD or marked as gifted until a few months ago (I am 25). I always felt like students and administration targeted me. I was sensitive and would break down crying or throw temper tantrums because of always getting in trouble for things which were not 100% my fault. I felt like I was letting my parents down and I felt like a baby for letting my emotions get the better of me. Schools tend to focus on deficiencies or problems, psychologists too. I was diagnosed with Oppositional Defiance Disorder, then a hormonal imbalance, and finally, I was diagnosed with depression in the fourth grade after making an attempt on my life (the last in a long line or attempts nobody had discovered). What does intelligence or possible giftedness mean when weighed against unacceptable behaviour or suicidal thoughts? Your son is very lucky, because he has an advocate. You KNOW he is gifted and therefore have the perspective to understand his challenges. I had only two advocates when I was his age, one was an assistant principle who fought to prevent me from being expelled, and the other was my God mother who lived 2000 miles away. So advocate for him, be his ally. As others have suggested, go over their heads. Demand that the district allow an independent evaluation that meets their standards but which will lack the bias that will certainly color the school's interactions with or interpretations of, your son and his results. If the district will not cooperate, withdraw him and look at private schools or homeschooling. I know these may not be viable options as both can be quite costly (private schools are inherently expensive and homeschool requires you or another caregiver to be at home with him during normal business/school hours). But, if he is gifted and you show financial need, some private schools have generous endowments and scholarships. Some home school options will offer him the opportunity to progress at his own pace, subject by subject, quickly excelling through his best subjects and allowing him time to work through his weakest subjects. It will also allow you to figure out his motivations and build discipline. I gave up in school very early on. Even though I never did homework or other out of class assignments, I maintained above average grades for my school (which was the highest achieving school in a highly achieving public school district). I flew under the radar and eventually found myself in community college. I stayed there for 5 years until I discovered my passions and am now pursuing concurrent BSs in Physics and Pure Mathematics, with ambitions of a doctoral program in the former. But this path was discovered out of luck, I fell in love with cannabis after high school and that drug almost destroyed my potential entirely. I can only imagine where I would be today had I been identified earlier and given sufficiently engaging challenges or even been diagnosed and treated for ADHD when I was younger. Your son is very lucky to have you and to have been identified so early. His behaviour likely stems directly from his lack of true peers and absence of an appropriate environment in which to experience challenges and a sense of belonging. If you can help him find a solid program of study and socialization, his major behavioural issues should temper with time and help him grow into the man he wants to be. Do not quit fighting. Fight with the school, fight with the district, fight with the board of education and the superintendent. The latter is ultimately a politician, if you pose a persistent enough annoyance to him/her, they will likely acquiesce to your request and help you get the objective evaluation your son needs. I hope my perspective and suggestions prove useful. His path is not necessarily going to end badly, but getting him the accommodations and challenges he needs will help him avoid the obsticals and depression I (and many gifted) faced.  [info] None [info] 1529113466
delightfullydemented [info] I hear ya. I was diagnosed with depression a couple of months ago and have had to have a lot of awkward conversations with my boss about it. I had to tell her because it's been affecting my work and stuff. I had a meeting with her a day or two before Kate Spade died and she was super frustrated with me and even said at one point "Okay, I get it, you're sad all the time!" And if I hadn't been bawling my eyes out at that moment I would have unleashed all kinds of fury because "sad" doesn't begin to describe it and there's so much more to it than that.So when my boss found out about Kate Spade she went on about how "devastated" she was and I took that opportunity to talk to her about it. I told her that if someone like Kate Spade who by all accounts has it all could be suicidal then imagine how someone like me feels who *doesn't*. That seemed to resonate with her somewhat but I'm still looking for another job, that kind of dismissive attitude is why people are hesitant to speak about mental illness in the first place... [info] None [info] 1528824990
dabooton [info] I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago. I told my best friend one night that I was feeling suicidal and he helped me schedule an appointment with my college's counseling services. No one knows about my depression except for him and my other best friend - not even my parents.However, my real secret is that I don't believe I will make it past 30. My depression has been exponentially escalating and although I've been talking to my two best friends about my depression, I haven't really gone into detail about how it's getting worse and worse.I haven't told anyone that whenever I get some random pain in my body, I hope that it's cancer. I haven't told anyone that the only thing stopping me from killing is the fact that people care. If no one cared, I would most definitely be dead by now. Every time I think about killing myself, I think about my best friends at my funeral. These two people are my lifeline. If I lose them, I will probably die. I'm a very clingy person; I anticipate the day they will grow tired of me and leave me. This will probably happen within the next few years.TLDR; I think that by the time I hit age 30, I will be dead.  [info] None [info] 1439091562
rqon [info] I have been diagnosed with depression as well. I'm sorry for your loss. Please watch the lecture I linked earlier, I said before that I cannot do this position justice, I simply don't know enough about the subject and I do not possess the communicative skills of Sam Harris.I'm using the word sick because it is the best way to describe this person, I do not mean to trivialise other mental illnesses, I definitely do not. I realise the implications of his actions and I know exactly why you believe he should be imprisoned. I simply disagree and think a better method would be to detain, if necessary, and rehabilitate, because I don't believe in punishment.Replace him with a serial murderer and I would feel the same way. I'm not defending these people in the way that you seem to think, I do not wish for them to run wild, I want to help them. I do not want them to continue suffering from immoral behaviour. In this case his actions go quite far, as you brought up, he creates a demand. Which only increases the urgency in which he needs to be rehabilitated. [info] None [info] 1336705206
DarkQuasar [info] I literally can't bring myself to DO things I want to do. Does anyone else have a chronic motivation problem? There are personal projects I've wanted to do for, well, ever; honestly decades. But I literally can't bring myself to start them. I think about them all the time, I *want* to start them, and I go to bed every night regretting I didn't start them. For whatever reason, I **cannot** bring myself to begin.I am diagnosed with depression, but I'm being medicated for it (and consistently monitored), so I know that has to play some kind of factor. Aside from knowing this, though, I just want to be able to break out of my endless "planning" phase and get the ball rolling. I feel like it would get some of this stuff that's built up in my head out and make me feel better? (Maybe that sounds weird.) I know a lot of folks say, "You just gotta do it." or, "Dive in!" but that's not helpful for me. I need something more.Does anyone have any similar experiences and did you break out of it? What did you do? [info] None [info] 1478205001
carmen2211 [info] I'm so sorry :( That sucks. NParents are so heartless. I totally relate, so you're not alone. I was diagnosed with dysmenorrhea, a year or two after I got my first period. Which is basically every month when my period comes around I have immense pain and (tmi) lots of blood, more than what's good I guess. The pain keeps me up if I don't take pills on time, it makes me bedridden for a good 3 days. It's like the worst pain imaginable. I'm actually going through it right now again lol, but I took my medication early. (every month. yay me.) But yeah, some nights I'd be up until 4am just sobbing in the bathroom, not even able to move because the pain is too much, and my parents would come in and yell at me and tell me to shut up. They'd mock my crying the next morning, mimicking what I sound like, and telling me I just have low pain-tolerance. Nmom always says, "You're just sensitive. When I had my period it never hurt like that. If you know you're going to have your period why don't you take care of yourself?" Even though the doctor straight up told them that it's not regular period cramps and a lot more painful than what regular people go through.  Also, my period is irregular, not because of my condition but it changes with stress and my environment, which obviously living with n-parents doesn't give me consistent healthy bodily functions. So I can't exactly "keep track of it" or "know" when it's coming. I can estimate, but I'm usually a good 5-10 days off. this time I was a week late. Whenever I'd be crying because of the pain my nDad would enjoy it, saying this was gods way of punishing me for not listening to him. Also, when I was diagnosed with depression and supposed to go to a teen psych ward for further help, NMom got super angry at me and told me I'd be wasting her money. When I told her I was getting a therapist and needed her to sign papers, she spent nearly 4 hours yelling at me and making me feel like shit telling me I had no reason to be depressed, and making it all about her, telling me how bad her life is in comparison to mine. So yeah. . totally relate on the "I'm not allowed to feel, only she can."  [info] None [info] 1537129540
soloqueen [info] Do two things every day that make you a better version of yourself. I started small. I wrote something. I learned a word in another language. I kept a secret. Eventually it went to - I ran/worked out. I kept on my diet. Then it was I did one thing at work nobody asked me to do. I got better at something not related to my job. I still do this, going on 4-5 years. I've been diagnosed with depression since a teenager well into my late twenties. I'm approaching mid thirties now and this is the happiest I've been. Took a while. Brick by brick kind of thing. Pretty cool. [info] None [info] 1461712436
robotshoelaces [info] I spent a weekend in 2010 in a small rural hospital's behavioral health ward when I was diagnosed with depression. It was terrifying, even though it was really quiet aside from the lady having a manic episode. I still would do anything to avoid doing it again.That locked door, man. It's demoralizing. It's soul crushing. It's dehumanizing. But it's also necessary. [info] None [info] 1425913735
carrera594 [info] I feel that if you have "the blues" for over 6 -12 months then you most likely have depression. When I was diagnosed with depression I had a feeling of hopelessness and sadness lasting well over a year. I never thought I'd have depression but as I soon learned depression runs in my family. Every member in my immediate family has depression. Depression is a very serious thing, please get yourself checked and be safe. Good luck to you good sir, there is always hope. [info] None [info] 1330018917
Skynet380 [info] Rooster Teeth and Me So around 6 years ago when I was in 6th grade I was exposed to RvB and RT, and I was immediately reeled in. This was a time of bullying and hardship for me and it really helped me to feel happy. Getting through middle school, not much changed, and then in high school, I was diagnosed with depression. I saw it coming, but knowing shook me, and between the years of 9th and 11th grade, I tried to take my own life three times. During my senior year things turned around, I got a girlfriend, was a lot more social and was getting ready to live on my own. However during exams, that's when everything got blurred, all the stress and pressure nearly cracked me, and when I wasn't eating, studying, or sleeping, I was a zombie, I talked to nearly no one and I again sunk into depression and considered taking my own life. However, looking at RT and it's fanbase, seeing all the wonderful people I would get to meet and get to know, and my trip to RTX, kept me going, so from the bottom of my heart and this is all true because you read it on the internet, but just know, thank you all for being there without even knowing it. Signing out, Skynet (ConnorA380 on the site) [info]  [info] 1404742327
finkej2 [info] My grandparents are holocaust survivors. They were obviously severely traumatized. Each of their children need emotional support. My brother and I have been diagnosed with depression. However on my other side (were in America during the holocaust) there's no documented mental health issues. I don't think this is a coincidence. [info] None [info] 1561994507
ImpracticalThriller [info] Agreed. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 15 and was routinely told that I would "get over it" as i got older, that I just wanted "attention and pills". No one took it seriously.Jokes on them, I'm 34 and I still haven't gotten over it! (Haha... oh god.) [info] None [info] 1573140093
prettypinkshark [info] I can remember my thought process being "There are many parts of being a girl I hate, so I mustn't be one". Therapist just said something to the effect of "All teenagers question themselves at some point" which in hindsight was most definitely a euphemism for "You'll grow out of it". Though that therapist also defended Health At Every Size so I'm not sure what to make of her advice.Actually, that was around the time I was diagnosed with depression and it was deemed delusional thinking, which eventually led to me being put on citalopram and realising I was just being irrational.Thanks for asking, BTW! I'm happy to answer any questions about my special snowflake phase and how I grew out of it. One of the reasons I love TiA is because it reminds me of my old self. Been there, done that, and I guarantee they'll all get sick of it and learn that there are many ways to express themselves without resorting to made-up labels and pretending to be struggling when really they haven't got it that bad. [info] Pronouns: 馬/鹿/野郎 [info] 1418114966
mmpb [info] This is me irl. I grew up in a homogenous population (I’m not sure why but I think this is important), and did a bunch of random stuff as a kid, so I learnt really random info on a lot of random things. I was also the only girl child growing up, was babied but also treated equally (we all had the same chores regardless of age or physical appearance)...I grew up to be very approachable and have always been described by adults in the family as a “people’s person”...the end result of all these was me having very different groups of friends, I know everybody everywhere and I can connect people from different social groups that otherwise don’t interact, I’m able to hold a conversation with most people regardless of race or religious or political views...I never had a best friend growing up, I was always hanging out with different people all the time. I never felt weird about it until I was diagnosed with depression, so I only really feel lonely and sad when I’m depressed, which I guess is what depression is anyways...I always enjoyed my own company as much as I did others, I always believed that I need to love myself before loving others, and that I am the only person that can hold myself accountable for my own life. I love watching movies alone, or going to dinners or trying out new restaurants alone...as much as I enjoy my friends of different circles, I think having different groups of friends and knowing many people has made my life more interesting and helped me a lot growing into the human I am today. I’m now in my late 20s and just last year I realized that it really doesn’t matter whether someone consider me as their best friend or not, I can still consider them my best friend. Everybody meets different people in life, why do I want to control other people’s friend circle? I’m very happy to have them on this journey with me. Life is short, live your life and love your life. [info] None [info] 1567842625
glitchlife [info] It's OK, it was coherent enough for me. I was diagnosed with depression first too, about 8 years back. Now I've gotten kind of pissed that girls and women are so overlooked for the adhd diagnosis and I kind of want to change that somehow. I agree with you, it is a relief. I am just not sure what help I can get and will it help, you know? I feel like a lost cause somewhat. I have to say though I recognize like all the things you listed that have made me feel shitty over the years! Forgetting to eat, fidgeting, all that stuff. I felt a little better reading that because it felt like you were describing me spot on :)  [info] ADHD-C [info] 1442577177
panax_ [info] I was diagnosed with depression for a long time. It makes sense because I specifically mentioned suicidal thoughts, and I was so horrified by the thoughts (and it took me such a long time to admit them to anybody) that I didn’t really interrogate them. It was only when I spoke about some more classic checking that was taking over my life did OCD click as a diagnosis. It also gave me the space to talk through various iterations of harm and sexual OCD that I had been ashamed to admit. [info] None [info] 1550687588
bendy-trip [info] LSD first time experience trip report. LSD helped me with my mental illness. In 2015 I was diagnosed with depression and an emotionally unstable personality disorder. After around 12-18 months of therapy and trying multiple different medication options, I felt as if I was empty and nobody could understand let alone help. I became suicidal and even  planned on taking my own life on two separate occasions.  After months of research and seeking advice from anybody that would listen I stumbled across an article that talked about the potential therapeutic and mind altering effects of phycedelic drugs. That was it. I was intrigued. It took me around 6 weeks to acquire a reliable source for LSD and once I did, I bought 4 200ug blotters. So, after about a week of getting the LSD, me and a friend (A) agreed we would take 2 blotters each, 400ug. The day of the trip:: I put the first blotter on my tongue, eagerly waiting for a horrible medicinal taste. Nothing! After 10-15 minutes I swallowed the first blotter and walked to the local shop for soft drinks. We got back and instantly took the remaining 2 and had 1 each. About 20 minutes passed and “A” decided it would be a good idea to go to the public park. Me being me and being high from a packed out marijuana joint, I agreed. On route to the park, wich is only a 10 minute walk away, a plane trailing a banner flew over head.  I’d never actually seen one until this day. I swear I lifted my head to look at the plane for around a minute and as soon as I lowered my head to look straight, the whole world had changed.  I had heavily misunderstood how intense it was going to be! I suggested we retreat to my apartment to stay safe and try to enjoy the experience, “A” agreed 110%. We got back after a sketchy 10 minute fast paced sweaty and anxious walk, “A” had already began to freak out at this point. 30-40 minutes passed and I was having the time of my life. “A” meanwhile was insisting he had to go home or he was going to die! This began to have a negative effect on my trip so I eventually walked him across the road to his house and once again, retreated to my bedroom for safety. Around the 2 hour mark is where I peaked and I believe this is where I had a shift in my mental state and everything from this moment onward changed. I was riding a bicycle through multi coloured geometrically shaped mountains that where pulsating waves of love outward like a heartbeat while being followed by an entity that I can only describe as feminine, if that makes any sense at all. Yes I know!As I was coming down hours later, I had motivational thoughts racing through my head inspiring me to change my life. I was filled with positivity to the point I literally cried with happiness. I sat in my bed, eat a full packet of Oreos that tasted unbelievably amazing, little did I know that food is amazing while coming down on physchedelics, and fell asleep. This experience happened to me 14 months ago. I’ve had a single DMT session since about 2 months ago, and my life has changed completely. I feel better, I communicate better and believe that I am also a better person to be around. I’ve had no thoughts of suicide, I have had no need to contact a doctor or any “down” moments concerning my mental health. IMO LSD has made me a better person. Sorry for the long post but I had to get this off my chest.As for “A” he contacted me the very next day and said he didn’t enjoy the experience and would maybe try it again another day. My next experience is scheduled very soon. I’ll keep you posted. [info] None [info] 1542485330
Old_Army90 [info] It's rough. I've been diagnosed with depression in the past, but I've been on meds and have checkups every three months and have been doing well for years. At what point though would a legislature (or scientific panel for that matter) says "Yes, he's proven that he can own a gun and not be a risk to anyone." Would someone disagree with their assessment? What would they do if they disagreed? Could something change to where my ability to own a gun *was* taken away at some point?It's a tricky issue, but most definitely one that needs to be addressed. [info] Blue Dogs for Hilldawg [info] 1464814803
dunny__ [info] This is so relatable. I was diagnosed with depression last summer and took about a month off work. My sister brought me a huge bunch of sunflowers when she found out from my mother about my diagnosis. It was the first time in months where something had jolted me out of my sad autopilot rhythm and as soon as she left I cried for a good while but afterwards I felt so much better. Over the next few weeks I would buy myself sunflowers every so often. I love that they remind me of my sister, and that even such a small gesture of kindness can have a great impact. [info] None [info] 1487034619
meganahs [info] I decided to get up (with help). A visual of my depression. I was diagnosed with depression several years ago. I haven’t been on medication or sought out therapy after the effects left several years ago. I understood my depression and battled accordingly. The last few months have been rough though. Every aspect of my life has suffered. From myself, family, career, body image, house, friends, to everything in between.Now let me make this clear, I am not suicidal. I am a glass half full person. I love and enjoy life. I appreciate the beauty in the world and my personal relationships. I love my job and my passion that I have for it. I recently sought out help though. I reached out to my father and communicated my feelings. Now you must know I am a visual person. I try to understand things by relating them to something I already understand. When talking to my father, I reassured him that I am not aiming to harm myself and that I am just stuck. I relayed a picture/story of what I was feeling and he ultimately understood. I just wanted to share.Picture a simple building. Four brick walls and a large window in the front. The window can be anything you attribute to happiness. For the sake of the image, picture an item or a painting that you can admire. I can understand the artwork in the window. I enjoy every aspect of it and feel happiness in addition to admiration. The only problem… There is no door. It should be there. Either to the left or the right. I can’t find the door. I feel content standing in the window but still desire to find the door. The longer I look for the door the further I am from the window. The last few years, I have been able to find my way back to the front. Jumping over obstacles or pot holes that I didn’t fill. I always had a desire to get back to the front of that window. Only recently, the obstacles became more difficult. I find myself sitting in the back alley wondering if I should go left or right. I have been living on the instant gratification but not moving. I sat down. Sure, I can see the billboards of hopes and dreams. I see them but I don’t bother to get up. I have watched my friends, family, career, and responsibilities pass by. Yet, I did nothing. I feel that I have waited too long. Yet, this last week I reached out. I asked for a hand up from several people. I stood up. I must say… That’s a big step. The only issue is whether do I go right or left to get back to the window?At least I stood up. That’s all that matters right now. [info] None [info] 1480691772
AbstractStranger [info] I’m not a doctor but to me it sounds like you have some sort of depression. I have been diagnosed with depression and I would say I am more happy than you if you only feel good 10% of the time. Do you feel like there is something specific in your life? I also was on lexapro for about 6 years but haven’t been on any medications for 3 and I can completely relate to your concerns about being put on some medication that might fuck you up. If I were you I would see a doctor and explain to them that you don’t feel comfortable being put on meds and he may recommend a therapist.  [info] None [info] 1531441634
FaceMace87 [info] Depression isn't like that. I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago.I didn't even really notice, it was my girlfriend that did. She noticed I would spend more and more time just sitting without doing anything in particular. Whenever she asked why I just sat I would reply "I am just chilling".It got to the point that just sitting was all that I did but because it happened over a long period of time I didn't notice.I was finding it hard getting up in the morning and I just said I was tired but in reality I was depressed.Don't believe what the movies tell you.  [info] None [info] 1551864306
GoGoGadgetBumHair [info] Slipping back into depression I think I just need a place to write out my feelings more than anything so I apologize up front for the stream of consciousness that's about to happen.About 3 or 4 years ago I was diagnosed with depression and started taking medication (Celexa) but never got therapy. Within the past year I started noticing major sexual side effects and it was affecting my relationship with my husband (gay male here). Thinking I was okay I weaned myself off the mess until I finally stopped about a month ago.I have never really had a good support system other than my husband and about 6 months ago we moved cross country away from our families. Right now I am having trouble with a fair amount of down days and no one to talk to. (Not that I usually talk about my problems anyway). My husband doesn't really understand as he has never had any experience with mental illness. He does his best but it shouldn't be his problem alone and I have trouble asking anyone else for help.I don't really know what I'm looking for out of this but thanks for listening. [info] None [info] 1505913544
JamesMidas [info] Yeah, I agree with you. After I was diagnosed with depression I did research on my illness to understand what it is and how to survive it basically. Also I been taking meds for a couple of days now, it really makes me feel different and sleep better which is a plus. [info] None [info] 1407852239
abcdefgkfc123 [info] Yeah I can agree to this in some level. I was diagnosed with depression and my mum ignored it. [info] None [info] 1508971653
The_Evil_Inside_You [info] I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1465480244
pizzalover9a [info] Advice - telling my employer I am severely ill and may get worse. Hello r/uk.I was hoping someone here maybe able to help me or point me in the right direction.I am 29 year old male who works for a large corporate in central London. For the past 6 years ive been battling a degenerate autoimmune disease. It has a long latin name but in a nut shell its the inflammation and artheritis of my lower spine.Over the past 6 years ive had to give up a lot such as running and now even walking without pain. The past two years have seen it get really bad and i am worried for my future. I have been diagnosed with depression from my GP (caused by slowly losing the ability to walk pain free).My employer who i have worked for now for 18 months doesnt know i am ill. I decided not to tell them as i could still get into work and continue to carry out my role.It is now getting too unbearable to commute in and focus on work and i do not know where i stand from a legal point. Does anybody know any source or know which direction they can point me where i can speak to someone to understand my legal rights, also how to tell my employer in the right way without being sacked (and it being blamed on another reason) that i have degenerative conditon that may cause me being unable to work by this time next year?edit: unfortunately there is no known cure currently. thank you [info] None [info] 1509371433
jakalan7 [info] Career Burnout? Evening all, &amp;#x200B;I've worked super hard all my life (well, officially since I was 16) But I'm 25 now and I'm somewhat burnt out.&amp;#x200B;I've had a really good career in IT, working my way up from tech support to an IT Manager, picking up a lot of certifications along the way - however I resigned from my management position a couple months ago and took some time off to enjoy the fruits of my labours (I went to Japan, then America and generally enjoyed life).&amp;#x200B;There were a lot of reasons behind this, firstly a friend of mine died, we had been pretty close and had a sort of on/off relationship last Summer (she was only 22) and it hit me that I could die tomorrow too and I wanted to do some living instead of working in an office all day. Secondly, I was exhausted all the time - I barely had any energy to go out in the evenings and I'd lost all respect for my boss who unfortunately had really bad personal hygiene and would often speak to me as if I was a dog and/or a child.&amp;#x200B;Anyway I recently ran out of money and was forced to look at other IT jobs, so I've taken a job doing technical support (well below my previous pay grade) and to be honest it's pretty awful so far, the hours are long (08:30 - 17:30) and they have a ridiculous on call system which means you can basically be called on your personal mobile at any time (even if you aren't on call) I've been woken up by automated 'server alerts' at 6 am about 3 times this week.&amp;#x200B;I find when I get stressed and/or I'm being overworked I'll become ill, my throat swells up and I'll be incredibly fatigued. This is exactly what's happened this week and I've had to take 2 days off sick - I've still not fully recovered but I have to go back in tomorrow. I didn't get ill once on my 2 month break, but as soon as I go back into this job I'm ill again (this has been a reoccurring pattern for the last few years) &amp;#x200B;I'm just at a huge crossroads right now, do I even want a career in IT any more? I have little or no interest in doing any more IT exams right now, but I'm not sure if it's just a phase or not. &amp;#x200B;Or have I just burnt out, is this why I'm exhausted and demotivated all the time? &amp;#x200B;**Additional Info:**  \- I was diagnosed with depression about 18 months ago but I've stopped taking my medication, I feel like it turns me into a zombie and doesn't actually treat the root cause of the issue.   \- I broke up with my girlfriend of 5 years last year (we lived together for 2 of those years) to be honest it had just gone really flat and I didn't feel the same way that she felt about me. After the breakup my depression improved significantly and I seemed to have more energy again - but it's sort of returned a bit now.  I'm seeing another girl now but it's not super-serious because to be honest I'm afraid of commitment.   \- I own my house so my outgoings are minimal (perhaps £400 a month tops)  so I could probably take a part time job and still get by - this isn't something I've done before but it's definitely an option.   \- One of my main hobbies is DJ'ing and promoting events, some months I can make up to £500 from doing this alone. I often fantasise about doing this full time. I am passionate about this but I am full of self doubt and I'm not sure I can turn this into a career. [info] None [info] 1560105298
OlympusPrometheus [info] I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago AMA [info] None [info] 1564215275
iamthemachine1776 [info] I was diagnosed with depression between my sophomore and junior year of high school I went to a Christian based therapist who said if I "believed the lord would help me and put my trust in him I would get better with in the month" so being the type of person I am I did exactly that I put all my problems behind me and let the lord take over time went by and I saw small changes in my life like my emotions were somewhat more stable and my suicidal thoughts decreased for a couple of weeks the therapist thought I was cured but still wanted to see me weekly 2 months went by and my depression has gotten better and then had gotten worse (kinda like a 1 step forward 2 steps back deal) I told my parents that I still wanted to kill my self and I wasn't happy with my life they said if I trusted the lord and his plan I would be okay...10 months later I attempted suicide for the 3 time finally my parents had seen that I was serious and they changed therapist to a person who would take my depression more serious and prescribe medication... 2 months on medication and my life got exponentially better my depression was then diagnosed as dysthymia and I was told I would probably live with it for the rest of my life off and on (i don't really understand how that works don't ask me). My grades got better and my self esteem increased 2 years later and I still have depression off and on like they said but I haven't had another attempt since.I still believe in god but I believe the medication and the proper treatment helped the most It is my opinion that god plays an active role in every ones life but we have free will and if we aren't willing to help ourself why should he? I believe that once I got my stuff together he helped me but that he was always there to get me to that point in my life Deuteronomy 31:8 says: The Lord himself goes before you and will be with you; he will never leave you nor forsake you. Do not be afraid; do not be discouraged.”To me that says the lord will be with me through the thick and thin and won't ever leave me out to dry and to not lose hope no where in the Bible does it say the lord is going to make sure I have a perfect life but only that I will have life and to do with it what I want just because I was in a bad spot in life doesn't mean he left me but that he was letting me figure out who I wanted to be and how I wanted to take on the shitty illness that is depression  [info] None [info] 1502274751
Fastuchera03 [info] I have felt exactly like you, for months on end, in the past. I feel my own low energy, lack of concentration, haziness, etc. in the end, were related to chronic depression. This hunch was confirmed by a psychiatrist (a few different ones, during different periods of my life). I think sometimes that if we’re not crying all day long we think, “I can’t possibly be depressed.” And yet there are many other symptoms of depression. I would talk to a psychiatrist. Fighting an uphill battle everyday, feelings of guilt... I personally don’t feel that’s anyone’s normal. I was diagnosed with depression and took an SSRI. I had done CBT - Cognitive Behavioral Therapy- in the past, and that may be your best option, since you’re pregnant and it is treatment sans medication. In my opinion, I am at my best with a combination of an SSRI and CBT. I was just pregnant (but I miscarried) and stopped my SSRI as soon as I found out. I would prefer to be on one, as I feel it genuinely helps in many aspects (mood, energy levels, etc.) but plan to continue trying to conceive, so can’t go back on one. I realize this may not help, given SSRIs are probably not possible for you right now, but I would consider that your mood, energy levels, feelings of failure etc., might be tied into something larger than just “I need to be more motivated and why am I unmotivated and unaccomplished ugh.” Pregnancy hormones are another complicating dimension to this. I wish you the very best. [info] None [info] 1569595910
almizten [info] It’s ok to want to have a mental illness Anecdotally, when I was at my lowest, I often wished I had depression because then it would at least name all the troubling thoughts and behaviors I was exhibiting. I knew something was wrong, but I every time I thought “hey maybe what I’m feeling is depression,” i would automatically remember all the hate that self-diagnosing mental health got online and would feel like a fraud for “wanting to be sick.” Turns out, surprise, I was diagnosed with depression, and in the beginning I was so afraid of being a fraud, of lying about my mental state to feel special. I felt this even while I was in psych hold for an attempt, even when I had to withdraw from school to attend intensive therapy.It’s very common for those with depression to feel like they are faking it (esp. if there’s. good days sprinkled in with the bad ones) and therefore don’t deserve help and support. For this reason I think we should take every person who thinks they may be depressed seriously, so that there are as few obstacles for them to get professional help as possible. Sure, there may be people who want to be/claim to be sick just to feel cool or special. But for the sake of those who do need help, and fast, we should embrace everyone who thinks they have depression without question, so we can focus on getting them a consultation with a professional to get whatever help they need.  The focus should not be on gatekeeping mental illness, but on encouraging as many people as possible to talk to a medical professional to help determine whether or not they are sick, stressed, hypochondriatic, or just-overthing-their-emotions-sometimes-maybe.Armchair diagnoses are not real diagnoses, BUT no one knows you better than you. Many people who seek help for depression do so because they feel “hey, this is not right, maybe i have depression, I should talk to someone.” There are already so many reasons and excuses to not seek professional help, and we should make it so that “i’m just attention seeking, my problems aren’t real” is no longer a valid excuse to not schedule a dr. appt. to talk about it. [info] None [info] 1581086060
fuckeh [info] I was diagnosed with depression as a kid too. But recently I did a test for adult add and got 9/10. Apparently they're often confused, but I haven't got checked out by a doctor yet. I was on antidepressants as a kid and all it seemed to do was sap my energy. Not a big fan of drugs like that, I'd rather deal with the ups and downs of life naturally. [info] None [info] 1463259748
MaybeILoveYou [info] I've been there.  I was diagnosed with depression, but the depression wasn't going away and my moods were swinging so much that it turned out I had Borderline Personality Disorder.  Years and therapy later, I'm so much better.  Oh, and Schizoaffective Disorder, which adds colour to my life.  I'll be on meds forever and I'm okay with that.  We've survived so much; it would be a waste to leave now.  And trust me, it does get better.  My meds help me so much.  I'm so happy and my life is great.  It's worth it to stick it out. [info] None [info] 1388187119
scobeavs [info] Came here to say this. I am diagnosed with depression and what you're describing sounds like me at my low points. Go see a doctor. [info] San Francisco Giants [info] 1520863249
bigchungy [info] My father made me go to 5 different doctors after I was diagnosed with depression until we ran into a doctor that agreed with his notion that "you can't be depressed, you're too young" or whatever stupid shit he believes. Eventually he actually started only looking for middle eastern doctors because he thought they would agree with him. The last doc I went to was this young middle eastern woman who seemed like she went through the same shit I did. She actually sat down my father and lectured him for how shitty it was that he was fishing around for a doctor that would deny me medical care.I think he just didn't want me treated for depression in case the secret "got out" to our family and reflected poorly on him. I feel the same way about not wanting to come home from college, but unfortunately my college is small so the dorms actually close and require you to leave most holidays. [info] None [info] 1545029346
PurpleEclipse [info] My story. I'm 26 and have PCOS. I miscarried both times at 6 weeks last March and December. It started off with spotting followed by me asking for my rhoGAM shot. This past one I tried not to get emotionally attached to the baby, but it hurt ten times worse. I was diagnosed with depression ages ago and it has gotten worse but also manageable with medication. I've only had support from two people since it has happened and I wanted to know what you guys have done to cope? Thanks. [info] MC March '15, MC December '15. [info] 1458248109
abigaell [info] Hey there,I was diagnosed with depression from a very young age, but like you, I was afraid for a long time to call anyone and ask for help. One idea is to look online for practices in your area, and send them an email. More and more counselors these days share their email for communication purposes because it's usually faster to reach someone by email than by phone call. Express your fears about talking to someone. They can usually arrange a phone call with the clinician first as well.I believe online therapy is a thing now, too.Sorry if this didn't help. I will try to think on more solutions. [info] None [info] 1570053456
_bubble_butt_ [info] Hey OP,  I know exactly how you feel as I felt the same way some years ago. I was diagnosed with depression and got the help I need. It is still a struggle but I am now on medication that works and getting out of bed/getting dressed/eating/facing the world is much easier. If you want to talk please DM me  [info] None [info] 1547998307
AndypandyO [info] Should I say I was depressed? I'm currently applying for AAC Ground Crew. I'm very early in the application stage and one of the top questions is, "have you been or are you diagnosed with depression?" I am not diagnosed with it nor do I have any symptoms of it. However, about a year and a half ago I went through a very messy break up and thought I was depressed for a period of about 2 months or more. I went to the doctor, said I was depressed so he threw some anti depressants my way. I did not take any anti depressants and completely willed my way back to health and to a stable state of mind. Since then I have never felt any slight depression what so ever. But the question is, do I say I was diagnosed with depression?Cheers. [info] None [info] 1477039644
InsidiousTheRetard [info] Haha jokes on you I was diagnosed with depression by my therapist...... [info] I have depression [info] 1565677451
iamthefury [info] This is very true. I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago, and had been suffering from it for even longer. "being myself" meant that I would be tired, quiet, and feeling an irrational mix of hatred and sadness boiling up in my mind. I got put on anti-depressants after I finally accepted that it might not be normal to consider suicide as a reasonable option several times a day, but they only deadened the pain, they didn't introduce happiness. Then I started smoking pot. I feel much better now. [info]  [info] 1325893148
buterbetterbater [info] The worst part of being bullied that people don't talk about is the "odd" kid is often perceived as a scapegoat by kids AND teachers. Being ugly or fat or whatever can make the adults around just as inclined to ignore, berate and abuse a child. I had the trifecta- physical and emotional abuse at home, abuse and alienation from schoolmates and mistreatment and targeting by teachers. There was no safe place. When a 7 year old is seeing suicide as the only relief from torment, it's disgusting. My experience has made me a firm believer that schools have no place administering physical punishment. I was being beaten severely at home and was being paddled as well at school.  Being the fat awkward kid left me vulnerable to abuse and no one offered protection. I don't know that I ever got over it- I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD and I still lack the trust to have close friends. I feel so vulnerable around people that I stay to myself and my partner is my only regular interaction. I don't talk to my surviving family often. I don't understand how someone could be so heartless and cruel to a child (maybe if I didn't have the contrast of my sister who was given all the affection and attention anyone could want). I was the last child and my mom ran off when i was a baby and I think I just became a sorry reminder of her to my family. I haven't any kids yet, but now the thought of doing that to a kid is so fucking infuriating that I don't know what to do.   [info] None [info] 1351082404
Alec2525 [info] I'm struggling Hi,I am 31m and I was diagnosed with depression (probably burn out) at the beginning of this year. It started one morning, when I thought I had a heart attack. I couldn't get up at the bus stop anymore and just stayed there for a long time before dragging myself to the doctor. I had trouble speaking. It was really bad. Things got better at a psychatric hospital, where I spent 4 months. I speak normally and my walk is nearly normal (I couldn't walk properly) but I remain tired all the time. Sometimes it is like suffocating. I got cortison IV therapy, but it didn't help. Apperently I have a common disease called Hashimoto's on top of my depression but it is supposed to be fine now. I don't feel that numb. It's just that everything is tiresome and drags. I can't work at the moment and life is no fun at all. I am very stiff and put on a little weight. I just hope I will feel normal again. I take aripiprazole and venlaflaxine.Does anyone have had a similar experience?Cheers,Alec [info] None [info] 1561391186
aweitscerulean [info] Im destined to be a loser because of my depression. [Long] I'm desparately trying to figure something to do with my life other than work at a gorcery store my entire life. I was in college but when i was 19, I dated a guy thay was way too old for me and was completely toxic to himself and everyone around him. I knew he wasnt the best boyfriend in the world but i didnt care, i just wanted to feel loved consistently. I made the dumbest decision of my life and flunked out if school because he wasnt attending college, i was very overwhelmed with my classes,  and i just didnt give a fuck what happened. I remember repressing my worries in my head about the consequences of flunking college, but would be willfully ignorant about it.  I want to join the Air Force so that I can attend college again, but I was diagnosed with depression last year and that is an immediate disqualifier, as i have to have neen off medication and not taking therapy fir at least 3 years. I cant fucking handle the thought of not going to the military at this point becaise i have tried to save money over and over again to pay off my community college so that i can attend achool again but i can never save up the money i need. Ive tried several times and something always happens. The last two times, someone t-boned and totalled my car and then the next, my (new to me) car needed a new transmisson. I called the recruiting office the next day and lied, saying ive never expirienced depression, so i wont have to wait 3 year, when ill definitely feel too old to enlist. I know it may not be a good idea but i feel like im on my last option before being a loser for the rest of my life. I never ever thought as a child that i was going to grow up to be a failure, but here i am.  I was also a very heavy marijuana user up until yesterday, so that i can have a clean system by the time i get to MEPS. I cant sleep, its almost 3am where i live and i work at 11 in the morning. I cant sleep because i keep thinking about how my father permanently warped me and now i have depression that i could otherwise probably fight it off if it weren't for him making me feel like a fucking burden and literally enjoying watching me stress and even cry over stuff. I haven't spoken to him in almost 10 years and i hope i never have to see his face or hear from him ever again. I feel like i could handle stress and coping with reality sober if it werent for him. He also beat the idea into my head growing up that the military is not for women (I'm a woman), that "all they do is go in and get knocked up. " So as you can imagine, I never thought of it as an option  until recently, now that I'm older and haven't spoken to him in almost a decade.  Im so fucking sad and lonely right now too.  Which also got me feeling really fucking guilty because my mother lives by herself and has no other children but me and I never really talk on the phone long or visit for more than an hour at a time because she's jobless and has no friends and shes extremely boring and suffers from depression as well and gives HORRIBLE life advice so i cant trust her with shit. She doesn't even seem to listen when i try to talk to her about my worries with my life and its not like im constantly complaining. Im actually quite ashamed of myself when i feel crappy. She always wants me to come visit and i always dread it. i feel like Im a horrible fucking person for treating her this way but I feel so fucking weird to be emotional at all with her, and I think its because my dad was just really bizarre in that category. He never told me he loved me and we certainly never hugged eachother. and i never referred to him as dad. I would call him by his first name.  So now i feel cold to my own mother and i think its because if i show too much emotion  i feel  like i lose my dignity. Like its super cringe to have to tell anyone in my family that i love them. i fucking hate that. Im just fucking so miserable and i want to sleep but i can't and now im  currently ruining my full day of work for tomorrow due to not sleeping. fuck this shit. [info] None [info] 1529564677
PogothePenguin [info] Not good today.. It seems like everything is coming to an end and I can't control it. I'm always lonely and it's hard to reach out. No one but 1 person knows I'm diagnosed with depression out of fear of being judged by family. My long term boyfriend got a job 6 hours away while I finish my last 5 semesters of school. I am extremely broke and in debt. I currently have a very low self-esteem so it's hard to try to "get out there."It's just come to a point where I have no idea what to go and where to turn anymore [info] None [info] 1501120652
redraven_adamw [info] My depression story. I am a 27 year old male with chronic depression. This is my story so far. Growing up not remembering anything before I was 6 or 7. This was also the time my parents got divorced. I have very few snippets of my biological father. I was told he was very abusive to my mom.My mom got remarried a year later to my step-dad. He had 2 children of his own, both male. One was 4 years older and the other 8 years older. Got bullied by the youngest most of my life. The older one and I just never got close.In elementary school I was diagnosed with ADD. Never had friends. And got bullied. I tried to make friends, but I always felt like an outcast. I eventually made a friend in 5th grade. But he went to another school in middle school. So I lost contact with him.In middle school same thing pretty much same thing has happened. I tried to make friends to no avail. I started to swim and play football to make friends, while I was great at both I still felt like an outcast.  Got bullied in school and felt like an outcast once again. Wasn't until the end of 8th grade, we where assigned to do a group movie. We where able to pick your peers for your groups. I didn't know what to do and eventually all the "weird" kids formed a group. One of the kids  invited me to come play AOE2 at his house. His two friends and I played for 8 hours straight on one game . Turned out to be best time of my life. Later they became my best friends.High school came around I decided to play on the football team and the swim team. I had to pick one of the two because I was great at both, but the issue was that they ran on similar seasons. I picked swimming because it was the better fit because for the life of me I couldn't catch a ball. But I was one of most athletic on the team. I evetually went to state sophomore year and junior year. Fast forward to senior year is where my depression started to kick in. A swim coach from one of the top architecture schools took interest in me came to my swim meet but this was the time I blew up and quit out of the blue and never showed up. I was just overwhelmed at the time because I still felt like an out cast and never befriend anyone on my swim team. On top of that my parents where always working and rarely ever supported me at events. While other parents always congratulated me. It took a hard toll on my life. This was the time I was diagnosed with depression. My step-uncle was a doctor knew I was depressed before I was even diagnosed. My parents both born in Poland never believed in depression. I was given lexapro for about 6 months and saw progress. My parents saw this progress and told me to stop taking the medication because I was happy again. I was naive at the time and didn't know what depression was.I still ended up going to the architecture school even though I didn't join their swim team. Same thing happened and felt like an out cast never made friends. Still had those 3 friends from the end of middle school though. Grades slowly started to go down not because I didn't have potential which I did, but because I started to stop trying and slowly stopped doing assignments and started to miss classes. In the mean time I had a girlfriend but was too ashamed to tell her what I was going through and that I had depression. My parents finally found out that I dropped out of school the same week my step uncle died (I was really close to him) and at the same time I found out my GF cheated on me. Lost 10 pounds the next 2 weeks. I started to get treatment for my depression finally but my parents still thought I was making excuses and being lazy. I was seeing a therapist and started to take medication. Started to get better and wanted to go back to school. I did and again same thing happened started out great then started to slip once again into depression. While this was happening both my best friends ended up moving away due to the military and my 3rd friend ended up ghosting all of us.Parents had enough and told me to get a job even though I was working as a pizza delivery guy they said a real job. I got a job as cnc machine operator. Was easy for me but stress induced because I was learning to code by hand and if I made a mistake it would be on my head. I was learning to program on master cam on the sidelines. But again I got overwhelmed I just quit. Decided to go to a community college took 12 credit hours was a straight A student then again I just quit. At this point I started to notice a pattern of depression and normal every 4-6 months or so maybe more .Went to TMS therapy didn't work.Went to outpatient therapy to further understand and what to do. After 2 months my parents told me to get a full time job I told them I could barly handle a part time job. Ended up working full time after 2 months again I quit due to being overwhelmed. In order to cover the fact I quit I still drove to my former job and sat in the parking lot for my "shift" so my parents wouldn't find out. They evetually did.This when I was bed ridden for 3 months just got up to eat and shit. Was suicidal and eventually agreed to go to inpatient because my mom didn't know what to do. My step dad didn't give a shit. After inpatient then outpatient I started keto therapy.  Thought  it worked and started to take it once a month after the initial 6 doses. Things where looking up. Went out of state to a private program for 6 months to work on my self.Life was looking good. Had a few slips here and there but I got out of it in a week . I called it progress.Got out came back home things where great. But life hit me hard. My last friend moved due to college.  I did move out to get away from my toxic step dad. Got a job at ups but again things started to slip and I quit.Now present day my mom wants to help me. I refuse because I am tired of trying. I lost all my friends and can't make new ones unless it's in a closed environment like the program I went to. But that's not real life. I fully understand I am not fit to have a GF. At this point in my life I see no point in wanting anything because it eventually goes to shit so why try. I stopped talking to people because I don't see the point. I just make enough for food and rent. Don't see the point In making more. My hygiene is shit because again if I am staying inside all day and no point on impressing others when try. Only good thing is I am not suicidal. Just because I know it would break my mom's heart. Even though it already feels like I am breaking heart for being the way that I am. I just fully accept that I will be miserable for the rest of my life, I can't enjoy anything anymore. I am done trying. [info] None [info] 1578962239
wafflekonez [info] Grew up in a Christian family, can confirm. First time I told my mom I was diagnosed with depression she shook it off and told me to just go back to church, that the Devil was targeting me in my weakness. I’ve gone on to forgive her for that because after a year of therapy I’ve realized a lot of people don’t really understand what exactly depression is, hell I never did either besides it being a “chemical imbalance”.I’m grateful for having gone through depression though, it’s taught me so much about what’s important in life and the importance of being there for others. I have a much greater appreciation for life, and after seeking profession help and talking out all my shitty issues, I feel in control of my life and 1,000,000 times more positive about everything. Reading Mark Maron’s book also helped iron out the remaining kinks.Tips for anyone who thinks they’re going through depression: Find someone, anyone to talk to and tell them everything you feel, even if it doesn’t make sense. Seek professional help if you can, it’s definitely worth it. And though you may not see it or believe, it can and does get better if you’re brave enough to face it and put in the effort to work through it. It’s not an easy thing to live with, but you can make it out, it’s just a matter of understanding your mind and your body and why things affect you the way they do. EDIT: Though I’m not the best Christian, I do believe in God, and I think in his own way he walked me through my recovery process to give me an understanding of it, so that I can use my experience to help others. I’m a firm believer in the power of Love and loving others regardless of their background/situation. There’s too much hate in this world going around, we need to be brave and fight back with compassion, patience, and kindness. [info] None [info] 1520976281
salvaggiod11 [info] Swapping My Pre-Built Gaming Laptop for a Self-Built Desktop Beast. Any Pointers? I am relatively new to building a PC from scratch, though I know how to install each component separately. What changes would you make to the build? Is there something i may be missing? Money is not necessarily an issue, however, I don't need something capable of rendering Star Wars: Episode 9 from my bedroom...My goal is to build a PC that I won't have to upgrade for quite a while and doesn't consist of the latest and greatest $2000+ dollar CPU (i9-7980XE) and GPU (Titan V).[PCPartPicker part list](https://pcpartpicker.com/list/qpjzYT) / [Price breakdown by merchant](https://pcpartpicker.com/list/qpjzYT/by_merchant/)Type|Item|Price:----|:----|:----**CPU** | [Intel - Core i7-8700K 3.7GHz 6-Core Processor](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/sxDzK8/intel-core-i7-8700k-37ghz-6-core-processor-bx80684i78700k) | $329.00 @ Amazon **CPU Cooler** | [NZXT - Kraken X62 Rev 2 98.2 CFM Liquid CPU Cooler](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/2RdFf7/nzxt-kraken-x62-rev-2-982-cfm-liquid-cpu-cooler-rl-krx62-02) | $147.32 @ OutletPC **Thermal Compound** | [Gelid Solutions - GC-Extreme 3.5g Thermal Paste](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/tgvRsY/gelid-solutions-thermal-paste-gcextreme) | $12.19 @ OutletPC **Motherboard** | [Gigabyte - Z370 AORUS Gaming 7 (rev. 1.0) ATX LGA1151 Motherboard](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/CkCrxr/gigabyte-z370-aorus-gaming-7-rev-10-atx-lga1151-motherboard-z370-aorus-gaming-7-rev-10) | $209.99 @ Newegg **Memory** | [Corsair - Vengeance RGB 64GB (4 x 16GB) DDR4-3733 Memory](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/jsprxr/corsair-vengeance-rgb-64gb-4-x-16gb-ddr4-3733-memory-cmr64gx4m4k3733c17) | $957.69 @ Amazon **Storage** | [Samsung - 850 EVO 500GB M.2-2280 Solid State Drive](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/VrH48d/samsung-internal-hard-drive-mzn5e500bw) | $179.99 @ Samsung **Storage** | [Samsung - 850 EVO-Series 1TB 2.5" Solid State Drive](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/RbvZxr/samsung-internal-hard-drive-mz75e1t0bam) | $349.89 @ OutletPC **Storage** | [Samsung - 850 EVO-Series 1TB 2.5" Solid State Drive](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/RbvZxr/samsung-internal-hard-drive-mz75e1t0bam) | $349.89 @ OutletPC **Video Card** | [Asus - GeForce GTX 1080 Ti 11GB STRIX GAMING Video Card](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/Yr8H99/asus-geforce-gtx-1080-ti-11gb-video-card-strix-gtx1080ti-11g-gaming) | $1149.79 @ OutletPC **Case** | [Corsair - Air 540 ATX Mid Tower Case](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/wgkD4D/corsair-case-air540) | $119.99 @ Newegg **Power Supply** | [EVGA - SuperNOVA G3 750W 80+ Gold Certified Fully-Modular ATX Power Supply](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/dMM323/evga-supernova-g3-750w-80-gold-certified-fully-modular-atx-power-supply-220-g3-0750) | $99.99 @ Amazon **Operating System** | [Microsoft - Windows 10 Home OEM 64-bit](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/wtgPxr/microsoft-os-kw900140) | $89.89 @ OutletPC **Sound Card** | [Creative Labs - Sound Blaster Zx 24-bit 192 KHz Sound Card](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/3nxfrH/creative-labs-sound-card-70sb150600000) | $124.75 @ Newegg **Wireless Network Adapter** | [Asus - PCE-AC68 PCI-Express x1 802.11a/b/g/n/ac Wi-Fi Adapter](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/8VMFf7/asus-wireless-network-card-pceac68) | $84.89 @ OutletPC **Case Fan** | [Corsair - LL120RGB LED (Three Fans With Lighting Node PRO) 43.2 CFM  120mm Fans](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/8KFXsY/corsair-ll120rgb-led-three-fans-with-lighting-node-pro-432-cfm-120mm-fans-co-9050072-ww) | $119.47 @ Newegg **Fan Controller** | [NZXT - Sentry Mix 2 Fan Controller](https://pcpartpicker.com/product/tWW9TW/nzxt-fan-controller-senmix2) |- | *Prices include shipping, taxes, rebates, and discounts* | | Total (before mail-in rebates) | $4364.73 | Mail-in rebates | -$40.00 | **Total** | **$4324.73** | Generated by [PCPartPicker](http://pcpartpicker.com) 2018-04-05 15:07 EDT-0400 |In 2015, I bought a GIGABYTE gaming laptop with graduation gifts. I spent about $2000 for the machine with a 980m GPU, i7 CPU ang 8gb of RAM. I occasionally used it for gaming but wanted a powerful portable computer as I planned on running demanding engineering software during my college career. I was diagnosed with depression and dropped out after spending way too much money at an out of state college. I am now 21 years old and have been supporting myself for 3 years. I drove over 2000 miles and moved myself across the country to start a painting company with a friend from college who also dropped out freshman year. The two of us have only been bidding out high end jobs in order to create an impreasive image for our small and humble LLC. Finally I have the funds to build my dream machine capable of running the latest and greatest VR titles without a hitch.Thanks for reading and thank you in advance for your help!PS. If you know anyone in the Boulder and Denver areas that may need help with painting or staining from 2 young, professional, and driven guys let me know! 😬 [info] None [info] 1522958357
ConstantRadio [info] How do I know whether I truly dislike my job or it's just mental illness giving me false perception? Been fired or did quit few engineering jobs so far and seeing contract terminated always gave me good feeling and a relief. Otherwise for the whole day I am looking on a watch for that 5PM so I can go home, I pretend that I am working, it takes a lot of mental effort to start tasks (depending on mood - sometimes I even can't open email), while finishing them is like trying to move a mountain, I'm not interested in interacting with coworkers especially talking about work...in short I am like some tourist visiting a company with a very poor productivity. So far I was diagnosed with depression to a high extend, and with ADD to a lower extend.&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;EDIT: Some more info for you guys (sorry if sounds a bit techy, as it was written for techies on first place):&gt;Since my electronics engineering studies and even since my technical high school days, deep down in me I am asking myself, whether electrical engineering (or software development tasks - it's pretty much the same thing due to problem solving nature) is really something that I want to do, leaving a good pay, market demand and social status aside? High school was somewhat terrible, while university was more bearable as I wasn't forced in doing anything and everything was very individual. Uni was hard and at the same time a complete boredom, but somehow, with a lot of luck, I managed to pass it by doing learning campaigns few days before exams while having a lot of help from colleagues. Of course, the grades were an utter garbage, but at the end of the day the boat was floating, although there were some close calls to drop out the uni (as a side note, I live in a social country with "free" education, so fooling around in school is possible without ending with a big dept). During practice work on uni, professors occasionally caught me being mentally absent, and had advised me that it's better for me to go for a walk in a park rather than daydreaming during their lessons. Few times assistants warned me that in essence I don't have the capability to perform engineering tasks, while other colleges told me in face or behind by back that I am a dumb moron. They might be right, but at the same time it makes me wonder, if that's true, how the hell did I make it so far - it can not be all luck, or is it?  &gt;  &gt;Now the job. The best part of it is going home and often it takes an eternity in waiting for that 5 o'clock. I can barely start tasks, and finishing them is a major challenge. Often I just pretend that I am working or I keep doing some completely irrelevant tasks. My productivity is low and my manager already warned me about it. Then I am not interested in talking with coworkers, especially not about work-related topics. On team meetings I have very hard time to stay on focus with discussion, usually I just sail away with my thoughts. On few occasions I've heard from coworkers that "this guy is a dumbass", "he doesn't know what he is talking about" I was said straight in face that "we need to have someone who CAN think" so there has to be something about all this stuff. I think that so far I excelled only in simple linear scripting (e.g. programming steps for automation), but I usually got lost in anything more complex that requires an actual problem solving. I never finished any app design. Some employer even suggested me, to maybe consider graphic design. So far I had quit or been fired at few jobs, all in the engineering field, and every contract termination made me happy. Not sure if I ever got any interest in any of those jobs, aside from money and status.  &gt;  &gt;And then my hobby, which should be game development. I yet have to finish a single game, because I've only ended with dozens of half working prototypes. When I am developing a game, I tend to somehow get stuck in coding. Often I just keep staring in that code for a longer time, not moving anywhere. Finally, I somehow stop coding and end with doing graphical work, composing music, googling or playing around with tabs in browser...in short, I end doing some irrelevant stuff instead of continuing with game development. I believe that from all the tasks that I can do, programming takes me the most of time (too much of it) and brings no results. [info] None [info] 1543256980
Portaille [info] I was literally just thinking about this an hour ago. Poor coping skills definitely worsen depression, but it can still remain despite one knowing the "best" coping techniques. Does that make sense? I'm tired so I feel like I'm not all here lol. For an example, throughout my little stints in therapy and growing up a bit, I've learned to cope with quite a few things. I can get out of my comfort zone and shit now. It's cool. But I'm still depressed. I found a post I made on another throwaway a few years ago after I was diagnosed with depression...and was a bit disappointed to see that I haven't really changed much, despite growing up a bit and experiencing more life. I have the coping skills, at least more than I had before, yet the depression remains - and tbh it's not getting any better.Um, sorry, I hope this post didn't make you feel worse. I guess I just wanted to let you know I understand how you feel. I often feel the same way, like I'm faking my depression because I supposedly can't handle life. [info] None [info] 1573268785
Markus_INC [info] I hate my mother, and I haven't got a clue what to do about it... I don't like that I have to write this but I have to get it out somehow. I am 17 years old, and I hate my mother. So this requires a bit of an explanation, because some will comment something along the lines of "hate is a strong word", which I am aware of. My life is plagued by self-hatred and distrust. I live rather comfortably when it comes to economy and my parents are still together. However, when I was younger I had heavy difficulties with studies. My mother would take things into her own hands, and force me to study Swedish long into the nights. I got tired, lost all self-esteem and even tried to commit suicide once. I started hating life, and I started going to a therapist. I was diagnosed with depression, and recently was diagnosed free of depression, as I lost all suicide thoughts and no longer felt as if I want it to end. The thing is, I still have issues with my mother.Now, she pretends to love me. I doubt it. She guilt me into doing things that I don't want to do. Everything from coming with her to her work or something "fun" during d-days (explanation: no, not that d-day. d-day stands for disposable day in Swedish. It's work-days where we are free from school to work with homework or study for tests) to even what I am allowed to think politically. When I don't do what she want, she begins to cry and scream and portray me as a bad child, in an attempt to guilt me into changing. She even makes me walk my big sisters dog. A dog that I had no say in whether *we* should get. She gives me no privacy. She constantly calls me, even during school hours and when I am home or with classmates. This has crippled my ability to socialise. I am about as socially capable as a rock, because I always think that she is going to disturb me and my friends. I always instinctively look around myself when out with "friends" out of the fear that she will show up. She is a massive embarrassment. She lacks basic social curtsy, in my opinion. For example, she coughs without covering her mouth, and she constantly ask either basic dull questions like "what did you have for lunch" or moronic questions about anything under the sun. I can't socialise with girls in any meaningful way, and if I could, I could never imagine bringing them home to meat my parents, or even home for that matter out of that same fare that my mother will come home. Sometimes, my parents travel somewhere, leaving me alone home. Shortly after, I begin to gain confidence. While I still don't socialise, I go to the gym, and I feel all round more happy. I wish every day was like this. [info] None [info] 1497178112
yvaN_ehT_nioJ [info] 1000x this. I was diagnosed with depression when I was college, and Asperger's Syndrome when I was 11. CBT while I was in college helped *immensely.* Also, OP, start working out regularly if you haven't already. Doesn't necessarily have to be lifting, just something that gets you up and moving. Physical activity can help a lot with depression.  [info] ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ [info] 1543442573
wish_my_wash [info] Can depression ruin your mind permanently? I was diagnosed with depression maybe 10 years ago, when I was in my early teens. I’ve gone through several medications, none of which have helped significantly. I’m just wondering if this prolonged state of depression can cause permanent “brain damage”? I feel like I’m mentally turning into mush, like I read a lot more slowly and I can’t process things as quickly as before. EDIT: Thank you for the input everyone! Literally any thoughts, opinions, and medical facts are welcome. [info] None [info] 1542783977
foxes722 [info] I think like this... "hey I really want to talk to you about something significant that's been going on with me. I started talking to a therapist since I was struggling with stuff and feeling overwhelmed. I've been diagnosed with depression, something that was also probably affecting me in the end of our relationship. I felt like it was important for you to know this is something I'm working on now, because I know this was something that impacted you as well."And I think let her know you're okay answering questions about it (if you are) and let her know she doesn't really need to say anything about it either if she doesn't want to, that the information is there for what it's worth.Also I think talking about any mental health stuff in an open and honest way is awesome and sort of breaking down some of the crappy stigma stuff associated. I try to do this as much as possible.Best of luck! [info] None [info] 1442502015
calliethedestroyer [info] Get your Iron levels checked. It could be that you're anemic or just low on iron. Anemia will make you feel tired, exhausted, even if you're sleeping enough, eating well.You can have anemia for a few reasons, if your diet doesn't have enough iron (really easy to not get enough iron if you're a lady, menstruating each month), or if you've lost blood recently.I am slightly torn on this issue - I was diagnosed with depression at 16, but no one actually did anything about treating the causes for it until I took it into my own hands at age 21. If your doctors really want you to be treated for depression, then start doing therapy. Try to avoid any anti-depressants UNLESS you are at IMMEDIATE risk for suicide or have suicidal ideation. Anti-depressants are very difficult to come off of, and they are rarely side effect free. I strongly feel that they are over prescribed as a "band-aid" fix. Good luck [info] None [info] 1334591148
Langoustina [info] I had just gotten diagnosed with severe depression and had started seeing a therapist. It took months for the therapist to convince me that medication might help, and while I was thinking about it, I messaged a friend that I hadn't yet told about my diagnosis. The conversation went something like this: (bear in mind that I'm translating this so it's not quite exact)Me: So I've been diagnosed with depression, and they want to see if meds will help. I'm starting to consider them because I can't live like this anymore. Her: Depression isn't cured with meds, my dear. It's cured by being with family and friends.Me: I mean, I'm with my family and friends all the time, and I'm exhausted every day even after sleeping plenty, and I'm just so fucking sad even thought everything is fine in my life. I don't understand it.Her: Well being depressed is bad, there's nothing good that comes of it. Life is too short to be like that. I lost my grandma about a month ago and I didn't expect her to die so soon. You can't waste your life being depressed.Me: No but that's what I'm saying, I am thinking about going on meds because I don't want to waste my life being depressed.\*At this point she falls asleep (we live on opposite sides of the world) and I don't hear from her until the next day.\*Her: Is your "depression" better today? (Laughing emoji, heart emoji)Me: \*Basically explains that no, it doesn't work that way, I'm trying my best but it won't just disappear\*Her: Well, quit working yourself up over nothing!&amp;#x200B;Needless to say I just agreed with her after that and quit talking to her as much. I felt absolutely gutted. And the meds did help once I went on them. Things improved so much. But yeah, I felt let down by that.  [info] None [info] 1551742940
wakingupthesun [info] Oh wow, I didn't expect so many nice responses.  Thank you, all of you, it's nice knowing that there are in fact people that understand.  The majority of my family on my dad's side has never dealt with depression, so when the pile of work gets too high they just power through it and don't understand why I get so overwhelmed and just break down.  My mom's side has a history of alcoholism, drug abuse and depression-my mom falls under all three categories.  When I was in eighth grade, I didn't know why I felt the way I did until we were going to the beach and my mom was supposed to drive us, but she decided to take my disabled younger brother's seizure medication and tried to drive us anyway. She couldn't even walk to the car by herself but we didn't do anything because she was the authority figure and you don't question them.  We almost had a head on collision with another car at an intersection and when we convinced her to turn around, we crashed into a telephone pole.  Later when we got back to the house my aunt came down and took her to get her stomach pumped at a nearby hospital and the next day she was in rehab 2 hours away.  Around this time I went and got a therapist, who I still see to this day, and I was diagnosed with depression.  Before that point I didn't know I was the only one in my grade who wanted to die, I thought everyone was thinking that, so I didn't tell anyone.  I was put on Wellbutrin and was stable for a while and finally my junior year, after talking to parents and my therapist, I was taken off the medication because I actually didn't need it anymore.  But my senior year it started to come back and didn't tell anyone for a while until it was almost too late, I started to make plans of how I was going to say goodbye to people, but my boyfriend actually stopped me, I couldn't say goodbye to him because I have never loved someone the way that I love him and he has been my rock through this process.  So now I'm about a month in on Wellbutrin again, but I still have a long way to go. [info] None [info] 1438103298
freestyle12 [info] I really need some advice and guidance at the moment. Right now I'm saying this is a serious post and no fun just looking for a bit of advice. I'll start the story with how I be came an every day smoker. when I was in 6th grade I was diagnosed with depression, my mom doesn't believe that anti depressants work in kids despite te recommendations from multiple psychiatrists. in 8th grade I smoked here n there to help cope with the depression which was getting a little worse every day. 9th grade due mostly to the fact that I am a very big athlete despite stereotypes. after my sports season ended I had nothing to occupy my time and my depression continued to worsen, I started drinking heavily (side note I'm a recovering drug addict from other drugs rather not go into details) on a nightly basis. eventually as I spiraled out of control I began to self Injure and attempted suicide 2 times that year. luckily I'm bad at that. By a miracle I made it through freshman year.  the summer going into my 10th year i started smoking every day. I immediately    noticed a significant improvement in my mood I continued this habit till the school year. during the school year I tried to keep a bowl a day habit going cutting down my consumption. my grades in my 10th year were significantly better I continued this through 11tg year and I got decent grades this entire time few As few Bs a C here or there and if I was just horrendous in a class a D or F. I realized when I would take my T brakes that I was actually too depressed to do a lot of the school work and would have to miss school because of how bad the depression is. now as an 18 y/o senior who has been accepted to a college, should I continue my daily smoking habit or should I try to focus on school and cope with the depression through other means (my parents won't let me take anti depressants. against it to the point where they refuse to let insurance pay for them) I just don't know I know I should focus more on school, but my depression is completely crippling, and if am in a sense addicted to weed seeing as my depression takes a deeper dip whenever I quit smoking. I just realized I kind of rambled so I apologize. tldr I have crippling depression I cope with smoking it effects my grades, but I don't know how long I can last facing it withoutedit: really appreciate the replies il try out your advice [info] None [info] 1380172402
CertainlyNotYourWife [info] I was diagnosed with depression about 6 years ago, formally. I have had it longer. I have tried what feels like every antidepressant out there. The current flavor is cymbalta and it hasn't done anything for me. I also have developed terrible panic attacks, to the point where my vitals are up and I have passed out before. I have talked about all of this with my doctor and basically was told to try 30mg more of the cymbalta and that was it. When i said that didn't seem to help, I was told there isn't anything else that she could do for me. I'm working on the psychiatrist thing but i live in the freaking middle of nowhere with zero resources and the clinic here has an obnoxious new patient intake method. So that's been kind of put on the back burner. I've given up on my doctors at this point. None of them seem to care that I am in pain, mentally and physically. I'm left to work with what I have. [info] None [info] 1560652152
mwaph [info] The Dream I’ve had the Dream for as long as I can remember. I don’t know when it started, but the longest I’ve gone without it is 3 months. I tend to forget about it a lot too. Just as all traces of it vanish from my mind, it comes back in full force a few nights down the line. It’s always the same, I’m standing at the edge of a forest. I recognise the place. It’s the forest that dotted the back of my school in my hometown. We were always warned not to go in there. The elders spoke about demons in the trees that would snatch the children and feast on them, not before torturing them. Images of young children on skewers, roasting over open fire pits circulated in everybody’s minds as our teachers and parents only encouraged these stories. It was only after I grew up that I realised that these stories were made up to discourage children from getting lost in the forest. A few years before I started school, the son of the man who owned the corner shop by our house went missing. He was last seen wandering around the edge of the forest. There was a big search expedition, but no trace of him was ever found. In fact, official reports stated that he might have gotten lost and died of exposure, but it was easier to blame demons when it came to trying to deter children from ever going in there. It worked for a little on kids but not so much on teenagers. A few years later, a couple, looking for some privacy, wandered into the forest and never came back. This time, the rescue expedition actually found a shoe that belonged to the boy, but there was no other trace of them. Once again, the official consensus was that they got lost and died of exposure. Wild animals must have carried off their decomposing bodies leaving no trace of them. It’s happened before in other parts of the world. I wasn’t a brave child, so I obediently stayed away while my friends made bets to scope out the outer edges of the forests. To be honest, no matter how fearless they made themselves to be, nobody had the courage to go all the way into the dark, forbidding forest. I think the unknown was what made it such a perfect setting for the Dream. Now, decades later, despite having moved cities and countries, I would always go back to the edge of the forest in the Dream. I would never know when the Dream would come to me. I tried to make it come to me by thinking about it a lot before going to sleep, but it never worked. A few days later, I’d forget about it all and then just like that, I would have the Dream. Maybe the trick was to not care. It always followed the same pattern, the dull scent of the earth was what would make me open my eyes. I’d be on the ground, staring up at a cluster of trees, growing far too close to each other. I would walk towards the trees, trying to find a way in. It was difficult because the trees huddled so close together. It was almost as if they didn’t want me to come in. When I squeezed my way past the broken branches, suddenly, the world would grow quiet. It was like someone had thrown a heavy wool blanket over me and I could only hear muffled sounds in the distance. Except for the whispers. The trees whispered to me softly, leading me further into the forest. The ground was soft and moist, pleasant under my bare feet. The trees would form a close-knit canopy under the sky, not letting a trace of moonlight pass through. In the Dream, I would always try to get to the centre of the forest, but I would wake up before I could. It was frustrating. I would wake up feeling a sense of utter failure. I tried to remind myself that it was just a dream concocted out of childhood urban legends. At the age of 30, I was diagnosed with depression and insomnia. I would spend hours in bed, shifting and turning, waiting for the Dream to come and save me from sleeplessness but it didn’t work. My mind felt like someone had turned on the TV at full volume and hidden the remote. I would stay up all night, head pounding and my mouth dry. There were times when I would get an hour or two of restless, uncomfortable sleep but the Dream never came back. It faded into the past like a distant memory. I stopped praying for it to come save me because I lost all hope. But remember how I had mentioned before, that the Dream only came when you didn’t think about it? My doctor finally convinced me to start taking some sleeping pills. I wasn’t very thrilled but the thought of a good night’s sleep made me force one down my throat. And there it was, the Dream. I was back at the edge of the forest. But something felt different this time. The trees weren’t as close to each other as I remembered. In fact, they seemed inviting. I heard the soft crunch of leaves under my feet as I walked into the forest. Like before, silence enveloped me as soon as I entered the canopy of trees. It was dark but my eyes adjusted to it quickly. Something felt a bit off though. The colours were a little different. It felt like I was looking at my surroundings through a photo filter. The air felt cooler, and I shivered slightly when I realised that I was only wearing a nightie. The whispers were back, this time a little sharper. I still couldn’t figure out what they were saying. I walked through the trees, my feet feeling like they were floating through the darkness. Something was pulling me towards the heart of the forest. I felt like this time I could make it all the way to the centre. I could feel the whispers guiding me through the dark night. Excitement coursed through my body as I felt the pull of the forest getting stronger. I had to get there before I woke up. A low hum had replaced the whispers. I could feel it vibrate inside my body. It was coming from the centre. And it was calling me. I noticed that the trees started tilting towards the direction I was going in. The hum grew louder as I made my way towards a big cluster of trees. I was almost there. My hands shook as I pushed the branches away from my face and I stepped out into a small clearing. There it was, the heart of the forest. The hum was almost deafening, but the adrenaline coursing through my body overshadowed the way it had started to grate on my ears. I looked up, and I could see nothing but branches and leaves. The energy that filled the clearing was almost suffocating. There was a big tree in the centre, its branches expanding and curling into the sky, some of them creeping down the bark of the trees knotting into the vines crawling up the bark forming nubs of various sizes. The tree was calling out to me. I crept closer and touched the bark, awed by the beautiful knots created by the tangled branches looping into one another. I looked up and realised that each knot had a distinct shape. My heart leapt into my throat when I realised that one of the knots right by my face looked like a foot. My eyes trailed up the various tangles of branches and vines that created a grotesque figure of a torso and a face screaming in agony. I stepped back, my breath ragged as I noticed the two other figures on the tree, all of their expressions in varying degrees of anguish. The resemblance was unmistakable. The tree had absorbed these people into its being. A scream escaped my mouth as one of the figures moved slightly, its eyes wide and opened its mouth but no sound came out of it. I spun around, trying to find a way out. Suddenly I felt suffocated as I realised that the trees had moved in closer. I squeezed my way past, the rough bark peeling the skin from my elbows. I felt something shoot out of the big tree and slither towards me, but I didn’t wait to see what it was. My feet felt raw as the rough gravel and pointy roots dug into my soles. I felt something loop itself against my ankle and I screamed as I dropped to the ground. I felt myself being dragged straight back into the darkness. And that is when I woke up. Sweat streamed down the side of my face and neck as I tried to catch my breath. It was the Dream. I was back in my bedroom, on my bed. I felt a cry escape my lips as I realised that I was safe and it was just the Dream. When the adrenaline from all the excitement subsided, I felt all the energy drain from my body. I felt a sharp sting in my feet. I felt bile rise in my throat as I pushed off the covers to reveal the soles of my feet bloodied and raw and the bedsheet stained with streaks of dried blood, soil, and twigs. [info] None [info] 1475150843
toolfan1994 [info] I am diagnosed with depression and I have a therapy session coming up in August but that just seems so far away at this point. I would like to quit my job but I'm not sure what I can switch to starting from scratch basically and be able to afford mortgage payments still. I don't have a whole lot of support. It's not really something my family talks about. My doctor suspected something in middle school and I ended up getting scolded for that so it took me until a couple years ago to get an official diagnosis. Unfortunately they only do full time at my work so I would have to find a new place if I wanted part time. [info] None [info] 1560983070
AdloraOfSolitude [info] I meant to reply to her, but now that you bring it up, yeah, I do. I have been diagnosed with depression and her symptoms mirror mine almost exactly. Almost every eating disorder begins with an urge to binge, purge, and /or restrict. I hope she sees my reply. People, teens especially, get way too much flack for being attention seekers when there's really nothing wrong with noticing you've been engaging in harmful behaviours and asking for help.  [info] None [info] 1396968221
Profesco [info] My [19M] of 2.5 years acts like a second father me [16F] and I don't like it. Boyfriend "B" is 19, I am 16. We've been dating for 2.5 years.I'm not going to start from the beginning of the relationship, it's more of the past month. I was diagnosed with depression. (I just hate everything that requires work and don't care about anything) and my boyfriend *was* supportive at first, but since the past month, he's been controlling. And by controlling, I mean not only do I have to ask my parents (which is obvious) to go out with some friends, I have to ask him too if it's a day where he's working. I find this stupid. I told him, "I don't like the way you're acting like another parent." B responded with "I'm only doing this because I care about you." I think that was a red flag, not sure about that.After a bit, we agreed we'd go out with friends together, last Friday. We all meet up with our regular crew all aged from 16-22. I was super excited, him not so much. As I was chatting with the others, I look over and he's hunched on his phone playing an app. After a bit, he then murmured to me, "I'm going to go work on my car." I was confused, but watched him walk and sit in his car.After an hour or so, (he was in his car for about 10 minutes at this point) my friend wonders what the hell he's doing there and to ask him if he'd like to go to the hookah bar with all the others. He's really against smoking, so go figure. However they didn't know this, so I asked him if he was going to go, he said no. I said I wanted to, but then got into an argument about how he doesn't want to and wants more time with me alone so he starts to leave while the others go to the bar and I stay behind, a little pissed. So there was a Notebook moment with me saying, "Fine, I won't go." He comes back.So today I told him I don't like how he treats me when it comes to me going out and the relationship as a whole.I tell him: "Look, I want to let you know. Since last night, I've been questioning whether or not I'm happy in this relationship. Well, I'm not. I don't like how controlling you are. I don't think we'll be happy together. Maybe we should just take a break."Him: "I'm not controlling."I told him I just wanted time away from working on a relationship, and I want to try to make myself happy. So once I get back on Facebook, he unfriended me. I asked him why and he says: "I'm trying to give you as much space as possible. Want me to not care? I won't even see your posts. Okay?"So currently we are on a break. I'm not upset, not crying waterfalls, and if anything I feel happier and more free than ever. I kinda wished that we would have taken that much more mature.**tl;dr** my boyfriend treats me like his child and it's rather annoying, and somewhat wondering if I should even try to fix this relationship. [info] None [info] 1369079155
spidersarefab [info] From the UK as well and I couldn't agree more!I was diagnosed with depression at 17 and given sertraline to manage it. It didn't work, wanna know why?It was actually ADHD and I was misdiagnosed for 6 years because the docs didn't listen to me properly. A lot of people I know are just put on it and that's it. It even says that you have to have been experiencing these symptoms for at least a year (I think?) to be diagnosed so why are doctors not even questioning it? Let's not forget that it can actually make you feel worse when you first go on it! It seems to be something taken so lightly. [info] None [info] 1559219089
hopefulwriter [info] I was a happy, hopeful child, then in the most important years of my life I was diagnosed with depression. Everything I've wanted/needed/deserved seems to have been taken away from me. Not only do I have to fight with myself in an internal struggle, I also have to deal with the external struggle of life. This is going to sound crazy, but some day's I'm convinced that there's people in a control room somewhere watching my life, trying to figure out what more can they do to me to finally break me. To just give up all hope that my life will be any better, and just give up and wait to die. [info] None [info] 1359308960
SunshineNinja92 [info]  When I finally told my husband I was ready to TTC the first thing I did was get an appointment with both my doctor and a psychologist so I had a medical support team on board in case my depression took control if things started to take longer than I wanted. I was diagnosed with depression in grade 3, TTC is definitely hard and does not help with the depression journey. It's like a bear fight in my mind with my desire to conceive and all of the steps that go with that against my depression saying I'm not fit to ever have a kid and I should just give up.If you have any activities you default to for relaxation I would start scheduling those in every day - literally set an alarm on your phone if you have to. For me that means taking walks, watching a Disney movie in a nice warm bath and baking - for you it may look a lot different but it might be a good first step to finding even a small step out of the hopelessness. Sometimes those little things even though the depression is telling you they are stupid and will never work can help tone down that same negative voice. [info] 27 | TTC#1 | Cycle 8 | 🇨🇦 [info] 1565728363
sectandmew [info] Hey. I don't know too much about your life, but I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 13, and ADHD since I was four. Just wanted to let you know people care about you and we're happy to have you as a part of the community [info] Gimmick puppets since day 1 [info] 1480029342
outdoorwoman84 [info] Old Habits, laziness and a bad mentality die REALLY hard (Long post) I've attempted to keep at it with CICO for 1 month.   The first two weeks I was able to stick with it, track almost everything and keep the motivation and mindset.   The last couple of weeks,  not so much.   They say it can take 21 days to make a habit.  I didn't make it 15 days. A little bit about me:   34 Female, weighing in around 244 pounds.  When I started CICO I was 248. I did not weight myself this morning because I was afraid of what it would be.   At the beginning of this year I was roughly 255-258.  Winter always becomes my very sedentary time and once Spring hits I become more active with my kayak fishing competing (yes its a thing).   I have been through cycles of becoming a couch potato in the late fall up until April for several years now.  I hate winter, I hate dark mornings and dark evenings,  I hate the cold, and any activity outside in the cold is somewhat impossible due to cold induced asthma.   I have also given up very easily in the past with other diet trends, mainly because they were so restrictive and knew it would not work and also didn't have the mindset.I had been in a funk for about 2 years with no reason/motivation/mindset, etc to try or even attempt weight loss.  I knew I just didn't have it in me mentally to do it.  I recently got married 9/8/18 so there was a lot on my plate for that.  The week off after the wedding something inside finally woke back up.  I got motivated, I got the mindset back. Its like the on switch that I couldn't find was on full power.  I was ready to make a change. There is literally nothing keeping me from loosing weight but myself.  I kept seeing posts on this subreddit and it gave me even more inspiration.  I bought resistance bands, printed off motivational posters, I did things to prep myself and hoped I could keep at it.  I didn't want to let myself get into my normal winter potato mode.  I wanted to get myself in better shape for the kayak bass fishing national championship next March down in Louisiana.  (Kayak Fishing is my heart, soul and passion).  I had the vision of being slimmer and in better shape for this event.  I had such good intentions, motivation, and support from my husband who I had tried to get into it years before. Now it feels and seems that I have just automatically given up, but the switch is still somewhat on, which I'm terrified I'll loose access to completely again. I tracked my food/calories with the loseit app and made a simple goal to track everything and keep my calorie limit within reason (1600-1700/day). Sounded and seemed easy enough.  The first 2 weeks I was able to stick with it completely and logged everything even if I went over, but it wasn't going over by much (70-100 calories).   I didn't limit myself on certain foods, etc but realized within the first 2 days that it was still going to be a challenge mentally since I have a big sweet tooth and its really opened my eyes as to how many calories are in anything and everything.  Around the end of the 2nd week  I hit the wall again.  I would track most of the day, or parts of the day, then the evening is where I would run into trouble.   I would want to have larger portions of dinner and have that evening snack.  I couldn't deal with actually seeing how bad I did by tracking and it would make me feel ashamed of myself if I did.  I also have had issues with binging (usually around the time of the month).  I used the resistance bands once.It's so easy to get off track, go back to old habits and just continue to be lazy because its the EASY thing to do and requires the least amount of effort. It's easy to come home, get dinner ready, etc and then just sit on the couch because its easy and requires little effort/energy. It's easy to give up right away because there has been no progress visually/mentally/etc and its the easy thing to do.It's been easy to always think I'm never going to be good enough to loose weight because I have always failed or given up and have constantly yo-yo'd throughout the years.It's easy to get discouraged and give up when the scale barely moves.It's so easy to make whatever food you want and not have to count calories for every single ingredient because that can take alot work and even investigation.  It's easy to give up looking for better and different foods, recipes, etc because its an endless monster in itself since there can literally be 100 variations of 1 recipe.  There's also a lot of really weird shit out there for recipes and foods.  I was also faced with the reality of the meals I had made in the past were HUGE calorie eaters.  My ghoulash recipe is 650 calories alone.... not a lot of room for other meals and foods in the day.   &amp;#x200B;Now the positive side of things that my mind has accepted/realizes (My mind has a hard time seeing positives as this has been a struggle since high school, which is when I was diagnosed with depression).  By doing CICO there has not been any junk food, candy etc in the house for quite some time. Even when I gave up I have still not succumbed to buying crap food from the grocery store. Its a matter of not having the temptation in the house  and also budgeting since we are working on paying off credit card debt to eventually be able to buy a house.    Meal planning and prep has been on Sundays and made things easier for knowing what lunches and dinner will be, but on the other side of that is that there is alot more for me to do, since I do 95% of the meal planning, prep and 100% cooking.  My husband is supportive, encouraging etc, but couldn't cook to save his life.  Our kitchen is tiny in a house we rent so that makes things challenging if he wants to try to help  Our local Krogers now has the Clicklist where you order ahead and pick up your groceries.  The only downside is that it has to be made within 4 hours of wanting to pick it up and they stop pick up after 8pm. I'm trying to see the how/why/what etc that got me off track and has caused me to automatically think I have failed.  There's one part of my mind that desperately wants to keep trying,  but another part that is already in the given up and lets go back to easy/lazy mode. The battle in my mind seems to be the wall.   I wish I could just shut this part off so I can keep myself going. [info]   [info] 1541090923
becky_kate_ [info] Yeah that's why it took me so long to realise it was the mirena. I was diagnosed with depression about 4 months after it was inserted, the doctors never questioned my birth control and sent me for iron and thyroid tests. They didn't show anything so they sent me to a pshycologist. But now thinking about it it all makes sense. When I had the implanon taken out and questioning other options I was also told the same thing, that there's less chance of  the mirena having these effects because it's localised. However this has affected me even more so than the implanon. There's plenty of people that are absolutely fine with it, and obviously everyone reacts differently to things, but if you've had previous trouble with hormones then I'd definitely do alot of research, or even keep an eye on how you're feeling if you do get it inserted. I just wish I'd realised the first time round that it was the mirena causing the problems. But if you don't try it then I guess you'll never know if you're suited to it, so it's completely up to you. This is just my experience :)  [info] None [info] 1552438397
ILikeToPetDogs90 [info] "I have no reason so to be sad but i am" this is because of "I was diagnosed with depression" This, I have Major Depressive Disorder and in my experience I went from being suicidal when I was unhappy with life to being healthy when my life started turning around to being suicidal when my life was objectively great, it ruined my relationship with my Fiancee, ruined my health and ruined my career, there can be causes for MDD and other types of depression,Diet and health is a big one, since I have gotten back on top of my issues with Chronic pain I have been getting a bit, better, I had a great week, and I'm having a shit day, but trying to stay positive helps me, levels of minerals and shit can do it too, but don't shy away from the fact that you have depression "I want a quit my job and just spend all day in my room" that's depression, whichever type it is, you need to try to reflect on your problems, which honestly is the hardest when you're depressed, friends and a good support network who understand what you are going through and who you are honest with is the only thing I have found that helps me, it is very hard to maintain such a network without asking too much of people you rely on though as well, people only have so much emotional willpower themselves. anyway sorry for the rant, having a shit day like I said, but I hope this sheds a little bit of light on things? sorry if it doesn't, and if you need to talk man, feel free to hit me up :) I'll try to help with some of the things that have plagued me and some of the ways I try to cope if you like. Have a good one though man, hope you're feeling better soon, and if this is hitting you when you've been super unhealthy, that could well be the reason, talk to your doctor and see if there's anything they can check on that could help. [info] None [info] 1526284534
FestivePlague [info] He's been aware of my depression and how bad I can get. I confided in him and told him when I was at my darkest depths that I wanted to kill myself. I think he both feels incapable of helping me and thinks that I'm making a big deal out of nothing. Often when I am at my lowest point he tells me to "cheer up" and when I can't or I snap at him for being so insensitive, he makes me feel bad for feeling bad, so to speak. I think his inability to help me turned into an anger toward me, just as you were saying you experienced with your mother. I know the exact situation you had with your mother because I also had it with mine. She had struggled with deep depression her entire life and turned to alcohol when I was young. I watched her destroy herself and felt like her constant emotional breakdowns were testament to her being a bad mother and that her choice to be drunk 24/7 was out of selfishness. I didn't realize until many years later when I was diagnosed with depression what she was going through, but because I saw her try to drink herself to death and was minutes away from being successful, I vowed to never allow alcohol to rule my life. I don't even drink socially because I'm afraid I won't know how to stop. I often think about how my depression is hurting my husband and although I'm grateful that he's stayed with me through my toughest times, I have the strong feeling that he's not 100% honest with me on exactly how much it bothered him. I feel as though he's harboring some kind of resentment toward me that I may never be able to change. [info] None [info] 1406315912
crazybitchgirl [info] You clearly have not read up.And yes, I have read up. I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 12 and I am currently 23. As for your idiotic comment of "depression is a problem of the mind, so explore it with your mind" would you say the same to a diabetic? "Its a problem of the pancreas so explore it with your pancreas"? [info] None [info] 1544848328
goldenperfect [info] Is it dangerous? No. Taking any psychedelic is risky if you have a family history of schizophrenia or existing psychological issues. This is because they can bring out mental disorders earlier than they would've at a later point in time or make current ones more severe. Personally, I have been diagnosed with depression but it's been nothing but beneficial.There is the danger though that what you are purchasing is not in fact LSD, but really a research chemical or designer drug like 25i-nbome or 2ci. These drugs are often falsely sold as LSD either on accident or because they are cheaper and easier to find. If your tab tastes chemically it's a research chemical, which means taking five hits to trip harder could possibly be fatal. This is why you only buy from trusted and tested sources. Can you die from LSD? Well, ONE person actually did overdose and die from LSD by injection MILLIONS of doses at once. Otherwise you can eat just about as much as you want without fear of OD'ing. In conclusion, take LSD.  [info] None [info] 1359337813
sadthough [info] The feeling of nostalgia actually really hurts sometime I've been diagnosed with depression for a few years now, but one thing that gets me the most is this really painful pang of nostalgia. I could just be sitting and minding my own business, but suddenly it hurts so much - like I'm longing for something. A lot of the times, I don't even know why, but I suddenly feel like I need to go back to my childhood, and that I want to leave reality. The pain actually feels physical, and I clutch my chest to stop it from hurting. Sometimes I think about the things I miss, and I remember this scent I used to love in my bed sheets. However, this scent was lost over a decade ago, and I can only just remember how it "should've" smelled like. It was a mixture of detergent, my mom's scent, and just the scent of my house.    Sigh. [info] None [info] 1518548913
Gweat_and_Tewwible [info] How to read when you have depression? Hello people!  I am happy this sub exists and we can talk about books, now to the question.I am diagnosed with depression and I struggle to read ever since I\`ve had it. I am too tired or the reading doesn\`t give me joy and it doesn\`t make me interested at whatever I am reading, I am flat lined emotionally. Should I just keep reading or should I leave it for when I get better? [info] None [info] 1543326611
IlixAquifolium [info] Is anyone here managing to be successfully employed or self employed with CPTSD? I'm looking for some hope that I can achieve this too. For as long as I can remember I have struggled with feeling like 'a loser' or 'a failure.' I think this came from childhood when my mum was always saying that I was 'too timid' and needed to be like this other girl who lived down the street who was loud and tomboyish. It felt confirmed in primary school where I was bullied for being 'weird and posh' and day dreamed a lot spending the lessons either tuned out and looking out the window or drawing. I would get distracted by things like the chocolate bar pictures in the maths books, focusing on how 3d and chunky they looked and how I wanted to draw them (and eat them!) rather than work out some maths equation relating to them!I went to a school in a new area for secondary and felt absolutely DETERMINED to turn my lot around so aged 10 I started pretending to be an extrovert and made friends with a lot of cool rich kids, mainly because I knew it was my best bet against bullying. I also learnt study skills from these children and felt happy to be included but also struggled because there was always a very bossy girl in charge of each group who would put me down, mock me, use eye rolling etc. This was much more tolerable than outright physical bullying from boys so I just tolerated/accepted it. I started to do well in school and got good grades, then went to university and also got a good grade and felt on top of the world remembering the promises of all the adults that good grades = good job = happy life. Things fell apart as soon as I graduated and was in my first job which a menial minimum wage admin job that had nothing to do with my degree, which made me want to kill myself. I was diagnosed with depression and since then (now mid 30s) I've been in and out of therapy with a new diagnosis every few years.I tried another career later in my twenties partly to avoid the dreaded admin but to my absolute horror I started failing at it - I just couldn't keep up with the workload, the demands, all the people. I was working 80 hour weeks on little sleep and my brain felt like it broke. Since then I've never felt quite the same. I have held down one job for about 8 months but it felt like hell and I started having panic attacks and was once again signed off. I hated it so much it made me feel both filled with rage and also suicidal at the thought of having to keep working in a job like that my whole life (admin/reception).I've been on disability since then as everyone seems to agree that I 'have mental health problems.' I'm so grateful for the disability money but I would love to be able to be independent again. I tried a couple of self employed ventures but struggled to make any money from them, which has just added to that 'loserish' feeling. I want so badly to be a self employed creative but my CPTSD symptoms are so bad at the moment I can't even remember things I have just done 1 second before (ie. when I'm in the shower, I can't remember if I have just washed my hair etc, so end up washing myself 3 times because I keep tuning out and forgetting). I also dissociate quite a lot, cry most days, pretty much always feel really spaced out and I get sensory overload leading to panic attacks if I'm around a lot of people or have to talk to people too much. I need peace and quiet to feel calm and balance.I don't want to just waste away, I want to make something of my life. I'm not sure what I'm asking, maybe my question is How do I get back into work/self employment and make it work for me with my symptoms and be successful? Does anyone else struggle with CPTSD and also manage to be employed or self employed with some semblance of success? I've started therapy for my traumas and finding it really helpful but don't want to wait another few years to start working again, I want to get working again ideally in the next few months.Thank you for listening and for any helpful tips, advice or inspiration. [info] OCD/CPTSD [info] 1548374128
pepecardonaa [info] Hi! I’m living a really similar experience with my exgirflfriend, (I’m even also from México), I know what you are feeling and my best advice it’s that you look for help, what you are feeling isn’t normal and seeing a therapist and the right meds can really help, you are not alone. I have been diagnosed with depression but that diagnosis helped me to because I realized “hey, there’s nothing wrong with me, there’s only something wrong with me and I can do something about it” [info] None [info] 1512920572
Joseph_Santos1 [info] A therapist might not be too much money out of pocket. They're $40 a session where I live in California.You may get more support from /r/depression. I'm diagnosed with depression and your story reminds me of my own position a few years ago. [info] None [info] 1433104640
wertyou2 [info] I'll certainly admit that there are dickholes out there who will fake being depressed so they feel special, but I hope you'll believe me when I say I have been diagnosed with depression. I honestly don't believe that the internet or a doctor is gonna do jackshit to cure anything, but sometimes its nice to rant about stuff late at night and at least have an anonymous someone who isn't gonna tell me "it get's better" respond. (this is really only for [/depression](http://reddit.com/r/depression), I don't know how well that'd go down in other subreddits) [info] None [info] 1408292260
smfmili [info] I genuinely feel so depressed because I don't have my car right now The clutch went in my car last week and I'm supposed to get it back today so I had the whole day planned out and now I'll have to wait until tomorrow to get it back because something came up. I feel so horrible and out of it because I don't have my car. I do love it and it's really what keeps me going in life. I've never been so down in my life (I am diagnosed with depression but I've never felt so bad). Is it normal to feel this way? What can I do about this? [info] None [info] 1558951249
Austifox [info] I'm not sure where to go. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 23, and have been on medication since 26 (28 now). at the same time I was put on medication I was also diagnosed with schizoaffective disorder. which is basically a less sever form of schizophrenia. but still pretty terrible. I hear voices all the time that tell me to kill or hurt myself, which just feeds into my depression.about two months ago my pharmacy ran out of my antipsychotic and I went a month without medication. during this time I cut up my arms pretty bad, went to a mental hospital for treatment, failed my semester at college, and lost my job.I've run out of money and relay on my parents to fund my living, but they can only help so much. I applied for disability with social security, but they said it could take 3 to 6 months to get the application processed and that doesnt mean I'll be accepted. I've tried applying for jobs, but no one will hire a schizoeffective person with a history of not performing at previous jobs. I called my dad today to let him know where I was financially and what I needed to get by. he said he would do what he could and get me the money, but I could hear the strain in his voice that I. a burden to them that they cant exactly afford at the moment.on top of that, my pharmacy ran out of antidepressants so I've been a week without those meds and my depression is really starting to hit hard. I've been feeling like the only escape is to harm myself, possible to the point of death, in order to get by and finally escape this hell of being a burden to those around me.I keep telling myself that eventually things will turn around and I'll get better. but I'm 28, jobless, still in college, and cant seem to find a break. I feel like I'm drowning in the sea with no land in sight and my strength is starting to give out. the endless abyss of the ocean is starting to look inviting and that scares me. I'm not sure where to go or what to do. [info] None [info] 1563260682
Warning_grumpy [info] We did ours in grade 8 and received them in grade 10, I also threw mine out. Mine was just my best friend is Kaila and how much I hated life. It was during the time I was diagnosed with depression but wasn't on medication and just as I started using drugs and alcohol to mask my feelings. I fucking hated reading the letter because is was the kind of shit you'd leave in a suicide note, and two years later it had only gotten worse.  [info] None [info] 1546148618
thewolfgamer11 [info] I'm an EXTREMLY empathetic person. AMA I was diagnosed with depression which evolved to PMDD (hormonal depression). My depression can be pin pointed to comparing my achievements with people I know and me feeling extremely guilty over not doing anything about some of the world's problems. An example of this would be when I read about the conditions of people in North Korea, I feel guilty and obsess over it to the point where I blame myself because I know about the conditions but can't do anything about it. This obsession turns to sever depression which just makes me want to end my life because I have the general information about the conditions but haven't done anything in life to do something about it. I am sure a lot of people have this problem as well. [info] None [info] 1578904332
fuckbitchesgetmoney1 [info] I agree, So I decided to look into immigrating to Canada, but I am diagnosed with depression and it looks like I would be denied for being a burden on the health care system.  [info] None [info] 1541723272
GLJ98 [info] I have recently been diagnosed with depression. No regrets. I was diagnosed with depression last month. I have moments of clarity where I feel like myself (whatever the fuck that means), but for the most part I feel legit weary. The mind set of being susceptible to tears comes and go in waves, but I can usually control it. Not the other day...I recently made a $10,000 downpayment on a purchase that would better my life. An investment in my professional future. I owed $22,000 today. I spoke with my financial advisor last week about liquidating an account for the funds, and he told me he'd do that for me. Funds available in 3 business days.I found out 2 days before my purchase date that my financial advisor neglected to do his job. It was Thursday, and I would get the money 5 days too late. I freaked out. I was angry, frustrated, and worried. What would become of my $10,000 down payment? What would become of my future? What the fuck am I doing with my life?! 22,000 fucking dollars, and $10,000 down the drain. Fuck fuck fuck fuck fuck.I called the customer service line and tried speaking calmly to three different people, but every time I was speaking through tears. I was having an emotional break down and couldn't stop it, and couldn't reason with myself before talking to complete strangers. I felt unprofessional, weak, and foolish. But those mother fuckers felt fucking bad for me and I got all the numbers I needed to file a complaint. Managers, managers of managers, supervisors. The people I spoke to about my financial advisor's mistake felt such compassion for me, they cared because they could recognize the genuine pain in my voice. I got to speak to my financial advisor's boss, who gave me his personal cell phone number and told me he'd do what he could. He apologized for my advisor, and I told him thank you. Thank you for the apology, but it does no good.The manager called today, and told me he got that money into my account. I paid the $22,000 today. I have fucking depression and have no regrets. My life feels fucking shitty, and what my financial advisor did was fucking shitty, but the people who helped me yesterday felt compassion. I felt connected to people in a way that gives me faith in humanity, even though I don't have much faith in people. [info] None [info] 1419140874
BigNoseDay [info] Same. I've always thought that everyone experiences the same degree of burn/pain/sinking feeling, then I'm diagnosed with depression. I I get so much less painful/achy after taking medication. [info] None [info] 1502009175
MadameFizzgig [info] Holy shit… I was diagnosed with depression about 4 years ago, but I've been sitting in the shower ever since I've been taking showers. [info] None [info] 1428968269
lillyheart [info] About 2 years before I started drinking, I was diagnosed with depression. And for most of my drinking and sobriety stays, I've been on antidepressants. This last dive into drinking lost me privileges to medicine because it did not mix well with alcohol, and like any good alcoholic, I much preferred to stop taking the antidepressants than to stop drinking. And getting sober and working the program, things got better. without antidepressants. To a point. It wasn't that I was super into "I have to be happy and that's the point." it's okay not to be happy sometimes, I never needed a reminder about that. But over a year in, I was still emotionally fucking raw, and I was doing EVERYTHING people had told me to do. And finally I came to that place in the big book that tells us "seek outside help." The 12 steps were designed to treat addiction, not depression. I went to a my old doctor and shared the story. Yep. Still have that depressed affect. So I started my old regime, now that I'm sober (note: it did take far more than a dozen tries to get me something that worked. My first attempt at antidepressants as a 12 year old led me to attempt suicide- thanks SSRI's!) When it started kicking in, I was just... amazed.First off, all that hard work I had been doing, had been paying off below the surface. I used to hate taking medication because it made everything I did wrong that much clearer in my head. I'd rather be fuzzy and fucked up and not know what's real because reality was not my friend. Now reality and I are friends, and being able to see clearly has been a breath of fresh air. Some statistics from the AA 2011 Survey:Before coming to AA, 63% of members received some type of treatment or counseling, such as medical, psychological, or spiritual. After coming to AA, 62% received outside treatment or counseling. Of those members, 82% said that outside help played an important part in their recovery. So if you're working the program as well as you can and this... depression or anhedonia is still around for you, seek outside help! You may be doing everything right and have another condition. You're not doing anything wrong in your recovery by adding to it what will work for you.  [info] None [info] 1368118138
HYisAwk [info] Hearing these successful medication stories makes me regret my past decisions. I was diagnosed with depression in my final year of undergrad, did cbt for a year, didn't work, and was eventually prescribed Escitalopram. Being scared of the potential side effects (and thinking perhaps my symptoms were more just me being a shitty human being than depression), I just never took it.Went through my masters with the symptoms, now started a PhD where the symptoms are amplified beyond what I've ever experienced, and I am likely dropping out in April once my classes are over. I do wonder how my life would be if I had stuck with the Escitalopram prescription... [info] PhD Neurophysiology [info] 1490797476
applebreadsticks [info] My life fell apart and I'm so heartbroken my body is breaking down Hi reddit. I'm (17F) struggling a lot to type this out, and have been since it happened even though I know I'll feel better after sharing it. I'm going to do a very very short version of The Downfall, and then maybe come back to elaborate when I feel like I can. Right now I truly just need to get this off my chest.I've been wanting to post on here for a while, but I've been struggling to communicate my feelings and haven't been able &amp;#x200B;I was diagnosed with depression a few weeks ago, before everything fell apart. Ergo I'm feeling pretty low already. Friday night I found out my grandmother and father both have cancer. My grandmother is close to dying and my father hasn't gotten the 'final results' yet, so his fate is currently unknown. I'm not very close with either of them, but it still hit me very hard as I don't have a lot of family left. I didn't tell anyone about it really, including my boyfriend, who cluelessly broke up with me about three hours later. I've been in relationships before, but never one as serious as this one, and he meant (means) the world to me. He simply just fell out of love. He was my biggest supporter and I've never confided in and trusted another person as I have him, so losing him also meant losing my best friend. I feel incredibly alone, and I don't recall when I last felt a pain like this. Since friday night I can count on one hand what I've eaten, I've been drinking a lot of alcohol to numb it all a bit, and now my body seems to be trying to tell me a thing or two. I woke up last night covered in my own blood experiencing the worst breakthrough bleeding in my life (i'm also on the pill, so this should not happen), am still bleeding heavily, which is scary. My hair is falling out in chunks, my skin is breaking out, I have excoriations around my eyes from crying, I cannot sleep, and my depression seems to have doubled in severity. Oh, and I also had a terrible pregnancy scare from two inconclusive tests this Monday. I can't believe my life was fine literally a week ago. I feel so lost and alone and see no hope for the future at all.&amp;#x200B;**Tl;dr: Was diagnosed with depression a few weeks ago. My boyfriend/best friend/biggest support broke up with me on the same night I found out my grandmother and father have cancer. Since then I have been unable to eat, drink, or sleep properly, and now I'm experiencing heavy breakthrough bleeding, acne, hairloss, and even worse depression. Also had a pregnancy scare, and now I am losing hope.** [info] None [info] 1550761683
CanineCounselor [info] Pregnant with No Motivation Backstory: I’m sure this is a reoccurring theme for everybody here, but I guess I’m tired of talking to my husband about it and getting the same responses. (Always super empathetic and understanding, but on a deeper level he just can’t understand)I’ve struggled on and off with depression since 2008, but fortunately I’ve made it through the worst of it (haven’t felt suicidal in years). I take Prozac daily, I was in therapy for many years, and I’m now studying to become a clinical counselor (finishing my Master’s of Clinical Counseling next year) to help others struggling with mental dysfunction. This past Spring I got married, moved to a new state, and started a new job. I thought all of those things together may trigger something, but I actually handled the whole process /stress quite well. However, now that I’ve gotten everything settled, I’ve slowly been falling back into a depressed state. I’m constantly fatigued and I sleep, watch Netflix, or mess around on my phone in my free time. Outside of my coworkers and local in-laws, I really don’t have any friends, and I have little to no desire to make friends when the opportunity arises. Things I HAVE to do, I’ll eventually get done, but I spend almost all of my time wondering what it would be like to do something else (hoping eventually I’ll find something that truly helps me feel happy). Since I was diagnosed with depression, I’ve gone a million different routes with my life, trying out different majors in school, working all kinds of jobs, starting my own projects (dog training business) etc. but nothing ever really fulfills me or feels ‘right’... so I end up on the couch watching Netflix documentaries and wondering how people find their fulfillment / happiness in life. Today: Anywho... My husband and I recently found out I’m pregnant, and although I am SUPER excited about it, I also look at my lifestyle and feel terrified about what it’s going to look like with a baby. TLDR:I’m depressed, pregnant, and have no clue why I’m posting this on here other than I’m maybe hoping for some support or stories about similar situations. [info] None [info] 1567034794
ProfessorEIm [info] I've been diagnosed with depression before, and I definitely know what it's like. It's back, hahahaha. Not exactly mild right now, either. I like the idea of volunteering, but with college and needing money, it doesn't seem like a great choice. I don't know. It's worth a shot.I'm hoping to join Americorps next year, which would likely hook me up with some like-minded folks. And I love the outdoors (I want to do environmental work). [info] None [info] 1431536011
veronicabitchlasagna [info] I was diagnosed with depression after my demeanor changed drastically and stayed that way. I would burst out into tears for no reason and be emotionally detached from everyone. I stopped eating and would have a hard time falling asleep. [info] None [info] 1555297194
FromChernobyl [info] I was diagnosed with depression as a high schooler and then bpd later on so i’m on a couple meds now. They have helped but never for very long. So I’m rlly antsy to try adhd meds especially because i go back to college this fall and I really dont want to drop out again. But I’m hopeful 💝 [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1560820046
juststabmealready [info] He's not depressed. He's literally just lazy. We had him see a therapist after I was diagnosed with depression because my parents were worried about him too. He is extremely dyslexic however which explains why he struggles in school a lot more than most. That we can understand but we don't like that he doesn't bother to study at all. He doesn't let us pay for his tutoring because he genuinely thinks he can get by on his own when that has never been the case. The only reason he graduated from high school is because my friends and I had to help him cheat through every final he's taken. [info] 18 [info] 1562825384
legionjudge9 [info] Age: 19I have started university.I have been diagnosed with depression again. [info] None [info] 1573414143
ral365 [info] I was diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1559449472
PickleballTrophies [info] How do you deal with social exclusion? To preface this: I stopped drinking in 2012 when I was 18. I'm 22 now, and am happy with my decision to live a life of complete sobriety when there is so much alcoholism and prescription drug abuse in my family. That being said, I can't help but wonder how different my life would be if I'd chosen to live by today's social norms. I have never, felt that I'm treated equally when it comes to social interactions, or specifically, being invited out/to parties.Now, I don't have a problem with others drinking. At all. I stopped drinking because I lacked any control over myself/my consumption, but I don't expect others to abide by my own lifestyle. I would love to at least be invited out to bars to feel like others don't look at me like I'm some kind of circus freak, but that has never happened.I'm sure people do it because they are just trying to be courteous to my life choices, but it's led me to this mentality that others will always, always have more fun and enjoy themselves when im not around. I've had to delete all of my social media because seeing others constantly enjoying themselves while I'm at home alone has absolutely destroyed me. I was diagnosed with depression 5 years, and have been on antidepressents for the past 3 months, but this incessant feeling that I'm a boring, depressed outkast seen by others as an eternal afterthought rather than someone they look forward to seeing never seems to leave.Thank you, Reddit, for being the one place I feel comfortable and free to discuss the thoughts I get caught up in and live inside of everyday. [info] None [info] 1475985176
poboor [info] How to learn to be alone and still feel okay? I'm diagnosed with depression, neurosis and borderline. For the past year I've been in two serious relationships, that ended really badly and I also fucked up a 3 year old friendship with a guy that is really dear to me, because there was a moment where I felt alone and used him just because I wanted the loneliness over. I feel like every relationship that I have lately is not because I really find the person great and attractive, but I get into it to feel the warmth and attention. One minute I feel like I'm in love, I feel happy. Next I find the other person annoying, repulsive I want them out of my life.I know I must take some time to take care of my head, to be more stable and control myself. I don't want to use people, I want to finally really feel, I'm so tired of that swing of moods and emotions. I take meds, I see a therapist. I feel like it's getting better on many levels, but not on this one.What can I do to feel okay just with myself? What it takes to stop being afraid? [info] None [info] 1548965056
gazibbegins [info] “I have to go guys, but before I do I want to get slightly serious for just a second. When I was twelve or thirteen, I was diagnosed with– and a lot of other people have been too, but yes, I was diagnosed with depression. *applause* …It’s not an achievement. But yes, I was diagnosed with mild depression, and you know I’ve been very fortunate and successful but it’s always there, it kinda ebbs and flows, and people are very concerned and they try to help but it’s not really an easy thing. But then I realized the other day… after all this time… I had a rock in my shoe! Check your shoes everybody!” - David Cross [info] None [info] 1504541138
PhotonicPizza [info] No. I am a nihilist, yet I don't feel depressed. I am diagnosed with depression, but I take medication for it, and I don't feel the symptoms anymore. Nihilism doesn't make me feel better, nor does it make me feel worse, it just makes sense to me, which is closely linked to me being an atheist.(slight tangent alert) I don't like the idea of nihilism being represented by depressed edgy teens that are just like "oh man life is worthless darkness void and black :&lt;". It really grinds my gears. [info] None [info] 1476633409
sigmatic_minor [info] I'm sorry but your logic there is very broken. &gt; Was on the adderall for about 6 years. I moved and switched Primary Physicians he really looked into my health history and got me off of it. It was amazing how better i felt after i was weened off this stuff. That's like saying "I was diagnosed with depression and tried an antidepressant. I felt way better after I stopped taking it, therefore depression doesn't exist"Sounds like you were just misdiagnosed or the medication you tried wasn't the right choice for you. ADHD has been researched in countless independant peer-reviewed studies and it most definitely exists. It is also proven to be 75% genetic and you can be tested for the specific genes as well as do some reading on what particular neurotransmitters are affected and how.&gt; Even Leon on his death bed said it was fictitious.You may want to fact check this yourself. This isn't correct. See below (many sources for the full interview with proper context all over the internet):&gt; The claim that Dr. Eisenberg asserted “ADHD is a fictitious disease” is reproduced on countless web sites as something he said “seven months before his death in his last interview,” which would place the date of his utterance around February 2009. When documentation for the putative quote is provided, it references an article (often described as a “cover story”) published in the German weekly Der Spiegel on 2 February 2012.&gt; We found that the German-language version of Der Spiegel ran an article in 2012 that skeptically examined the large increase in diagnoses of mental disorders in recent years and quoted Dr. Eisenberg on that subject. A software-based translation of that article from German to English does describe Dr. Eisenberg as the “father of ADHD” and report that during his “last interview” he said something similar to “ADHD is a prime example of a fictitious disease.” However, when one allows for the vagaries of translation from German to English and reads the statement in context, it’s clear that Dr. Eisenberg wasn’t asserting that ADHD isn’t a real disorder, but rather that he thought the influence of genetic predispositions for ADHD (rather than social/environmental risk factors) were vastly overestimatedPlease do some more independant research (google scholar is fantastic) and be more open about the process of critical thinking. [info] uᴉɯpɐsʎS ǝᴉssn∀ [info] 1526973643
Batstronaut [info] I've been doing what I can to get more experience with various hobbies. I've been cycling. A lot. 36 miles is a quick run and 75 miles is a fun outing. I've been learning guitar for the past two years, self-taught. I learned how to build a computer and play video games every now and then. I've finished High School with my diploma but I still feel this way a lot. I was diagnosed with depression at 16, and have been in and out of an existential crisis that's too hard to explain through writing since 8th grade. [info] None [info] 1563504242
TheRealDirtyB [info] To clarify, I was diagnosed with depression last year by a mental health professional. [info] None [info] 1551534805
xavyera_grace [info] Did you just read my mind? This is absolutely me right now. I have just started my second term as a first year and I am lonely as fuck. I mean, I've got 'friends' but I feel no connection whatsoever. It  hurts when I see everyone chatting away with their friends and generally enjoying the uni experience, while I'm here hating every moment of it. I don't have anyone to share a house with next year as well (will be living in student accomodation), and it just makes me feel so unwanted, especially when others I know are all able to find housemates. I literally have no idea if I can even get through these three years and have seriously considered taking a year off. I just don't know anymore. Sorry I can't really help with your situation but I just wanted to let you know that there's another human being struggling with this as well. Hopefully it'll make the stuff you're going through just a tad bit more bearable (though still shit nonetheless). You certainly helped me feel less alone in typing out your experiences. It sucks. I'm sorry. I'm sorry that things turned out this way for you, I'm sorry that you are feeling the pain I'm feeling, but most of all, I'm sorry that life can be such an asshole sometime. I've been diagnosed with depression if that helps. [info] None [info] 1546973198
Signupbrah [info] I have been diagnosed with depression. And I went through the same thing as you are now. I felt that medication would just be fake, and not real happiness. I felt horrible on the inside, like nothing would get better, and there is no hope left. (I attempted suicide multiple times but never succeeded) I found that going and telling a loved one, or a good friend about all of your problems can help. I told them what I was feeling and it made me feel "real" happy. Genuine happiness is definitely than fake happiness but if you feel your not ready to tell someone who cares about you. Then you should take the medication even if you don't want to, because it will work. You will feel a difference and be happier, even if its not real happiness. But it is better then death.   [info] None [info] 1363821014
pepperno [info] i am diagnosed with depression and i am on 3 anti depressants. there are many reasons i am depressed. yes i know i’m fuckin jealous but it’s not the main cause of my depression. i just got back from being admitted to the hospital because i attempted suicide. i’ve been feeling pretty good as of late but i just went downhill suddenly.  [info] None [info] 1529088568
crafty_bunny [info] I've been diagnosed with depression at least three times in the last 8 years or so. The pills don't really work for me so I took up cycling instead for the endorphins and have been leading a fairly happy existence since then [info] None [info] 1290085542
confusedsmol [info] Happy New Years! Do you have a New Years resolution? Hello everyone, it’s officially 2019. Do you guys have any New Years resolutions? I have a few, it’s not something outrageous so it’s something still within reach. 2019 has just begun and I believe it’s time to be a new me. I want to change and change for the better.This year my resolution is to be more positive. In 2016 I was diagnosed with depression and things have just been really hard. I know I can’t just flip a switch or drink a potion for it to stop, however what I can do is challenge my mindset and ways of thinking. 2019 is my year to take back my life, gain confidence, and really just strengthen myself both mentally and physically.Regardless of whether you have a New Years resolution or not I wish you all the best. Be you, be true, be happy. Also don’t forget to be fabulous ☆〜（ゝ。∂） [info] None [info] 1546403970
FuzzyLittleBunnies [info] I was diagnosed with depression and put on prosaic about 10 years ago. Fast forward to now. My depression is the worst it's ever been. I'm just waiting to get my shotgun back from a friend so I can end it. I don't think it's clinical. But I'm fucking depressed. [info] None [info] 1572855287
Eunomiac [info] I think one of the things you should definitely do is read up on the symptoms of depression, and/or take a quick online screening test [like this one](http://psychcentral.com/quizzes/depquiz.htm).  Then discuss it with your doctor (you don't need to go to a psychiatrist/psychologist---GP's are much better equipped to diagnose and treat depression than most people give them credit).I say this because a lot of what you describe sounds to me like symptoms of clinical depression: feelings of being overwhelmed; inability to self-motivate combined with feelings of guilt; loss of interest in things you used to enjoy; overly negative self-perception and self-talk, and---*especially*---the way that you distinguish yourself today from who you "used to" be.  That last part suggests to me you're not grappling with some deeply-rooted character flaw, but rather that you've experienced a negative *change* in your mental state---one that may have been triggered by something (like stress or burnout), or simply by a quirk of brain chemistry.  Regardless, depression is a nasty beast, and you really want to rule it out:  Untreated, it's very good at making itself worse---lack of energy/motivation leads to more social isolation and negative self-talk, which worsens the depression, which makes you even *less* energetic/motivated... and so the spiral goes.  Obvious disclaimer:  I'm not a doctor, and this isn't medical advice.  I have been diagnosed with depression and am responding well to treatment, though, so I do have "life experience" as they say.  Importantly, depression in men doesn't necessarily mean feeling sad or having suicidal thoughts: rather, it frequently presents as a decline in energy, motivation and sense of self-worth of the kind you describe.**EDIT:** I just wanted to add:  A lot of the advice in this thread is really, really good---particularly meditation, which science is increasingly revealing the benefits of.*However,* we live in a society that stigmatizes mental health issues, such as depression.  It's very easy for well-meaning and insightful people to suggest things that may, and probably will, help.  But let's pretend instead that you have a broken finger.  It's painful as hell, but it's not as if it's rendered you nonfunctional:  You can still drag yourself to work, feed and clothe yourself, etc.  People might suggest you compensate by using your other hand, or dull the pain with Tylenol, or tell you to take care that no one bumps it while you're waiting for it to hopefully heal on its own.  It's all helpful advice.Or... you could go to a medical expert, get x-rays, and get the bone properly set.  Not only will it heal faster and cleaner, but it won't hurt as much in the meantime.In my opinion, we should look at depression (and other mental health issues) in the same way.  We don't, but we should.   [info] None [info] 1459759779
johannamaeja [info] Family have no idea I have been diagnosed with depression. I live in a different state than they do, so i don't think it benefits them. Only a handful of friends do know. I'm afraid to tell everyone, because then I'll drive even more people away. But I could mention that. But won't that seem too needy? [info] None [info] 1440997225
chancegiven [info] I was diagnosed with depression in the 7th grade but I had the symptoms of it for years. I had suicidal thoughts in the 4th grade. I hate being depressed, and I hate seeing people who do it just because its quirky and they want attention and they can do whatever they want and you can't say anything because they're 'depressed'. [info] None [info] 1568602734
gcedwardo17 [info] Living in the NOW sucks I'm lonely and I'm not. I have an great family but I can only confide in my mum and sometimes I feel as she's the only one who truly loves me. It's selfish but it doesn't feel like enough to only have your mum. I have friends yeah, but they never invite me out or anything. Even before I was diagnosed with depression I always had to ask first and no one would ask me, it was always me. And even now with depression everyone continues to not ask to hang out with me. I've given up trying. The depression is making everything 100x worse. Weirdly enough, some days I'm so happy to be alone and free to be me, but at the same time I can't help but cry over the fact that I'm the only one who's got me (besides mum). It's been 5 months since my bf and I broke up and fuck me I still miss him and love him I hate to admit it. Sometimes I wish he would take me back, other days I say no way cos of some of the stuff that happened but I don't know. At this point I want him to be my friend again. I miss my best friend. He was my only real friend for over a year, I've never really been great with keeping long term close friends. And now we hardly talk and it breaks my heart. What's worse is that after we broke up, my depression peaked (I can't tell him I have depression either) and now I'm so miserable on my own with everyone aware I have depression but never ever trying to hang with me even tho I try so hard to act fine in front of everyone. And the worse part? I can't do anything about it for the rest of the year because I'm stuck with these people until Uni hits next year and then I'm free of these fuckers. I just want a fresh start where I can meet likeminded people who I can actually be proper friends with. But for now...I'm stuck in a constant loop and I can't get out. [info] None [info] 1555853616
weeabootits [info] Hey OP, this sounds like me. I'm a 18 year old female, in my first year of college. As a kid I was accelerated a lot and always did very well until around 8th grade, when I was diagnosed with depression and ADD. I would just not hand in assignments throughout high school, even though I knew the consequences. I kind of felt like I was already failing and there was nothing I could do about it anyways, so I didn't try. I just wanted to sleep and play video games all the time. It's very hard for me to explain - and sometimes I don't even understand it - but it was just a mental block due to my depression I think.  [info] None [info] 1422045627
CIthrowAway [info] I think my job is making me more depressed Hi guys, I've never posted here before so if I go off course let me know. So I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 18. I'm 27 now. It waxes and wanes a little bit. Right out of college it was the least symptomatic. I believe this is because right out of college I found a job in my field and then married my college girlfriend. Flash forward a year and I get laid off. The company goes belly up a very short time after. I was unemployed for a year. During this time, my depression started creeping back in, but I think this was because of the financial stress my wife and I were under. We worked through it as a team though and by some huge stroke of luck I found a job just a week before my unemployment was due to run out. This job is with an absolute giant in my field. They pay a lot more than anyone else I could reasonably get a job with would. I've been here a year now. However, there are a few problems. First it's a "contract" position that is completely open ended. Everyone starts as a contractor, sometimes for years, but it really sucks that when I get sick, I don't get paid. And, every 3 months they "review" my contract and that puts stress on me knowing at any time they could just axe me. The main thing though is the schedule. It is Tuesday through Saturday 3 PM to 1130 PM. This makes it very hard to see anyone, including my wife. My wife has to get up  very early for work (around 5) and she's gone when I wake up and asleep when I come home. Sunday is the only day to see each other. Also, I don't get to see my friends too often or my family.I think the lonliness is what is making me the most depressed right now. I just hang around with my cat all day waiting to go to work. Anyone have experience with this? [info] None [info] 1412187964
positiivikko [info] If my other comment didn't make it clear already, I definitely believe therapy is the right way to go for most of us. However, finding the right therapist *for you* can be very difficult. But don't give up even if it doesn't happen right away. Knowing that dissociation is what you need help for already helps; I was diagnosed with depression for most of my life and never got the right kind of help because none of my previous therapists realized what was really going on, and neither did I. It's been a life changer when I finally accepted my dissociation and was able to start seeking the "right" kind of help for it (obviously "right" is subjective).The other thing that I'm learning personally is that your friends don't really need to have had the same experiences to be able to offer support. If they're good friends, they'll try to understand what you are going through, and even if they can't, they'll still support you. However, it is also important to find people who have had similar experiences, and I suppose you just have found a bunch of us. If I may ask, what makes you most concerned and scared? Is it just the realization of how extensive your dissociation is, and the realization that you have not realized it before? (Well that's an awkward sentence... I blame morning brain). Personally it was incredibly devastating for me to realize I have dissociated most my life "away" (I'm sure it's still somewhere there), that I've lived most my life in a bubble that isn't very tightly connected to this reality. Still is. [info] None [info] 1536131541
tanoren [info] Why is everyone so afraid of suicide and death? Hello. I've had depression and suicidal ideation for years now. I was diagnosed with depression at a young age and have had suicidal thoughts daily since I was around 9 or 10. Depression seems to just be something I will always live with; I don't remember a time it wasn't there. I would have gone through with my death years ago but those I love is what keeps stopping me along with the future. Up until this year, anyway. I met my goal of getting to college. I always meet my goals, even if it kills me; I lost over 50% of my hair my senior year of HS due to stress because I wanted to get an honors diploma last minute along with some very hard classes and taking care of my grandmother.Now the future is uncertain and I don't entirely want to be here to bear witness to it.To me, life only has purpose if you give it purpose; what that purpose is is at one's discretion. I don't see it.Suicide has always been a comfort to me. Why does everyone fear death? I don't see many asking that. The default response is always, "don't do that, it's bad!"... but why? There's many on this earth and I would only be missed for so long by the majority of people who know about me if at all. In the grand scheme of things, I don't really matter. And to me that's freeing. I just want to go. I'm tired of the fight. I feel like I'm only living for others even as I'm getting a near-full ride to uni for my own sake. [info] None [info] 1511672285
viva-c [info] Good job!! I can totally relate. I was diagnosed with depression about 5 years ago and only started medication about 6 weeks ago. I was so scared of the side effects, which is why I put it off, but I am now on medicine that doesn't have any bad side effects and feeling a lot better! You got this! [info] my cat is bae [info] 1450195069
FuntCase89 [info] I am. I was diagnosed with depression around 3 months ago. Probably ought to have mentioned that as it's likely related - I think if I find some sense of purpose in my life it might help me to lift myself out of it :) [info] INTJ [info] 1410181989
liliannereid [info] Any way to help people and not feel like you're dying inside? Hi! I'm an infp and I'm diagnosed with depression (and adhd). I love helping people and I feel like it's my life's purpose to do what I can do make the lives of others better... but the thing is that even though this is what I feel gives my life meaning, I really can't handle it. It always gets to a point where I'm completely drained and I end up spending weeks in bed, not being able to "give" anything, avoiding all contact with others. Is there any way that his can just *not* be like this? I'm asking here because I'm hoping somebody here recognises this and can give me some tips. Thank you for reading. [info] None [info] 1459203703
Zediac [info] Thanks, but I'll pass. I've been a psychiatrist and a therapist. I've been diagnosed with depression but so far nothing has helped. And there's so little options for mental health care in my area that even if I wanted to try again no one is taking new patients.Suicide isn't an option for me. My sense of self preservation is too high for that. I know myself. Maybe a little too well. But I know that this will never be an option for me.I've done a lot of talking over the years. I'm just tired of it all. I don't have the energy to talk anymore.Thank you. I mean it. But I'm not going to take you up on that offer. [info] None [info] 1473893555
dogsandcupcakes [info] I will try the shake! It makes me feel better to hear that someone else has a similar schedule and situation as me. I have been diagnosed with depression and have mostly accepted the "fake it until you make it" approach. My mom passed away and she was very understanding of mental illness; but my dad is absolutely not understanding at all and doesn't even believe in it. He is the one who pushes the fake it approach onto me so heavily...I will get blood work done at my next doctor appointment to double check everything again.I am kind of lonely. I am around people all day but I do not have any significant, in person, connection. I am rather introverted and do not appreciate small talk, so I crave a deeper connection with one or two people. However, I call myself a "socially skilled" introvert because I can easily adapt to any social situation but I definitely do not usually enjoy it lol.  [info] None [info] 1509030948
FeldupEther [info] I have been diagnosed with depression recently. Seriously reconsidering everything in my life right now [info] None [info] 1516559441
blackrose2592 [info] I had planned my suicide and written out suicide notes specifically for certain people. A friend of mine made an appointment for me at the school psychologist and I figured why not go? I assumed she would laugh, tell me I was a complainer and send me home or something. Nope lol she called campus police. I was handcuffed, taken to a hospital ER for...I have no idea. And then I was taken to a mental health facility where I was diagnosed with depression and borderline personality disorder. I cannot possibly tell you how much I hated it. I was pretty much scared of everyone for the first week, especially my roommate who was an older woman (maybe in her 60s?). She would stand at the end of my bed and watch me sleep. Creepy. You have numerous people asking you the same questions over and over and over every day, but you hardly ever see the actual psycologist, I was there for two weeks and saw him for maybe 5min. Group therapy was a joke, at one point the person leading the therapy gave us a list of things to do when you get depressed to make you happy. "Do something you like! Play with a puppy! Watch a movie! " I was so insulted. You think I'm that stupid that I just never tried any of that? When your deep in depression you dont just get cheered up like that...Only good points were art class and the food. Im out and better now, but I would never go back. I didnt get better being there, I got worse. I got better when I got out, found a good therapist and the right meds . (I went through so many combonations of meds, some with weird side effects). All being committed motivated me to do is to make sure that if I ever get to a point where I wanna kill myself I'd seek help ANYWHERE else, or just kill myself. [info] None [info] 1415173160
adoboislife [info] I have been diagnosed with depression. I have tried and stopped taking anti-depressants because it made me feel kinda dead inside. I thought I was going alright and managing it well with regular counselling. Most days, i feel like I'm too busy to think about my feelings anyway. As long as I'm well enough to go to work, i soldier on with my full-time job. And when I'm not at work, i always try to keep a cheerful face for my daughter and husband. But today, I realised that maybe I'm not going as well as I thought because of a conversation I had with my 4-yo daughter while i driving with her this afternoon. We were silent most of the car ride, but out of the blue she suddenly blurted out," You know, Mommy, we should take care of other people." Surprised, I replied "Oh that's a kind thought sweetie. Yes, we should definitely take care of other people." Then she continued, "I wanna take care of you." Tickled by such thoughtfulness, I said "Thank you! I'd love for you to take care of me when I grow old." She went quiet for a few seconds and then said, " I wanna take care of you because you're sad." I said, "Sweetie, yes, Mommy is sad sometimes. But that's alright. It's normal to not be happy all the time." She responded, "Yeah, sometimes I get sad too... and sometimes I become angry.. and sometimes I'm happy... But mommy, you're always sad. And daddy is not always sad. I wanna make you happy." 😶😳😑(Sometimes I wonder if my kid is really an old lady trapped in 4 year-old's body.)Anyway, like a well-practiced spiel, I knew just how to change the topic when our conversation became awkward. I simply wiped the tears that almost instantly flowed from my eyes. But yeah, that's the most personal thing I can share with you today... the day i got caught by my kid. [info] None [info] 1556113331
the_lord1 [info] I gave birth to a girl named Joy. I was diagnosed with depression after. [info] None [info] 1566607032
mycatsnameismittons [info] I think i know a little about what you are saying. I have often wondered why i don't "feel" emotions the way others do. I was diagnosed with depression about 14 years ago and have been on medication ever since. The thing is, most of the time i don't FEEL anything. It sounds to me like you've reached the end of your rope. I'm sorry about that. I wish i had the words or the wisdom to write something that would soothe you, even for a few minutes, but i don't.  Maybe you could share your thoughts with someone on the other end of a "suicide help line". I just wanted you to know that you were heard by someone. [info] None [info] 1527383120
keegan112099 [info] I can agree with that.  Theres a difference between self-esteem issues and annoying co-dependance/fishing for compliments.  I was diagnosed with depression a year and a half ago now and not a single person knows or has had any indication I might feel the way I do. Its an Inner thing and while yes it has an affect on relationships its more an Inner struggle of who I should let into my life and trust.    [info] None [info] 1512260752
ohpetunia [info] Not when I was diagnosed with depression but when I started to take my treatment seriously.  [info] None [info] 1550536683
Stevewoody82 [info] I’ve been where you are and I’ve come out the other side.There are a few things I can recommend 1, a label is optional. I was diagnosed with depression, ptsd, bi-Polar and said fuck it to all of them. I choose what I’m going to be, not a doctor.80% of mental illness starts with your thought patterns so control that and you stand a chance of winning. Yoga, meditation and Dota can help achieve this in moderation2, don’t feel sorry for yourself and don’t be a victim. Life is shit and it does not care for your emotions. Also people have there own shit so please learn to control your happiness and moral in other ways because relying on others can often disappoint.3, as mentioned above, moderate. Dota is fine as long as it’s not obsessive, like anything. Find balance. The gym will help and if you can’t afford it, simply go for a walk / run. It’s shit at first but the chemicals it releases will help combat the shitty feelings. Eat healthy, workout and play hard. That has helped me over the years.This community is the most loving and toxic I’ve ever encountered at the same time. Take what helps and leave the rest. Always here for a chat or to own your ass in a game ;)GL HF x [info] None [info] 1537275888
joeybuns [info] [Light] I went to therapy to help me my depression and it didn't help So 3 years ago when I was 16 I started going to therapy because I was diagnosed with depression and the doctors said I should go to YPAS (Young Person Advisory Service) which is to help kids &amp; teens deal with stuff such as depression, anger issues etc. Basically I get assigned my therapist who is in training and records are sessions. But it didn't help, every week I went there it just made me feel worse. And honestly my therapist was trying his best and was a nice fella and all but being in the vicinity of the building I dreaded, I would get buzzed in and would wait in a waiting room with other people who are in the same boat as me. So we'd sit down for the hour session I'd have every week and he'd start off by asking me how my week when I told him how I was basically failing at everything and how my family had their problems and how I wasn't every my ex gf etc. And then I would fill out some stupid form about how I would be feeling over the week.The form itself annoyed me it would give you a statement for example I was feeling restless this week and then you'd rate it one to five. Then after I finished the form we would talk about it for an hour. And we'd go back and forth and nothing really changed. I'd end up giving the same answers because of my routine with college nothing really changed eventually I fell behind with my work so much college basically gave me an ultimatum, my mental health or staying on the course I obviously opted to stay in the course.How I kinda got better was my friends at the time they helped me get out of it at the time because we made each other laugh anyway thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1475624786
Mbeatrice [info] It affected me too. I have been diagnosed with depression in the past, and his death just further solidified that there is nowhere you can go in the world that will "fix" it. It's very sad, because you would think that traveling the world and experiencing so many others' cultures would help, but depression doesn't care about that. [info] None [info] 1539366597
PansTables [info] I am diagnosed with depression. So I hate it when self-diagnosed people say that they're depressed. They're just sad.  [info] None [info] 1551387899
bringyourownbeard [info] I don't know what I need to hear right now. Hi, everyone, I've been diagnosed with depression for a few years, and I have a wonderful therapist, but I guess I just need to vent and search for advice and support from people who feel the same way.Everything is going wrong all at once, right as I am trying to go to a therapist and get my life back on track. I am going through a very bad breakup with a boyfriend of 2 years, my bitchhole supervisor decided last minute to not renew anyone's work-study contracts including my own, and three weeks ago I was sexually assaulted in the apartment I was supposed to share with aforementioned boyfriend. I don't want to go into details about what happened, but in the days and weeks following the incident, I have been noticing changes in my behavior and attitude, despite my desperate attempts to not allow this to change me. For a few days, I was terribly afraid I'd been broken, that I'd never be able to be intimate again. The smell of a guy or the sensation of someone hugging me or touching me even platonically made me sick to my stomach, and I'd start shaking and have flashbacks. However, I am very hard-headed and set on not allowing this to affect me this way, so I pushed myself and had sex with a friend who it turns out may have feelings for me (I'm not sure how I feel, again I have a lot on my plate). I was okay during and after (minimal shaking, only had to pause a couple of times), but in these past few days I've been more and more shocked at myself, as that behavior is so out of character for me. I guess perhaps it is the realization of all of this hitting me at once along with my strict parents teaching me at a young age that sex is bad (I have now slept with 2 people) and pressing on me that if I didn't wait until marriage, I was doing something wrong. So this has been a long-standing issue, and now the pressure to not crumble from the attack is like the poop icing on the poopnado cake.Did I mention that I couldn't tell my parents because they would just panic or maybe even accuse me of doing something wrong, and I can't confide in my birth mother because I've just reconnected with her after 12 years and we haven't developed that kind of bond nor can I trust her when just this weekend she forgot I was coming to visit and went to the lake with her boyfriend.I can't calm down. I can't make myself relax or not overthink things. I no longer enjoy smoking weed because the sadder I get, the more panicked it makes me (It actually used to make me feel better until about 6 months ago and it's only gotten worse). I am having panic attacks and major episodes even when sober and now that I live alone I am always terrified of having one of these attacks while I'm by myself. I just want to feel better, I don't know if I need to go back on meds or what, I just can't keep doing this. I want to be able to wake up and look forward to my day as a gift, I want to be able to watch a movie or listen to a song without worrying about triggers, I want to have sex and not feel guilty afterwards. I want to be able to figure out how I feel about this guy I slept with, and whether or not I want to pursue anything more with him or with someone else or with no one at all right now. I want to be able to get through day-to-day things like doing the dishes and going for a walk without it feeling like way too much to take on.I guess I'm asking, "What do I do?" [info] None [info] 1377386031
parvej1234567890 [info] If she said those things and had valid reasons to believe so I would completely understand, quite frankly. We all should strive for self improvement, and in doing so experience pathetic and disgusting moments of ourselves. If that's due to your own lack of discipline and motivation, that is pathetic and disgusting, obviously Your physical appearance is the most important aspects of life. We are who people perceive us to be, and how you look affects what others think of us. I'm not at the stage of thinking about whether I should break up with her, however no longer being physically attracted to someone is a completely valid reason to do so. Physical and emotional attraction are both vital to a relationship.Personally, I've been diagnosed with depression and I viewed it as failing to even function as a productive human. Being depressed and doing nothing due to it, losing self discipline is absolutely degenerate. If you are unable to even control your emotions to that state you're a failure as a person. It is something that you must deal by yourself, and if you're unable to overcome it, you are a weak human. [info] None [info] 1542374426
mscullin75 [info] Will probably get buried with all the comments but here we goTo put a timeline on this, I was a freshman offensive lineman at the University of Georgia and had enrolled in July of 2013 instead of the typical June with all the new athletes. I felt like this may have had contributed to a moment where I felt helpless and felt like taking my own life back in September of 2013. I said to my roommates "I felt like killing myself last night" and that obviously threw them for a whirl. As a result of this, I was forced by the athletic department to go to CAPS, our mental health and psychological program. During my first visit, I was diagnosed with depression. However, I didn't continue going to CAPS after that. I didn't want to talk to someone I didn't know about my issues. I didn't feel comfortable. My teammates told me "just be happy" numerous times and to this day I'm not sure if they realize that simply saying something like that doesn't make a depressed person feel better. I continued my freshman year of college feeling depressed in random, heavy swings to the point where on May 2nd of 2014, I tried to take my own life. I pulled a kitchen knife out of my kitchen drawer and tried as hard as I could to slit my wrists. I tried 5 or 6 times and I threw the knife down while crying. I realized I could learn how to control my depression swings by seeing the happiness in everything in life and realizing that I could tackle anything I put my mind to. For the next year I had to wake up every day with the mentality that nothing was going to stop me and that helped me so much with dealing with depression. The last few months of my 5th year of school, I'd gotten very frequent, but lighter depression swings. I say lighter because learning how to control it feels like a superpower. I'm going to get depressed but knowing I will not take my own life from this Earth is a very powerful feeling. To know that you can see happiness in any miniscule thing is one of the biggest things I've learned while dealing with depression. To this day, I still have that knife and I still cook with it. Yes, it probably seems sick to keep it and do something like that, but it helps me have "power" over how I tried to take my own life. Like I said, I still struggle to this day with depression, but it's learning how to deal with it that gets me through each and every day. I actually just moved to a new town and I feel quite happy with where I am in life.  [info] None [info] 1528476522
somedudewithascalpel [info] Well than. I'm 14 and angsty so don't read if you don't like annoying rants.I've been diagnosed with depression so I went to therapy yesterday and was honest that I've been feeling like shit and have planned two ways to die but haven't acted on them yet and we spent most of the time planning on an emergency plan for if i do it and who he can call and blah blah and he recommended i go to a psychologist to get antidepressants because he didn't know I was feeling depressed enough to want to die until now but anyway he printed a paper with all this info on it and a reminder for the date I'm going to the psychologist and him again. (He talked to my mom and made sure she's okay with going to a psychologist.) My therapist said that I'm supposed to be able to choose if i take pills or not and keep therapy information to myself but i accidentally left the paper in the car. My mom read it. Shes anti drugs and apparently thinks she absolutely needs to get involved somehow and now apparently wants to help by bringing up a dead animal we saw on the side of the road a week ago! :) And apparently reading the paper that i was allowed to have confidentiality with was love or something. the last time i told her i was feeling all she said was "well thats stupid." She didn't care to help than so why does she want to now? How would she? She's literally just reminding me of a gruesomely smashed animal and asking me "hOw DoEs ThAt MaKe YoU fEeL?" Jesus Christ. End of spoiled teenager rant thanks for listening~ [info]  [info] 1573198720
LoveDemNuts [info] I was 22 when I was diagnosed with depression now I am 27, I avoided meds since they made me feel like I was weak, so I avoided them for years and essentially was a low functioning depressed personMy experience has been that I tried meds when I finally hit the lowest low I could, i felt completely hopeless and excited to end it. To this day I have never regretted trying meds, I only disliked that it took me this long to finally have some happy moments in lifeI’m sorry meds haven’t worked for your mother and friends, I’ll say for myself it’s all depending on the user, some drugs will be like night and day difference whereas others won’t work for you at all.The best advice I could give is at least try some, since depression fucking sucks! what do you have to lose? Even if they don’t work and you have to try another, I think it’s better than living each day in a dread Also with your age you could be able to get a good handle on this early! I wasted about 3 years just being miserable, but If I could make those years just a little less miserable why not?Also kudos for you for looking for solutions to your depression, takes courage [info] None [info] 1565142918
amodtha [info] Day 44 of social isolation in a foreign country ... starting to crack So, I live alone in a foreign country and since the pandemic started, I've had very little interaction with other human beings because the country I'm in is on full lockdown with curfews and everything. I think all of this is necessary and good, but it is definitely having a toll on my mental health. I was diagnosed with depression in the past, but after changing my circumstances I wouldn't really say that I'm usually depressed. I do think I'm normally a little sensitive and easily hurt by the closest people to me, but not generally depressed, you know? But for some reason this lock down is very hard on me... I get more and more sensitive and down as the day wears on and by the time night comes around and I can talk to my fiance, who is on lock down in a different city, I am about ready to break down. I feel bad because I know he wants to talk to me but at the same time I keep getting triggered very easily by things he says and he is not even trying to be mean or to upset me. Obviously, this is adding extra stress on top of the social isolation because I start to worry about my relationship. I guess why I'm reaching out here is because I just want to know if there are others out there who are feeling like me... My fiance seems to think I'm just way over impacted by this whole thing. I am not sure if that's fair to say because he is in quarantine with his family, not completely alone. I don't know anyone else who is alone in this situation - anyone else who is in quarantine/on lock down and can't be around other people. If you're out there, how are you holding up? Are you cracking like me, at this point? Or is there something really wrong with me that this is putting me in such a dark place? [info] None [info] 1587420244
LindsayEm [info] Psychiatrist vs. NPC? TL;DR:  What's the difference between a Psychiatrist and a Nurse Practitioner as far as treatment, knowledge, and prescribing?I've had an awful time with my current psychiatrist, so I've been trying to find a new one. I've been avoiding RNs and NPCs because I've always heard that a Psychiatrist is better at handling complex cases.My dad has a friend who managed to get me in with a NPC, so I'm going to see her, but I'm concerned that she won't be able to properly handle my case. I've been diagnosed with depressions and BPD and I've been on at least 25 different prescriptions in the last 6 years.Any thoughts would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1494262374
UnpredictableSewer [info] really having a hard time with this I'm pretty new to all this... It started with medication. I was diagnosed with depression and started on anti depressants several months ago. One of the side effects I experienced was a loss of appetite. I guess it's fairly important to the story that I am, and always have been, overweight. I noticed one day that all of a sudden I had lost close to 15kg in one month. It was both kind of scary (because I know it's not really a good thing), but I just loved seeing the numbers on the scale go down. I hadn't weighed this little in YEARS. So when I felt my appetite coming back, I just... didn't eat. I don't really have anyone watching me eat, so I didn't even have to pretend. When I was "making dinner" I cut up a bell pepper and washed some grapes, took them to my room, had a little bit of the food and threw the rest away. I didn't really think it was a "real" problem, because I am still overweight. Nobody looking at me would ever think I had an ED. But one of my best friends started getting really worried, and he said that he wanted me to tell him how I was doing, and if I was struggling I've been talking to him, and he can usually calm me down and talk me through the worst of the issue. He's living abroad for the school year, but I just managed to go visit him for a week and I came back last night. I was finally able to weigh myself this morning (he doesn't have a scale) and it was like a nightmare. I had gained weight while I was visiting him. I decided to reach out to him because I was so close to a panic attack, and now he's saying that if he were braver, he'd call my mother and tell her what's going on. I really don't want this out, I'm just not ready for that, and now I feel like I can't talk to him anymore. I can't trust that what I tell him will just be between us. I kind of got worse that ever today... this weight gain really screwed me up, plus the whole thing with not being able to trust my best friend anymore. So I ate a little at dinner tonight and then I felt so awful that I purged for the first time. I just could not NOT do it somehow. Now I feel guilty, sad and confused, because the purging actually did make be feel better. I'm sorry for the rambling... I just needed to get this off my chest [info] None [info] 1576880589
sosila [info] I’ve tried to tell him there isn’t one but he keeps saying that antidepressants alter the way your brain works so you think it’s okay to shoot up schools or whatever. I tried pointing out the vast majority of people on them who don’t shoot up schools and that it’s correcting a chemical imbalance but he just doesn’t care about what I have to say at all.  I’m pretty sure I’ve been depressed my entire life, but it wasn’t until the hospital assigned me a medical team that I was diagnosed with depression. He doesn’t care though. [info] None [info] 1562376623
Ikeeki [info] &gt; Been together for about 6 years. She has a very bad OCD that I constantly have to watch over her for. I feel its made me a nervous wreck otherwise if I dont watch her, she hurts herself. Other than that we get along amazingly. Ive kind of been needing her to be there for me as of late. I was diagnosed with depression and just barely got off my meds feeling better. Shes been my strength, my wall.Sounds like you guys depend on each other which I think is okay as long as it's not completely one sided though I feel you both should be seeing therapists, either separately or together.&gt; However she was offered a free trip to visit some family that she hasnt visited in years. Some of her fam members are sick as well. I thought it was a good idea for her to go but I felt I needed her. Ive told her I needed her because of what im going through but she ended up leaving anyway because she didnt want to cancel the flight.Any reason you couldn't have gone with? Any who I think it would be hard for anyone not to have made this decision, considering this is a rare occurrence. Also hard to blame her if you guys are going through financial bumps and a chance comes up to be spoiled by her family (and see them since some are sick and it sounds like in a different state so she probably misses them and visa versa)&gt; When she left I took it hard. Aside from missing her, just feeling like I was abandoned. We dont exactly have the best living conditions but ive been trying so hard to make them better with her support.It sounds like you do care for her and you genuinely miss her, and also it sounds like you guys spend a lot of time together. We are creatures of habit so it's understandable for you to feel upset.&gt;Shes having a blast at her familys place. Theyre kind of rich so shes doing all sorts of fun things. I cant help but feel happy and also sad at the same time. I feel happy shes found happiness but also sad she left me when I needed her the most after being there for her for years.I appreciate your honesty and at least you're happy that she's happy, and i think these are completely normal feelings (feeling sad she's missing and maybe even jealous considering your financial issues).&gt; I feel guilty feelings this way. Im starting to think im not right for her. I used to be so calm and collected, but now talking to her I just feel the "I needed you this time.. and you left". She couldve rescheduled the ticket and I seriously doubt her sick fam members wouldve died anytime soon. Her family were never there for her to begin with. Ive been there for her from the start through everything.. and the one time I really need some support, gone.I'm not gonna be harsh to you like others because it takes a lot of guts to be this honest and show a possibly negative side of yourself, but i'll be blunt; I think you're overreacting for this one specific event. Considering how long you've been together, ive sure you've had a lot of instances where things didn't go according to plan, so to start thinking about ending it all over something like this seems like a huge knee-jerk reaction. It's perfectly normal to feel abandoned but it's a little selfish to make her feel bad over something that most of us would have done as well.&gt; She couldve rescheduled the ticketRescheduling the ticket would have done what exactly? Reschedule it for a few days later? Honestly im not sure if that would have helped the situation, it sounds like it would have just delayed the situation you're facing now.&gt; and I seriously doubt her sick fam members wouldve died anytime soon.This is a bit harsh and makes you come off a bit selfish. as someone who cherishes their family (especially ones who aren't healthy and ones i don't get to see often), I would have a hard time passing up seeing family in a different state, even if we weren't necessarily close (assuming there isn't straight up hatred).&gt; Ive been there for her from the start through everything.. and the one time I really need some support, gone.I would try to let go of the idea that she ditched you. She didn't necessarily ditch you, she just chose to take a rare opportunity to see her family. Once you get over that fact then a lot of this starts to solve itself.My takeaway:* See a therapist either together or separately, it's good that you guys can depend on each other but try and alleviate some of pressure/stress with professional help, it will let you guys focus more on each other and the relationship. * Recognize that your depression may be effecting this situation.* Hang out with some friends while she's gone, it will help fill your social needs and not feel as lonely since im sure you guys were together most of the time (you mentioned you watch over her a lot cuz her OCD).* Don't resent her for this, it will just make things worse.* Make sure you focus on telling her how happy you are that she is happy, and that you miss her (this lets you be honest without making her feel bad)Overall I think it's normal for you to feel abandoned but you're also overreacting to this one instance in a 6 year relationship. It's temporary, she will be back, and your relationship will be better off if you welcome her back with open arms versus welcoming her back with resentment. Who knows, this time apart might actually be good if you take advantage of it with the right mindset.PS. You never mentioned how long she's going to be out of town for. A week? A weekend? Hang in there! Find a hobby to help pass the time =) [info] None [info] 1497258526
KinIsNotMogar [info] So familiar with being depressed, feeling happy is just wrong? I was diagnosed with depression six years ago, and I've been doing things less and less. This year has been the worse, where I don't even join group calls with my friends anymore to play games with them or something.Every time I start feeling okay, I start feeling happy, I feel guilty and scared. Every time I start feeling comfortable or anything, something bad happens.Just this year, Grandpa in the hospital, he gets out, I start feeling better, he goes back in, he comes home, I start feeling better, dad has a heart attack, he comes home, I start feeling better, grandpa goes back to hospital, he comes back, I start feeling better, car accident and I don't leave my house anymore, start feeling better, hurt my foot, start feeling better, today grandpa and mom both went to the hospital.I'm always scared of being happy because I know that means something bad will happen.Recently got a boyfriend, and his goal it seems like is to make me happy. Yesterday I was actually happy, and I didn't feel guilty about it, I thought that it's stupid, why would I be scared of being happy? Nothing bad will happen just because I'm happy.Yesterday I was happy, yesterday I told my boyfriend I wanted to be in a group call with all our friends again, play a game with them, and I wanted to go to the mall (to buy presents for my family) and I wanted to go to Six Flags (theme park out here, I have tickets to go I've had all year from my brother, I felt okay enough to go now.)For the first time in a long, long time. I was excited for the next day, the next few days, the next week or so.Then reality smacked me in the face again. I was right, every fucking time I get too happy, something bad happens. Grandpa can't walk and he keeps falling down, so he goes back to the hospital early this morning. Mom is on her way to visit him and she gets in a car accident. She totals the car (our only car left, the other was ruined in the last car accident) and she's in the hospital now.We don't even have a way to go see her. Grandma will probably lend us one of her cars though, but I can't be too hopeful about that.Is the whole feeling thing normal? Afraid of being happy, or feeling guilty about it? What about being too happy and then bad things happen? because that's how my life has always worked...I just started seeing a therapist recently and I was slowly starting to feel better, but it takes so long since I have to keep convincing myself that nothing bad will happen. It takes longer each time since each time it's showing me that I'm right each time...I'm just so upset at myself right now [info] None [info] 1448839118
FindingGerald [info] I totally agree. My life hasn't gotten better at all since I was diagnosed with depression six years ago. It's gotten worse if anything. I went from being raped (12) to domestic violence (13-16) to suicide attempt (14) to my friend committing suicide (18) and I'm about to be 19, who knows what the future holds for this year. All I know is that you do learn how to fight through it. Though I contemplate suicide on a regular basis, I'm still here.  [info] None [info] 1486691350
cswift [info] Long story old thread, so this will almost definitely be buried. In high school and the years before I played a lot of baseball. I got pretty good spent 6 days a week practicing and working out to improve my play. I actually wanted do something for a future with the sport. By the time senior year rolled around I was good. I could throw 90mph as a pitcher, made the all district, and county teams for my area in Florida and had just recently signed my Division 1 baseball scholarship. In Florida baseball teams usually have tournaments over the week of spring break so various high schools could play each other (ex: Key West H.S. plays Orlando). For our spring break my school went to a tournament in North Florida. After a walk by the leadoff hitter, I was up to bat. The first pitch was a fastball for a strike and I thought to myself,  “Man this kid’s got some life to his pitches.” After two more pitches and a foul ball I saw myself down 1-2 in the count and stepped in thinking, “ His slider is good stay in on the pitch and don’t get fooled.” The pitcher came set, checked the runner, and delivered the pitch to home plate. The ball came in high and inside I did not have enough time to get out of the way since my first reaction is to stay in on the pitch. The result was a combination of sounds as the ball forcefully collided with the helmet and the my temple, that left the me unconsciously convulsing face down in the clay. Since the concussion I've been diagnosed with depression. Needless to say after 6 months of rehab. I don't really play baseball. The next year I went to my backup school, got dumped, and had a real shitty span of two years. Now I am of the mindset that I am just now a horse waiting to be turned into glue. TL;DR: Senior year i got hit with a 93mph fastball in the head. Baseball has since stopped.  [info] None [info] 1471877045
avacatt [info] This was helpful. I wish someone had told me when I was younger that my high processed high carb diet was contributing to my hormonal imbalance. No one did, not even my endo who diagnosed me with it in the first place. I was diagnosed with depression but I started to realize that my hormones had an effect on my mood, not my brain chemistry. So the SSRI's I took I feel like didn't treat the root of the problem. Not even my psychiatrist asked me anything about my hormones even though hormonal imbalance is such a big contributer to PMDD and mood issues.I notice my mood issues and depression get worse when I'm eating bread, pasta, high GI. So I am laying off that for now and I see such a huge improvement. I just don't think some people's bodies were meant for those foods.Aside from that, I did want to also mention that while diet is extremely important, so is dealing with past traumas that can also lead to actual hormonal change. I had really low self esteem as a result of a bad upbringing and I know that in addition to diet I also have to heal from my past. [info] None [info] 1507656891
IAMA_Karmanaut [info] What is the creepiest and/or fucked up dream you can remember? (Might turn NSFW) Mine happened last night. Now, I haven't had a nightmare in years, so I've been really lucky until now. It had to be the most vivid dream I've ever had, so many minor details were carefully crafted to fuck with my mind.[I have a mutt](http://i.imgur.com/8ZPG8gM.jpg). He is 7 or 8 years old now, a rescue I got when I was 10. He was almost the sole reason my dream was a nightmare. In my dream, I saw him fly through his life, going from 1 years old when I got him, to his current age. Every age though that I saw him, he had something wrong with his body. At 1, he had no eyes. 2, only 3 legs. Through all of it, when he got to his current age, he was all fine and well, until I went and hugged him.My arm became covered in blood from his underside. I stepped away, and the next thing I saw was that his entire belly was gone, stripped from his body. All of his internal organs were falling, blood everywhere. His heart dangled on the ground, still beating. His intestines dragged behind him. ***But he didn't die.*** He was in so much pain, he whined and cried for hours, and I had to sit through it. I was crying in my dream, and I woke up crying from the torture.It made me realize how much I love that dog, and how I never want to lose him. He was with me when I was diagnosed with depression, he always made me laugh when I came home from school, relentlessly bullied. He was the one that found me with a knife late at night, about to take my own life, and his face stopped me. He is the reason I'm still alive to this day, and seeing him in pain as he was will be the most fucked up dream I have ever had for the rest of my life.__________So /r/teenagers, what creepy, fucked up dreams have you had? [info] 18 [info] 1370195732
Pzora [info] Difficulty moving forward Lost my father 7 months ago suddenly to a heart attack, he passed alone in his room next to mine. Our relationship was never perfect but I love my dad and his death broke my heart.Most days I try to keep my mind off those who have been lost, but most nights, like tonight, it pains me deeply to remember the stupid little squabbles or annoyances that were common between us. I'm still reliving the night I found him slouched over in his chair, knowing before I even touched his cold body that he was gone.Unfortunately (in my opinion) I'm not religious of any sort, telling myself he is with my mother again and family that has passed, sadly doesn't do anything for me. The only solace I have is he no longer has to suffer from his depression and other mental demons. Not even sure if this is where I should be posting this, I was diagnosed with depression by the age of 9 (now 28) and it has been a long battle. Losing arguably the closest person to me  has left a wound that feels like it could never heal.Thanks for reading my wall of text reddit, I tried to keep it short. [info] None [info] 1550396303
queenofbo0ks [info] My mental stability is not good, I was diagnosed with depression last year and since then it seems like it's only gotten worse. I'm in therapy with an amazing therapist now and slowly making progress.He supports me, even when he feels down as well. He is there for me, holds me in his arms as I'm on the ground hysterically crying. He makes sure that we are going to fight this together.He tells me he loves me every day and when I don't have the energy to do chores, he picks them up for me. Cooking is the only thing that makes me feel better, so he lets me cook all meals (even though he loves cooking as well).It's hard for both of us and we have our quarrels as well, but we both love eachother and are willing to work on it  [info] None [info] 1552120860
Beatrice_Ross [info] I was diagnosed with depression at the age of twelve, and dealing with it for quite a few years now, it always pains me to see people fake something like this. The feeling of depression is truly impossible to describe, and for people to pretend to have this mental illness is downright disturbing. Not only does it make people less inclined to believe someone has genuine depression, thus making life worse for those who actually have depression. but it also feels like the people faking depression are mocking us in a way (at least for me it feels that way).Depression sucks, don’t fake it for attention, it makes life harder on people actually dealing with it. [info] None [info] 1557075860
JessKnitz [info] I just don't understand I've been diagnosed with depression over 15 years ago. It's nothing new, yet I feel like I've gotten nowhere with my recovery. The main reason is because of my experience in college.When I entered college, I was fully intent on majoring in a STEM field. That's what I had always showed talent in, and that's what my parents expected me to choose. That was my plan as well, until I started loving my Japanese language classes.I ended up loving learning about the Japanese language &amp; culture so much that I ended up changing my major to East Asian Studies. I had also learned of a summer language program that was offered in Japan itself by my college, so I had planned to get in and go there for the summer. There were 2 summers when the language classes were offered, so I had 2 chances to apply and get in. I applied and didn't get in the first year. Ok, no biggie. I'll just apply for next year. I knew that was my last chance for that program (as well as my last chance for an internship exclusive to the attendees), so I improved my grades and tried my hardest to make my next application the best that it could be. I didn't get in. I didn't even get on the wait list.I was so devastated. That was 11 years ago, and I never really recovered from that blow. Even now, it hurts to think about pursuing my Japanese-related dreams again because it hurts so much. It's why I ended up transferring to another university and getting a STEM field degree anyways (mainly because they didn't have an equivalent to East Asian Studies). It's also why I'm having a hard time finding a job now. I just can't put what happened back then behind me, and I don't even know why. Both the administrators and those closest to me blamed me for putting that Japanese summer program on too high a pedestal and should have never given it that kind of power over me, but it's too late for that now. The damage has been done, and I don't know what to do about it. It doesn't help that my father expected me to be making over $100k by now and living the dream life. It's obvious he's disappointed in me, and I don't even know what to tell him.Because I'm so hurt, it's hard for me to even get out of bed and do my daily hygiene most days. To be honest, I'm just happy when I have clean clothes because I had remembered to do the laundry. I was lauded as this bright, gifted student as a child, and I'm not living up to any of my "potential". I haven't been doing anything in STEM \*or\* Japanese, simply because it hurts too much.I just don't understand what I'm supposed to do at this point to "get over" it. That rejection cut very deeply, and I've been unable to figure out how to be happy again despite what happened. I really couldn't treat the rejection as a minor thing anyways, because after it happened, it felt like there was a looming cloud always bringing me down from that day onward. In the first few weeks after, I was lucky to even have woken up on time for my classes. My habits haven't changed much since.Anyways, if you made it this far, then thanks for reading all the way through. I appreciate it and any advice you all may have. [info] None [info] 1560731940
r_a_g_s [info] I'm curious which internet tests you tried.  I was diagnosed with depression before the Web was invented, so I haven't gone out looking for such.  But I'm curious to know what tests are out there and how I score on them, just for fun. [info] None [info] 1362070820
lythalive [info] I was diagnosed with depression and GAD at 17. I took it ok, it was not unexpected. I was rediagnosed at 37 with AvPD, Depression, severe Social Anxiety, General Anxiety, PTSD, slight Agoraphobia and a light sprinkling of Paranoia. I knew things had gotten bad over the years but that diagnosis messed me up for a couple of months. It made me feel pathetic and like a human who got warped along the way and needed to be trashed. Too far gone.I'm working very hard on my self esteem at the moment. I feel like I'm working from the bottom up. [info] None [info] 1526054733
praisecarcinoma [info] I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago. This past January my diagnosis was changed to Type II Bi-Polar after a pretty severe suicide attempt. I promise you and everyone else I don't want it.  [info] Humankin, pronouns: pizza/highfives/bro [info] 1432944072
callesucia [info] Studying abroad and depression finally hit So I was diagnosed with depression about four years ago and in that period of time I've had my ups and downs. From wanting to kill myself (just mild suicidal thoughts) to being extremely happy. I've learned to handle my depression with a routine of work, study, running and reading. And it worked, until I'm six months in studying in Argentina.I came over with friends, and made a couple of new ones. Days were pure fun and joy. Classes started and I started working in a kitchen, which I found out I loved. I had a small fling with a coworker and life seemed to be incredible, it seemed like I could get everything I wanted out of it. Couple of months go by and due to the economical situation of the country, the restaurant I worked at closes and I'm out of a job. I thought not working would be like it was when I first came, but my friends have remade their lives, they have found partners and even though we all sleep in the same room we barely talk. I guess their lives continued and mine went back. The girl I was seeing moved to Brazil, and well, I really don't know what to do from here. Last couple of weeks have found me in some pretty dark places. Not the darkest I've ever been, but pretty dark. Some sadness falls over me and I can't seem to get it off me, even though I can't find a reason why. I'm guessing it comes from feeling lonely now that my friends spend their time with their SO and I'm just, you know, alone. I've lost my ability and desire to interact with other people, and when I find the strenght to go out I just walk and walk and I do feel better, but that only lasts a bit. I know I have to go out and do things by myself, experience new things, meet new people, but I don't seem to be able to get myself to do that. Even if I went out to a bar or something, I think I'd just sit in a corner, drinking. At this point I think I actually am a bit afraid of strangers.Since I was diagnosed with depression I've been taking 20mg of Lexapro daily, and still do, consistently, but I'm not sure it's been helping a lot lately. [info] None [info] 1468359290
SirFadakar [info] Thing is, because it's not exactly an allergy makes that much more dismissable to people who don't understand the damage. Sure I won't go into anaphylactic shock but I'm running the risk of colon cancer, depriving my body of nutrients that I desperately need (I was diagnosed with depression at 14 without an MRI, found out at 21 I had celiac, doctor said it affects mood and I figured it'd be minor, but in 3 years I haven't had a severe depressive bout since.)Anyway, point is, my friends with allergies will say shit like "well I don't work tomorrow, I can deal with cramps and diarrhea." Well isn't that nice to know it's over once it comes out of your ass. I get this residual pain days after my stomach aches and migraines go where my entire system is nauseated, food is hard to put down, migraines are easy to trigger, catching a cold or infection becomes really easy.I wish I could shit out my pain. [info] None [info] 1478988471
SparklingLimeade [info] This outlook has always baffled me. Happiness and sadness to me are like light and darkness. Darkness means there's no light now but it doesn't take away anything and it doesn't preclude the existence of light in the future. Do you seriously believe that there will be nothing pleasant for the rest of your natural life? I was diagnosed with depression and I still never wanted to end anything. Sometimes I want to sleep till things get better but I always anticipate that there's another shit and a giggle somewhere in the world. If you have a problem in this area I recommend professional help. I don't know why it works but it helped in my case.Friends can be difficult. How long *exactly* have you been trying? How well traveled are you? Where have you looked? I moved around quite a bit and usually found a few people who were good for spending time with. Sometimes I didn't though. Didn't meet anybody really interesting till college. Those are good for finding interesting people. Go to some meetings and hang out. Get comfortable. See how it goes. Alternatively, I find the internet to be a pretty cool place. Make some friends regardless of distance. Many online communities (reddit included) are full of friendly strangers and at times I prefer that odd openness that comes with anonymity.You could also just say "to hell with people" and be a hermit. Chill out and do your thing. Get into your hobbies and go out only when necessary if that's what works for you. Some people pull that off and I've enjoyed the occasional bout of solitude. Especially now that we have the internet to balance that out I think there's a lot of opportunity to lead a balanced life with minimal human contact.tl;dr: Get professional help for serious issues. Making friends is tough but doable. It's also optional though. Hobbies are good. [info] INTP [info] 1483620019
Funkaro [info] Perputually tired, no motivation. This is my first time posting on reddit lol.My problem is that im always tired, and as soon as I get to school, I go to first period and fall asleep. I sleep through all of me periods, and the only thing I look forward to is going home. I have no motivation to do anything, im terrible at writing and any type of work that requires creativity. I used to really love drawing and art, but now i can never think of what to draw so I just stop and play videogames. My family has given up on me, and told me that when im 18 i have to leave. Im worried about what will happen when im 18, but I also lack the motivation to do anything about it. I've played over 3k hours of videogames on steam in 2 years and all my friends play with me too, but have good grades. I hate school and always think about my future in class, but it still doesn't help to motivate me. If I stop playing videogames at all, I feel withdrawl, and I lash out at others because of it. Many times my parents took the internet away and I got really angry and tried to fight them. I got sent to the mental hospital many times, but they never kept me for more than a week. My parents don't care anymore, so they just don't talk to me, and im fine with that because i despise them aswell. I used to be beat by my dad because he forced me to practice algebra starting from when I was in 4th grade, and I never was allowed to go outside to play for the entirety of the summer holidays. I was forced to practice piano for 5 years until one day I had enough and started to break things. My parents are incredibly materialistic, and I knew that. They would do anything to make me stop, then they found out that they could call the police. After that, even when I stopped, they would call the police everytime I disobeyed. So I started to throw classes. I turned in nothing, I entered tests blank. Then I got my way again. This is how its been for the past 2 years. I'm a garbage child, and I know it. I know im a dissapointment to my parents, and I know that im a useless part of society. I want to fix this but I can't. I lack the motivation and the self esteem. I was diagnosed with depression, but I feel like other people's problems are way bigger than mine. [info] None [info] 1557946952
ideka_tbh [info] I was diagnosed with depression but my family just pretend nothing happens [info] None [info] 1562513401
Koocheyyy [info] I was diagnosed with depression last year. I think its because of my antidepressants that increased appetite without me knowing. But i honestly dont know [info] None [info] 1557018717
corpse_flour [info] I was diagnosed with depression 26 years ago. It was about 10 years ago a psychiatrist told me it is dysthymia. Looking back, I can see I was like this even as a child. Nowadays, a kid might have a chance that someone will notice something is wrong and get them help. I was just called a moody and difficult kid/teen. [info] None [info] 1566152344
damask14 [info] Having a rough night... I've never posted anything on r/depression before because I thought my problems were too mundane to post or would seem like I was throwing myself a pity party, but I'm in a shitty place tonight and I have no one to talk to. Really long wall of text on the way...I was diagnosed with depression in 2012, when I was 20.  I had a really tough semester emotionally. I wanted to cry as soon as I woke up. Eventually we (my mom and I) realized what it was, I went into therapy and got on some meds.  The next semester I studied abroad, as it was part of my degree requirement. It was probably one of the best experiences of my life, barring some isolated incidents.  I lost my boyfriend of 2.5 years, with whom I felt I would be getting engaged once I got back, was taken advantage of physically and emotionally by a number of guys (which, you have to think, was totally my fault...), and I think I was raped, but under the circumstances I can only believe it was just technically rape, and I probably could have stopped it/I was misleading.  Sorry for all the run-on sentences, I'm just letting it flow.  So even though being abroad was an incredible experience, it built up some trust issues in me.My last year of college was great in that I felt better, most of the time, and I finally felt like I had some great friends.  Relationship-wise, it still sucked. My ex had moved on, which hurt, but whatever.  I dated a couple of guys, one who didn't seem to ever want to be around me. The other right before I graduated, with whom I was in a sort-of relationship for the duration of the summer. He was emotionally abusive, yelled and swore at me even after I told him how I felt about such behavior, pressured me into having sex, etc.  So yeah, not much that's helping the depression.My dream job was to work with immigrants.  I want a job where I'm directly helping people and making a difference. Something that would make me feel like I'm worth something.  I had an offer for such a job very very far from home; and then I had an offer for a customer service job at a company four hours away. I would still be using my skill set, but instead of helping people make a life for themselves, instead I would be making sure their differential pressure gages got to them on time.  After much thought I chose the latter, thinking it was too soon to be so far from home and my friends. And I regret it.Now, I've only been here a month, so maybe I shouldn't be complaining. But it is hard. So hard. I don't know anyone.  I have no friends, no one to talk to, not allowed to have pets, etc.  I hate my job.  I'm 22 years old and one of the ladies told me that I'd be a "lifer." While I know I won't, it still hurt for some reason to think that.  I'm just tired of coming home to nothing and having only myself for company.  It gets old really fast, and I'm not really sure how long I can put up with that.A couple weeks ago I met this really cool guy. He was genuinely sweet, attractive, and he seemed into me.  He told me he was waiting until marriage to have sex, which I thought was actually perfect...I'm tired of having guys take advantage me/I kind of hate sex.  We went on a couple of dates, and things were awesome.  We kind of decided very casually that we would date.  Last night he straight up introduced me to his family and friends.Tonight he told me we shouldn't date. Because he doesn't see us getting married.I know that's ridiculous.  I probably dodged a bullet there. But...god damn it if that doesn't make me feel like complete shit.  I already have trust issues, but now...I'm probably never going to be able to date again. I hate my job, but knowing I'd get to hang out with him later was awesome.  Getting introduced to a group of people I felt I was going to have the opportunity to get to know made me feel so much more comfortable about moving here, knowing absolutely nothing.  But now what?  I'm not marriage material...because I have depression? Because I've had sex?  Or is he not attracted to me and is just trying to be...nice?  I don't know. But now, as usual, my hopes were raised, and dropped back down on me like a bag of bricks.  I hate being with myself, but I can't trust anyone else either.  This place has nothing going for it as far as meeting people.I don't know, I'm sure I'm making up excuses. But all I can think of right now is dying. Not over a boy, just because I've been dealt a shitty hand of cards, over and over, even though it's almost not even shitty enough to complain about. I just don't really know where to go from here, and I could use a hug...it'll get better, right?If anyone really read any of that, I'd be amazed. Sorry for whining. [info] None [info] 1413248747
chanesully [info] I woke up day in and day out thinking that everything was terrible, I was ready to die, often thought about killing myself, and I hadn’t felt happy in years. I was diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1526328519
Dying_Letective [info] First time here, sorry if it's trash. I've been diagnosed with depression for about 1.5 years. I used to be going to school everyday, and had a successful year last year.But then everything crumbled like the ruins of an ancient clay tower. The one friend I opened up to had moved away to a different school district. My brother was still stuck in the Marines for even longer than we thought, another brother moved out of the house and got stolen away by his girlfriend, and my sister is always busy with work now.A struggle to find a reason to do anything now. Everything just seems to be a gray blob, and I'm expected to build a cathedral out of it. I haven't brushed my teeth in weeks, and instead just chew gum to make up for not brushing them. I'm always tired and never have energy. I always am relying on my mother and other people to make up for my shortcomings. Everything just seems like there's no use to even try doing it. And even if I do try feels like the only thing I can do is fail.When I'm talking to people I'm always known as the happy one, the one who's always trying to make everyone cheer up and always is there for you, but I think what I need is just a duplicate of me to do that for myself. I crave attention and affection from other people to make up for the fact that I can't do that for myself. Depression has taken every chance of a good life and has turned it into another reason to die. I'm at home right now and I still feel like I want to go home. I want to have that feeling of finally being done with everything and being able to finally relax and just collapse. I had built an entire pyramid of friendships and a social life but instead of being able to maintain that, I've pushed myself away from others. I only have one person that I consider a friend now and I don't even know what their name is in real life. The only thing I know about them is their gamertag. They're the only person that I actually want to talk to you and miss being around whenever I don't get to hang out with them. I feel really stupid now that I'm actually typing all of this out but I guess it was good to admit all of this? I'll admit I did give me a feeling of relief to just get everything that's been on my mind out onto something. [info] None [info] 1572877690
Parasomnia [info] The water rising up, the sun is sinking down. Life has been on a downward spiral for a long time, every time I feel as though there is a way out or a better time ahead something or someone comes along to remind me that they are more worthy and important.I have had a voice inside my head for so long now that its the only voice I ever hear now, constantly belittling me and question my self worth. My family and friends have urged me to seek help with my daemons and it was with a reluctant heart I went. I've been diagnosed with depression and I'm awaiting an appointment to see a specialist, I'm currently taking Sertraline 100mg daily and have been for 4 months now.Recently I felt that things were improving but have found out today that even if I get better at handling this my wife of 8 years night leave because she can't face the thought of living with someone who is not happy. I'm now finding it hard to see how I can save my marriage and get treatment, Should I just pretend to be OK inside and live a life apart inside my head? or get the treatment and loose everything that has kept me from the inevitable. Right now I cant see a good end to this week and have no one I can turn to as I live a great distance from anyone I know. I came he today to let people know that I was here and there used to be good days in my life, of which I now miss. [info] None [info] 1364484731
Disgruntled_Badger [info] I don't know when it started, but I first started noticing how much I slept when I was in high school. I must have been maybe 14 or 15. I'd sleep like 8 hours during the night, fall asleep in classes, go home after school, sleep for another 3 or 4 hours...I'd wake up around 10-11pm and do my homework and other stuff, and then go back to sleep. I'd constantly oversleep and miss my buss etc etc... I guess this was often overlooked by the school because I was such a good student despite these problems. My parents thought I was lazy though, and never considered a real medical reason for it.In college, dealing with this was harder.. high school workload couldn't compare to college and I started performing really poorly. I took the train to school, and I'd constantly fall asleep on the train and miss my stop. I'd grab a coffee before class, but fall asleep anyway. This did wonders on my self esteem. I was diagnosed with depression soon after, but my sleepiness never went away. I talked to my psychiatrist about it and my general practitioner but my blood work all came out fine and I was told to just drink some coffee (?!).Eventually, at 21 years old I went to a sleep specialist at the recommendation of my therapist. I fell asleep during all my naps, got REM within 4 minutes on all of them, and they just sent me home early and skipped the last nap because they had gathered enough info. Doc told me I had narcolepsy. Went for a second opinion. That doctor confirmed too.  Now I'm on Xyrem.I can't believe it's only been a year since my diagnosis, but I really feel way better than before. I'm sleeping better, I'm more productive during the day, my mental health is good. Its good finally knowing what was wrong with me (even though I was kind of a wreck after diagnosis). All in all, I only wish I had gotten a sleep study sooner. I might have saved my undergraduate GPA... [info] None [info] 1466036551
LovelyLucyLoo [info] Just me Hey this is my first post but I've been here for a bit.I'm Lucy and that's pretty much it... Im not special in any way, not smart, not pretty, not liked and not entertain. I've been diagnosed with depression this year but had it for quite some time... I'm trying different meds rn but all I get is side effects and no results... I don't really know why I post here, maybe I just want someone who understands to talk to. Thanks for reading [info] None [info] 1532216567
SaschaStorm [info] Well, someone at school when I was diagnosed with depression told me; 'You're making yourself sad, you see that bridge by the lake? Go jump, you just want attention.' Its what started my self-harm. [info] None [info] 1563736277
fratparty3 [info] I am as happy as the guy in the picture and I have been diagnosed with depression [info] None [info] 1569608471
mylifeisanocean [info] one day of several feeling depressed. Watching "veronica decides to die" Been NC since last august. Ok, my Nmom did visit me twice just to see her grandson.Now depressed..again, been for 10 years.Has anyone seen the movie "veronica decides to die"? Watching it now. I feel jealous. Jealous that she had the meds to try suicide. And especially jealous that in the movie she has such loving parents who would put her into a good hospital and visited her.My dad visited me once when I was diagnosed with depression to cheer me up. He took me to a cafeteria and we had a walk in the city. That was 11 years ago. Nmom has never showed me any feelings. [info] None [info] 1467226305
baneofdaleks [info] [Advice Request] Looking for some advice on a card my mum left me outside my door the day I moved out. Some quick background before you read the actual message, my childhood was a little rough. My estranged father was an enabler to my Nstep-mother. My mother has a whole bunch of Narcs as relatives and had an very rough childhood. I don't know if she has fleas or what.My mother and I have had some very intense argu,ments since I was diagnosed with depression, where she has said some horrible things and never apologised. (I would be happy to provide more details if that'd be help). It all came to a head a couple months ago where she said that I was broken and never fixed and that she is never allowed to 'be broken'. She finally says she doesn't care about my problems anymore. Oddly for me I had been making massive improvements in my life, I had gotten my very first full time job, started going out with friends again and even started laying plans to move out. It was like she just didn't see the real me anymore just my mental illness.Anyway sorry for the rambling the message is below. I would really appreciate some feedback even if it is that I am an idiot and too should forgive and forget.Dear baneofdaleks,This hasn't been an easy year for us together and I'm truly hopeful that you'll find the peace you want and deserve in your new home. Please know that I love you as I have and will and that I'll always be there for you should you need me. I wish you the very best of ever good thing you wish for yourself.P.S. Please know that I'm angry with you- I just don't know what to say anymore so I stay quiet. I hope that can change for us both. [info] None [info] 1473558542
DogedotJS [info] AITB for not letting my wife's friend visit from out of state during a pandemic? My wife's friend is out of work until further notice so she wanted to capitalize on the low air fares and come stay with us for awhile.I'm working from home and my wife works 7-3 at a hospital so a good part of the day it would just be me and her in a tiny apartment, hosting a guest while I'm trying to work.I said no. Then realized that my wife was being secretive while texting. And please note that I am not proud of how I found the following information. She was already logged in on Messenger on my computer and read some nasty messages about me.My wife turned on me and said that I'm being grumpy and that I'm in "one of my moods", started texting her friend screenshots of our conversation to make me look like I was being mean about not letting her stay, even disregarding the texts asking if we could arrange something post-quarantine. She then started talking to her friend about my marijuana usage and drinking, despite being the main provider for the household. She proceeds to ask her friend why I can't be happy without them. I have been diagnosed with depression and take meds for it. I have really bad days sometimes and doesn't understand that I need escapism sometimes with the stress of keeping a household afloat while trying to be strong. [info] None [info] 1586797180
Don_Balon [info] &gt;The Tottenham full\-back, 27, made the admission in a frank interview with several national newspapers.  &gt;  &gt;"It's no secret that I've been through a testing time at Tottenham this season," said Rose.  &gt;  &gt;"It led to me seeing a psychologist and I was diagnosed with depression, which nobody knows about."  &gt;  &gt;He added: "I haven't told my mum or my dad, and they are probably going to be really angry reading this, but I've kept it to myself until now."  &gt;  &gt;Rose said the treatment of a knee injury sustained in January 2017 \- which saw him sidelined for eight months \- was the start of a period of personal turmoil.  &gt;  &gt;"My uncle killed himself in the middle of my rehab, and that triggered the depression as well," Rose said.  &gt;  &gt;"Off the field there have been other incidents: back home in August my mum was racially abused in Doncaster. She was very angry and upset about it, and **then someone came to the house and nearly shot my brother in the face \- a gun was fired at my house.**  &gt;  &gt;"England has been my salvation and I can't thank the manager and the medical staff enough. It was really hard, and being referred to a doctor and psychologist by the Spurs club doctor helped me massively to cope." [info] None [info] 1528322832
thimbah [info] My realization after starting treatment So I've been diagnosed with depression. It's the hardest thing I've ever gone through. Last semester was the worst it's ever been, I had trouble concentrating on studying, I was failing tests, failing classes, blaming myself, panicking, crying. I had never felt so much stress, guilt, apathy, or despair ever in my life. I had a lot of horrible thoughts, to the point where I am grateful to still be there.  It took a long time for me to admit to myself that something was wrong. And it took a lot of convincing from my boyfriend that something was wrong. I didn't want help, I wanted to get through this on my own. To prove to myself I was strong enough.  But that's the thing about depression, you don't really get to win on your own. I didn't talk to anyone about what was going on, except my boyfriend. I told no one that I was struggling, that I was failing, because I was ashamed. I thought I was "just stupid" and "not good enough," it wasn't until he urged me I needed help and I realized my life was being severely affected did I actually seek help.  That was in February. Now in June, I have just had my two week check up to see how antidepressants(celexa/citalopram) have been helping me. The difference has been amazing. I never realized how low I felt until experiencing what it feels like to be hopeful, optimistic, relaxed, and at peace with myself again.  My point is, it took me FOUR MONTHS after seeking treatment to actually START treatment. I wish I had sought help sooner, so I could have gotten better sooner. I wish I had reached out to people, talked to someone about how I was struggling. I wish I had admitted to myself that it's OKAY to seek help, that I didn't have to do this alone.  If you're feeling hopeless, if you feel like you've given up, that you're worthless, that you don't deserve to be happy, that you CAN'T be happy...PLEASE seek help NOW. Don't wait until next week. Or next month. Start now, because it's a long road and and you already need help. It's okay to need help. It's okay to talk about this! The sooner you start, the sooner you get better. [info] None [info] 1465514770
brackley32 [info] How League changed my life Hello summoners.I’m 17 years old and live in Berlin, Germany. I passed a huge milestone today. This morning I had an appointment with my therapist and doctor. They told me that I’d finally gotten over my depression. The only thing I can thank for this is League of Legends. This is how League changed my life.Two years ago, I moved cities, and schools. I moved to a school of almost 2000 students. I didn’t know a single one of them. I found myself struggling to fit in and find even one friend. After about 3 months of constantly standing alone at school, not having a friend, I was diagnosed with depression. I self harmed, and did some pretty messed up things. Months followed and nothing changed. None of the medication I was put on seemed to help me, nor did the therapy. I was skipping days of school, sometimes weeks at a time because I was too scared to go back and face it. And then before I knew it the year was over, and a new one started. With the starting of my second year at this school I made a promise to myself that I would do something, anything, to try get myself out of this slump.I was in an electronics class, and I saw a group of 4 or 5 guys all watching videos and talking about this funny looking game. I plucked the courage to go and ask them what it was. They introduced themselves to me and explain this game called League of Legends to me, and offered to play my first game with me after school. I accepted this offer without a second thought. After school, I rushed home as fast as I could and downloaded the game, made my account and added my friends. They played my first game with me. I played Ashe top, and I absolutely sucked at it. But it was the most fun I’d had in a very long time.The following day at school I saw them, and they were all talking about the game again and I could finally join in. I got introduced to other LoL players too. I asked them if they wanted to play some premade games again later that day. They said I could but only for tree fiddy.Since that day, we’ve all played LoL together almost every night. League of legends has made me friends, and brought me to a better place.I want to thank everyone at Riot for making such a wonderful game. I want to thank my friends, you know who you are. I also like to thank kaceytron I’d go and watch her streams whenever I was feeling down, and unable to play the game. But most of all, I just wanna thank every one of you for just playing this fantastic game.TLDR: I had depression but this fantastic game made it go awayI’d love to read your stories about how (if) LoL has changed your life. [info] None [info] 1432636200
waterisue [info] It can  happen. My doctor, who was already pretty shitty and which I wanted to switch anyway, didnt take me seriously at all anymore when I told him that I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD. Like I was reporting serious physical symptoms and instead of clearing that up ir sending me to a specialist, they send me to a neurologist. They didnt even seem to believe my diagnosis, eventhough I told them it was from an ADHD specialist. They started talking to me as if I was intellectually inferior. After I inquired wether he did it because I just told him I have ADHD he gave me very patronizing non-compliments along the lines of "I think you are a very special person who does think alot about alot of things". It sounded like cheap copy pasta and I was insulted that he thought I was too stupid to see through it. I haven't been at the doctor simce then, but when I do, I won't get around looking for a new one [info] None [info] 1544295251
reCAPTCHAYAMUM [info] I was 'depressed' for years. I was diagnosed with depression, OCD, and GAD, and I was put on SSRIs. I eventually realised that my mind was creating these 'mental illnesses' as an excuse to avoid things that I was afraid of. In a very harsh sense I believe I created my own problems as a convenient excuse to be lazy.There was no eureka moment, but after making this realisation and admitting to myself that no one was responsible for my success and happiness in life besides me, I made a lot of changes. I stopped seeing a psychologist, get off lexapro, started working out, and started putting more effort into my friendships. Slowly my mental illnesses just petered out and now I consider myself mental illness free. I don't want to offend anyone who believes they are mentally ill, but I would suggest at least considering that your 'mental illnesses' are just products you subconsciously created over time to avoid things that you are afraid of. [info] None [info] 1463478037
Ksight3 [info] This is going to be a long one so brace yourselves.I used to be bullied all throughout my life and didn't really stop until I graduated from high school. I came to the United States from Korea when I was almost 8, and didn't speak the language. I'd actually say the language barrier wasn't the biggest issue given that I was put in a class that had a ton of kids that spoke my native language. However I didn't have the best childhood growing up and this carried over in the US in that I didn't make friends very well. I specifically remember a ~~douchebag~~ bully (in the eyes of the public he was the popular kid) who came up to me while I was eating lunch and ask me "Do you have any friends?" and I pointed to my best friend at the time, Scott. He went over to Scott, then came back to me to say, "I asked him if you were friends. He said no. Best friends say yeah" and left.My family actually ended up moving to the next town over about a year or two after this incident. Fast forward to middle school when I was mostly hanging out with Korean kids in my year. Our group consisted of Jason, Michael, Heamin, Sean, Brian, John, Johnny, and myself. Jason and Michael would often get into petty fights with John and I, but Sean was a really beefy dude who always wanted to keep the peace so nothing ever escalated. That changed in 8th grade where Sean moved to the next town over. All hell broke loose. Now, John and I are sincerely very nice guys, and never really put up a fight. We were basically the perfect candidates for bullying. Given that John was already 6'1 while I was 5'6 and scrawny, Jason and Michael chose me as their target. Literally every single day when the school day was starting, I would go to my locker to gather my materials, and Michael would come up to me and kick me as hard as he could in the [coccyx](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coccyx) or shove me into the locker. People saw this, and said/did nothing. In fact, I'm certain teachers saw this and also did nothing as well. Strange, because we had an assembly about bullying annually, and the school had a 0 tolerance bullying rule. (According to this rule, a student found guilty of bullying another student would be immediately expelled). This went on for about a month or so while I kept my mouth shut. One day Michael picked on me again in front of others, and I just *snapped*. I punched him so hard I broke his jaw (well, maybe in my dreams). He and I were immediately pulled into the principal's office, where we were both suspended for 3 days. **THE FUCK IS THIS SHIT? I'm suspended? For what? FINALLY defending myself?** Why is this piece of shit not expelled for crying out loud?Michael stopped messing with me, and this gave reason for Jason to step up his bullying game, which continued through high school. I played a lot of sports all my life, and I had a very good relationship with my volleyball coach, so I confided in her about the bullying. I still remember her exact words: "*Our* Jason?" (Jason and I both played volleyball, I was on the A team, he was on the B team). At this point I had printed all the proof that was available to me. Jason and Michael both had AOL Instant Messenger accounts and would post in their profile information about how I was a sub-human being for god knows what. They made fake Xanga accounts (a Facebook equivalent of today) about how I was gay, had bad hygiene (I had acne back in the day), etc. My coach talked with our school counselor and the talk I got from my counselor was this:"Hey, I heard you were having some problems with Jason and Michael." I told him the years of torment I went through, while he had been handed the proof that I've acquired from online that I printed. "Well, they say they're not the only ones with hurtful words. They say they've been forced to create those accounts, and say those things about you because you had done so as well." I was beyond speechless and absolutely livid. Here I am, having been mentally and physically tortured by the students in this high school, with PROOF that I am the victim, and all I got was "it's hearsay." Needless to say, Jason and Michael got away with nothing but a verbal warning. I'd like to reiterate my high school also had a 0 tolerance bullying policy.Following these events in my life, I developed a very strong hypermasculine personality. I swore a lot, had an "angry" expression all the time, and a very aggressive attitude because I hated being picked on and used this to deter any potential bullies. By the time I went to college, I was diagnosed with depression. FeelsbadmanI am not a hateful person, and even when people do me wrong, I rarely hold it against them the next day. I will tell you however that Jason and Michael are the two people I can NEVER forgive.**TL;DR Bullied all my life until I went to college.*** Got ridiculed and asked if I had any friends* Was physically beaten on a daily basis in middle school* Mentally tortured in high school* Both my middle school and high school did NOTHING despite holding a 0 tolerance bullying policy* Developed a hypermasculine personality* Diagnosed with depression in college* Now I'm awesomeAlso, for anyone that is experiencing getting bullied right now, let *me* tell you. It gets HELLA better :) [info] None [info] 1351064244
tjenator [info] Hey y'all, maybe not the right place to post this, but I recently got some bloodwork done. I'm 19, and my test levels came back at 390 ng/dl, which does fall within normal range. However, I've always had trouble losing weight, I've been diagnosed with depression, and I am pretty constantly tired. I figured it was just a luck of the draw thing, but I was comparing my levels to my mother and father for fun, and my test is about 150 ng/dl below my fathers. He's 43 and pretty overweight, so this is rather frustrating to me. So my question is: Should I consider testosterone supplementation, whether through a doctor or on my own?Additional relevant information: I haven't grown in 4 years now, so I figure I'm pretty much done.  [info] None [info] 1467290493
blanktextbox [info] Yeah. I was diagnosed with depression, later dysthymia, but the psychologist acknowledged that it was very atypical, meeting only one symptom if you don't count attempting suicide. Wasn't willing to agree that I shouldn't have the diagnosis, though.  [info] None [info] 1495761559
mmooner [info] You should ask her if she wants to see a therapist/counsellor. I was diagnosed with depression in highschool, and meds didn't help much, but counseling  really helped me get over it. [info] None [info] 1404005269
aqueezy10 [info] Why do I feel so worthless? I don't know why I've been feeling like this lately, but I feel so worthless. I consider myself a successful person who has achieved a lot -- I work a high-paying job in finance.Probably the main reason I feel this way is because I don't think I have anyone that cares. I don't have many friends and days can go by without me receiving any texts or phone calls. I feel so lonely at times when I come home late from work and have not spoken to a single person outside of work. I feel lonely when I walk outside on the streets of NYC and see people -- who are probably not as successful, good-looking or whatever metric society uses to judge people -- that are happy. I feel lonely when I walk outside and see people walking together and I wonder what I need to do to have someone in my life. I feel lonely when I sit in my apartment in NYC on Friday and Saturday nights because I have no one to go out with but know that the entire world is out having fun.Growing up, I would always reach out to people and make sure they're OK but seeing none of those people reciprocate it makes me feel even worse. I've been diagnosed with depression but that doesn't solve my biggest issue. Recently, I've been thinking if people I know would even care if I'm not here anymore. If someone hasn't spoken to me in months / years, why would they feel anything if I'm not in this world?I'm not expecting anything by posting this. I just want to let out my feelings. Would appreciate it if anyone has pointers. [info] None [info] 1441246923
letsdocrack [info] I agree with you. I used to truly not give a single fuck about what other people thought. However last year when I was diagnosed with depression, I found one of the main reasons I was caught in my downward spiral was because I started to care about what people thought again. I don't know why I just cared again. Not giving a shit about others' thoughts of me is my main obstacle to happiness and success in life. I don't know why I started to stop caring in the first place, and I don't know why I started to care again over the past 2 years.It's dumb. I know it's dumb. I know I shouldn't give a shit but for some reason the thoughts creep into the back of my mind. Lifting does't even help with it anymore. Is this learned helplessness? [info] None [info] 1456255050
ApatheticPotato [info] I was diagnosed with depression a year ago and my doctor prescribed me couple anti-depressant (Escitalopram etc) but all of them seems to have little effect on my ADHD symptoms and I felt more anxious after taking those.  [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1464550474
krutter9900 [info] There are varying opinions on this issue, and I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed medication.  [info] Foursquare Church [info] 1414179437
knoxtodd [info] Lack of Motivation/Depression Hey everyone, I’m 49 days out which in itself I feel great about! However, for the past week particularly, I’ve noticed a lack of energy/motivation and depression. I am diagnosed with depression and take effexor for it, so its nothing I haven’t dealt with before. I’m just curious if this is normal for it to be from quitting this far since. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1550690249
stop_harm [info] 18 F I'm in my low period.. Hello everyone! I'm an 18yo girl who just finished school and is currently looking at what uni I'm going to (and let me tell you, I have no clue). I have been diagnosed with depression and BPD and I'm on the low side today.. I could use someone to talk to. I'm into movies (especially sci fi and ww2 movies) and I think tomorrow I'm gonna go see Toy Story 4 (alone.. But okay). I really like drawing (even though I'm not really good at it) and I want to get into writing (even though I don't know how to). I'm strangely getting back into videogames thanks to Elite Dangerous (I'm a science space girl) but I don't know many.I hope I gave enough of a starting point for a conversation and I hope to hear back from any of you!Edit: I'm sorry but I need to add this: I'm not looking for anything other than a friendship (I know it might sound pretentious or something, but I don't feel comfortable with that at the moment). I thought it was a rule so I didn't need to specify this? [info] None [info] 1562084222
misslemaire [info] Awesome! So glad you're enjoying it. We have visions of lobster rolls dancing in our heads. As for the pups, I'm probably going to register my large dog as a certified emotional support animal with NSAR. I got her when I was diagnosed with depression about 4 years ago; I'm hoping that would curtail any pushback on the rental situation with her.  [info] None [info] 1438479173
jld2k6 [info] The hell are you talking about? lol. I did NOT KNOW I was going through opiate withdrawal. You think I went and put myself in a psych ward to hide the fact that I was doing opiates a few times a week? What you are saying is just not making sense because I was put in the psych ward against my will based on a statement I said that they construed as suicidal. Because of that statement, I was diagnosed with depression and forced to seek treatment for depression while in there. What does that have to do with the fact that I chose not to tell them about doing opiates a couple days beforehand? If I would have known I was feeling the way I was because of the opiates I would have taken the proper steps to remedy the issue, which is exactly what I did when I figured all of that out. Edit: If you are amazed that somebody lied to a doctor about their drug use, when even a marijuana user can be fucked by telling a doctor he uses it, you must be a very very sheltered person to think my situation is insane lol.The situation was not created by my lying either. It was created because of my statement that if God does not exist it wouldn't really matter if you just drove your car into a tree because you won't know any different in the end. This statement was created by the opiate withdrawal which if you want to look at it is what caused me to end up in the ward. Even if I told them I did opiates 2 days before visiting them I would have still ended up in the psych ward because of the statement I made. I don't know if you are reading some part of my story wrong or what but your reaction is just not making much sense to me lol.   [info] None [info] 1388748330
GrebGoneBad [info] Thanks for your reply, this is exactly the kind of advice I was after. =) I have been considering searching for a local AA or other such service that I can, at the very least, go to and ask for advice on what to do next. Maybe I'll put some more effort into this. Im unaware of alcoholism running in the family, at least in my immediate family. But your point on letting alcohol supply the bulk of my good feelings is exactly why I've posted here. I realise what I'm doing is unhealthy, I just need some guidance on how to avoid going down that road. Currently I'm going through a pretty rough time, I've been diagnosed with depression and I've made the first step towards getting help for that, so I realise that I've got an even harder time ahead. But maybe this is a time to change a aspects of my life, and I'm not afraid to put in some hard work and get things sorted. I'm also sure that my alcohol consumption isn't helping my overall mood any. Thanks for the links, I'll be sure to take a look. And thanks again for the advice, it means a lot.  [info] None [info] 1489089244
ThrowawayThomas32 [info] Absolutely, people just start to assume especially in my case there I'm unable to do anything therefore worthless, I get pushed out of projects, I just don't matter, people just don't take whatever you say seriously and just push you aside, It hurts a lot. I really don't mind! I went really in-depth about it in my last thread on here so I'll try condense it down; In school I had two toxic best friends, It was normal at that time (We were three dumb 15 year olds at the time, it was 2011) to hang out lots and if I didn't they'd continue talking behind my back/bully me/or spread more rumours I'm fucking my sister, because I had like a few months of school I toughed it out and planned to cut them off when I've finished school, start fresh going into college. One night out we got mugged by two much older guys, [I had the worst end of it](http://i.imgur.com/fLymuW5.jpg) which sent me into a really bad spiral afterward, my 'best' friends used it as a way to continue mocking me and trying to get girls to sleep with them, one time Aaron (One of them I knew ever since I was 5) said to my face I'm just wearing my splints for sympathy just so he could try have sex with a girl he liked, I wasn't, I had about close to 2 months recovery time and they just abandoned me, I couldn't use all of my fingers for a better part of 9 months. I was diagnosed with depression, PTSD with Social Anxiety coming in later, I had compensation come through from the government and got about 7K out of it, I just isolated myself and just became lazy, you can see after all of that why it's been a tough few years for me personally. Absolutely, I'll be happy to share how it went - After the interview I'm seeing a friend I tend to see once or twice a week, just going to get a pizza and hang out for a bit, she's been going through a project (She's doing media same as I did last year) so I haven't seen her in almost two weeks.Absolutely, I fiddled over the idea of doing up the loft as a livable space then I'd have plenty of room to do stuff there, with the extension alongside that it'll give me enough room to have a bedroom, large media center and lots of other space, even though if I choose not to go into the attic there's a lot of room there regardless, It's still in the really early stages but with money I can check with a architect about what they think would look best, it really depends how much money in my pocket we all have and how far we can push it, my father is probably going to stay here, so it'll probably just be me, my sister and mother moving there.  [info] None [info] 1454013372
_PM_ME_FRIENDSHIP_ [info] Is 3 years not enough time for my boyfriend [32M] to know if he even wants a future with me [29F]? Throwaway.I've found the love of my life, and I know that I want to spend the rest of my life with him. We met through work, fell madly in love with each other, and he's seriously treated me as a queen all of our time together. He's a really good, kind and sweet guy. We've been together 3 years, 2 of them we've owned a house together.A little backstory: I've been in three serious relationships before (2y, 4y &amp; 3y), but I'm **his** first serious relationship. In addition to this, I've been diagnosed with depression and BPD. Last year was hard, I started meds, went to therapy and worked through this as well as I could. He has been **nothing** but supportive and understanding! This year I've found the right meds, and lately I've felt great to be honest, for at least 6 months.Lately, I've been hinting at engagement. Like for example, we were in NYC in October, and at the Top of the Rock - looking out over the NYC lights at night,  I told him as we were leaving "I thought you were gonna propose", and he responded with something like "Lol, sorry".Now, with all this in mind; a few weeks ago, I asked him where our relationship is going. He told me he didn't know. Then proceeded to say that things has been hard with my depression, and that he was hoping for things to get better. He had even though about breaking up with me, but *isn't that normal in any relationship*? (His words.) Also, he stated that he indeed would like to get married and have kids - in general. He just wasn't sure if it would be with me. Lastly, he had felt pressured to propose because of all my hinting.Now I'm in shock - because I honestly thought we were at that stage. And I felt really bad about my past episodes of depression, because now I felt the stigma coming back that I've felt before (and that he has so many times reassured me that I shouldn't feel): that I'm a burden and not good enough for him. I felt humiliated, since I was so sure about him, and thought he felt it too, but no. I'm worried that we might be together for x more years, and then I end up single at &gt;30. I'm thinking I'm not ready for kids now, but I'd rather not be &gt;35, if you know what I mean.He stated pretty clearly that he loves me and wants to be with me, and he makes it really obvious that it's the truth. Everyone around me says he's really in love with me, that it's easy to see also. And I feel it. He promised he would seriously think about our future. I'm just stuck with this feeling of not being good enough, that I'm not mentally healthy enough for him. And it's kind of eating me up from the inside. The relationship is great though, I still feel in love with him and I can clearly tell he really loves me too.Shouldn't he know about now what he wants for us, or does he need more time considering this is his first serious relationship?    ---     **tl;dr**: SO isn't sure about our future, after 3 years together and owning a house together for 2 of them - even if our relationship is great. [info] None [info] 1510671583
Acidic7 [info] GUILT every day at school I try and get in and out as fast as possible I hate people I hate everything. I have been diagnosed with depression and I haven't gone a day without wanting to die but what's stopping me is the guilt of people worrying about me when I don't show up to work or that one friend I have that plays Game Pidgin with me will she worry about me when I don't answer. I am tired of everyone saying if you leave people will be sad, if you ever say this you have no clue what its like. I want to die because I have no one. What will my parents think? Will this affect people that I care about but don't care about me? These are the questions I have. I don't want to be a burden to people. I don't want to burden them with worry or my trouble so I try and put a mask on and act. Who am I kidding I know no one will worry I would just like to think they would. I really do want to kill myself and I plan on doing it soon I don't know when or how but I will fuck this life I hope I am reborn into a crow. [info] None [info] 1552030463
OliveShmolive [info] I have been emotionally abused at work for over a year now, but today I was physically assaulted. My employer threatens to fire me unless I drop the protective order against the coworker who assaulted me. (Virginia) This has been going on since day 1 on the job. Beth (the one who assaulted me) has been rude and pushy, demeaning everything I do, calling me names (cunt, bitch, nappy-headed cow etc...), talking about me to my coworkers. I've been isolated and I'm alone. My family says I come home from work sad daily. I feel like everyone is just talking about me behind my back everyday at work and I'm constantly watching my back and keeping my eyes to the ground. Beth is the groomer at the animal clinic where I work and has been for 12 years where as I've been there for 1. She brings in quite a bit of money for the clinic. For some reason she's got it out for me.   There have been several verbal altercations that were immediately reported to my boss (the owner of the clinic) by me. Whether by text message or by phone. My boss always says she'll talk to Beth but nothing ever happens long term. She does talk to Beth but it doesn't do any good and actually seems to make things worse.   Today was a normal day, the boss was having a day off and I was going about my business like usual, me and the receptionist got lunch. I noticed that it was noon and the sick kittens that Beth had brought in a couple weeks previously had not been fed or had water the entire day. Their cages were filthy and no one had done anything for them. It's not my responsibility to care for the animals that other employees bring in, it's that employees responsibility. It's not my responsibility period to care for the clinic cats or any boarding animals, only hospitalized patients. Another employee spoke to Beth about why the kittens weren't cared for and Beth replied to that employee "Well where the hell is Oliveshmolive?" Implying it was my job to take care of them. Despite this, I got to it anyway because not doing it out of principle would mean the kittens went hungry and thirsty and sitting in their own filth. I did however text my employer to let her know that Beth was not doing her job.   A short time later, I was in the lab cleaning up a fecal test and I see Beth come stomping towards me, slamming the door. She cornered me in the lab and starts cursing me, telling me it's not her fucking job to take care of the kittens, I took care of them and I'm a fucking bitch for telling the boss she wasn't doing her job, calling me a know it all cunt and sloppy cow and a fat bitch etc... I replied "You're not doing your fucking job" and she yells at me "I'm the fucking groomer it's not my job to take care of the animals." I told her that if she brought them in their her responsibility. I don't know what she said here but after quite some times of abuse I eventually said "Why are you such a bitch?" and her face is so close to mine she's spitting in my mouth as she yells at me. Then she bucks at me and I back up against the counter and she pushes me by my shoulders. I immediately took out my phone and dialed 911, I told the operator all that had happened. While I'm on the phone she's saying she wished I would hit her so she could beat my ugly face in. All of the other employees claimed to not have seen her push me, they're her friends after all so why would they admit to seeing it.   When the police arrived, I was out back smoking with another employee. I don't normally smoke but I was very shaken. The police took my side of the story and then went and took her side of the story. Since no one admitted to seeing it there was nothing they could do but they told me if I wanted to I could file criminal charges with the magistrate. I was told by them to leave work, despite me not causing the incident. I have the feeling they didn't believe me. I went to the magistrates office and filed a criminal report and was awarded an emergency order of protection and a warrant was put out to serve Beth with assault charges.   My employer later contacted me by phone. It was a 30 minute conversation and I don't remember what she said verbatim but the gist of the conversation was that if I wasn't to come back to work until the protective order was gone, that I'm not as valuable of an employee as Beth, I was obviously overly sensitive about people talking about me because of something that happened to me in childhood (which we have never even talked about), and that I would be fired if I refused to drop the protective order. I told her that if she were to fire me, I would be taking legal action against the clinic as whole.   I have an interview at another vet clinic tomorrow afternoon and if I'm offered the position, I intend to take the offer and not give a two weeks notice to my current employer. Regardless of the amount they offer me, it's not about money anymore. It's about my mental well being. I feel terrible about myself and my self esteem has suffered huge blows due to my treatment at work. I was diagnosed with depression as a teenager and have been on medication since, which has always been fine but my depression has severely worsened since working there. I intended to leave the clinic I'm at anyway but I didn't want it to happen like this, I was going to quietly give my two weeks when I found a suitable position and be done with it but that's become impossible in light of recent events.   My questions are: Do I have grounds to take legal action upon my termination? Do I have grounds to take legal action if I quit, since I'm quitting to leave a hostile work environment? Am I making a bad decision by pursuing the assault charges? What would any of you do in my situation? Thanks in advance for any replies. I plan on consulting with an employment attorney asap but I want to be prepared and I want to know if it's even worth it to pursue this. [info] None [info] 1370561013
Cumdumpster71 [info] I was diagnosed with depression and was put on a variety of medications for years (none worked). I just forced myself to overanalyze why I feel bad, and usually I have a thousand reasons (almost none of which are pertinent to the moment). So although I still don't feel good, I have mental tricks to help me when I'm feeling really bad: I just tell myself my issue is a physiological one and that I'm coming up with excuses to justify it.I'm not trying to say that your issue isn't a big deal because it really is. I'm just saying what has helped me personally and hope it may help others as well. [info] None [info] 1508627632
mann90 [info] Funny, since I was diagnosed with depression in the military, almost committing suicide. That's cute of you to assume so though. [info] None [info] 1553355274
beetherbubbin [info] I am thankful for the Internet, but I wish it was around when I was younger Forty years I have been alive. More than twenty-five years ago I was diagnosed with depression. Counseling and pills never really seemed to do any good. For so long, I searched for an escape. I hid myself in other worlds; I played a lot of video games growing up as a release and a coping mechanism.For the longest time, I thought jay I was alone. While I knew there was something wrong with me, I was unaware of how common depression actually is. Many thought I had a case of the blues and felt that I could just get over it. All these years later, the stigma is not attached the way it once was.As technology has advanced, an entirely new world at my fingertips has presented itself. A world of so many people who have felt the same way I do or did feel in the past. I am thankful that the Internet came along to show me that there are so many others who have been living with the same monkey on their back that I have.If you are reading this, please know that you are in the right place to talk things out and you are in good company. You don't have to go through things alone. While I cannot speak for everyone here, I know that if a stranger asked to talk and was teetering in the edge, I would jump at the chance to help. Everyone, please take care of yourselves and know that you don't have to suffer in silence and you don't have to suffer alone. I wish that the resources were available to me so many years ago. Some times, I am surprised that I lived this long. [info] None [info] 1483554085
SlimManatee [info] so I’m in college right now and I have a good support system/nice group of friends there + a girlfriend but I’m home for the summer and I pretty much have nobody here. I’m so alone. For hobbies, I like being outdoors, hanging out with people, watching Netflix, casual video games, etc. and I have good days and bad days. At school it’s mostly good days cause I’m not so alone but at home it’s mostly bad days. I know a stack won’t take the loneliness away but can at least support my mood. I was diagnosed with depression a couple of years ago but refuse to take SSRIs now. [info] None [info] 1561130017
Tobizz3 [info] I’m sorry that happened, but I’m glad you “chose” to leave. I went through something really similar. When I started a new study I moved in with 2 classmates I barely knew. They turned out to be assholes, and that was also when I was diagnosed with depression (not because of them necessarily). I left. They scammed me for a couple hundred bucks though, just because they could. A couple years later I’ve now found a study subject which I love, and I’ve surrounded myself with people I click with. I’ve been very cautious about not attracting the wrong kind of person again. My social life determines a lot for me, I’ve come to see. I hope you find something you really enjoy doing. And I hope the people you meet will be different from the ones you’ve had to deal with. All the best! [info] None [info] 1522250566
ssbabymama [info] I get what you are saying. I was diagnosed with depression at a young age after my parents divorce. And EVENTUALLY it got better and I didn't need or want the medication and now I haven't had depression at all since. The gun shot wound you describe is only as fatal as you make it. Depression is a mental state of mind. You are in control to stop the bleeding. Nobody else can stop it but you. I get you're looking for advice on how to handle it to help you deal with it. But you saying "you don't know if it's gonna get better" sounds "doom and gloom" as I said. Because everyone has ups and downs. Rarely do people get kicked down and never get back up because life is crushing down on them through avenues outside of their control. I get it takes awhile to get over being depressed and it isn't a light switch flip sort of thing. But it all starts with YOU and how YOU start to move things in the direction you wantEdit: if the gunshot wound requires a Dr then you should go get a prescription [info] None [info] 1510175596
benanabock777 [info] I'm all alone.. I'm a kid. A middle school student. I was diagnosed with depression in third grade. I am a social train wreck. I can never say the right fucking things. I am not popular at all and always have had the sense that no one will ever be able to fathom or understand my emotions or what is happening in my life. My family is great and I have some acquaintances but no actual friends who I can spill my heart out to.Spring break last week and lately I've done nothing but sit on my ass and bitch to /r/depression about all of my problems which are pretty insignificant as I'm only a middle schooler. I see reddit as this open place of mostly caring people.. It's all I have now. In the past year my sister converted me from atheism to christianity and I "fell in love" with "god". Now.. I see that was a big waste, as I just pulled the wool over my eyes and imagined something besides porn and food loved me. And now, as I'm older and kids are "experimenting", I'm constantly offered drugs, from people who seem like they will be my best friends if I smoke out with them. I know that's shit and I keep telling 'em until I get money, and now I'm considering it. What's the harm? The need for affection sucks as I'm a scrawny little bitch who's reminded of that constantly by peers. Because of that I'm super sensitive and no girl will ever get close to a relationship with me. I know I'm a kid and I shouldn't worry about that, but in a world where one kiss as an eighth grader is pathetic, I feel like a prude. Not that I am.. Just that I am grotesque and disgusting I guess.Just thought I'd vent. Cause what else am I gonna do with my shitty life. [info] None [info] 1333852194
Netflixandzzz [info] 1 year, 2019 can F off now! 2019 has been my worst year ever. I tore the ligaments in my foot in February and its only just starting to be pain free. I had to give up yoga because it was too painful on my ankle. My knees are shot and cause me pain daily. My allergies got worse and worse, and the allergy clinic I've been to all year informed me their medication didn't work on me. I have marriage problems and I was diagnosed with depression 2 weeks ago.But through it all, I haven't had a single drink. I batted off naysayers, friends questioning my motives, accusations and rude comments. I battled with the idea of downplaying my drinking or being honest about how it was a problem.Exactly 1 year ago today I made the decision to never touch a drink again. I got lucky, it's been a pretty easy non drinking year, but hard in every other way.Thank you all for those that helped here, thank you for not judging and being a safe space. Good luck to everyone starting their journey today after a rough Christmas, I feel ya buddy. And to everyone else who's got days, weeks, months or years under their belt, I'm proud of you. [info] 476 days [info] 1577365658
IWAlcatraz [info] I just hate myself bruhAlso my friends abandoned me when I was diagnosed with depression. Rip me.  [info] An Unaware Cat [info] 1540604239
sukaretta [info] The thing is, I’ve been clinically depressed before (about 4-5 years ago, my psychiatrist prescribed me Zoloft and everything worked itself out), so I know exactly how it feels to be truly depressed. This is fairly different than it was back then. I still attend classes regularly (I used to skip classes for 3 semesters straight then), I now have better relationship with my parents, a much healthier coping mechanism, no more outwardly destructive thoughts—quite a turnaround than when I was diagnosed with depression. But now you got me wondering, is it possible for depression to recur just because you haven’t been taking any antidepressants, even without experiencing a significant emotional event? [info] None [info] 1568946288
TDubTheSubBub [info] After I was diagnosed with depression I decided to go into an outpatient intensive dialectical behavior therapy group for adults. I learned about many different people dealing with the same illness as me and some dealing with other illnesses. We all came from different paths in life, but we all found ourselves in that room every morning, making an effort to better our lives. It was more focused on how to live with our illness than what caused it. One thing that will always stick with me is that we were all told at the beginning that we would have to deal with our illnesses for the rest of our lives. We had a couple rules for every meeting that went along with an overarching theme. We never mentioned specifics, no self harming thoughts or the like were to come up in meetings. No judgement was to be passed on anyone else, we were all there to improve our lives. And probably the most relevant for this post, we never made any assumptions. We weren't supposed to try and relate to others problems because we all came from different paths. I didn't know what anyone was going through and they didn't know what I was going through. All we needed to know was that all of our emotions were valid. We all had our reasons and those reasons were valid. I think the worst thing anyone could do to anyone dealing  with mental illness is to invalidate their emotions. Don't ever tell them that they shouldn't feel that way, don't ever make assumptions about what they are going through, and lastly don't bring it up often. We are just people trying to live the same as you.  [info] None [info] 1475647484
ugly-lonely-girl [info] Is anybody else completely lonely? 21 F from EuropeI have been diagnosed with depression. I suffer also from bulimia and I had several self harm episodes. I dont have anybody. No friends, no partner.I've never had one cause I am ugly (no I dont have body dysmorphia..). Is anybody else on my boat? How am I supposed to defeat depression if I dont have any source of love/affection? Please somebody help me [info] None [info] 1566142103
FlashyFire2525 [info] I was diagnosed with depression. Most people reacted this exact way. “Don’t pretend”, “you are only looking for attention”, “you are young, what are you 20? You don’t know shit about depression”.After I got my diagnosis it was all like.....that doctor is crazy. He doesn’t know shit. You are only a bit sad, that’s not depression, so on and so forth.All good now though, my therapy helped me in the end. [info] None [info] 1564381948
UndiscoveredColors [info] I had major issues with depression as a child. The earliest I remember feeling "different" was about 1st grade. I didn't feel as energetic as the other children. I had friends but they were all a lot more happy it seemed. This kept going all through elementary, middle, and into high school. About 8th grade is when I was diagnosed with depression. I started therapy but it didn't help all that much. I didn't find a real connection with any therapist I tried going to until the end of high school. So the ages of 7-16 I was dealing with depression basically alone. I always hid it from my mom getting her to believe I was fine after therapy (until she found out I was still having issues because of bad grades).I then had some issues with Anti-depressants which led to me returning to therapy and actually connecting with someone. During this time I was dealing with a lot of responsibilities I was becoming a "young adult." However, deep inside I felt like I never fully got a childhood. This led to me putting off a lot of those responsibilities and acting like a child when I needed to be an adult. I was finally connecting with a therapist though so I started to improve. I'm almost 21 now and I have a stable job will be starting college again in the fall and really am starting to feel my life coming together. Of course I still have my days or time periods where I feel just as depressed as I used to but now I have better ways of dealing with it. Sorry for the long essay.  [info] None [info] 1374865750
hazzeFox [info] Drank yesterday while on Zoloft (sertraline 50mg) I was diagnosed with depression about two months ago, and I was prescribed Zoloft 50mg, which I've been taking for exactly 8 weeks now. Since day one on Zoloft, I literally ceased to take any other drugs (in my case: weed, alcohol, and Xanax for occasional panic attacks I used to have), and the ONLY drug I've used in the last 8 weeks was Zoloft itself.&amp;#x200B;But yesterday was my friend's birthday, and she decided to prepare a special cocktail with chocolate, sugar, and an alcoholic beverage (in this case Japanese sake, with about 14% alcohol) that she had in her house. She's been telling me about that special drink she likes since last year, but we never actually prepared it, until yesterday. I reallyyyy wanted to drink it and taste it for the 1st time, so I googled a lot about whether it was safe or not to drink any alcohol while on Zoloft, and pretty much all medical websites said it was "safe", although advising against excessive drinking, since it could lead to blackouts or memory loss way faster than if I wasn't taking the antidepressant.&amp;#x200B;I only drank one glass of it (slowly), and then I ate pizza and drank soda afterwards, which I believe helps "eliminating" alcohol better from my organism, than if my stomach was empty for example. I didn't feel anything bad, or even dizzy or sleepy, in fact I was fine and I'm still completely fine right now (physically), but as the overthinking person that I am, I'm kinda anxious that somehow that bit of alcohol could "worsen" my depression or delay the treatment. Am I just worrying too much? I don't really plan on drinking again, nor using any other drugs during the treatment. [info] None [info] 1554023308
justathrowaway313 [info] Thank you so much for your thoughts and in response;I was diagnosed with depression when I was in high school and was treated at a psychiatric hospital and have come a long way since those days. As I am sure you know, its always an uphill battle, and I'm trying my best to stay on top of it. I will definitely continue to try and not engage in self-hate, however difficult that may be.I am starting to exercise every day also, as well as eating way better than before. And I agree, nothing has helped me more than running or lifting some weights.During my time in the hospital I practiced mindfulness a lot. I will definitely remember what you said and what I have learned and try my best to stay mindful. And I will definitely check out that subreddit.It was really hard a first, due to the fact that I equate councilors with my time in the hospital. Despite the fact that I gained a lot in the hospital, it was also one of the worst times of my life, so getting a councilor was really hard. But after meeting with my councilor for a couple of weeks I realized the benefits councilors offer.I think my issue with college is I'm lonely, but more than that I don't feel fulfilled. For me, classes, writing papers and taking tests are just not for me. Originally my plan was (is?) to join the Marines, serve and hopefully come back and be an EMT. My learning style is more hands on and I need regiment and lots of order, that was how I succeeded in high school.Thank you so much for your time and for your thoughts, honestly it really has meant a lot to me. Thank you and be well.  [info] None [info] 1484757557
GreatBigPig [info] &gt; A funny way of describing depression is that you literally cannot give a fuck.I am diagnosed with depression, but I actually give a fuck. I want to so badly do stuff, but many times just can't. [info] None [info] 1409856019
Rickst75 [info] So during my divorce from my ex-wife, we had to have full psychiatric  evaluations done. Part of that included IQ testing. I was diagnosed with depression, which wasn't surprising. And she was diagnosed with Borderline Personality Disorder. All of that aside, my IQ was 132. And hers was 105. There was definitely an intelligence gap, which my therapist believed I intentionally sought it out as a coping mechanism to deal with other insecurities. At the time I used my intelligence as a way to feel superior to her. I wasn't abusive. But I  could certainly be dismissive. But the truth is, we weren't a good match. Not any many levels. But specifically to that one, I never viewed her as my equal. And it put added strain on an already strained relationship. I've since married a women much closer to my IQ who, as my therapist would call her, is my Intellectual Equal. Gone are my days of looking down at my partner. I was forced to deal with my insecurities and work to overcome them.TL:DR Not educational, but IQ. It added stress to an already stressed marriage. [info] None [info] 1443703467
EmperorVir [info] I am adult with kids who attend school. I was diagnosed with depression for the first time over 20 years ago, and worked as a personal care assistant in group homes for people with mental illness. Also, both of my parents suffer from PTSD. I have quite a bit of experience of people with "mental issues". I don't believe Dardoch to be one of them.Is Dardoch even 20 yet? Give the kid some time to grow up.Edit: Added additional context. [info]  [info] 1512592173
F22man [info] Started talking to myself positively. I used to always make self-deprecating jokes and they were genuinely funny to me, but people start to see you as that person who hates themselves and it gets old. I stopped doing that and my confidence has shot up *so* much. People actually come to me first about hanging out or just messaging about things. Its a massive 180 from the beginning of this year. I was diagnosed with depression and struggled with it for so, so long (there's probably traces in my comment/post history somewhere), but talking to myself different and accepting me for who I am, being proud of my likes and interests has made people wanna be around me. I spread positivity and think things out and try to give equal respect to everyone. Basically, be a positive influence on the people around you, and they will want to be around you more. Make them happy and and they'll do the same.  [info] None [info] 1542972172
CraftyxCrafty [info] At least in my case, the apathy and self-loathing is just as apparent in my social identity as my anonymous persona. I have no issue with letting people know that I've been diagnosed with depression, but I can usually make a joke about how unhappy I feel and genuinely laugh with others about it.Connecting with others by laughing at our insignificance feels slightly more real that talking about the weather at least. [info] https://soundcloud.com/yng-farrow [info] 1551170112
dnageiw [info] My date is a bit further off than you ladies, but a lot of times I find myself not necessarily down about the wedding, but more so stressing about things like, "will I be in good shape and fit enough by my wedding day that I won't hate every photo?" or, "will I be a good wife?"  I think a lot of it lately has to do with winter and the crappy, dark all the time, miserably cold weather, but I've been diagnosed with depression before and while I've gotten the OK to stop medication and cope with it on my own, it does creep back every once in awhile. All I wanted to do yesterday at about 3 p.m. was crawl into bed and have my day be over. I'm not really sure if my rambling has helped at all, but I just wanted to know you're not alone! &lt;3 [info] iowa bride | indiana wedding | 10.7.16 [info] 1452407653
TheHungryRoot [info] I doubt it. They really are just looking to make sure that you are of sound mind and that you will be a compliant patient. I was diagnosed with depression at 14, been in and out of therapy most of my adult life and was on antidepressants for a number of years. I was not in therapy and not on meds at time of my consult, but I assured the psych that I was totally fine and that my depression was very manageable. Didn't have any issues getting approval. I also second the person that mentioned that they want to make sure you won't turn to another vice (alcohol, pills, etc.) if you aren't able to "eat your feelings" after surgery, like a lot of overweight people do.   [info] None [info] 1493312916
finmapper [info] I have been diagnosed with depression and know others. It's not guaranteed that the OP is depressed, but they should seriously consider it. The notion of not being able to enjoy *anything* is a red flag:&gt; I'll never understand how people can enjoy doing anything.FI can be an escape path, not a cure. I certainly know that when I have a depressive episode I don't want to do anything besides lie around at home doing nothing. [info] None [info] 1509398675
xXEvilGummyBearsXx [info] Unfortunately the effectiveness of a prescription differs from person to person. I've been on so many different anti-depressents since I was diagnosed with depression. Some had adverse effects on me, both mentally and physically, and some had no effect at all.It can take time to find the right prescription for you. And even then, the medication itself isn't necessarily a magic cure all. My doctor has only just come to realise that I've already researched all the self help options that are out there and have been on so many medications already. He's since decided that the circumstances driving my depression need to be resolved before I see any improvement, and is trying to find me help to resolve any issues that can be resolved. [info] None [info] 1532866637
itsableeder [info] I actually had a similar conversation with my GP a few months ago. I smoke cannabis quite regularly - although unfortunately that's still illegal where I am - but don't drink much at all. She asked me how much I smoke (and apparently I'm a fairly heavy user, but I'm OK with that), then asked if I might be self-medicating. I asked her - genuinely, through curiosity rather than trying to be a prick - whether that was a question she ever asked the people who happily admit to drinking most of a bottle of wine every night after work, and drinking huge amounts on the weekends, every week. She's probably right that I'm self-medicating. I was diagnosed with depression a year or two ago and the meds I was given wreaked havoc with me, so I stopped taking them. Coincidentally (or not) that was around the time that I started using cannabis so heavily. I was very pleased to see my doctor take my question seriously, though. [info] None [info] 1412648966
moonrider18 [info] Yeah, I've been diagnosed with depression, among other things.I agree that it's important to do what I want and not get caught up in other peoples' ideas. I guess I'm still figuring out what I want? Hm...Frick, what I really want is to volunteer at a Sudbury school. Too bad that involves traveling hundreds of miles...&gt;There's no shame in the 'Seinfeld method'/doing ten minutes a day/withholding rewards/whatever strategies not working for you.Thanks.&gt;(prodromal symptoms, extinction bursts)What's this? [info] None [info] 1500094712
Herrenos [info] This is one that irks me too. And I've been diagnosed with depression. It comes and goes. You recognize it and take the steps you need to to overcome it. Stop drinking. Eat better. Get exercise. Get sunshine. Pray/meditate. Take meds if you need them. It's a treatable illness, not some kind of uncontrollable monster.Also: Being Introverted is not an excuse for being an asshole. [info] None [info] 1437571813
Moochkins [info] It might be the time of year, SAD or whatever (I was diagnosed with depression some years ago but I thought it was gone by now), but I really feel like my co-workers are suddenly annoyed by me or have lost all respect for me. I dunno. It's really getting me down.  [info] None [info] 1452073033
allseeingike [info] I was diagnosed with depression and I feel lsd took it away( or added happiness and emotion into my life) My relatioships are shit for the most part though I don't even talk to my family besides my momI get along with my wife though and that's good [info] None [info] 1420803218
RainbowBrittle [info] I feel you. My mom started out being really resistant to drugging and psychological diagnoses. She and my dad disagreed about me getting tested for ADD back in the day. My (clueless) teachers didn't think I needed it, and they were supposed to be the experts--but also, my mom was vehemently opposed to me being labeled "deficient." (This may have also been due to fears that it would exacerbate racial discrimination, as we are black Americans.) When I was diagnosed with depression later (mainly because I couldn't get shit done), she was very fearful that I'd have to be on antidepressants forever, and asked when I could stop taking them. Then, in the course of followup treatments for depression, my ADD was finally diagnosed. I didn't stay on meds for long back then (college), probably because the dosage was super high and I didn't like the way I felt. Mom's had a lot of life experiences since then that have made her a lot more compassionate and less controlling. I bet that if she hadn't, she would be a lot more negative now towards me and my husband going back on medication. As it was, she kind of sighed, and asked 1 or 2 questions, and then dropped the subject. It's really hard for people to recognize that others' internal experiences can be vastly different from their own. I think it's a source of a lot of disagreement in the world today. Like a heterosexual person who has no homosexual attraction being convinced that all homosexuals are just faking it, or made some kind of intellectual choice to overcome their "natural" inclination. People who experience none of the symptoms of ADHD or depression can very easily believe that it's just like when they forgot one thing that one time, or when they felt a little sad for a rational reason. I think it actually frightens people to think that it's possible for another human being to be so different on the inside that they can't understand their experience at all.Developing compassion for others, and especially for yourself, is key to being able to accept your own differences--strengths, weaknesses, and all. I actually feel bad for those closed-minded people who want to beat  up on everyone, who believe that everyone can and should "suck it up" and get a "stiff upper lip." They won't have compassion for themselves when they run into their own limitations. [info] None [info] 1367426937
EllieZomZom [info] What causes depression I've been giving this some thought lately. I've done a fair bit of research, and what I've gathered is it's not really known what causes depression. It's thought to be a combination of genetic, chemical and situational factors. Things like trauma can also have an impact.Personally, my dad was diagnosed when I was 12. His dad had depression too. So I tick the genetic box. I was always quiet, and a bit shy so I got bullied a lot. This led to me having a very low self esteem and I was insecure. I had a very toxic close friend that gaslighted me and treated me badly, this knocked what little confidence I had left. I was diagnosed with depression at age 14, and after a couple years of therapy put on antidepressants. They didn't work for me however, I tried lots of types. At the age of 17 I was sexually assaulted by a family friend. I reported it a few years later, but there wasn't enough evidence. So that's a tick for trauma.Do you have any insight as to what caused your depression? Do you think it's random, a result of bad experiences, or multiple things? I think it's a combination of everything. [info] None [info] 1571884553
derpderpdonkeypunch [info] While I was diagnosed with depression when I was seeing a shrink in high school, I honestly think it was an excessive amount of teen angst mixed with being an introvert and having grown up in books for the most part.  However, there is a history of depression with some people in my family and it is entirely possible that I have/had a minor form of that which was most acute before I developed internal methods to correct for it. [info] None [info] 1365430989
hoogafanter [info] While background checks really do just seem like "common sense", I do fear abuse of them. Especially as someone with a mild and non violent criminal history, I worry about my own rights being taken away because I was diagnosed with depression or something 20 years ago... [info] None [info] 1551365763
catcard [info] I used to know a girl in high school who would deliberately cause drama and have little sob sessions and "breakdowns" and blame the latter two on the fact that she "didn't take her depression medicine this morning."SSRIs take weeks to start working and weeks to wear off; accidentally forgetting to take it one day doesn't change a thing. Her bullshit was especially infuriating to me when I was diagnosed with depression in my junior year. I was actually depressed; I wanted to ram my car into a thick oak tree at top speed. This bitch just wanted attention.Edit: I appreciate all the comments with clarification; I'd never had any side effects from missing my meds for one day, and none of the (levelheaded) people I knew on meds for depression attested to having side effects, so TIL! As with everything else in medicine, and in life I guess, it's different for everyone. [info] None [info] 1336692448
JoeD11288 [info] I don't really know why I'm doing this..  My name is Joe (30M) and I feel so incredibly alone.I work two jobs and have no interests in doing anything. I'm friendly with the people I work with, but honestly I wouldn't consider them friends. I wouldn't hang out with them outside of work. I've never been in a relationship...I had a glimpse of something a few months back and honestly it made me the happiest that I've ever been in my life, but that ended abruptly. I'm struggling every day with trying to keep that person in my life as a friend, because without her, then I'd really have no one. I'm currently homeless, living in my car, trying to save up enough money to get my own place, whether that's a house or apartment, something.Ever since that glimpse, I have felt more alone and lonely than I've ever felt in my life. I was never popular in school, only ever had a handful of friends at a time, and as times gone by, I've lost contact with all of them. I know I'm depressed. I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 18. My head is pretty broken...my heart is too.I really don't know what I'm trying to get out of this, but, I think I just needed to admit to someone, and myself, how sad I actually feel, how alone I actually feel. I've realized that I crave attention and affection, but I have no one to get that from, or to give to someone else. All I know is that it hurts. Everything hurts, and I don't know how to change it. I'm not very social, I don't go to bars or anything like the such, I don't have social media anymore. I've tried to reach out in different subreddits to try and talk to some people, just to not feel so alone, but that hasn't really worked out either.Again, like I said, I don't really know what I'm trying to get out of this but I just wanted to write it down I guess. And before anyone says anything, yes, I am in therapy, it's with a new person and I've only had one appointment so far with them, but I've been in therapy before for extended periods of time, I know it helps me, but, right now, it feels like nothing helps.Anyway, if you spent the time to read this, thanks. I appreciate it. [info] None [info] 1565876235
swegway69 [info] Well first of all I have been diagnosed with depression when I was 10. I always had suicidal thoughts. Last Friday I tried to kill myself and I’m planning to do so again. [info]  [info] 1574958214
daaanish [info] The Great Sadness I was diagnosed with depression a few years back but stopped taking the medication regularly and then eventually stopped altogether.There are times in my life that were much worse than I feel now. To be quite honest, compared to the past I am doing very well. However, the catalyst to my depression remains.I have what my wife and I call "the Great Sadness", what it has become to us is a chronic illness. The nature of this chronic illness is that I can't be happy in my own skin. I can be happy with my two sons and my wife, but whenever I am not around them I struggle to keep going. Since I go home to see them every night, I am able to reset very easily, and so this has kept my depression in check for quite some time. But sometimes I get morbid thoughts... what if my wife left me and I never saw her or my two sons again? I am defined by them, and losing them would kill me. I need to be able to find happiness on my own, something that motivates me and I have both autonomy and purpose for... this has alluded me all my life. I am not stupid person by any means. I am relatively financially well off, I have a great family, and I am well educated (in pursuit of my second graduate degree) however, too many times a day I am consumed my thoughts of despair and "the Great Sadness" fills me. It effects my relationship with everyone and it has caused me considerable difficulty keeping a job.What tools have those of you in the subreddit used to find an internal focus point for happiness? I am just an empty shell of a person if it isn't for my family... that's a dangerous rope to walk on.I need help. [info] None [info] 1425703513
ohnothebanjo [info] I don’t want to be dealing with this illness anymore. Background: I was diagnosed with depression at age 13, but the doctor who diagnosed me expressed that I had depression probably before that. I remember feeling symptoms of depression since about age 10/11. I used to self harm between ages 12-14, along with suicidal thoughts. Long story short, I was talking to my mom and the conversation led to mental health. She obviously knows about my depression but because I haven’t expressed my thoughts to her, she thought I was getting better. I haven’t, I just haven’t told anyone. I tried to get help by telling her that it’s getting bad again but she refused to hear me out. This made me realize that I have no one to talk to about this. I have no friends left who care about me that much, my parents will just judge me and say that feeling depressed like this is a sin. I’m not in a romantic relationship either so I have no significant other to go to. I have no one. Even if I did, no one would understand this. I’m so tired of having depression. I have been struggling for 7-8 years. It has stolen all of my teenage years and a large portion of my childhood. I have no option to get better, I’m stuck. My parents refuse to send me to a medical professional to seek treatment. They can’t afford it and neither can I by myself. There’s no hope for me. [info] None [info] 1561977384
humbummer [info] Disastrous. I decided to pursue an engineering degree at age 24 after getting top honors with an associates degree in engineering at a community college. I commuted to campus with a 40 minute drive, had no idea how college worked, got put in classes in buildings that were physically impossible to reach in time for the next to begin. I had never heard of a syllabus and didn’t know what books I needed for each class. I didn’t even think to ask...I’d sit in class taking notes and couldn’t follow anything.  Because I didn’t know what a syllabus was, I wasn’t reading the book, didn’t know when tests were and didn’t know anything about ANYTHING. I dropped out with a GPA of 0.5. I was suicidal. My wife was of NO help to me. I had meltdowns everyday. I wasn’t aware of my AS then but I was diagnosed with depression. I still don’t like to talk about it.  [info] None [info] 1507986809
Useful_Atmosphere [info] Alright mates listen up This is a post about depression inspired by a post saying you aren't depressed unless you are diagnosed. For those who care I was diagnosed with depression like 4 years ago. And I gotta say, when I got diagnosed, nothing changed, I still felt like shit, I just knew why.Now depression isn't something that can be scaled, it is different for everyone. And effects each of us in different ways. To say someone can't be depressed because they aren't diagnosed is bullshit. It's like saying you can't have a disease without being diagnosed. Now I will admit some people go too far and say they are depressed when they are only sad. But that isn't a reason to disregard everyone else's feelings. If you feel depressed, then you might have depression. Just cause you aren't diagnosed doesn't make your feelings false [info] 16 [info] 1547978510
afternoondelite [info] Tomorrow is my birthday and I lost both of my parents and I'm not even 30. I've been diagnosed with depression since I was in my early teens. I attempted to end everything back when I was 14 with medication. Thankfully, I managed to get myself to move and find help after swallowing the last pill. I turn 28 tomorrow. It will be my 4th birthday without my mom who passed away in April 2009, and it will be my first without my dad, who died sitting next to me last October. My dad was sick and confined to a wheelchair for the last 5 years of his life and after my mom died, I took on his care. I left my job, school, my entire life I had been creating. And when he died, he left me with absolutely nothing, not even a roof over my head. He'd also used my credit to get credit cards that I was unaware of and totally trashed my credit and used money that my mother had left to buy vehicles he couldn't drive, remodels to the house, a new tv every 2 months.. everything was just spent. Today I finished packing the last of what I could at my old house and said goodbye to the ghosts of my parents. I stood there crying. This is going to be my first birthday where I don't have someone hugging me. I don't care about presents or a party, I just miss having them. I keep breaking down every chance I have to be alone to just cry silently. I don't feel like harming myself, but it's difficult. On top of all that I have an ex that won't leave me alone, sending me texts calling me a whore and a drunk a bitch and offensive images. I don't know, I just needed to say this, and those I'm around seem to "understand" but don't really. I'm tired of the looks of pity. I hurt. I tried getting back into counseling, but felt uncomfortable. Tried getting back onto meds to help, but, I felt a sort of stigma about taking them (paranoia most definitely). I feel more comfortable coming online to say how I'm feeling than telling a person to their face. [info] None [info] 1346730578
MishakovPoeziya [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for ~8 years now, since I was about 12, but I've had symptoms since around age 9. It fucked with the way my brain developed, big time. I had no sense of self worth or self preservation growing up, and that lead me to surround myself with some really terrible people, because I genuinely believed I deserved mistreatment. There was a long while where I only justified keeping myself alive so that I could make others smile. I thought that was my purpose in life, and because I based my self worth on how happy the people around me were, the fact that I surrounded myself with people who did everything to self destruct and take me down with them was doubly hard on my mental health.Because of that, as well as the fact that I was dealing with being closeted and trying to cope with an undiagnosed eating disorder, between ages 13 and 18 I had probably 10 suicide attempts, 3 of which lead to hospitalization, and 2 of which were very nearly successful.*"How are you?"* is kind of a loaded question when dealing with depression, honestly, because there are definitely good days and bad days, but I'm so, so much better than I was as a teenager. I still *have* depression, but I'm no longer suicidal, and I've actually been clean from self harm for a little over two years now. Getting rid of the toxic, manipulative people in my life has been integral to my recovery, but it was the hardest thing I've ever done in my life, because despite what they'd put me through, both intentionally and unintentionally, I still loved those people a lot. Therapy has helped me realize that I have worth outside of what I can do for other people, and that I deserve the same kindness I extend to others! It's been a steep uphill battle, but I can see myself with a future, now, and I have a very kind, loving social circle, who I adore to the ends of the earth.To anyone still in the throes of dealing with depression, dear god, despite how overused this phrase is, it really does get better. It might be the hardest thing you ever do, and it might hurt like hell, but it is so fucking worth it. I'm so grateful I didn't die, because if I had, I'd have never known what it means to be happy. [info] None [info] 1569085608
bookishgeek [info] This struck a chord in me because I have been exactly where you are. I was diagnosed with depression and GAD right before my now-ex fiancé broke it off with me. I was convinced I could change and show him what a good person I was, that he'd love me if I changed. But the truth is that after he left me, and I got over the first week or so, I found a real wellspring of strength in me. I cope with my depression much better now as a result. Try to remember that anyone not willing to help you through the hard times does not deserve you during the good ones. Hang in there. [info] None [info] 1345113474
AnxiousIntender [info] When does it get better? You know, the old saying goes "It gets better". But when? I've seen many others who have suffered for years and it's been one and a half years for me since I felt like I have depression for the first time. I was diagnosed with depression soon after, and I'm still receiving medication and therapy.But when I take my meds, it's just like drinking water. It doesn't help at all. The psychiatrist keeps increasing the dose and prescribing new meds but at the best case, all I get is drowsiness as a side-effect.Also therapy feels like a waste of time and money, because all I do is talk but the stuff my therapist tells me is nothing new. She just says "Don't worry about the outcome, tell yourself 'I'll do it'." or stuff like "It can't be too bad if you fail, can it?" or "Don't be a perfectionist and stop thinking in black and white". It kind of helped once, when I had to get some text printed, but I still can't talk to people casually (or do anything that requires self-confidence).Finally, it was my aunt who got me to start  getting help. I couldn't talk to mom or dad because they always said "Think positively" or "It's just a phase". Well, my aunt also had depression, and hers was severe depression while mine is just mild depression and she got over it in one and a half years with medication only, no therapy or whatsoever. And here I am still struggling with "mild" depression with medication AND therapy yet I still can't get over it.I'm losing hope and getting more suicidal day by day (though I really don't wanna kill myself, at least while my parents are alive), so here is the question: When does it get better? [info] None [info] 1497858934
robotortoise [info] It makes me want to die even more than usual.And I was diagnosed with depression! [info] Corrin (Male) [info] 1495506755
small-cute-clown [info] how to deal with boyfriend? so my boyfriend of 2 years has recently been acting similar to how I used to act before I was diagnosed with depression. I've told him this, but hes afraid of going to the doctor solely because hes afraid of getting addicted to the depression medication. I dont know how to help or what to tell him? I need medical advice if that's even possible to get addicted to, and if he even has depression, since he refuses to go to a doctor because of the fear of medication. [info] None [info] 1585459538
WhichDisabilityAgain [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 11, and I had symptoms as early as 7 years old [info] None [info] 1534730058
AnimeGurl678 [info] Well, I personally think that depression isn’t about a person’s mental state but rather the state of society. With political correctness on the high, you can’t hurt anyone’s feelings, leading to society not being able to cope with life. This was normal decades ago, which led to people easily able to overcome it because they weren’t constantly getting *depression* drilled into their head. Now you are expected to show emotion (which is not a bad thing)  but in this case it isn’t just showing it, but making it and excuse for feeling down all the time. And, before anyone asks, I have been diagnosed with depression, I have a fascination with history and psychology, and I have explained this stuff to other people who have depression, and it has helped them overcome it by realising that everyone else has gone trough, is going through, or will go through the exact same thing. [info] None [info] 1555505449
cginevra [info] How do I get through this? Due to some unfortunate circumstances, I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 11. It was relatively easy to handle with plenty of support from my friends and family.At 14, I met an amazing guy who really helped me discover who I was. We were together for 3 years, and I could always confide in him. When I hit an all-time low at 16, he was there for me. He would drive to my house in the middle of the night if I ever had a panic attack. He stopped many suicide attempts. He's probably the only reason I'm still alive.Another series of unfortunate circumstances led to our breakup. I'll be turning 18 in a few months and I have never felt this lost.It's been a month now. At first, I was pretty reckless. I drank too much, downed too many pills, and barely got out of bed.I'm struggling to stay optimistic. Lately I've tried some new hobbies, hung out with different friends, and spent more time with my family, but I'm still numb. I can feel myself slipping deeper and deeper into this pit of depression, especially now that I don't have his support. Reddit, what do I do? How do I get out of this? I don't want to hurt myself like I have in the past, but my control is quickly slipping away. [info] None [info] 1437950529
anjewthebearjew [info] Long time lurker, finally posting. Hey everyone! I just wanted to post and yell about my experience.I have known I was bisexual since I was 14, I am now thirty. I have hidden this fact for over half my life. Recently a lot of things fell apart for me...jobs...housing..etc. It was all due to problems from substance abuse.I finally decided to seek help and I've been in a substance abuse treatment center in Alabama since August 4th. There I was diagnosed with depression and finally got on the right medication. The counselors there have been so wonderful. They encouraged me to change...be honest...hold no secrets.Since I told the counselors I was bi I was slowly emboldened and accepting myselc. Then I told the community in the inpatient facility I was at. Then my family and friends. Everyone so far has been supportive and I haven't noticed any different treatment.After I get out of treatment here on Oct 12th I'll be going to live in a sober living facility in Pensacola, FL. I am finally looking forward to a sober life where I can be myself. I will be back at the treatment facility tonight...I'm on a weekend pass until then. I will have to give up my cell phone but until then I can chat if you like.Thanks to this community for all the insight I've gained from lurking and I hope to contribute more in the future! [info]  [info] 1506891679
xR3ALR3CKL3SSx [info] My psychology teacher wrote me...and I never read the note. My last week in my psychology 101 class in college  we wrote an essay about ourselves and what we learned blah blah blah. That year I was diagnosed with depression. I wrote about how that class help me seek help and understand what I'm feeling.When I got the paper back there was a long paragraph in red pen on the last page of my essay(I could see the ink through the page on top). I put it in my backpack without reading what he wrote. I wanted to thank him before I left on the last day of class but I couldn't. I chickened out last minute. I have lost the paper since then. I wonder what he wrote. Really cool teacher too. [info] None [info] 1505413393
theodopolopolus [info] Yeah I reckon I can say I've been diagnosed with depression (and I do say so just to help those people open up to the idea that I actually am suffering), but it just seems so weird how I don't understand whether or not the doctor has correctly diagnosed me or just dealt with the immediate issue, the blurred lines you talk of just make everything so difficult.I have also had private counselling and I reckon that the person I talked to would definitely agree with me that I struggle both with dysthymia and episodes of major depression. But I don't think that there would be any dialogue between her and my GP. I think the system is just so inadequate to deal with these issues, you can't expect all GPs to understand and know how to treat depression, it really is the confusing type of illness that needs specialists. And to diagnose based on the results of a 9 question questionnaire just seems lacking, a main issue being that it only asks if you've felt this way for longer than two weeks, surely thought should go into if the person has been struggling for over 5 years.(There are probably other benefits to splitting up mental healthcare and physical care that would be quite politically appealing regarding wait times and the like) [info] None [info] 1493476560
oradraffe [info] I just don't know anymore. ( Extremely long post sorry) Hi, im really terrible with words so I dont know how this will go, but fuck it.Im 19, out of high-school, never graduated and I dont even have a GED. Recently moved back in with my parents after living in Las Vegas for 6-7 months, and im extremely depressed not necessarily to the point of suicide, but lets just say that if a semi were heading my way, I cant promise you id move out of the way.Whats the point in life if nothing you do brings you happiness? Ive never really had any friends aside from the ones i have made online through years of online gaming, and that's only 2 mind you. Recently, it feels like they don't enjoy being around me, even though they know im depressed but I don't talk about it constantly.Its just that with my depression being so shitty right now their presence helps me a lot, yet they choose to ignore me. But they don't know that it helps, and the fact that they aren't there like they used to be doesn't help me one bit. And with my sleep schedule being completely flipped and insomnia for days at a time being present, I cant help this extreme feeling of depression.Im also in love with a girl I met through one of them, even though they live 3 states away, and im not 100% sure she likes me back, so I highly doubt she will know my feelings, even though shes the first person I have fallen in love with because shes so amazing. But then again I don't think with my fucked up state, id be able to handle rejection.As a long time reader of this Sub reddit, I notice a lot of people asking people for hobbies, and I only have 1, gaming..but as of recent I cant enjoy it at all. Also, no I dont take meds, aside from self medicating with painkillers and Weed, I was diagnosed with depression at a very young age, and tried multiple meds over the years with none working. I don't know my full intentions of posting here.Maybe I just want someone aside from the small amount of people in my life that dont really care, to know whats going on with me. And hell, maybe its good that I haven't made a move on the girl I love, because no one wants to be around a depressing person like me right? And what if I did kill myself, then it would just be another person im disappointing and making sad? Its just terrible waking up every morning with this constant sadness, and depression raining over me like a thunderstorm. Accompanied by loneliness and knowing that the only person I ever loved wont know the feelings I have. I know a lot of people say it gets better, be patient etc. Its not true for everyone, I have learned from experience shit just gets worse. I said it once and i'll say it again, I dont see why anyone would want to be around me when I have this shitstorm of depression looming over me. If I had to be honest I dont see myself being here in the next 1-2 weeks. If you didn't read the whole thing I dont blame you, my sentence skills are terrible, my life is boring, and this whole post that I made is just a bland Piece of shit.Hope you all have a good day. [info] None [info] 1401787336
10minuteslate [info] This really hits home for me. I was diagnosed with depression around 5 years ago, and I'm now a graduate student working towards a doctorate in clinical psychology. I actually research depression's effect on interpersonal relationships. Try not to be too hard on yourself. It's so easy when you're depressed to be critical of how you're handling your relationships, especially since depression DOES make it harder to be the kind of relationship partner that you would like to be. In all likelihood you are your own worst critic, so try to remember to forgive yourself. The decision to go see a doctor and/or a psychologist is one of the hardest parts of this journey, and you've made a courageous choice. Best of luck, we're all here with you. [info] IH/Raleigh/Railcar/Skull/3sixteen and more [info] 1396639306
simplyOriginal [info] Hey man... Just wanted to post to say, damn, I can relate. I am 3 years younger than you and I am barreling towards the exact same life. I smoke weed every day and am in my second year college. I am probably going to drop out because of my habit. I have dreamed so much of making millions of software development as well, for 2 years now, and still have nothing to show for it.I was diagnosed with depression last week and while the diagnosis itself makes me feel a bit better, I know now I'm in a much deeper rut. So much of my day is spent on reddit or sleep and I'm pretty close to reaching out for help with my addiction to weed. I know how shameful it sounds because pot is the one drug that everyone calls harmless.  I'm curious as to how you are you going to change your ways...Good luck. [info] None [info] 1355178039
itsmoxiebitch [info] I feel you on the numb part. Most of the time I just feel like I’m going through the motions of being alive. I was diagnosed with depression a couple years ago and got better. But the stress of school and losing people I care about in my life...I feel it creeping back into my life. It’s hard to change your routine sometimes. Stay strong. [info] None [info] 1542022016
OrangeJuiceIsNoice [info] Mental illness isn't an excuse for being a terrible person. I've been diagnosed with depression but that doesn't mean I can just go treat people horribly. The fact still stands that Melanie was accused of raping someone, and in her response she never denied doing so. And on the whole "spreading hate" part, I'm pretty sure that it's reasonable to be upset and angry at someone for abusing a person. I don't consider her being held responsible for her actions to be hate. [info] None [info] 1512654231
6L1TCH [info] I am diagnosed with depression and few weeks later my gf also got diagnosed and has to use pills. I legit feel lost and i dont know what to do. [info] None [info] 1560364980
blackday44 [info] To go to my doctor and tell him my problems. I have been diagnosed with depression and I am now getting treatment for it. [info] None [info] 1499015587
al0_ [info] I agree, I think it's a good idea for a professional to either ask if it needs to be explained or to just explain it anyway. And it's my responsibility as a client/patient to ask if I'm confused instead of getting in a huff like I did.I focused so much on the "learned" part.. that he was already judging how I was diagnosed with depression ie I was young and maybe my environment influenced and caused it instead of getting to know me and my history more before drawing conclusions.But when you say it like this&gt;its possible they wanted you to see depression as a changeable thing which is an important perspective for treatment.it gives me a different perspective on why he may have said that and that's why I came to this subreddit so I appreciate you giving another perspective and explaining the differences. Like you said, no idea what he intended but I should have spoken up and asked so I understand where he's coming from. Thanks for taking the time to answer my question. [info] None [info] 1491274639
Lucian7x [info] I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 4, so I'm pretty fucked up. I have no idea what is it like to NOT have depression. That, and I'm going through bad times right now - I crown 2019 the worst year of my life so far, and we're not even through q3 yet.But still, I hope someday I'll get better. See what's it like not to be one of the accursed. [info] None [info] 1563956321
UwUImaDeadMeme [info] If it's been going on for more than two weeks, seek help. Also, I'm seeing a lot of people saying that this may just be hormones. While this is true, it could also very well be something more. I was diagnosed with depression at age 10, it happens. You don't have to be at your lowest to start asking for help. Just use your better judgement. [info] None [info] 1574648146
preternaturous [info] I need to rant, and only you girls have the potential to understand... First off, this will probably end up a pity party. I don't want it to end up that way, but it probably will, so I'm sorry. Some important info first: I was diagnosed with depression a little over a year ago, and I began taking medicine for it. My counselor advised that since the meds were working so well, I should try tapering off and seeing if I'm feeling better without them. I was. So I haven't taken my meds in months. Like 6-8 to be exact. But in the past couple days (mostly last night) my depression hit hard.Here's what's up. First off, I feel like I'll never belong anywhere. I was actually hanging out with my gay friend the other day and some of her friends, and without knowing me, the topic of transgenderism came up, and that led to crossdressing. What I never realized was how much resentment there was towards crossdressers. I mean, I've experienced the alienation first hand before, but not like this. Apparently, crossdressing is "transgenderism's bastard child." I don't fit in with gays because I'm not gay. I don't fit in with lesbians because I'm not actually a girl. I don't fit in with cis-gendered people because I obviously have some sort of gender issue that borders on dysphoria, but I don't fit in with transgendered folks either cause I don't make the full time commitment to get a sex change. I feel like I'll never belong with anyone. And my girlfriend has been trying to help, but honestly, she'll never truly understand how I feel. No one will. Except for you girls and others like me, but that doesn't help cause I only know you girls through reddit and the internet and that just isn't the same. It's like being an astronaut all alone in a module through space. I mean, sure I can radio home and talk to people over the comm. But I'll still go crazy from loneliness cause there's no one physically here. I just feel like I'll always be alone.Furthermore, I feel like I'll never be truly happy. I mean, I'm in a lot of financial trouble which I'm working hard at, and it seemed like I was going to finally get it fixed, but then Sallie Mae contacted me and now it's like, no matter how far ahead I get, something else will show up to ruin it. I'm in the running for an awesome teaching job that would pay really well, be a very nice launching point to get into the career path I choose and would overall turn my whole life around and make me happy, but there's one teacher who could (and probably will) ruin this chance for me, just cause she doesn't like me that much. I feel like none of my friends are truly my friends. I mean, they all know about me and my crossdressing. And some are okay with it. But most of the time, I still have to hid it because they're all, "You crossdress. That's fine. I don't care. But I don't want to talk about it or see it, so never bring it up."I'm unhappy with my body. I haven't dressed up in 4 months and it's incredibly stressing not to, but I can't enjoy it if I do, because the whole point of doing it is to feel attractive and fool people into thinking I'm actually a girl, and with my body the way it currently is, I can't do that, so I refuse to dress up, cause it'll only make me more upset. I have a plan to fix my body and get into shape, but I just can't stay motivated to do what's right and keep me happy, so I keep falling into bad habits and take the easy way out which depresses me more.I feel like I'll never attain any of the goals or wishes I have for myself. I just can't do anything right, ever.I guess the bottom line is, I'm so depressed, that I'm at the point where I would honestly commit suicide to escape, cause I feel it's the only way. But I can't even do that because I'm too much of a coward to take the coward's way out. I'm too afraid of pain and death to do it, so I'm just condemning myself to a life of loneliness, pain, and misery. A torturous existence like that of the Greek Titans Atlas and Prometheus.Anyway, I apologize if it sounds like I just want you all to tell me how great I am. Cause I don't. That's not the point of this, truly. I just have all these depressing thoughts in my head, and although they'll never truly leave, I still needed to get them out somehow. [info] None [info] 1330843695
darkmakeslight [info] Pretty sure I'm undiagnosed adhd but I was diagnosed with depression by a doctor years ago. I find that when I drink energy drinks like monster or a few others I function on another level with a heightened mood as well. I would love to see someone get to the bottom of this so we could all use it to our advantage. [info] None [info] 1556645917
VayneHentai [info] I'm suicidal , and I've been diagnosed with depression from a therapist and part-way from a psychologist.I understand what's happening to you, and my suggestion is reach out&gt;The last time I isolated myself and kept it all hidden was when I attempted suicide.Don't do that, and look for support. [info] 17 [info] 1444793397
foxfunk [info] I wasn't sure where to go sorry. I have been diagnosed with depression, I've had it for 5-6 years.  [info] None [info] 1477684435
Keskekun [info] I have been diagnosed with depression since I was about 14 and we can't really find the cause it's just a state I'm in it seems. Currently however I'm very happy. I've took my life where I wanted it to go, I'm paid enough to never have to worry about my financial situation, I have an amazing partner and I'm starting to get into shape, if I starve myself for a week you can even see a hint of a 6 pack (don't do that). But I'm fucking exhausted, and there is just nothing I can do about it. I just want to sleep constantly and when I do it doesn't help. I feel like I'm getting trolled here. two decades of not feeling happiness and when I finally get to a point to do it my body is like "´Well, we can't have that". It feels like a betrayal tbh. [info] None [info] 1518103703
GotThatBass [info] To me, the reason why I started listening to “sad” music (to me it was goth, metal, emo, rock etc) is because I could relate to it. I was diagnosed with depression/ptsd/a lot of other things before I was a teenager and I remember just thinking, “Wow. Someone else feels this way?” [info] None [info] 1556139202
pm_me_Spidey_memes [info] Fucking preach brother. I was diagnosed with depression years ago and that diagnosis changed my entire outlook on life. I told myself I could beat it. I told myself that from then on I’d do my absolute best to only do things that make me happy. I’m doing that now, I’m off meds, I’m happy and content. I found a job that I love, a place I like to live, doing extra-curricular activities that I love. I changed my life around and it seriously helped ME. I’m never going to say that this is the solution for everyone, but like you said, I’d rather be out finding and doing the things I love than sitting inside playing video games all day feeling sorry for myself.  [info] None [info] 1543962008
ca7cha8esra66it [info] Should I be on an antidepressant? I was on paxil and abilify but then I stopped the paxil and have been off of it for about 2 months and continued the abilify. Since I went off cold turkey (I know I know that's a bad decision) I went through hell at first but now I feel kinda normal. No feeling super suicidal and actually attempting. No getting seriously angry over nothing. I don't feel happy but I actually started to shower and take care of myself. When I was on the paxil I felt more depressed and irritable and like my happy emotions were suppressed. I couldn't smile without it feeling super forced while I was on it. I was diagnosed with depression as well as bpd so I'd assume that an antidepressant would help but I guess it didn't? Sorry if this is all scrambled up, it's hard for me to explain anything. [info] None [info] 1578065493
MaronaPossessed [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12. You don't have to ask your parents if you don't want to. There are people at pharmacies, emergency rooms, and government facilities. Depression is no laughing joke or something to brush aside. Of course, there aren't any over-the-counter stuff. You're not alone and you'll always have someone to go to. [info] None [info] 1524779736
RiskyWriter [info] Hey.  I wanted to write you to let you know that while a lot of my life experiences varied a bit from yours, the over-arching themes are very similar.  I was diagnosed with depression (possibly cyclothymia) when I was 18, but not Bipolar II until I was 34.  I was treated only for depression until then and over time, this made the hypomania worse.  I have been enrolled in five post-secondary schools, and also only have my two year degree.  My cumulative credit hours exceed most programs, but I could never finish.  I hope to go back someday, but not for what I was majoring in.  First I have to climb the mountain of student loan debt I've allowed to default.I have been diagnosed with Anxiety as well as PTSD (this from growing up with my mother, along with a string of horrible things that happened during my late teens).  I also went to a GP for most of my healthcare, though I see a therapist here and there, maintaining insurance and money for co-pays has been difficult.  I am at home now, having left yet another job (I think I've lost about 4 specifically to this disease, though perhaps more that I just don't attribute to it).  My husband works long shifts four days a week, but thankfully has three days off.  I have a hard time with friends too.  I feel like they all abandon me, but the truth is, I'm not an easy friend to have, and I am terrible at maintaining contact long distance (or frankly at all) due to my depression.  My husband and my little brother are really the only friends I have.Anyway, I'm sorry you're going through this, but I thought it would help to know you're not the only one, and that it's not your fault. [info] None [info] 1441551301
edgybirdman [info] !! This!! I was diagnosed with depression before I was diagnosed with ASPD. I was always confused when my depressed friends talked about hating themselves, etc. I always felt empty and I didn't think life was worth it, but for the most part my self esteem was untouched. The doctors described me as a 'complicated case' before they figured out what was going on.  [info] None [info] 1553113124
Zero9194 [info] I was diagnosed with depression and I wouldn’t say I feel sad, I honestly just feel nothing. Sometimes I feel sad because I never feel happy and feel like I’m missing out, but that’s not directly caused by the depression. I don’t enjoy doing things and am tired all day for no apparent reason. The worst part is how difficult I find it to do the smallest of task due to how low energy I am and my lack of tolerance for the most minor of inconveniences. [info] None [info] 1556121640
puremystique [info] I know I'm ruining my family relationships coz of my anger but I just can't stop A little bit about me, I was diagnosed with depression this year once I realised that I was getting sad a lot more frequently with it being more pronounced. A lot of it stems from bring an emotional kid (crying EVERY day over the littlest things) and being told to just stop crying in high school or I'll get bullied.So, I did just that and bottled up all my emotions for the past 9 years, with me just about to finish uni this semester. However, this year I've been losing all my distractions that have let me ignore my emotions, as I'm no longer enjoying my studies which has forced me to confront my actual feelings.Unfortunately, for the past 9 years I've got it stuck in my head that showing any emotion is a weakness. Any form of vulnerability is a weakness. Standing down from your views (no matter how wrong) is a weakness. And thus I have become so much more defensive and instead of simply crying, my first response to anything I don't agree with/anything that upsets me is to express myself with anger and then cry.I have hurt my family's feelings on so many different occasions with my outbursts, saying things I don't mean but strangely feeling a need to stick by what I said because "I don't want to be proven wrong and back down". Even today I had a disagreement and called 3 of my family members idiots, even though I couldn't properly come up with a coherent sentence. Like, I know what's going on in my head but I can't tell them properly coz I'm getting upset and angry. In turn, I feel like they aren't properly listening or understanding what I'm saying and are just using any attempt to belittle me. Was I in the wrong for calling them idiots and making them upset with me? Of course I was. But I can't apologise to them coz I've got too much of this stupid pride in not wanting to back down. I feel like every argument I'm having with them is fracturing my relationships with them, but I just can't stop. I constantly think that maybe it'd be best to move out of home even though I have next to no money because I'm hurting them. But in the same token I am twisted in thinking that I should move out as that will hurt them too. I don't really want to hurt them, I love my family to pieces and I know they care for and are worried about me, but I don't know how to stop getting angry all the time. I just don't know what to do.Sorry for the rant, I've just had a very emotional day today. [info] None [info] 1564927466
losttadpole [info] hi there 21[F] here! I can relate a lot to what you said I was raised Catholic but I am now I guess not religious/atheist I'll go with my parents on Christmas to church just to make them happy but that's the only time.I have been diagnosed with depression for 3 years now and currently still switching meds to see what will be most beneficial for my mental healthI'll be honest I lost my virginity during a one night stand but I'm honestly also not mad about it either I feel virginity is this big thing and I freaked out about the thought of sex forever and then I realized it's just a part of life and I want to be young and free. I get it I'm just like you I can be so social and out going but then a few hours later I just need a break. to kind of unwind and get sometime to myself. Life is all about taking chances if girls keep using you then you are definitely looking in the wrong places. but don't be afraid to put yourself out there because once I did lose my virginity my sex drive was so much higher than before. being in a religious family is hard and maybe you want to keep a little privacy for yourself and its alright. I don't feel as if I have to tell my parent 100% of things I'm doing on the weekends. you just have to let go and getting drunk isn't so bad. getting mad also isn't bad sometimes it just shows how much you care about wanting to change...think of your feelings from a different prospective [info] None [info] 1476505501
Forgo77en [info] I [17 M] feel like I'm easily forgotten about by everyone.   I don't mean to seem petty or anything, that is the last way I want to come off. ---  I am a pretty caring person, at least I like to think. And I am pretty good for messaging all my friends (16M/F - 19M/F) to see how their doing or if they want to hang out. Except once I moved and got a job and started to become slightly busy I had noticed all my friends never messaged to see how I'm doing or if I want to hang out. I had noticed I was always the person to message first.---  I'm the kind of person to see someone "struggling" on their Snapchat story, or whatever, and message them ASAP to make sure their okay. But when I do anything that's similar to that I'm left in silence.---  The job I got had stopped calling me into work after a couple months, but still gave me STAT pay. Making me feel as if they had completely forgotten about me.---  I have always been pretty introverted, but I usually didn't have any problems making new friends. I hate staying inside all day, but whenever I message a "friend" to hang out they tell me they're busy or seem interested and cancel the next day.---  I've met new people and it's the same with them. I met a girl [16 F] who seemed interested in me, but when I asked her to hang out she was busy EVERY SINGLE DAY (I tried to make plans with her almost every week asking when she was available and she never was.). I know some people have filled schedules, but she was home-schooled and didn't have a job. So I find it very unlikely they're busy 24/7 like that.---  I even have had stories told by my good buddies to me where "some guy" did something funny and I had to tell them I was that "some guy". It feels like my face is a blur in everyone's memory.---  I know I'm only a teenager, but it hurts feeling like I'm the last thing on everyone's mind. Whether they are good friends or employers.---  I am diagnosed with depression so is my perception just skewed to see this way?  ---     tl;dr: I always message my friends first, no one messages me. I feel I'm the last thing on everyone's mind, and that none of my "friends" truly care about me. [info] None [info] 1520361268
Coziestpigeon2 [info] I was diagnosed with depression after about 2 years of going undiagnosed. My perception on life didn't really change; I always managed to stay logical enough to realize that my sadness/hopelessness was silly and had no basis to it. After being on meds for about a month...I started being happy. Not a magical, instant change...but my days just stopped feeling so hopeless.  It made a massive impact on my life as far as my mother and girlfriend are concerned.   [info] None [info] 1354906681
We_so_pro492 [info] 2019 has been the best year of my life. As of today I am officially a 17 year old male and a lot has happened in this year in particular that has made my life worth living. In 2017 I was diagnosed with depression. I hated my life and wanted to die at times I didn’t have many true friends. I am an athlete but I never felt like I belonged in the popular group. I was always kind a troubled kid and got in trouble a lot. When I figured out that we were moving to a different state in 2018 because of my dads job I was completely crushed because I thought it could only get worse. I moved after Christmas time and was really nervous. The high school I was going to previously had about 1,000 kids and the school I was moving to had double that amount. When I first moved I was so nervous that I would make one mistake and mess it all up again. I met this kid my age let’s call him Peyton. He was really popular and had a lot of friends. After about a week I kinda mended into his group. It was the popular group I thought they just let me in so I didn’t feel bad. I started getting invitations to party’s. But foolishly I was to sceptic to go to any of them. A few more months past and it was about the end of the school year and I started feeling more happy overall and I started to remember what being happy felt like. Summer time came like a lion and before I knew it I was hanging out almost every day with my friend’s. We were going to party’s going to the beach and I was having the most fun I ever had. It was nearly the end of summer and I could officially say I had beat depression. Football started and I was hyped. During school I was opening up to more people and getting to know everyone. During the middle of the season I had a massive crush on this cute girl I had known for a while at that point. I built up the courage to ask her out to homecoming and she said yes. I was so excited my legs about gave out I went home that night feeling like I’ve done it. We started talking on Snapchat and she admitted that she had liked me for a while and my heart about beat out of my chest. We went to homecoming and dancing with here was the best time of my life. We continued dating through the rest of the football season. My team made it to playoffs and lost. I felt like it was my fault and that I had failed my team. But out of anyone I knew my girlfriend was there for me the most. I knew then that I wanted to marry this girl. Wrestling season started and we began getting more serious about us. Just this week I lost my virginity to this girl. I feel that this year saved me if it weren’t for Peyton,my girlfriend,my team and all my friend’s I probably wouldn’t be here today. To everyone who has ever supported me I thank you for giving my life purpose again. 2019 has been the best year of my life. Thank you all so much for reading this. [info] 16 [info] 1574031491
ganzas [info] Hey OP :) I get the feeling. If it's ok with you, I'd like to share my story. My hope is that my experience will give you the hope that you're not alone in the struggle to live your life. I see you.My experience I've been in therapy off and on for years. I finally found a therapist that I was able to work with about 2 years ago, and I'm still with her (1 hour a week). I've been diagnosed with depression and ADHD-PI, but at one point or another I might've fit the bill for a lot of other things as well. I also take medication. Duloxetine (cymbalta) 60mg, and atomoxetine (straterra) 80mg. I've been on one medication or another for about 7 years now. I've been on this current combination for over three years though, because it helped me through period in my life where I was falling down a mental black hole. I mention all of this because I wanted to say that I get the desire to avoid medication. I'm not a fan of a lot of it: the payments, the scheduled check-ins, the questions it leaves me about my worth and abilities as a person. BUT. I wouldn't change it for myself, personally. Where I was in my life, medication saved me. And although part of me wishes that I didn't take it, part of me also knows that there's nothing inherently wrong with medication. "If you can't make your own serotonin, store-bought is fine"That is not to say that medication was or is the only thing I needed. Ultimately, my life didn't get *better* (as opposed to circling the drain) until I started doing the work of therapy, trusting myself and my therapist. I was in a holding pattern until I committed to the process of sharing with  my therapist and trusting their intentions and ability to be kind. I hope that you're experiencing this as well :) it sounds like your path might've been the opposite of mine: where I relied on medication to do the work, you're trying to "run with a broken leg or sprained ankle" perhaps?On side effectsIf you're worried about side-effects, and that's what's preventing you from trying different depression or GAD-related medications, this is understandable and normal. Side effects aren't what you're looking for, and dealing with them can be really scary and consuming. But if you have a good support network, they will help you through this. They will help you find something that you can live with. For example, I put up with stimulant-related ADHD meds in high school, and I had really bad nausea for years because of it. Eventually, with the support of my therapist who validated my desire to not feel that side-effect any more, I had the strength to mention it to my prescribing doctor. With their support and medical knowledge, we instantly switched to a non-stimulant medication. I no longer throw up every morning now, haha. And I still have the medical benefits I was hoping for. Have you heard the comparisons made between mental health and physical health? It goes something like this: if you had a fever, you might try to wait it out. But if things don't get better within three days, you see a doctor and try some medications for it. In the same vein, I think that if you're struggling, trying to improve your situation yourself (and even with a therapist) is good. But if the problem persists, it's ok to need a boost.Kindness for yourselfI'm glad that you find your therapist wonderful, and are seeing results :) as soon as I found one that I was comfortable with, I started seeing differences too. My personal trauma that I'm working through is quite embedded, so I've been cautioned repeatedly that it might take years to want to put the past behind me. I don't know your situation, but I do want to offer the same idea: patience and time, with kindness and thoughtfulness from your support network, will do wonders. Be gentle with yourself. I believe that forgiveness from ourselves can change the way relate to ourselves. It's ok to feel numb; you're doing a lot of emotional work right now, and it's hard. I can't even begin to write down how hard it is to see ourselves. And it's ok to want something more from life; you deserve a rich and satisfying life with joy and beauty.  [info] None [info] 1532551075
puma721 [info] I was diagnosed with depression and OCD. So I decided I needed to get a handle on things... Kinda doing a reset with all substances and trying to make myself into someone I'm proud of. [info] INTP [info] 1493164720
anupsidedownpotato [info] Definently talk to the doctor who prescribes the medication because they know best. I also have depression and ADHD. I was diagnosed in the first grade with ADHD (Thanks Ms. Maguire). And after trying a range of of different medications I finally ended up with Focalin XR. In the seventh grade I was diagnosed with depression which took a huge toll on my social life, school life and everything else. It was extremely difficult and you'll eventually get through it I would definently recommend talking to your doctor about what ADHD medication would work for you while also taking antidepressants that work well with each other. Your mental health is very important and should be taking seriously. But I think once you get on the right medication it's just a matter of time and falling onto the right flow. I'm just out of my junior year in high school and I'm finally off my depression medicine for the first time and it's actually really hard. But good luck my friend. You'll get through it. [info] None [info] 1499366822
Dogeek [info] I don't think this is BD related, but is there a correlation between the time required to ejaculate, and depression? So, I've been diagnosed with depression last September, and I've always had trouble to cum, even by myself I'd easily last 45-90 minutes. When I started taking my medicine for my depression (escitalopram aka seroplex) I began to last even longer, which was very annoying. Now, I've stopped taking my medication as I don't feel I need it anymore, I'm not happy per se, but I don't wanna kill myself every day. The thing I've noticed though, is that I'm much quicker on the trigger, I lasted only a few seconds inside a woman last night (the whole ordeal took around 30 minutes, as I love foreplay, and we even did some outercourse which was quite stimulating), therefore I'm wondering if there's indeed a correlation between my now premature ejaculation and depression?I have a theory that could corroborate this hypothesis. Given that depression inhibits serotonin and dopamin production, and that serotonin I think is part of the equation to trigger ejaculation, there might be a link. And for the medication that slowed me down even more, the escitalopram, maybe it triggers unnatural increased serotonin levels, up to a cap that the body has trouble going over to trigger ejaculation? I don't really know, and I'd love to hear your thoughts. [info] BPEL : 7.5" x 6.7" (19cm x 17cm) BPFL : 4.72" [info] 1494064583
MayaMaia [info] There were a lot of things, mostly to do with suffering around me. When I was 11 my older sister was diagnosed with ME. If you don't know what this is, it's a chronic illness that basically makes you tired all the time but can give you all these other symptoms like joint pain, sound/light sensitivity, IBS and exercise intolerance. She also had OCD which made her anxious. I prayed God would make her better but she's still ill to this day (good news is, she's the happiest person I know nowadays.) I cried seeing her suffer everyday, and that's when I started doubting.When I was 15 I was diagnosed with depression. Being depressed I thought to myself there is no reason for anyone being in the universe and existence is pointless. I still have this to a degree.  But most importantly, I tried to kill myself. I struggled a lot and I can't begin to describe accurately what depression was like at its worst. I still ask myself "where was God when I wanted to die?" Finally in July my sister's best friend's sister died from cancer. She was 7. She cried in pain, a girl was nasty to her and she had to go through horrible treatments all for nothing. No benevolent God would allow something so horrific to happen. And if he would, I don't want to sing his praises. This also ended my sister's faith in God.It's probably pretentious but I think anyone who believes in God is a blind, optimistic fool. There is a famous poem about not being able to see Jesus' footprints next to yours in dark times because he's carrying you, but Jesus did not carry our friend with cancer, he left her to suffer and die. As for me, I made it through my depressive phases with meds, inner strength and the right decisions for my life. All my family were Christians but we're all slipping away now. My mother is sick of the sexism, elitism and homophobia in the church, and my Dad says he believes god made the universe but doesn't do what you ask him. (He's on the fence really)Sure felt nice getting all that out. I've had it bottled up for months! [info] None [info] 1418586367
heavyheartwolf [info] I relate with everything you just mentioned. Even before I was diagnosed with depression I had this subtle knowledge that felt like I wasn't meant to be happy. I really appreciate the quote at the bottom too, thanks. [info] None [info] 1349245197
Drama_Dairy [info] Nah, it's not about the dogs, my friend, though I thank you for your kind suggestion. My dad died some years ago, and she never really recovered from the loss. She just gets more and more depressed and bitter these days, and she's leaving the house less and not taking care of herself. She has all the hallmark signs of depression, but she refuses to get help for it, even with me offering to pay for it and take her to her sessions. :( It's killing me to see her degenerate like this, and I really don't know what to do about it. The weird thing is that she was all about getting me treatment when I was diagnosed with depression as a child, but when it comes to herself, it's like she has blinders on. She's even gone so far as to comment on the fact that my grandmother (her mother) has depression and needs to get help for it, but we can always see other people's blemishes before we see our own, I suppose. I can't leave her alone, because I know it would spiral her down even further if I did, and I'm the only one who can convince her to go out and do anything.Sorry to unload my problems on you, mate. You're just trying to be helpful, but I don't want to take advantage of your kindness like this. It all just started spilling out before I knew what was happening, lol. I'll figure something out. I can't *force* her to get help, but maybe I can find another way to get her to help herself. [info] None [info] 1528750765
bh_bohrium [info] First thing to say: I promise it will get better. Life always does. That may sound corny but please, hang in there, it will be ok in the end. When I was younger, I was diagnosed with depression. I dealt with it by trying to look for the little things in life that cheered me up, be it the beautiful sunrise in the morning, or the way that my dog always jumped up onto my bed at night. Just be positive, and handle each day as they come. [info] None [info] 1557173236
RoaneF [info] Honestly, and this is going to sound stupid and cheesy, it's really helped me as a person. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 8 years old. Over the years I've seen 6 different therapists and been on 9 different medications, but it wasn't until I played this game and got to the conversation they just played through in this episode that I ever honestly felt like someone out there understands how I feel. Some random weeb game I picked up because it was free showed me that there's at least one other person on the planet that is able to at least comprehend me. And as dumb as it is, that's basically the only thing I have going for me right now and I've latched on to it. I can't honestly claim that the game "saved my life" or something that drastic, but it's given me something that very few things have: enjoyment. And I genuinely love this stupid anime trash game for that. [info] None [info] 1513598211
sccappuccino [info] Should I stay away from LSD if I have depression? I was diagnosed with depression when I was 12 and have been on zoloft since then. I've never tried LSD before but I want to. (I've only smoked weed and I smoke often) I'm a very open person and am excited to try LSD with my boyfriend soon (we plan to listen to Dark Side Of The Moon during our trip) but I want to know if it could have any effects on my depression.Sorry if this question is asked before, I hadn't seen it posted so I thought I'd ask. [info] None [info] 1329713369
batmain [info] I've tried. Earlier this year I was diagnosed with depression, and a year before that I was diagnosed with bulimia and I've never recieved treatment for either one. Money has been tight since hurricane Sandy . [info] None [info] 1375672085
mylycanslove [info] I’m at a loss TL:DR at bottomEdit: I got 6h49m sleep last night. I have been awake for 5 hours. No caffeine. I’m laying down for a nap, as I am struggling to keep my eyes open. Something’s gotta give. I’m going to find a doctor and (if needed) get a new sleep study before the end of the year, as I’ve met my deductible.This is long and I’m mobile. Please ask, if I forgot something.Back story: I’ve [33F] struggled with sleep issues (extreme fatigue, wanting to sleep all the time, sleeping through classes) since I was 17. I told my doctor; my thyroid was checked and my iron levels were checked. I was given iron pills to fix my iron. I was diagnosed with depression at 17 and put on 20mg Prozac. I stopped taking that ~4 years ago (?).I struggled to stay awake, doing anything. Most days in college, I either slept in class or just didn’t go cuz I couldn’t drag myself out of bed.I got to the point where I was addicted to Diet Coke, just to stay awake.I got pregnant when I was 24. I stopped drinking caffeine until I was 8 months pregnant. I started drinking Diet Coke again. 10 months after DD was born, I had my first sleep study, in January of 2013. Diagnosis of narcolepsy w/out cataplexy. I was prescribed Ritalin and Concerta, as I was still breastfeeding. I was on that regimen for 2-3 years (not exactly sure anymore), before I realised I was very angry all the time (anger is a severe side effect of methylphenidate, especially Ritalin). I asked my doctor to switch medications and she put me on Modafinil. It worked for approximately 6 months. She did caution me that a lot of times, Modafinil either doesn’t work or doesn’t work for long, after using methylphenidate.I chose to see a neurologist, hoping he could help me further, as my doctor was no longer able. A second sleep study was done in May of 2017. This sleep study found a diagnosis of borderline hypersomnia. I failed a full hypersomnia diagnosis by 8 seconds. The doctor refused to prescribe medication. I was told that I could only get medication for the hypersomnia, if I was on antidepressants, which I no longer needed.Since then, I live on caffeine. I consume a 16 oz Kickstart (90mg caffeine) between 6a and 9a and another (91mg caffeine) between 11a and 2p. I typically do not consume any other caffeine during the day. If I am having a particularly slow day, I may consume an extra soda or Water Joe (caffeinated water).  I can almost tell what time of day it is, based on how tired I am.I am unable to get more than 6 hours of sleep per night, during the week. I go to bed between 9-930p and I wake between 415-430am for work and drag myself out of bed, as I rarely feel rested. Often times, my first alarm (I have 5) at 345a, wakes me from REM, leaving me über groggy (I have a Fitbit that tracks sleep).So, several questions here!       1) Should I get another opinion and get another sleep study done? I almost don’t want to, as I literally finished paying for the last one (that apparently was NOT covered by the insurance I had), last week.              2) How can I avoid feeling so groggy?                  I’ve tried going to bed earlier, but I find myself unable to. My fiancé goes to bed for a nap at 630p, to be up at 9p for work. Our daughter goes to bed then, too, usually in our bed. I could go to bed then, too, however I’ve not yet wound down, as I don’t get home from work until around 5p.       3) What other things can I use to give me energy/keep me functioning? Caffeine works, but I am hoping to transition to Water Joe, as pop is expensive (so is that, but 💁🏼‍♀️) and I want to cut down on sugars.  I am, unfortunately, unable to drink coffee, as I have never quite developed a taste for it.TL:DR: not on meds anymore, exhausted, looking for advice and suggestions about another sleep study, how to not be groggy, energy other than caffeine from pop [info] None [info] 1572575907
rosacanina_ [info] &gt; Not sure where you’re getting the 3 days max recommendation of medication for sleep from.Those are the guidelines for usage of zopiclone for example. &gt; Er... be careful of your claims and overgeneralization. Medicine is much more nuanced than you’re leading it to be (all neuroleptics causing “numbness” for example and not being able to function for multiple weeks). True, but there's the big three or four neuroleptics that are prescribed like for example olanzapine, quetiapine and haloperidol and at least all the ones I know of have this effect. Maybe not in everyone, but if you're planning to hold on to a job this needs to be factored in to the decision of taking the medication. With any medication, really. Zopiclone causes anterograde amnesia for example, a few hours into the morning meaning you are unable to function for a few hours even after waking up.My definition of "able to function" is very strict... to me it means that the patient can continue everyday activites as usual. ADs can also make you unable to function due to the side-effects. The compulsive yawning due to escitalopram for example has huge social implications making you unable to function. Neurolpetics can also cause issues with vision, which can impact on your ability to drive, which means you can't function as usual anymore. Some drugs cause tremors or dystonia... which aren't considered "severe side-effects" but they can make you unable to function. If you have a job where you need your fingers but they jerk/shake unpredictably this can cause you to be unable to do your job (or any job even) -&gt; thus you are not able to function anymore. If you operate machinery this can also make it too dangerous to continue to work. &gt; People are allowed to drive on second generation antipsychotics, which OP is asking about. The initial sedation is in a minority of patients &lt;10-15% and lasts only a few days.Might be region dependent, but yes.. you are allowed but it's still a heck of a legal gray area. You are also allowed to drive with a blood alcohol level just 0.0001% under the legal limit, but if you happen to cause an accident it is to your disadvantage, even though you were under the legal limit but even under the legal limit means there's some form of impairment and since it caused an accident the impairment was obviously high enough to make you unable to drive... even though you were under the legal limit. It's a legal mess. &gt; Regardless, he’ll need to have a more accurate assessment since we don’t just throw drugs at people for any symptom without a full evaluation.I trust that you don't do that... but it's done... a lot. More than anybody is comfortable admitting. It's literally easier to get a prescription for an antipsychotic than it is for ibuprofene. The latter requires you to convince the doctor that you're in pain (so much as to warrant the prescription) while the former just takes an appointment at a psychiatrist and they'll throw it at you. Not to mention all the cases of misdiagnosis of illnesses as depression and all the misdiagnosis we don't even know of yet. Full evaluations cost a ton of money and time, more than any health insurance or doctor is willing to spend, ironically, because hospital stays cost upwards 600 bucks a day. &gt; There is definitely a consensus and guidelines for treating depression and treatment refractory depression.There's also consensus in the homeopathic community on how to treat some illness. The question is whether the consensus is actually rooted in overwhelming evidence or not. It's very common for psychiatrists to just have a set of medications they prescribe, and every patient gets the same thing (which of course is legit, if you assume the drug cures something and they all got the same thing, why wouldn't you) but this isn't rooted in consensus, it's rooted in "the experience of that psychiatrist"... but obviously other psychiatrists have other experiences so they prescribe different things. That's an inconsistency. If there were actual consensus, it wouldn't be a matter of experience (or preference). The same with diagnosing people. If there were consensus, then if you send the same patient to 5 different psychiatrist you'd expect at least 4/5 agreement, which in practice there isn't. Luckily, this doesn't matter too much because the treatment for a lot of them is the same anyway so a "screw up" in diagnosis isn't really that relevant to treatment. The consenus is limited to what category of drugs to prescribe (i.e. SSRIs, Neuroleptics, Tranquilizers) but that's pretty much it.I've been living with chronic pain for the last two years (although recently it is on an all time low (== almost no pain)) and one of the biggest challenge was having a GP even as much as to look at me (because I was diagnosed with depression many years ago) as the standard treatment for any patient with a mental health history and literally any symptom that isn't visible by eyesight is to send them directly to a psychiatrist without running any tests. My biggest "personal" issue with psychiatrists is that none of them offered me a treatment plan and at this point I don't think there's even a psychiatrist that can offer a treatment plan... which should be possible if there's consensus based on overwhelming evidence. Basically, this puts me into the position where I have to do my own research, read studies, study parts of medicine and pharmacology and do all this stuff I don't want to do because this shouldn't be my job in the first place. [info] None [info] 1506376281
SixCardRoulette [info] Depression, in the medical sense, doesn't mean being "depressed" and moping all the time - rather, it's a horrible, sucking, consuming thing that sits on your shoulder every hour of every day, a thing that can easily and without warning whip-snap you into believing there's no hope and no point to anything because everything is shit and you're shit and the world is shit, and so you either lash out or withdraw for hours at a time.  If that happens, finding a ray of light can quite literally be a life-saver; if you find something that brightens the darkness, makes you feel *something* that isn't, well, *this*, then you cling on for all you're worth and slowly haul yourself out again.  MLP is an example of just such a thing - it's not that it's relentlessly bright and shiny and cheery (indeed, if it were, that might actually tip you further down the slope once the credits roll and you look around and you don't live in Equestria), it's that it draws you in, it's honest, it's *hopeful*.I was diagnosed with depression earlier this year, having suffered the symptoms in various ways for years and done nothing about it because I'm a man and a father and a sports fan and a lawyer, we're meant to be tough but stoic, and not punch holes in walls or go on five-hour walks around the docks in the middle of the night (both things I actually did because they seemed like good ideas at the time).Once I went to see the doctor, was diagnosed and given some antidepressants, things turned around pretty quickly and looking back at some of the stuff I did, it's like reading about a totally different person. But here's the thing - I'm not sure I'd have been able to stabilise myself enough to get myself the help I obviously needed without having found MLP.  It sounds really trite to say it, but plunging into four (at the time) years' worth of MLP from a standing start and binge-consuming it might possibly have even saved my life.tl;dr: Ponies isn't "painful to watch", it's pretty literally what kept me going. [info] Braeburn [info] 1447239482
pickadillybeans [info] I think depression is a wound that stays with you for life So I was diagnosed with depression in my early 20's, so about 10 years ago. Since then I've vowed to find the source of it and to overcome it. I've been through cognitive therapy, psychotherapy, spiritual healing, am dealing with childhood trauma, and am working on earning my major in psychology. I study the brain everyday. I have an extensive knowledge on healing, and most of the time I am a happy and functioning individual, and I consider myself (for the most part healed). But, then there are those days. Those days when you wonder what you're doing it all for. Does anything matter? Do you matter? The days when we retreat from everyone else because their reality is happiness, a reality far from your own. Your bed beacons you  like a long lost lover and whispers  to you to close the blinds, and promises you comfort so you can weep in silence. And on those days, all the healing I know, I seem to lack the strength to practice it. This depression is like a dark entity that comes and goes as he pleases and blindsides you just when you think you're on top of the world. [info] None [info] 1486421761
TheOptionalChoice [info] Anyway for me to get help? I don't own anything, I don't have a job, I don't have medical insurance, I don't have a huge savings.I sometimes stay at my sister's, sometimes at my mother's, friends, ect. I don't live that uncomfortably to be honest.I do handy work for spending cash, I guess you could call it a job but I don't record taxes.I know I need help. I was diagnosed with depression over 10 years ago. Psychiatrist was too expensive and they wouldn't let me keep my medicine without going.I have no idea if I'm eligible for Medicare. I don't even collect food stamps. I've went to the office to apply but they needed mail with a mailing address. I didn't have any on me at the time and they told me to come back with them. I finally collect 3 that they asked for. I get one credit card bill a month.Does anyone have some advice how I could seek depression help? [info] None [info] 1525373215
AcowCatlersDownfall [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, and I feel that way. Usually, everything is shit or everything is bearable. [info] None [info] 1571000182
anxious-wreck [info] Feeling down again when you've been doing great is scary. For the past weeks I've been feeling down consistently and I'm having body image issues again, I'm losing self-confidence, I'm starting to feel stupid, confused, unmotivated again and I'm so scared. All I want to do is to crawl into bed forever. I was trying to do something nice and I can't stop failing which is even worse because it's affecting me more than it should, like it did when I was diagnosed with depression by both my therapist and psychiatrist.I've been doing so well, I don't want to fall back into that hole. It's the worst thing that has ever happened to me. [info] None [info] 1552187191
humanisty [info] Hi. I've read the whole post. Now: I know what you're feeling. I know it's hard. Although we've had quite different lives and families, mine also was no sweet home. I've been dealing with mental health issues since I was about 12, I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 16, I've tried to kill myself in my teenage years three times, and I've been experiencing my worst bout of depression yet for the past year, but I'm still here now, and trust me, you can overcome this. You sound like a really brave girl and believe me, you will be a stronger and better person for what you went through. So please, don't give up yet. You're only 16, you haven't tasted life for yourself yet. It's really not all hopeless.Still with me? Okay. So it sounds like you have a lot of pent up things to talk about. You're not being heard. Do you talk to your boyfriend about how you're feeling? Just wondering, regardless I'd recommend at least talking to a counsellor at your school or something. They've done wonders for me, and they helped me get through education when I was really struggling, never quite reaching my full potential. Second of all, I'd recommend visiting a doctor and talking about this. They will be able to diagnose your depression and then you'll be able to access help. This may be antidepressants (I bit the bullet and got put on some for the first time a year ago - they do wonders) which may help level your moods, they may also refer you for therapy which will help you make sense of your thoughts and feelings. It did wonders for me. Ask me any questions you may have. And please stay strong and don't give up - it will get better. [info] None [info] 1371353912
11jadaway [info] I was diagnosed with depression and chronic stress in 2013. Both mental health problems are commonly medicated with marijuana in places where it is legal/medicinal.I have NEVER in my life claimed to have been prescribed marijuana. Look back at what I said. Did I was prescribed it? NO I FUCKING DIDN'T.Climb back on your high horse. If it really bothers you so much that I have a mental health problem that is medicated with weed then go to a fucking counsellor like I have had to do for 4 years and most likely for the rest of my life. [info] None [info] 1483638980
CardboardLeague [info] Thanks for creating the ACA. When I was unemployed it took me 5 minutes to enroll. My first meeting with my very awesome Doctor I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed sertraline. My prescription cost me $0 a bottle and has been the best thing I have ever done for myself...there's even an argument to be made that it helped keep me from taking my own life. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you.  [info] None [info] 1478656035
Enigmavoyager [info] ADHD, Anger and Relationships As the title says, I seem to be exhibiting all the symptoms of ADHD and I've scheduled an appointment with my psychiatrist but I need to know if it's possible for someone with ADHD to maintain a healthy relationship. I have explosive anger and I've lost everyone in my life due to it. I put my partner through hell with my emotional outbursts and temper tantrums. I am so afraid that he'd leave me if I continue to go down this path. I was diagnosed with depression early this year and was on medication but they made me feel weird and funny. I ate a lot and gained a lot of weight, which further lowered my self esteem. I don't seem to be able to see anything to conclusion and my boyfriend is tired of my behaviour. Please tell me there's hope. How do I educate myself on the disability? Are relationships stable with a person with ADHD? [info] None [info] 1566220734
damnbrothatsucks [info] Yea this makes sense. I was diagnosed with depression yesterday although I don’t necessarily feel sad. I mean life isn’t great but I never thought I’d be depressed.  [info] None [info] 1553736440
Teuthex [info] I've been diagnosed with Asperger's by a woman I only met once, after she spent hours on the phone with my mother, who also tried to make everyone believe that I was violent and abusive.I've been diagnosed with depression, and only avoided being prescribed medication after running out of the room and vanishing for a day or two, by a therapist who I had been seeing for 3-6 months against my will, in which the sessions consisted of me completely refusing to engage with her and telling her that I wasn't depressed. I'm assuming she came to this frame of mind through contact with my father and grandmother, though, to be fair, she could have just been exceptionally dense.I've been handcuffed by a policeman and taken from my apartment against my will to spend five days in the psychiatric ward of a hospital and eventually diagnosed with Oppositional Defiant Disorder due to my father convincing a court that I was suicidal, because I didn't return his calls for a week or two.In case it isn't obvious enough from my tone, I'm not even remotely any of those things; though, ironically enough, that last one led me right up to the brink of attempting suicide, and because of it I very fervently hope that I have a chance to end my life if I'm ever committed to a place like that again. [info] None [info] 1339297721
themoroncore [info] I used to be a devout Christian, I fully stopped believing when I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1469469315
firesohigh [info] Grief ended my relationship I recently lost my father. We were were close and it was sudden, I had to get on a plane and head home within an hour of receiving the call that he had been hospitalized. My father was my only real family and I've had a very hard time adjusting back into my normal life and routines. Its been long enough that I was diagnosed with depression.Just as I was got this diagnoses, my boyfriend of over one year broke up with me. Our relationship was going great until my father passed away. I've become a completely different person, no longer fun or interested in the world the way I used to be. He wasn't very supportive or sensitive about what I was going through, we actually broke up once before because he did not get it and kept trying to talk to me as if nothing had happened. I recognize that this relationship wasn't good for me and it's probably good that he is not in my life but it feels so unfair. There's nothing I could have done differently and yet, I doubt myself. What if I had tried harder/ what if I didn't pay enough attention to him and our relationship? I know that grief takes a toll on personal relationships but I don't know how to move on without blaming myself. [info] None [info] 1516454070
Necromuffin [info] I’m not sure about ‘cool,’ but it was pretty sweet that she personally went out to a high brand craft store to buy me a cute little book to write my poetry in. I was diagnosed with depression/ptsd whilst I was in year 6 (5th grade) due to childhood trauma and that’s the only time I truly felt like a teacher understood and wanted to help what I was going through, even though she was not trained for such a young child with problems and I don’t blame her. [info] None [info] 1562618323
Ketsuryuukou [info] I had to deal with never being alone long enough to recharge at school last year. By the end of it I was diagnosed with depression. I'm still dealing with the aftermath.  [info] None [info] 1412477077
SleepySubBoy [info] 23 [M4F] Sub seeking first IRL female lead relationship - Sweden  Hello! I'm a 23 year old guy in Sweden (I'm not Swedish and still learning Swedish at the moment) and I'm searching for a monogamous relationship with someone I can meet up with on a regular basis.So, a little about me: I'm 180 cm tall, brown hair but it's dyed red. I have a bit of a baby face, like to keep my body completely shaven. I'm very skinny, not very muscular but that's something I want to improve. I dress mostly in black and have a bit of a gothic style. I don't dress in feminine clothing, nor do I think I would look good in them and I'm not interested in feminization. My style is better described as gothic/tomboy-ish. I would consider myself cute and funny, also caring and open minded, if we ever met IRL I will be VERY touchy, like holding your hand, trying to sneak in kisses, putting my head in the crevice of your shoulder and when in private, of course I'll want to poke your butt at appropriate times. I'm an introvert, and highly prefer to stay either at home or just being the two of us if we go out.Some important info you **MUST** know before you contact me:1. I have been diagnosed with depression. This still afflicts me today but I am seeing help and am mentally stable, just get a bit sad at times.2. I suffer from chronic pains, so I have some physical limits and is one of the reasons why I'm not so muscular, since it's very difficult for me to exercise. But it's not like I'm in a wheel chair or anything, I look completely normal. This is slowly getting fixed as I've started getting proper medication.3. When we aren't able to see each other for long periods of time (like holidays or maybe a busy school/work week) I would like to cam chat instead of just texting, even if it as casual as hearing each others voice.4. I have autism. I did develop a bit slower than others, so I don't exactly behave like a 23 year old, more like a teenager, but I still have the mental maturity of an adult. The main issue that comes with my autism is that human contact is a bit weird to me, especially under the belt, so it might take me a few weeks to be comfortable in bed. All I ask is for you to be patient with me.Summary of what I am searching for; A dominant female around the age of 18-35 who is nice outside of bedroom fun and is very caring. Fitness is a huge turn on for me. I am fine with most titles, so whatever you want to be called, I'll most likely be fine with it. Personality traits I find super attractive are confidence, high energy and flirty (I'm very shy and nervous and don't know how to flirt back, so don't be surprised if I freeze up if you're a flirty type.)A great bonus would be if you played any video games, my life kind of evolves around games like Overwatch and a few others, but it's not required.I will give you my kink list in DM's. But here's my limits, just in case they change anything: Gore, extreme age play, impregnation, size play, feminization, tickling, anything to do with feet (legs are fine), vore, furry, blood, watersports, scat, diapers, lactation and bestiality.Well, hopefully I have piqued at least one person's interest. My inbox is always open, so go ahead and leave me a message! [info] None [info] 1586806591
isaktamin [info] I feel like depression leads to anhedonia. Generally, when it first appears, depression is more stereotypically "sad" and morose. It's just that when it's chronic, or when depressive episodes are frequent enough, people cope by becoming anhedonic. I've been diagnosed with depression, and I can pretty clearly remember the crying fits and just absolute weight of sadness I felt all the time when I was younger. Now? I'm used to it, because I've experienced it constantly for years. It's morphed from overwhelming sadness and depression to just a constant state of feigned apathy, joylessness, and stoic lack of care. [info] None [info] 1519760821
peppercosmo [info] I definitely agree. I started to play games after I was diagnosed with depression due to my mom battling with cancer. My ex actually bought the game to cheer me up. I find gaming can be therapeutic and I meet amazing people online, who actually try to get to know me. I use to party a lot in freshman year. Went out 3-4 times a week with friends. Meet tons of guys but was never interested. Maybe it is the type of people I use to hang out but the guys were never interested  in getting to know the real me, other than grab drinks and "hang out". Most guys my age just wants to get " results" and skip to get to know you part. I feel when your in game you can connect with someone not based on physical attraction but base on a deeper connection. I actually rely on my in game friends way more than my real life friends to talk to :)  [info] None [info] 1445408078
Melansjf1 [info] My girlfriend left me a year ago, and I'm still having trouble with it. When she dumped me I went off the deep end, tried to kill myself many times. Begged her to take me back. I don't even know why she dumped me. But I know that while we were together, it was the only time in my life that I felt happy. I was diagnosed with depression in the ninth grade and was never able to sit back and just enjoy my life, I've had fun, and enjoyed moments, but was never happy throughout an extended period of time. Until I met her. We went on our first date and right away there was a weird change in me. People I hung out with at school but were never really close with made comments about how I looked brighter, how my eyes were lit up during the day. I would wake up to a text from her every morning telling my to have a great day and asking how my sleep was, and every night she would call and we would talk about our day and what we were thinking about, talk about things that annoyed us and what we accomplished during the day, and unwound any stress. We once donated blood together and she had to leave the room when they were taking my heart rate because it sped up when I was near her.  My body had physical reactions when I was around her. I no longer complained about things that used to annoy me. I did better in school and in sports because I no longer felt the pressure of my entire life being forced down on me. I went out with her to social gatherings and family events like weddings and Christmas parties. We communicated with each other and would share our feelings and thoughts with each other. I fell for her hard, and she did too. But after two and a half years she broke it off. I don't know why, and I've been replaced by someone else within the last year. I can't feel joy from anything anymore, I can only sit back and think about what it was like while it lasted. I still love her more than anything else. I can't remember what it felt like, but I know I want it again.I wake up every morning waiting for a text from her to start my day. When it doesn't happen I try to make it through the long dull days so that I can get home, climb into bed with my phone next to my head, and fall asleep waiting for her to call. And I dream about how it would go, she would ask me about my day, what annoyed us during the day, what we were thinking about, what we accomplished, and I can finally unwind all of the stress I have. [info] None [info] 1480613437
jackinoff6969 [info] We never ended up getting married.:/ but therapy and medications never worked on me after I was diagnosed with depression 10ish years ago, therapy might help now though. If I find the time, it’s something I should probably reconsider. Thank you for the time and knowledge, every bit of feedback I get is seriously life saving,  [info] None [info] 1538871415
Genshed [info] When did I say anti-Semitic bullshit? Citation needed.My point was that I'm *not* a radical, and yet I have criticisms of JBP. Maybe it's partly because he and I are almost the same age, so I've lived through the same history he has but see it very differently.Full disclosure: I have been diagnosed with depression (like JBP) and, as a history major in college I didn't take any maths classes. Now that I'm retired, I want to expand my intellectual horizon by learning new things. It is revealing that you equate mental illness with a lack of success and a desire to learn with stupidity. [info] None [info] 1555100478
4311104400 [info] Hey man I really understand where you are coming from. I used to be in the same spot funny and really insecure to even think that any female unrelated to me would even like me let alone love me. But I feel that the biggest change for me was when I was diagnosed with depression in my second year of collage. I didn't even know that I was depressed. It is not something we hear about where I came from. You only know it from movies. I was given Prozac and man I can't describe how it changed my life it made me able to get up from bed and actually do something. I worked a lot I did many projects and collage level competitions. I didn't win any one of them but the feeling of accomplishment and what I'm capable of doing gave me this mental edge. Whenever I meet someone and I get nervous I just go back to that place of the things that I did and say to myself that fuck him. He wouldn't even dream of doing half the thing that I did. He is the one that should be nervous for meeting me( it is a a bit arrogant but my insecurities will balance it out in the end ). It just gave me this new self of worth. I stopped using Prozac long time ago I just don't need it any more I got this new mental place where I can left myself back again. I don't say do what I did but find a way to feel you have a real value where you can feel that you are good at something. Just go and do it untill you feel you are better than most normal people at. It will help you a lot. A good thing that women respond really well to confidence. I hate tinder I don't use it but my friends does. I just hate it I hate the idea of swapping or being swapped at just the looks. We are more than that to be just judged by it. If you need to talk about it just message me I would love to talk  [info] None [info] 1530654501
saturn1000 [info] Does therapy actually help? Every time I fall into a depression spiral (which have been a lot worse and happening a lot more recently), I just want to talk to someone about it.I have plenty of friends who I could realistically talk to right now, but it's late and they're all hanging out with other people and having fun and I don't want to bother them. I feel embarrassed almost immediately after talking to them anyway.But I just want to talk to someone and get all this shit off my chest. I'm crying. I want to scream until my throat bleeds. I'm bottling so much shit up and I feel like I'm going to explode. I'm so fucking sad.I would like to go to therapy. That would be someone who I'm guaranteed to be able to talk to. But I went to therapy when I was diagnosed with depression as a kid, and it didn't do anything for me. I went for a few months before my mom pulled the plug because it wasn't doing anything.That was a long time ago. I feel like it could be different this time, since I would feel more open to actually talking about things. I have so much shit I want to say but no one I feel like I can say it to. My only problems are therapy is fucking expensive and still has the potential to do nothing for me.If you go to/have gone to therapy, do you think it's genuinely helped you? Or was it just a waste of money? [info] None [info] 1550379961
Nynaeve_al_Meara [info] I get a bit frustrated with all the comments saying "don't tell people you have ADHD." I think it's okay not to tell, of course, that's your decision, but you're really discouraging others. I'm newly diagnosed so I don't have too much experience with telling people about my ADD, but I was diagnosed with depression three years back and have been going around telling people about that. With my ADD, I find it's difficult for me not to tell, actually. I don't want to tell, I plan on not telling, but than something comes up that's a symptom of that, and I just HAVE to talk about it. Eventually I just gave up trying not to. I've actually found, most people are surprisingly supportive and understanding. Sure, there are some people that don't believe me, but I just do my best trying to explain (it helps that I love talking :D) and if they still don't understand, sure, I get upset, but in the end, they're the ignorant ones and they're just not worth it. In short, don't give up on people because of some asshats :) [info] None [info] 1524389727
Trainer-Grey [info] I was just diagnosed with depression, been a bit tough. I was finishing class the other day, and for some reason I just broke down. My teacher talked with me, and despite the fact I felt so embarrassed crying in front of a teacher, I felt a bit better.  [info] None [info] 1412342758
MeanMacaroon [info] As someone who've been kinda into this 9 year old girl situation I understand her. Here goes my history on the view of a 9yrs girl now on her twenties. It is long but try to read it all.I also had a "broken family" my parents never married and I was an accident (my mother's own words despite how many times she said she wanted to have me this hurts like hell). I never got to grow with both of them. My grandma raised me till 9. Mom was a busy bee who worked to the bone all day and I couldn't barely see her on a daily basis. Not even weekends. It still is like this.So I was an only child, whose father I would see like once a week when possible for him, mom absent all day due to work. So both parents weren't present. One day my mom met a man she fell in love with and I REALLY didn't like him. He was a THREAT. I barely had time with my mom and then out of the blue a random dude walks into my house and gets a ton of attention and affection I was starving to have day to day.He tried to be nice. He was not. He said all the cartoons and things I liked were not real. Needless to say he gave me a reason to dislike him at 9. I was a CHILD. You don't just say to a child that everything they like and believe is not real. Don't ever do this.Some few months go by and I cry at school whenever I'm called to talk about being transfered to another school.We moved in to another city and he had two sons way older then me. The younger one bullied me everytime he had the chance. I hated every second of this. I wished it was a nightmare and when I woke up things would be back to normal.Because 9yr old me was removed of the house with her grandma she loved so much, the new school in which I had friends and my hometown to a stranger's place with a bully and a city that was unknown. No one asked if I wanted this. I just had to accept and I didn't.No one there gave me time enough to process the storm of bad emotions I had to then try to be nice and accept it was my life now. They (the 3 men) quickly disapproved of my behavior as a lil spoiled kid raised by grandma and started to treat me bad. I needed time, space, confort, affection, reassurance. Everything was way too fast. Yes they did buy me toys and took to places that could be fun. But know that one simply can not buy a child's simpathy with toys or treats or a dream bedroom. It takes time to build a nice relationship. It takes space and respect and validation of one's emotions.You are, in her view, an intruder to her life who is stealing her beloved mother away from her. The baby makes it all worse because she feels replaced. She no longer has a family of her own. She is a stranger in the nest.The year after all that shitty moving city and house my mother got pregnant. I always wanted a sister because I was lonely. But it was way too late for it. 11 years of difference is TOO MUCH.I never harmed my mom while pregnant. I was worried about her health and the baby. When lil sis was born everything changed and THEN the bad emotions raised. I had VERY dark thoughts about the many ways I could kill or harm her because of how fragile and defenseless she seemed. I never did anything. Instead, she would always blame and accuse me of beating, pushing, pinching her and so on despite me never doing anything of the sort. Mom would get absolutely furious and yell at me for it while she laughed. It went on for years.I felt abandoned. Replaced. Nothing more than a stranger in a house I didn't belong. I hated this city, the school, the stepfather and his younger son who made my life hell.I was diagnosed with depression with like 10 or 11yrs old. I cried writing this because it all still hurts. I was f--king traumatized at a very early age and shit only build up throuhought the years.So yes get her into therapy asap. This behavior is not normal nor should be accepted. She punched her own mother trying to KILL the baby then wished she was dead. Those are signals of a possible depression she is developing and will only get worse. She needs to have someone to trust and open up to. Reassurance. She must feel like she still has a family and is an important part of it even if it's different and bigger now. Give her time,space, maybe practice some sports so she wastes energy and learns healthy ways to cope with her anger. Give her time with her mother alone as well. Avoid saying the mother is yours now. Don't ever say that. If you didn't great, do not ever use such words. Respect their space, buy some childs books about babies or something if she doesn't know where they come from yet. Assure her she is important an her mother is still hers but you and the baby are a part of the family now. The mother has to set boundaries for her, not you. She won't take orders from you because you are not blood related. Use a calm voice and explain that actions have consequences be they good or bad. She needs to apologize to her mother for what she did and learn that she can not use violence as an answer. But this is between them. Let her approach you once she feels safe to do so. This is really hard on all of you but ultimately harder on the daughter.My apologies for the spelling mistakes and long text block. Best of luck to your family and I hope to have helped. [info] None [info] 1538681515
Crunchy_bastards [info] I was just diagnosed with depression and a vitamin D deficiency, so this comment makes me feel a little better since I just started taking them, hopefully it helps me too! [info] None [info] 1523960164
star-of-morning [info] Weird, but I can't eat or think about food or calories. I feel nothing. So since the 1st of the month I've been fasting and restricting. Lots of plateaus and fluctuations. But in the last week I've been going through major depression. Like, severe as fuck. I don't remember ever being this depressed and I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 14 (I am 24 now). The depression has cut my appetite in half, if not more. Since Sunday I've been eating exactly 180 calories per day. Even those 180 calories make me feel like I'm gonna puke afterwards. I don't actually purge, it's just nausea. Nothing tastes good. I don't crave anything. I don't want anything. Eating feels like a chore.I don't feel hunger during the day but I force myself to eat *something* so I can get schoolwork done. In the evening I do get hungry but I don't do anything about it because I'm too fucking depressed to feed myself. This is not sustainable. Less than 200 calories a day for weeks, or even months on end is not sustainable. Even my ED brain knows that. *I* know this. But I feel like I can't stop. I leave for college at 9:15am and get home no later than 4:30pm and my roommate works 3pm to midnight. My biggest fear is that I'm going to faint and there won't be anyone to "wake me up" or whatever (if I'm unable to wake up naturally, idk, the last time I fainted I was around friends who immediately picked me up and put me in bed) and I'll just be lying on the floor for hours, totally unconscious. I feel like I need a "reset" day to get my appetite back. But I don't know if it will work. I don't know if I can even do a reset day because I get so full so quickly on less than 200 calories. I'm at a point where I'm *terrified* of eating over 300 calories even. I was going to have half a Quest bar to get close to 300 but my depression wouldn't let me. If I did a reset day I would probably just try to eat one full proper meal. Preferably something I really, really enjoy. Have any of you been through something similar? Where you are eating so little, you *need* a reset day to not...die? I mean I know I'm not going to die anytime soon but...you know what I mean. Have you done a reset day so you don't completely fuck yourself up physically? [info] 5'2" | went to treatment | send help | 24F [info] 1521000034
irethkat [info] Hello everyone, I'm looking to enlist in the Air Force next year, after I get myself into shape and my weight down to where it needs to me. My question pertains to my medical history. When I was 15 I was diagnosed with depression. What are the chances of getting into the Air Force with that on my medical record? [info] None [info] 1556128072
denimonster [info] Totally normal dude. I’m 24, in my second year at college with my parents still supporting me. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 19 years old so I took a break from school and focused on football (played professionally here) for a few years. Then started school when I was 23, it’s never too late to get a degree! [info] None [info] 1518653470
jesterhed40 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression, but I showed the symptoms since I was a teenager when I was still a Christian.  My depression actually has nothing to do with my views on religion or the absence thereof. The funny thing is, since I acknowledged myself as an atheist only 2 years ago, I actually feel more free than I have ever been concerning my own worldview and comfort.  My mind belongs to me and me alone, and I am ultimately responsible for my own actions.  I try to do good things for the sake of being good and making the world a nicer place rather than feel like I'm being watched and I'll go to hell if I miss a step.  If you spend all your life worrying over the afterlife or lack thereof, well, there goes your life and you missed out on it.  We have to work with what we have now and not let fear and uncertainty rule us.  For me, not having control over something and obsessing over that fact sort of led to my depression. [info] None [info] 1338869172
MsgPhoHartburn [info] If I were you, I'd stop taking the Wellbutrin since it's not necessary for you to take. Why take something if you don't need it and it has adverse or undesired side effects?I took Wellbutrin for a while when I was diagnosed with depression and hated the false sense of happiness so I stopped the drug and just coasted through with depression.PS. You now know what's like to be one of us guys. Welcome to the club. [info] None [info] 1327341434
uwuyouresowarm [info] thank you immensely. I do not currently take any unprescribed drugs or alcohol because at least for me it just makes things worse. I do see both a physiatrist every month or two, and and a therapist every week. I am diagnosed with depression, ADHD, and dissociative disorder (which I have a whole lot of thoughts about but we don’t have time for that) and I take Adderall for the ADHD. I carry a hydroflask at all times so I drink water almost religiously, and it helps if it’s ice cold because it kind of brings me back. I also tend to draw often. sometimes serious drawings or little sketches like the circles you mentioned. thank you for your advice and I will try some of what you mentioned:) 💕 [info] None [info] 1557006332
dcofftheheezay [info] On another note, I was told to lie about a few things on my SF86 by my recruiter and I'm worried about how that will affect my security clearance, in the near future and further out.   I've had an interview, they told me some things they were able to find, I did a good job of explaining them, they followed up a couple of weeks later asking for paperwork on my defaulted and then consolidated loans. I've smoked weed, plenty of witnesses but no criminal history, and I was told to list that I lived with my grandmother instead of listing every single apartment, all in the same county, most in the same town, and I was diagnosed with depression back in college but never saw a therapist and medication didn't help, busting my ass did. I don't think I was really ill honestly, and they're all in my opinion white lies but I just trusted my recruiters and didn't see it as a big deal if they didn't. After doing some reading I'm high key nervous about my future with this. [info] None [info] 1531358146
chazzhenry111 [info] Despite seing a Therapist my Depression got even more worse So yeah I have been diagnosed with depression last March 7 and after taking some pills and medication I still feel hopeless. Like despite my attempts to become  better I still can't, and ever since I started taking these medication I still feel the same. It's like these medications are just illusions that will tell us we are going to get better but the truth is that it is not. Though some of us does get better but just gotta wait something or someone that can trigger that depression again. Like depression comes and go then comes again. And I am sick of it knowing that one day something will just trigger it. And all these therapy does is makes you forget your depression. Like fuck this I'd better be dead than to live in this cycle. [info] None [info] 1584596754
etherealpwincess [info] YES! I was diagnosed with depression a while back, but I honestly think a lot of it had to do with the BED, feeling like no one understood me, not performing well in classes that actually required mental effort from me for once, etc. I was never really able to find an answer for why I was so depressed, but I finally think I might actually have one.I was worried about how long I could stay on the vyvanse, as I'm new to it, but what you said is actually quite hopeful. And what's more, you personally could just stay on vyvanse until you're independent enough to get an ADHD diagnosis on your own? But I definitely understand the "trying not to push it" sentiment. Now that I actually have vyvanse for BED, I'm hoping I don't say anything wrong that makes the psychiatrist take it away from me. Just be glad your doctor sounds very good💕 [info] None [info] 1543188001
AlexEH [info] Where to seek help in Toronto? I was diagnosed with depression and depersonalization, but i have good reasons to think it might be Bipolar type 2. I was wondering if anyone on here knows where i could go to talk to someone about it. I'm having a hard time finding people who seem to know about it. Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1425364263
Dsiee [info] Man, It pains me to read things like this. Australia has inherited the same problem, i think.I haven't cried since i was 11 years old. I don't even know if i can anymore. I was diagnosed with depression at 16 and slowly improved when i went to university, but of course never cured. 8 years later I'm working and falling back down. I know i need to get better but i don't know that i can or should be bothered. Whenever i go to talk about it i just feel like a whining little bitch, which really doesn't help. I doubt my coworkers even 'believe' in mental illness.Fuck, sorry for the pity parade. I just need to vent. [info] None [info] 1536134068
metalgirl00 [info] Does anyone else have severe depression and mood swings 1-2 weeks before their period? I've always had mood swings before and during my period, but they've been getting worse since about November. I've also been diagnosed with depression and I'm on medication for it. I was diagnosed with depression long before this started happening.It seems like the nausea with my period has gotten better, but the mood swings have become a lot worse. I was put on birth control when I was diagnosed with PCOS (last June) and it made my depression worse so I stopped taking it. I don't know what to do about the depression before my period, does anyone else go through this and know how to deal with it? [info] None [info] 1547156984
The_Engineer [info] I'm glad you are doing better.  I think every child has to grow up by overcoming the faults of their parents.  I think you have a very tough lot, compared to most everyone, but it is your lot and you do have control over it.  I was diagnosed with depression before I was 10 years old, and it is really tough to get past it.  Glad you are taking your meds :-). [info] None [info] 1339732791
missmalibu [info] Were there times in your life where you didn't feel depression, but rather the opposite?  I was diagnosed with depression for 10 years, and the meds they gave me killed my sex drive altogether.  The meds also didn't seem to improve my emotional or social state, actually made those things tons worse.  Years later they discovered I was actually bi-polar (and I had been taking meds that weren't right for me on and off for over a decade!) [info] None [info] 1270260411
SlightlyWeird [info] Redditors on anti-depressants, which anti-depressants should I avoid? Firstly I am in the UK and I'm going to presume there's quite a few different drugs that are available in some places in the world and not in others.Secondly I know some people are going to have a lot to say about this thread and whether or not I need this or whatever so let me start by saying it is VERY difficult to get the right words out to explain this so please, bare with me.Thirdly I know different people react differently to drugs and so the result is not the same with each and every person, but I also know there are times when quite a few people react badly to a particular drug and I just want to be well informed before I talk to my doctor.I was diagnosed with depression a couple of months ago after a friend and fellow sufferer told me to go to the doctors because she was seriously worried about me. I wanted at first to try other ways of getting through this and although I have found one or two things that have helped so far and have some amazing friends I can talk to it hasn't abated the problem entirely and I am really starting to struggle, the black ghost (I like dogs a lot so I call mine a ghost) is consuming everything I do and I'm sick of it. I'm about to go back to my doctor and ask for more help but I have been warned by a couple of friends that there are some anti-depressants I should avoid entirely if possible because of some of the more severe side effects etc that are quite common. It would be really great if I could get some suggestions of drugs people have had problems with so I can attempt a little background research before I go and see the doc.Thanks in advance :) [info] None [info] 1436951389
cclites [info] I was diagnosed with depression a month ago, and I hear you. In spite of doing everything right to get my arms around my ADHD, I would wake up every morning thinking 'not good enough, not good enough' on a repeat loop. Basically my ADHD was 'under control' (ha-ha, under control.... right), and the underlying depression sort of came to the forefront.Doctor prescribed Lexipro, and wow, what a difference. My patience level is better, and my self-confidence showed up after being non-existent for most of my life. If you can, see a therapist or doctor and see if they can help.My therapist gave me a good suggestion that helped a lot. Instead of letting my negative self-talk loop kick in, she suggested that I evaluate how I feel, and decide what my 'best' will look like for that day. Some days my best is to eat a meal and bathe. Bonus points if I brush my teeth. If I eat, bathe, wash a load of laundry, brush my teeth, and play 8 hours of video games, then I've had a great day.  [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1542841035
NathanielVal [info] I've been doing some thinking... I dont know what to think about life about me about stuff.I don't know what to do about my sexuality I might be gay... I don't know everything just seems so confusing I cant stand it. I love boobs boobs are great... but I also love dicks and that's just really making me think about me.I spent some time in the hospital because of some things and now I have been diagnosed with depression and idiopathic intracranial hypertension. Now i'm dropping out of school and I feel like I cant stop it.Anyway as its 6am i'm going to wrap this up... Everything is confusing and I don't like it but that's just life I guess. [info] None [info] 1385549601
JamesTheRetard [info] Does depression make you tired? I've always wanted to learn how to do computer programming. And now that I got my own computer I can do just that.But a couple months ago when I was diagnosed with depression I've been feeling tired 24/7. I just assumed I just need to sleep more but I still feel so sleepy. Now I don't even feel like learning how to code because I either feel too depressed or too tired.Am I just lazy or is my depression causing my tiredness? [info] None [info] 1494290771
glacia_z [info] My mom is doing a similar thing to me. I don't have anemia (and I can't imagine how hard it must be to deal with that crap and I'm sorry that you have to) but I have been diagnosed with depression and it makes it super hard to get out of bed. You're right about little things like this messing with someone. [info] None [info] 1569097611
SuperJimboJones [info] Is it wrong to not want to take anti depressants? So basically I was diagnosed with depression at the end of last year. Up until the end of June I was taking anti depressants which gradually got stronger the worse I got. I started to feel better, in fact I felt better than I had felt in over a year so I decided to wean myself off the pills before I went on holiday. Since returning from my holiday a week ago I feel low again, really low. I can't tell if it's just holiday blues or the fact that the depression is still there. Part of the reason I stopped taking my pills was because it was sertraline and I didn't like being addicted to them or the side effects. And getting off them was extremely difficult. I don't know if it would be best to start on them again or try and work through how I'm feeling right now? [info] None [info] 1439283754
mpiqua [info] Prescribed Ritalin and Depression Hello everyone!I'm new with Ritalin medication and just wanted to check and see if someone has gone through similar problems.I was diagnosed with depression in March2018 and I have been taking medication for it since then. About 2 months ago I was diagnosed with ADHD, and I was prescribed Ritalin which it has been 2 weeks since I have started taking it. 20mg per day in two sections. Currently, I have noticed that my depression symptoms have got worse over the last week. I feel more suicidal/prone to cry/more emotional.Has this happened to anybody else as well? I am seeing my doctor in few days. I just wanted to know if anyone else has gone through this as well or has any personal experience.Thank you so much for reading. [info] None [info] 1541300404
Goiterman [info] High school I was an "A" student (graduated with a 3.8 or so GPA).College I started out A's and B's but after one semester that dropped to C's and later D's and F's.  I was asked to leave my first school (I wasn't planning on going back anyways) and went to several more over my years of higher education.  I didn't drink or do drugs.  I played video games and suffered from severe depression (the games were my escape).My current job is for a company I've been working for, for about 7 years now.  Before I was diagnosed with depression and then put on medication to "normalize" me they were patient with me, let me work whenever and continued to give me checks (sometimes monthly just for "being on call" or more regularly when I was working regularly).  Right now I am the server administrator, webmaster and computer tech for them working regularly and on salary.  I'm also a co-owner of the company.It should be noted that the only reason I am where I am today is through the support of my co-workers (mainly just being understanding of my really messy schedule) and my wife who was and is amazing through this entire ordeal. [info] None [info] 1342987638
lissyh13 [info] I was just diagnosed with depression after struggling since summer to do anything. My entire semester in college is pretty fucked because I couldn’t get out of bed and couldn’t bring myself to work on anything until I literally couldn’t wait anymore. My whole life isn’t fucked but when you’re a student, struggling in classes can feel pretty huge. [info] None [info] 1512600512
Blocker215 [info] I'll add something. Though everyone has shit going on, I love this community. What we have here is special, this niche of people who love something but aren't willing to go to the insane lengths that some releases require.Anyway my past few months have sucked for me. I have had to move away from my family for school. The love of my life and I might have to split with her going to med school in another state. I am struggling to find work. I was diagnosed with depression and cannot afford to pay for my insurance. I had to cancel my order of breds from David when my dad got sick (its petty but this one hurt more than I expected). Its been rough fam. I will say one thing though. I come to this forum every day. You guys are great. Nothing but love for all of you [info]  [info] 1436172251
SundayNiteApocalypse [info] I feel like I'm being slowly dragged through life. This is my first post here, so I'll start with a bit of back ground. I was diagnosed with depression in middle school and was medicated until I started college. I'm not even sure how well the meds helped at that time, but I foolishly quit taking them and stopped seeing a therapist thinking most of it was projected on me by my mother (who was clinically psychotic and abusive, and I'm terrified that I'm going to turn into her). It turns out the diagnosis was probably correct and I've been ignoring it or completely oblivious to the signs for the past decade. I'm starting to let myself realize there's something seriously wrong with me. The worst thing is, my depression is mainly tied to the fact that I have to work for a living. Everyone does it, and everyone hates it except for the lucky few who absolutely love their jobs. For me, though, it isn't just "Ugh, I have to get up and go to work tomorrow. That sucks." it's more like, "I would almost rather die than do this all over again." And I *hate* that it makes me feel that way. My only few hours of happiness have been reduced to about 4-5 hours on Friday nights when I have the whole weekend ahead of me. After that I can't enjoy the weekend because I've started dreading Monday almost right after I wake up on Saturday. It used to be that I could enjoy at least Saturday and most of Sunday (hence the user name), but now it's getting worse. I have a beautiful wife and an amazing daughter, and my job is great. It's the best job I've had in my life. We just moved into the nicest place we've ever lived, I've been with the company long enough that they're giving me a raise and insurance benefits by the end of the month (which is honestly coming in the nick of time because I *really* need to see therapist and get back on meds ASAP) I have everything I've ever wanted in life and I can't enjoy it. Everything that brings me happiness is more like a happy memory of a dead relative. Yes, I'm happy, but there's an inherent sadness that comes along with it, like I'm remembering a happy time with someone I'll never get to see again. I look at my daughter's smiling face and the smile I give her in return isn't pure. It's this tainted half-truth of the desire to be happy, of the knowledge that if I didn't have the weight of the world bearing down on me at every waking moment that I could look back at her and give her the smile she deserves to see from her daddy. I wish that my wife didn't have to deal with my depressed attitude day after day for nearly a decade now, because I've never been as depressed as I am now, and due to my past behavior she just thinks I'm crying wolf for sympathy or attention or whatever, just like my mother used to do. Now I'm wondering if my mother ever was just doing things for attention or if she was legitimately crying out for help.I will ***never*** kill myself for several reasons, but the thought crosses my mind more and more frequently, and it's terrifying. I don't want to end it all, because my life would be so perfect if I didn't have this dark shadow dragging me through life by the ankles. I just want the shadow to go away and let me lead my own life.&amp;nbsp;Sorry for the rant. I just really needed to get it off my chest today, and I don't have any friends so this is really my only outlet. It's been a really rough couple of weeks waiting to get insurance so I can go get some help. I do feel a little better getting it out there, though. [info] None [info] 1489976195
iwastherealso [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and have had suicidal thoughts, my dad committed suicide some years ago and he's not the first family member to have done so. It's not a trigger to me though, luckily, so I don't understand how it's being insensitive or whatever, it's related to something in the game, not just a random "lol look suicide!!1!!1!1". Triggers exist for people, so only they have any reason to react negatively to it. If anything, suicide is something that needs to be spoken about more in general life. [info] None [info] 1446605997
Taylor_Kittenface [info] Not learning what really made me happy.I was diagnosed with depression when I was 16, I'm 27 now and I still have no idea what's going on in my life.Nothing makes me truly happy. [info] None [info] 1407465150
LordGrac [info] When I was diagnosed with depression at 21, I realized it wasn't a recent thing. The roots for it ran seven or more years back, all the way to middle school. I had no idea until I realized what depression feels like and how that compares to what I'm supposed to feel like. It got much worse in college, which lead to the diagnosis, but the roots were deep. Definitely look into it as a possibility. That shit is insidious. [info] None [info] 1412703770
chris-the-man [info] Living Well with Mental Illness - AMA Hi everyone:  I have spent more than half my life (22yrs diagnosed) with mental illness.  For the longest time I was diagnosed with depression and had that modified to Bipolar Disorder II a couple years ago.I have learned a lot about how to live and cope with mental illness.  I am hosting an AMAFeed (ask me anything) on the topic.  https://healthama.com/living-well-with-mental-illness-strategies-to-ease-the-symptoms-associated-475355I am interested in helping spread a message of hope to everyone who is interested.  The AMA goes live this evening (9pm Eastern USA)Post a question to the link if you'd like to learn more. [info] None [info] 1515530140
BogusInfomation [info] Am I really depressed? Please, help me. Please read this, I could really use some help right now.I (17M) used to be an extremely happy, outgoing child, always full of life. Around 3 years ago, I became anorexic and obviously lost all of this. Throughout my weight gain, I was told that soon I would return to my normal self again. I did not. Around 6 months after recovering to a healthy weight, I realised that I was nothing like how I used to be. I had lost all of my confidence, enthusiasm and although there were a few good moments, life felt dull. After speaking to my therapist and a doctor, I was diagnosed with depression. None the less, I have always been in denial to myself about having depression.Around 6 months ago I was prescribed mirtazapine however, I decided to stop taking it around 2 months in. Consequently, I experienced probably one of the saddest times in my life. Around a week ago, I started to take it again and suddenly I'm able to motivate myself, engage in social situations and most of all, joke around with my mum again. All this time I've been in denial about having depression but as soon as I took my medication, undeniable changes occured. Does this mean that I do have depression? Could I have been emotionless for so long due to anorexia that I've come to think that this grey world is normal? Or might I just be a guy who fetishizes my own sadness, only feeling different because of a placebo affect? Please, any advice/thoughts would be much appreciated ♥️ [info] None [info] 1568762788
aure__entuluva [info] That's one of the biggest lies doctors have sold you if you truly believe that.  I've been diagnosed with depression, and no where, anywhere in medicine is depression described as a life long condition that one is unable to recover from.  "Clinical depression" is not a stamp put upon you saying you will never be happy or have any joy in your life ever again because you are physically broken.&gt;The DSM-5 outlines the following criterion to make a diagnosis of depression. **The individual must be experiencing five or more symptoms** during the same 2-week period and at least one of the symptoms should be either (1) depressed mood or (2) loss of interest or pleasure.&gt;1. Depressed mood most of the day, nearly every day.2. Markedly diminished interest or pleasure in all, or almost all, activities most of the day, nearly every day.3. Significant weight loss when not dieting or weight gain, or decrease or increase in appetite nearly every day.4. A slowing down of thought and a reduction of physical movement (observable by others, not merely subjective feelings of restlessness or being slowed down).5. Fatigue or loss of energy nearly every day.6. Feelings of worthlessness or excessive or inappropriate guilt nearly every day.7. Diminished ability to think or concentrate, or indecisiveness, nearly every day.8. Recurrent thoughts of death, recurrent suicidal ideation without a specific plan, or a suicide attempt or a specific plan for committing suicide.That is not diagnosis that says your brain doesn't work properly, it's an observation of outward symptoms.  It's more a diagnosis that things aren't working properly at the moment.  Sure I will say there may be some cases of uncurable or untreatable depression, but they are few and far between.  Yea it might take a lot to change things, and you might need a lot of help to do it, but I wouldn't jump to such a conclusion about your inability to improve your life. [info] Bayern München [info] 1544838634
Kimidei [info] I don't understand how people can get excited in the morning. I'm 21 and I've been diagnosed with depression when I was 12. I feel like I missed my life and I don't know how to live like a normal person, in fact, I think I never had the chance to live like a normal person and I might never know what it feels like. [info] None [info] 1470870359
The_Derpening [info] My oldER brother died of a heroin overdose, my dad died from alcoholism, my mom is clean and sober from meth and most recently some kind of narcotic prescription pain medication, I've been diagnosed with depression, my dad's mom killed herself due to depression, and my oldEST brother is addicted to prescription pain medication although he refuses to admit it, claiming he needs them and uses them responsibly (he doesn't).I don't think I can afford it, do you? [info] None [info] 1351573094
mindyourownbusiness3 [info] I was diagnosed with depression about age 11. Was on medication for the majority of my adolescents. When I realized I didn't want to be on medication anymore, I weened myself off and started training for the military. A couple of years later, after being completely honest with my recruiter, I enlisted and was shipped of to basic training. 6 1/2 years later, I have a small collection of guns, and am still in the military. Now would it exclude you from certain jobs like intel and spec ops? Yeah. But there are plenty of other jobs out there. Talk to a recruiter about it. It also depends on the climate of the military. We just had a huge draw down, and are now trying to build back up, so they might be more willing to let you in. PM me if you have any questions.  [info] None [info] 1495302540
jemminger [info] &gt; I have been diagnosed with depression by two different doctors, and went to therapy in the past. I am way too shy and way too paranoid to tell them anything personal, and will only answer questions very generally.You need to trust that the therapist is there to help and not judge, and that it is all confidential.  If you can't vent to them and have them help then you won't move past it. [info] None [info] 1240242015
capsulet [info] 1. I was classified as gifted when I was 7 years old2. I don't know my subcategorization but my IQ at the time tested to be about 134. 3. I became depressed at the age of 15 and still struggle with it at the age of 20 (nearly 21).4. I did really well in school with little effort until my depression took over... Since then, my grades have suffered immensely.5. I've been diagnosed with depression, and both my primary care doctor and my psychologist want me to get tested for ADD as it's likely Ihave that as well.This is a really interesting point... I would love to see some kind of research on this or even help with any. This post gives me a weird sense of comfort-- my PCOS and my depression have been curses for me, but this kind of puts them together into a puzzle along with my gifted status, something that I'm really not sure has been a curse for me or not. [info] None [info] 1406448740
SameSadOldStory [info] &gt;Most docs don't want to do anything for someone so young, because opiates are so "evil" they'd rather have a suicide out in a field cause a person can't take the pain anymore than someone have a slim chance of misusing prescription meds and having it on the doctor's records.well okay, in the medical system, there is no such thing as suicide caused by unrelenting physical chronic pain, it's "depression". I've been diagnosed with depression for absolutely no reason, after that I researched the prime symptoms of depression, things like "lack of interest in usually loved activities". I can't do the things I love BECAUSE OF THE CHRONIC PAIN, not because I'm moping around the house. Every day I wish I could get on the PC and do some Photoshop work or some game design(was creating things on the PC as soon as I could walk and talk). Computers are one of my greatest loves besides athletics, it still hurts every day that I cannot do these things. But this distinction is utterly lost on these people.It makes me see red to think about this, especially when patients are blamed for bad communication so much. [info] None [info] 1448548219
uberwithanH [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was in 5th grade. I was about to drink mouthwash to end it all. My mother died April 2 and I’m still depressed, but I’m still here and that’s what matters. [info] None [info] 1559495153
NoxRunner [info] Not to be a buzz kill but I think it is also important to remember that we can not diagnose someone with limited information. I've been diagnosed with depression when I didn't really have it. It make me second guess myself and think that I was depressed.  [info] None [info] 1501952920
Curiositykilledmy [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for 4 years, along with other things  [info] None [info] 1476957722
IVGreen [info] If you're having trouble budgeting it might be your brain and not your finances So basically the last 5 or so months I've been having a bitch of a time paying bills. I've been behind on everything, robbing Peter to pay Paul. I'd create a budget. Pay day would come. And in 48 hours I'd be looking at our bank balance to figure out how the shit did I not pay the bills but still have no money. Or it would be a few days til pay day and I'm digging for change in the car to buy milk and bread. Frantically refreshing the online banking app to see if the direct deposit is available yet. Basically totally financially screwed. Meanwhile, someone mentioned that my Facebook posts had gotten increasingly prosuicide and death. I always make jokes like that but in retrospect I reviewed the last 2 months of posts and basically other than news it's all suicide and death jokes. This same friend suggested I should talk to a doctor about depression. Now I have been diagnosed with depression in the past but it had been very manageable for a long while. And from my perspective I was doing really well. Anyway, I talked with my doc and she got me on appropriate medication. I mentioned the budgeting problem and she said that is a common problem that comes with depression. That was 2 weeks ago. Over the last week I was able to create a budget and stick to it. I have 1 more bill to pay for the week which I'll do later today. But after that I'll have a decent amount of money left over for random expenses. Now, I have an accounting degree and have the knowledge to budget and manage m finances but I just wasn't able to execute it properly. So if you don't know how to create a budget it's likely not a mental health issue that is causing your financial troubles. But since I know how to budget, should be able to budget and just couldn't get my shit together, I was glad to find out that it was health related. The worst part is that I realized that I should have been able to put away 500$ a month to savings. (Approximately 20% of our monthly income)Hope this helps someone in their financial and other life goals. **Tl;dr: couldn't make a budget work realized I was depressed. Got help and now I can pay my bills** [info] None [info] 1471073862
DepressedDaisyChain [info] REALLY SORRY FOR THE LONG POST - PLEASE READ AND RESPOND ANYWAY - I HAVEN'T SLEPT IN 3 NIGHTS OBSESSING OVER THIS AND WOULD APPRECIATE ANY HELPI recently attempted suicide and left the hospital with a report that said I had attachment issues, emotional instability, black and white thinking and impulsive tendencies. I went to my first mental health session convinced I had Bipolar 2 Disorder but was told it was more likely Emotional Dysregulation (a symptom of Borderline Personality Disorder). I left with the plan to start DBT and go back on antidepressants.At first I was completely pissed that I could be viewed as an irrational and dramatic person who simply overreacted. After all when I searched Emotional Dysregulation it was basically a description of someone who overreacts. I felt I was completely misunderstood. I felt judged by the nurse and not excited to see her again. I didn't trust her at all. However, I got searching and if I was honest with myself I resonated alot with the symptoms of Borderline Personality Disorder.I am honestly quite scared and confused. Me and family felt the symptoms fitted better than those for Bipolar; the distrust, acting out irrationally, emptiness, depression, unstable future prospects... However the reported behaviours from those online are so different. There is a strong opinion of those with BPD being manipulative or extremely angry to the point of being cruel. Yes I've been manipulative - hasn't every teen? Often I just get in trouble if I put on a pity act to justify any truly stroppy behaviours I have. Although I can imagine all teens manipulate their parents on the odd occasion. Maybe if I do have BPD my parents are helping by not tolerating any potentially damaging behaviours. I've also said hurtful things in the heat of the moment. But I truly dont think my family would describe me as manipulative and cruel. More sensitive and untrustworthy, with the past ability to throw a major 'tantrum' which still at times feels like a major insult to what seemed at the time to be a justified reaction. However, I'm most of the time ashamed of those childish acts, and try my best not to act on my emotions. Yet don't all teenagers have a 'moment'.My family agreed that when arguments do occur, they are usually irrational attempts to prevent abandonment by pushing people away or heading out the front door myself. (These fights don't happen often, but when they do, I get disproportionately angry- but doesnt everyone lash out?) Whilst my moods change quickly, my family and I often don't draw attention to it, and the childish strop quickly passes. Maybe I'm just sensitive? I notice I often feel the rollercoaster emotions, but go up to my room where I cry and shake in anger. I may go downstairs to vocalise my opinion which  escalates things but usually I wallow in myself, feeling unsure whether I'm actually allowed to feel this way. If annoyed with friends, I usually avoid them until it passed. They recognise me as someone who overreacts but it is usually humorous, like falling in love when a guy simply  says hello. I try to deny falling out with them even if I have as the friendship is worth more than winning the argument. However, I've heard that winning the fight is a big thing for BPD's.I've been diagnosed with depression and these issues come up more often when I am low. This is when I'm more often to pick fights or to tip over the edge with small things. Maybe emotional instability is just a symptom of depression rather than BPD. However I definitely feel empty, have a poor image and fear being abandoned. I have been abandoned many times before. If I'm honest, my fourteen year old self completely fit the symptoms of BPD but you have to be an adult to be diagnosed. I fought with family, yelled alot, cut, threatened to leave, felt abandoned. But I was also a child adjusting to trusting people again. Also young teens are major brats anyway. I had therapy for trauma and depression and I have a feeling my psychiatrist who cared about me was secretly helping me weed out any possible damaging tendencies. However I recognise irrational thoughts more often. Perhaps, like I've been told, I only have some symptoms and if I put the work in I wont ever have a full personality disorder.It's impossible in one post to discuss every possible reason why I do and don't have BPD, but I wouldn't mind answering questions and getting to know more people with experiences of BPD, whether personal or relational. Whilst I have been going through some crap, I really don't want to forever be an asshole. Sometimes I'm convinced there's nothing wrong at all. [info] None [info] 1555973065
PrincessTiffany [info] I’m not entirely sure why. Probably because I said being overweight contributes to depression. It does. See, years ago during a shit time in my life I was diagnosed with depression and given Prozac. They did nothing but make me want to cry all the time. So instead of that I self medicated with alcohol and codeine and dove deeper into the depths of hell. I was overweight and addicted to codeine, what did I do about it? Started meditating. Got a gym membership. Stopped eating so much sugar and refined carbohydrates. Quit alcohol. Started taking vitamin D and potassium supplements. That was about a year ago. Now I’m healthy my mood isn’t really something I ever dwell on, it’s not that I became ‘happy’, it’s that it ceased being important. I don’t feel like shit all the time, which means I can focus on things.  [info] World's Best Narcissist [info] 1519583080
JesusChrist-- [info] I have been in the system for 5 years and those 5 years I have been with a decent family the whole time, I'm 14 right now and people are probably thinking how hard it must be for me as a teen going through foster care but really foster care for me isn't the challenge its how my parents think when it comes to me compared to their own children. I am diagnosed with depression and post-trauma disorders so you can imagine how my head must work when it comes to everything. To all foster parents that might read this DONT ever tell your foster child that you can call cps and they could easily be taken away, as a threat when they have done something bad, they DIDNT KNOW ANY BETTER. It hurts to hear that from my "parents" that have raised me for 5 years. I am grateful that they took me in, I am grateful that they take care of me but when it comes to me doing something bad threaten me with anything else but that. I hate hearing that the family that took me in say that they can easily call cps to take me away. I feel like a burden to them, I feel like they don't love me anymore, my depression gets worse to the point were I get panic attacks. When I get them I tend to hurt myself, and I thought that when my foster mother saw me in such distress she would comfort me instead she thought different, I wrote a bunch of negative words on my arm and instead of her looking at them she told me to wash it off. To any parent/guardian, if you see your child crying and see writing on their arms look at it read it, don't shame them and be comforting towards them. [info] None [info] 1564716094
bustaflow25 [info] Advice I have 3 baby mama's, 4 kids, never married, with a high school education. I work in a airplane warehouse 50-60 hours a week just to pay off loans, bills, kids happy. I've been diagnosed with depression, on top of diabetes. Both probably gave me E.D. But I'm alive. I put on a happy front to everyone because, I'm who alot turn to for advice. How do I turn my life back around. [info] None [info] 1420128434
Jackiplier [info] Thank you, it’s just hard for me to talk about my feelings, I’ve had history of just bottling stuff up as I was diagnosed with depression when I was 13. I’m hoping I can find someone who isn’t family I can talk to, they said they might take me to a councilor which would really help [info] None [info] 1555904289
Decayde [info] Feeling directionless and alone I was diagnosed with depression (dysthimic disorder to be precise) last year but for as long as I can remember I've never liked myself. I even remember thinking as a young child the world would be better off with me.I have periods where I'm okay. I'm very easily moved; there have been times in my life where everything seems to be wide open with the possibility of future happiness moments and small moments where I felt the pulse of life and the movement of energy in me, a faint glowing that told me I had a soul and everything would even out in the end cosmically.But lately I find myself spiralling further and further downward. I've been too busy to go to therapy. I'm lonely. I'm aimless and don't know what to do with myself. I cry a lot for no other reason than I feel like I need it. I'm going to university this autumn and I don't think I can handle being cut off from my unsatisfactory but familiar home. I still hate myself. I think I'm a useless sad sack of shit so unworthy of love that even trying to talk to people is to steal from them, to take their time they can never get back. If I do talk to somebody, they just sit there and say nothing or tell me to "bring it before God" and that's not what I need. I just need some understanding and someone to listen. [info] None [info] 1402029006
chezplatypus13 [info] I suppose it bears mentioning I was diagnosed with depression a few years back as well. I've felt for awhile that I've had that pretty well handled, but now that you mention it, reading my post again sounds more like symptoms of depression. My fear with that is not knowing which variable to look at changing. The Concerta or the Venlafaxine. I might go see a specialist about it rather than my gp. [info] None [info] 1486169024
al3x3691 [info] I was diagnosed with depression at about 11, and I'm 21 now. After my first year in college I got hit with a nasty wave of depression due to lower-than-expected grades and the realization that I wasn't going to be able to coast through college like I did in high school. Sounds kinda pathetic now, but it is what it is.Over a Skype conversation over the summer, my girlfriend at the time told me that I was the light of her life. I broke down in tears; I've got plenty of close friends and I've dated a few girls, but this was the first time someone had ever said something like this to me.Of course this didn't stop her cheating on me during a visit to Texas a few weeks later, but it is what it is. [info] None [info] 1358957345
redmourn [info] Dear reddit, today I have been diagnosed with depression for the second time. Any advice from those that have been through it? [info] None [info] 1327331884
WhyArentIDrunk [info] My whole life I've felt empty Hey, everyone new to this sub and I just feel like I need to get this out. My situation probably isn't as bad as most but it's rough right now. So to start off I grew up in a family of 5 where I'm the youngest of 3 kids. My mom all too often would tell me how much more she loved my older brother and how she feels like I'm gonna be a failure. Not once in my life has she told me she's proud of me and she only ever said after my accomplishments how much better my brother would have done... My dad wasn't around much, he had to work constantly to keep us all comfortable so I only ever saw him once or twice a week. I've always been an ugly kid with low self esteem and ever since I was 10 I never felt much. I was diagnosed with depression and doc said I should be on medication since I never opened up to the therapy, mom didn't want to pay for the meds and she wouldn't let me tell my dad or she would kick my ass. Fast forward 7 years and I finally got my first girlfriend, yay! But turns out she was also depressed but she took to physically harming herself vs bottling up like I did. She often blaimed me for her cuts, said she'd kill herself if I ever broke up with her and come my birthday, 9 months in the relationship, she dumped me and admitted to cheating on me with several of my classmates and so called "friends". When I finally graduated highschool I still didn't even get a "good job" from my mom, and my dad was late to the ceremony. My brother was there but visibly didn't give a shit, and my sister skipped the whole thing. Now I'm 22 barely staying in college, I've moved out and am living with a couple of old friends from my marching band who got married. So I'm the ever lasting 3rd wheel for them. I've taken to staying up all night because if I go lay in bed I just think about all the fucked up things going on and I hate myself even more. I've started smoking again. The only silver lining is I'm starting to get close to this girl whom I've know forever again, she was always there for me, she knew about all my home issues, and my one roommate actually got it out of her that she could see us dating. Little does she know I've regressed again and hate my life... I'm terrified to let her in and essentially reopen all those wounds from my ex. I don't know what to do anymore... I can't sleep, I can't eat much anymore, I just smoke and drink and dwell on the stupid shit... Sorry if all this is cheesy and not important. But... I really needed to just say it. Not many people know all this with me and I just want to talk to someone who understands.. [info] None [info] 1528432130
lanibanani11 [info] Help find my type from the questionnaire More in the comments:How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I'm a 17 year old female. I'm the type of person who doesn't really have a consistent personality tbh. I can either be really mean and rude, a jokester, or someone who's there to help people's problems. In some moments I'm reserved and quiet and others I can be loud and outgoing. • Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with depression in middle school and I'm just not mentally stable in general. It made me more reserved than I wanted to be. • Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?My upbringing was okay I think. I did live in a household where arguing and yelling was a frequent occurence, some including myself in it. But my family was somewhat diplomatic and never really used violence against each other. I live in a Buddhist family but they're not overly strict or obsessed about religion, except possibly my mom. But even she doesn't really enforce it that much. I don't really care for religion much and I think my family is okay with it.• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I'm a senior in high school. Whether I like it or not depends on my mood and class. I sort of keep to myself during free time since I have no friends and I'd rather just get the day over with than mingle with anyone. I do get lonely and hateful thoughts against people having better times than me though but everyone already kinda avoids me because I have a very snappy and rude demeanor.• If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?It depends I guess. I wouldn't feel refreshed by being alone for a long time and probably would get bored out of my wits. But I do talk to people online since I can easily change my persona with someone I don't know and it makes me less lonely.. [info] None [info] 1568488578
AggregateAnus [info] That's very interesting. I used to hallucinate voices in high school but then they just stopped. A year later I was diagnosed with depression. I always kinda figured they could be connected. [info] None [info] 1556992316
Newpocky [info] Might be a bizarre question....regards depression and medication. Ok long story short, I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 24. At the time I did not have a high sex drive or a high drive for...well anything. I went on medication (paxil) and for a while that helped tremendously. I felt like my old self. I had a girlfriend at the time and she knew the whole situation. The sex was FANTASTIC.        Fast forward about a year and a half. My medication wasn't working as well as it was in the beginning and I was slipping back into depression. My doctor switched me to another medication, (I forget the name, but it was a first generation antidepressant) and it made me a zombie, so much so, that I couldn't get an orgasm. Since then I have gotten off all medication and while I have been on because of all of the side effects I was having.     At this point, sex is something that is ok, but something that I don't enjoy nearly as much as before I went on Paxil. Do any of you have this same kind of experience? Is there anything I can do that can help my situation? [info] None [info] 1356085493
Tyfoon555 [info] Recently found out my sister was a victim of sex trafficking (very very briefly, in Seattle). So that was fun. Lot of anger and dangerous "I just don't give a fuck" levels, harder to get out of bed, sometimes just dying to say fuck it and just not do any of my finals. I was diagnosed with depression when I was 9 but I don't think I've ever felt more hopeless than I do now. I think for the first time I woke up today and was actually sad that I did. I just found these discussion threads. It's nice to vent a bit. Second year of college, I've tried so desperately hard to reach out in these last two years and was met with such little results that I've been a loner the last few months here. I don't have the energy to reach out anymore but I still have a naive optimism for something that will fall in my lap [info] None [info] 1513263199
tempotissues [info] Im new here and I can relate to so many posts but a part of me still keeps telling me that I am doing something wrong trying to seek validation outside out of comfort zone. Here is a little low down on my life. * Absent alcoholic father who resents mother to the core. * Almost raised by a single mother who is now old but very spiteful about how her life turned out. * Its always about the two of them even though their three kids including myself are in the late thirties* Pretty much everyone is depressed in the family to the point that nothing is fun anymore. * Personally I have been diagnosed with depression and my want to start a family in this unhealthy environment makes me more depressed. * In a LDR with a beautiful woman who wants me to get out of this rut but parents are 100% financially dependent on us.Am I in the wrong sub? [info] None [info] 1541090171
gwh1996 [info] Throughout my teenage years I was diagnosed with depression. After years of trying (with a gap year) I got diagnosed in November of 2018 and I've made a lot of progress in a few months. Not where I want to be but I'm better than I used to be [info] Cyclothymic [info] 1562121048
LoLWhiteRaven [info] I have the option to improve, but don't take it I woke up this morning at 5am with 9 hours of sleep, like I always wanted to. But this is the first time that my day started out exactly how I planned it. I wanted to go to the gym when it opens at 5:30am in the morning, yet I didn't go. I didn't have anything important to do that forced me to stay home, I just didn't go. I took a shower, ate, and brushed my teeth before sitting on the computer.Then I thought that I should catch up on all my classes. This week is my spring break, and I have not studied a single word of my notes or my text books. Instead, I watched random youtube videos to waste the time. When it hit 8am, my mom asked me if I wanted to go to the gym with her. What was my response? "I have a lot of work to do." What did I do instead? Watch video game videos, random top moments in animes, and some private things. When my mom came back, I convinced myself I needed a break from what I was doing, and I played video games for a few hours. I was supposed to go to my driving school office to get my permit, something that I was supposed to do back in September last year, but I'm afraid of all the people's judgements I will receive for not doing it earlier.After playing my video games, I got a call from my aunt to shovel the snow to make way for her call. For some reason, I was angry. Angry because I thought it was a waste of time. Yes, I wasted my entire time today and once something productive I could do finally came up, I was angry. I helped her, and came back home angry.Finally, I decided to start working. I applied for my English exam, and then printed my reading for my next English class so that I can study it and participate in group conversations. I read two paragraphs, and walked away. Then I started to watch other video game trailers for upcoming games, ate hotdogs, and created a snapchat story to try to appear cool to my high school friends that I don't even talk to anymore, since I pushed them away due to my depression back in high school.When I finished all that, I returned to my desk and opened my english reading again. Immediately, I went on Netflix and started watching Thor. Now it's 1am. I haven't done anything. I'm not motivated to do anything. I was diagnosed with depression over 2 years ago. My family won't help even though I brought it up multiple times. My dad said he doesn't expect anything of me anymore, that I'm full of shit, and that my cousin is more of a son to him than I ever will be. I hate myself and don't want to exist, yet I don't want to die. I tried many strategies, such as "Fake it till you make it". But none of them work. I'm desperate for any human interaction, though I tend to avoid it. I'm not motivated at all. I have all the resources, yet I don't use any. I'm weak, and I need help. I wrote a suicide letter a few weeks ago, but I shredded it two days later thinking I had some hope. As I said, I don't want to die. I also didn't want to make my mom cry. I can't imagine her face once she found me dead from overdose one morning with an open bottle of sleeping pills next to me. I feel disappointed that I can't do anything for her. I tell myself I want to do something, but if that was the case, then I would have done something. I never wanted to study sciences, or at least not right after graduating high school. But it was that, or I would spend the rest of my days on the streets. Maybe I would have been better by spending my time on the streets, instead of wasting my father's money on education that I don't use. [info] None [info] 1489727425
ImRazoR [info] I thought that my Depression had an end but then it hit me like it never had before. I was diagnosed with depression when i was 14 years old, i had to stay in a psychatrie for 3 months because the doctors thought i was suicidal (i never even thought about it). it didn't help me so my mom decided it would be the best thing to move to another city so i had like a fresh start. Even though i still had no friends there i didn't felt as depressed as i did before, i learned to live with my depression.Now i'm 18 and Everything around me seems to fall apart i got fired from my job, my best friend "stole" my girlfriend, my mother was diagnosed with cancer and because of this she cant work anymore and we're standing on the edge of losing our home...I really try my best to find a job and to hide my depression from my mom so she doesn't has to worry about me. but every time i have an interview at some place i just can't even leave the house and i dont understand why. I pretty much just lie in my bed and do nothingI'm Sorry for the bad english. [info] None [info] 1455310625
charm803 [info] I'm sorry you had to go through that. I was diagnosed with depression when I was younger.  After I got older and went NC with my nmom, my bouts of depression were less and less.  While I still get them now (though not as often), she was a major contributor, just the thought of seeing her would send me down a horrible spiral.  [info] None [info] 1396117685
waterlilies_ [info] Has anyone ever felt too depressed to take care of themselves (eat, exercise, shower, etc)? All I can do is just lie in bed. I have a happy life, I'm in a loving relationship, I'm taking classes I'm passionate about, but I've been diagnosed with depression all the way back in 2007. I recently added lamictal to my list of medicines, and I think it's made me so apathetic that I can't do anything to take care of myself. I haven't cooked for myself, only eating a handful of dry cereal and some carrots in the past two days. I don't know how to be a regular human being again. Any help is appreciated. [info] None [info] 1515719170
TwinBranch [info] Agree, but disagree. Depression is a long lasting effect of being upset, it can range anywhere from two weeks to years. But, you cannot say you have depression if you have not been diagnosed, but you can say "I am depressed" if you have had long lasting effects of being sad/upset. There's a difference.I have been diagnosed with depression and I have seeked professional help (actually going to see my psychiatrist today). Anyways, that was my argument on your PSA. [info] 16 [info] 1493811153
lastninja2 [info] A lost developer with 8 years of experience seeking advice on what to do next [I'm fairly new to Reddit and as I've searched, this place seemed most appropriate for my question, I'm sorry if it's not]I've been making games for about 8 years now. I spare you the details but I've made games for PC, Android, AR, etc.(It my probably seem promoting so I don't mention my games but if you are interested, let me know and I'll reply)After failing to make a proper platformer with Flash, I've started to work on a local AAA-ish hack n' slash game in a young game dev company as programmer/technical artist/etc.Feeling the urge to develop my games and get indie, I did quit and started making a platformer that we ended up selling to a flash game portal and the money was not astonishing but it seemed just ok for 9 months of very hard work. I've recently published it on Steam and it had very good feedback and some sales. Few people liked it (it has 103 reviews) but ~94% of them liked it and recommends it. (Some of them even ask for the sequel)After the boom of F2P market, I told my team members that I want to make F2P and want to quit. The next 4 years were disastrous. But I've learned very valuable stuff about myself and the scene.I'm 33, utterly broke, and honestly don't know what do with my life. I feel that I've lost a lot of opportunities and maybe that I haven't had my "moment" until now, it's getting very riskier to continue this path but something inside tells me to continue.Making games is the only thing that I want to do and honestly I don't think I can be able to do anything else. I can't even work at a company anymore as a side job to make money. I seem to just be able to do what I like. I know it probably seems bad but that's the way I am. I pushed myself for last 8 months to clone a F2P game and each day was a constant battle to make myself to work on it to the point that I almost deleted the project.I've been diagnosed with depression and failing in my career is making things just worse.Currently I'm thinking of going back to my roots and make premium games, even though almost every article advises against it. Either for mobile or PC.I'm changing my engine and going for something simpler so it may help me achieve failure faster.So if you want to help you can do one or more of these:A) Give advice on whatever you seem fit.B) What kind of games do you think I should make?Thanks. [info] None [info] 1479616841
BoolsDeep69 [info] 4 months ago It's been 4 months since my best friend died. We were both in tenth grade and I fucking loved her like a sister. During our time I was diagnosed with depression. The kind where you have no reason to kill yourself you just want to. Well let me tell you something. When she died I lost every sense of life I had. Even having a girlfriend isn't helping me with my depression. I just miss her so fucking much. Often people say that the first thing you forget is the voice of the person. Well that's shit. I can vividly remeber her voice and every night I can hear her. I want to fucking kill myself, and the worst fucking damn thing is that I know I can't. If I kill myself people will be sad and my brother will probably kill himself to. If there was a way to do it without having people sad I would've already done it. I just don't know what to do anymore. I can't get sleep. Her voice and face ring through my head every damn night. Why the fuck does it have to be this way. [info] None [info] 1511760668
kms2547 [info] I don't believe in God because I grew up.  And much like growing up, it didn't happen all at once.  It was gradual.When I was little, I subconsciously sorted stories into three categories: Fiction, Nonfiction, and the stuff they told us at Sunday School, which sounded like fiction, but they told me it was real.  It never quite sat right with me.Like many kids, I thought dinosaurs were super cool.  I read about how they lived tens of millions of years ago, long before the evolution of humankind.  This was at stark odds with the Biblical narrative I had been taught in Sunday School.  I asked my dad about the contradiction.  He told me that parts of the Bible should be thought of as metaphors and moral lessons, and not necessarily as historical fact.Later on I was taught that the only way into heaven was faith in Jesus.  I had Jewish friends who were genuinely good people, and I knew some Christians who were assholes.  That didn't sit right with me either.In High School I was diagnosed with depression.  My parents enrolled me in a Christian counselling service.  An hour or two on a weekly basis of one-on-one time with a counselor and I could talk about pretty much anything.  For the first time in my life I really opened up, not just to this man, but to myself.  I became a much more introspective person, and started really asking myself who I am, what am I about, and what do I believe?  Ironically, the Christian counseling service was the last big push I needed to realize that not only did I not believe in God, I really hadn't for years, and I hadn't really admitted it to myself.Ultimately I am a much happier, thoughtful, and self-actualized person than I was back in those days.  **I grew up.***When I was a child, I spoke like a child, I thought like a child, and I reasoned like a child.  But when I became a man, I put aside my childish ways.* [info] None [info] 1542219468
bluekitdon [info] Here's what helped me when I was diagnosed with depression. Hope it helps you as well.  https://www.personalgrowthchannel.com/2018/05/recovering-from-situational-depression.html [info] None [info] 1533402509
puppyycuddlerr [info] Need Help Reaching Out Please Hi everyone, hope all of you are safe and sound during these scary times happening in our world today.I have been putting this off for the longest time because I've been too anxious and afraid to seek help and I'm finally taking the first step. These last 12 months, I was diagnosed with depression, escaped my abusive family, an abusive relationship, and currently (as of 2 days ago) am hurting over self-sabotaging a relationship with someone I have really come to like that i met a couple months ago. I talked to my friends about these unhealthy cycles I really don't mean put myself in but always do. I would really like to better myself in order to have healthier relationships in the future. :( I would really like to talk to someone.I'm on [psychologytoday.com](https://psychologytoday.com/) looking for therapists I can talk to... not sure what to say when reaching out for the first time? Is this site good for therapist hunting? Any tips or other sites you can recommend? Any other subs you would recommend as well? Or would anyone would just like to talk or share their experiences? Anything helps :)I would appreciate all the help! Thank you!I posted this on the depression sub too. Not sure where to start :/ [info] None [info] 1584592333
zmcphail0625 [info] Not everyone, I grew up with Tourette’s and wasn’t diagnosed until I was 21. It was very hard on me growing up with parents that didn’t understand and being bullied at school. I did party some but after I was out of school. I worked a full time job in high schools. I was diagnosed with depression in middle school. I’m 32 and still have my down days and still take meds. [info] None [info] 1554898052
crashdowncafe [info] How do you deal with the fatigue? tl;dr: extremely tired all the time. How do you deal with this?I have been struggling with depression since January (this is a lie. This is when I was diagnosed with depression, but had already been fighting an uphill battle for ages). I have been seeing a psychologist, going for walks at least once a day for at least 20 minutes, making list of things I have to do that day and do them, and I have gradually been improving.I feel happier now and it is difficult to imagine the dark cave I was living in just a couple of months ago. I have good days and I have bad days. But this fatigue just won't go away. I'm always so tired and that made sense when I was doing no sleeping. But I've been sleeping fine now for a while now. I can now even talk myself into getting out of bed after 15 minutes instead of hours! But this fatigue is dragging me down. I feel so tired that I can barely stay out of the clutches of this depression. I don't want to go back to how I was in January, but I don't know how to deal with this fatigue any longer. My psychologist says it's something I have to come to terms with and it will get better on its own, but right now I have a hard time believing it. So I guess my questions are: Do you have this extreme fatigue and how do you deal with it? [info] None [info] 1432841778
Tempsnowe [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 5. I'm 20. I know nothing else [info] None [info] 1477357511
penguin17171 [info] Probably different from what most people here. Got a multitool as a gift from my uncle but I was diagnosed with depression with high risk so my family took my multitool away. So I bought a Kershaw cryo ii for the depression stuff but found out how much I liked flicking the knife open and closed and that kept me entertained enough to not do anything else harmful with it. Tldr knives got me out of depression with high risk. Current carry is a used Kershaw link in the standard steel. Would love a m390 one [info] Too late to the naming ceremony [info] 1553550002
PDaviss [info] Either high school or my senior prom. High school: The first three years I never worked and my grades reflected it. I'm a pretty smart kid but my mentality of "I can get it done in the class before" killed me. I was diagnosed with depression in 10th grade, and already had a severe case of ADHD, and a cycle began ti appear; I wouldn't do my work cause f the ADHD, thus making me more depressed cause I got a shitty grade. Because I was down, I'd have no motivation to do work.  I let this cycle rule my life for two years, royally fucking me when it came time to  apply to college. My only saving grace was a above average ACT. However I went 0-4 on college apps and am currently taking a gap year. The feeling that all my friends are gonna have the time of their lives in college while I'm home still is something I wish no one would have to go through. It truly makes me feel like a failure. Senior Prom: I had a choice between a girl that I had a crush on for a year but I knew a kinda-friend of mine was gonna ask her, or a girl I had been kinda friends with for about three months. I chose the second one, and within the day if asking her, I knew it was the wrong choice. I've been known to prioritize others' happiness above mine, and this time it came back to bite me in the ass.  The girl I didn't ask is now my best friend, and the other one I haven't talked to since prom. Waste of a night and money.  [info] None [info] 1377634333
Rydakule [info] I was diagnosed with depression and severe sleep apnoea at my highest weight (135kg) a few years after losing a family member. I had been overweight since high school and a lot of my constant weight gain had stemmed from a shitty childhood and a history of alcoholism and recreational substance abuse (pretty much weed and pills). After I lost my younger brother, I spiralled out of control and put on heaps of weight and would barely leave the house despite being a year into my PhD. My supervisor was the first one to realise my absence and I decided I would try and do something about it.I saw a psychologist and vented out my history which did lift a huge weight off my chest. She was pretty much overwhelmed with the sheer amount of baggage I’d dumped on her and decided to focus on one thing we could fix, and booked me into a nearby sleep clinic. I went for my sleep study, was diagnosed but it didn’t lead anywhere for months because all of the sleep technicians that read the results had all been charged for embezzlement or some shit. It was bizarre, but it basically meant there was going to be no progress for months.I kept going with my shitty lifestyle and for a month after my sleep study nothing had changed. I then decided that I needed to take action or I was going to eventually die in my sleep or die from obesity. I started counting my calories and walking every day. Exercise and diet was something I’d tried many times before and it was never something I could stick to long term. So I started out slow by walking 30 mins a day and eating around 1700-1500 calories a day. I dropped like 9 kg in 2-3 weeks. This made a huge impact on my mental health but I was constantly in danger of slipping back into my depression and I needed a way out of that. That’s when I found Taoism. I’ve always been a huge Bruce Lee fan and I’ve had a copy of his Tao of Jeet Kune Do on my bookshelf. One day I opened it up looking for stretches and exercises when I noticed the Taoist priest and the poem on the first page. I delved further into investigating Taoism and now I’m here. The Tao helped me to focus on life one day at a time and to leave my past behind me. It helped me to regulate my mood and it helps me to moderate my urges. I still fail daily, but when I fall down I centre myself in the present and begin again. Taoism didn’t help me to conquer my problem with food, CICO and regular exercise did that. I’m now 30kg down and feeling fantastic. Also, I did eventually get my sleep study results and now have my own cpap machine which has made a huge difference as well. However, Taoism did help me with my mental health which I think was the more important, underlying reason for why my lifestyle was so poor. So, I wouldn’t claim that Taoism is a good way to fix your eating disorder. However, I feel like Taoist philosophy can help you to improve your life in general and the effects of this may improve your relationship with food. I wouldn’t rely solely on Taoism to do this. Instead, take the necessary steps to fixing your problem and use Taoism to frame those things within the greater context of your life. Don’t be afraid to seek help. Whether it’s a psychologist, a nutritionist, a personal trainer, whatever. Take the steps to change your situation and let the Tao take care of the rest. Hope this helps. Good luck on your journey. [info] None [info] 1554860450
ailene12 [info] How to deal with death? I lost someone I was really close to about 5 years ago. I know it's been a long time but despite all this I cannot help but  blame myself because I always feel I could have prevented him and helped him out . I have been to various therapists and I am under medications because I was diagnosed with depression about a month ago. But I'm going crazy and j don't know what to do. Please help me. [info] None [info] 1583909755
ICEVIN_ [info] What video game changed your life? A few months ago I was diagnosed with depression. Life seemed meaningless and I felt empty all the time. Nothing seemed to satisfy me. Even my passion for video games. However, everything changed when I bought Zelda: Breath of the Wild.I heard it was good and was bored one night so I decided to buy it. WOW, just wow. This game is amazing in so many ways. The gameplay, the open world, the soundtrack, I could go on and on. Playing this game immediately changed my mood, gave me something to look forward to everyday, and also allowed me to let go all of life’s stresses and be lost in this world.Right now I’m playing through it second time with my roommate and it is even more fun for me just watching him play. I’m doing a lot better with my depression and I know BOTW is a huge reason I’m on the up swing. I know when I’m older and think about this dark period of my life, I’ll remember how BOTW changed everything for me.What video game changed your life? Or had a huge impact on you? [info] PlayStation [info] 1580877179
NaganisRage [info] Two years ago right after christmas, i had been dumped by the love of my life, assaulted by my ex best friend, and had an injured leg. I couldent make rent and had nowhere to go, no one to talk to. I figured id rather die than be homeless. I took a bottle of 150 extra strength tylenol tabs. I still remember the sickly sweet taste of the coating and every time i do it makes me want to vomit. I dont remember how i got there or how long i had been in there but when my landlords came on the day of my eviction (couldent pay rent) i was found unconcious in my bathtub. I woke up in the hospital and instantly vomited. I felt ashamed more so than anything, that it didnt work and now these people have to clean up my mess. I dont remember a lot of my time in the hospital, but every now and again i get flashbacks. I was diagnosed with depression, borderline personality disorder, and psychosis. I got help that i needed, but clearly not enough or i wouldent be here. [info] None [info] 1479908046
102bees [info] I'm diagnosed with depression. I have been for a year now, although the symptoms have been present for several years. 2018 was particularly rough for me. I lost family to cancer, I lost my job, I suffered an extended breakdown and had to move back in with my parents... it was an awful time, and more than once I found myself contemplating suicide.At no point did anything make me want to kill myself as much as that video did. [info] None [info] 1548922298
jveinotte [info] I have been married for 24 years.  We still fight sometimes but nothing serious.  If my wife were to call me sexy I would be as flattered as a teenage boy.  There is definatly an underlying cause for this blow up.  I was diagnosed with depression over 14 years ago.  I was being a terrible husband at the time.  I have worked with my Dr and he has successfully been treating me since.  Every few years I have a bad spell like what you described and head straight to the Dr. to change treatment or just talk. My beautiful wife has finally began to understand that the problem isn't her, but a treatable condition.  My heart never stops loving her even though my brain causes me to act like an asshole.  Depression is sometimes hard to see and hard to understand by family and friends, but it is very real.  It kills relationships and kills people and ruins those left behind.  Get to a trusted Dr with your husband.  Maybe it is not depression,  but if somebody with depression says hey that sounds just like me... it is time to help the one you love.Good luck  [info] None [info] 1546398409
Hiccups_And_C_Cups [info] I hit my 6 month milestone of not making myself get sick this week. (19/F)  June 10th was the last time I made myself get sick.  I was doing my leaving cert (SATS/A-LEVEL??) I can't remember why I did it, probably stress, but I decided that was it.I had a fantastic summer with my now ex boyfriend, going on hoilday, just enjoying every single day to the fulliest. I was too happy and stress free to do it, I was happy in myself for a change. I don't even think my bulimia crossed my mind thoughout the summer.Now that I'm in college, have moved out of my parents house and now single, my life has been terrible. I've been diagnosed with depression but still have refused to let myself fall back into old habits. I'm honestly so proud of myself for lasting this long, because I've being bulimic since the age of 8. I still consider doing it from time to time but I truly believe I am officially in recovery for my eating disorder. [info] None [info] 1544826156
okaytrue [info] What helps with fatigue? My biggest pots symptom by far is the never ending fatigue. Nothing seems to help it. Even when my blood pressure and heart rate are controlled I’m still tired. I already do high salt and fluid intake, my urinary sodium level is considered normal at 160. I got my thyroid checked including t3 and t4 as well as antibodies and they’re all normal. I did have a b12 deficiency but I take sublingual methyl b12 supplements and my levels are now normal.  My vit D levels are also normal.  Coffee makes me even more tired and sick to my stomach and im already prescribed vyvanse. I dont think I have cfs because i dont have post extertional malaise. Exercise does help but barely. I feel like i’ve reached a plateau where exercise no longer helps, although it doesn’t make me worse.      Before I got diagnosed with pots I was diagnosed with depression, even though I told doctors I dont feel sad. They said my depression is just manifesting itself more as fatigue. I took their word for it and tried therapy and 10 different kinds of antidepressants, which just made me even more tired so I stopped them.  I feel like i’ve tried everything. I am a bit depressed now but how do I know if im tired because im depressed or if im depressed because im always tired!? How can one not be depressed when they’re so tired that they can’t even participate in life???I am seeing a pots specialist soon but in the meantime how do you guys manage your fatigue? Do you have any tips that I haven’t tried yet? Thanks! [info] None [info] 1560438997
panconpaltixx [info] So for a long time I've been diagnosed with depression, a good way for me to cope with it is to joke about suicide and such. So for some months I've been doing this meme thing which became popular in my school and now some friends are saying it more and more regularly. But today a friend of mine wrote on a test "idk the answer, me and OP are killing ourselves today anyways" which like they were cautious of me before because of my situation but they never took it seriously, which was my target as for me it's a joke that's true to some point but it's made so people wont take it seriously. Well now my parents were called, and I might get expelled for not being in conditions of being in a competitive high school.Yay me [info] None [info] 1559779035
Straydog99 [info] Not understanding isn't the same thing as not feeling. I was diagnosed with depression years ago and it felt strange to me since I can't remember not feeling that way. All I remember is thinking "So this is depression? So what is... not... depressed... supposed to feel like?" I've also had plenty of times throughout my life where I looked at people who can fit in and have friends and such and thought "What are they doing different? What is the trick? How do they know what to say and how to act? How can they manage to do it day in and day out?" and it's very frustrating. I mean I can read about it in a book, but people aren't books. When it comes to actual people wild animals are easier to understand. [info] None [info] 1503597858
druggedmonkey [info] Borderline and dialectic behavioural therapy I was diagnosed with depression and borderline, and had tried a lot of therapies but 2 weeks ago I have started the DBT.So does anyone else has experience with the DBT?- Has it helped you a lot?- Do you still have effect from it even after the therapy?- Do you have some more tips in general to make it more effecient?- How long have you followed the therpay before it really showed results?Thanks in advance!Need more information or don't want to post on here directly, pm me! [info] None [info] 1514034876
IdaSchmida [info] What the f**k should i do. I knew I was pregnant instantly. I kinda pushed it back, because I knew things will now get uncomfortable. All the time before my bf of almost six years did not believed me, when the test came positive he fell into a state of shock and said some mean things. I knew they were articulated in a state of fear but nonetheless it hurt so much. Now (2 weeks later) he could be up for a child, but actually doesn't want to. He sees all the money we don't have to give the child a wealthy and carefree life. And is asking for an abortion with the wish to We both are 32, i'm only one semester away from finishing with a bachelor's degree and he's a freelance coder. I love our live as we lived it all those years.  I'm diagnosed with depressions and I had two abortions by the age of twenty. I had to do it at that time but it's still hurting. I repressed my secret wish for a baby the whole time. ( I got secretly upset when I saw young woman with Babys ore someone I knew got pregnant). Now it feels to me that I have to choose between our relationship or my sanity, TBH I think I can't go through another abortion without hating myself till the rest of my life. In the other hand: I can see myself with a baby but I'm sure if I can be responsible enough for a child or a teenager. I don't want to throw an innocent person into the mix when it comes to depressive phases were I could sleep all day. I'm quite confused. Can anyone relate to that? [info] None [info] 1549183641
KulaanDoDinok [info] Also, how would I go about going to the gym? I know it's free for students at my university, but every time I've tried to go I just kind of break down and give up, sometimes before I even get there. (Note: this isn't a new problem; it's probably been like that since before I was diagnosed with depression). [info] None [info] 1393978624
Robster881 [info] I was diagnosed with depression just before I met my current girlfriend who has had mental health issue her entire life.I'm not gonna pretend it's easy and that I don't get clingy at times and she doesn't get distant at times because those are our ways of coping, but she's worth every hardship. We both understand each other's issues and it means that we know that sometimes our actions aren't entirely our own. [info] None [info] 1434400662
kael146 [info] Hey... uhhh, so I’ll say first off that by no means am I trying to justify whatever is going on, but I will say that I have been diagnosed with depression and it really takes a toll on my relationships with others?  So I to a certain extent can see where she’s coming from, with my personal ah paranoia of people using me and shit like that getting in the way of a lot of my relationships with others and it’s honestly fucking rough on the other end too.  What I will say however is that nothing she does is your fault and the best you can do right now is refer her to someone who could maybe help (which you mentioned doing, honestly that’s amazing of you) and be there for her.  You’ve done what you can, and really there’s nothing much else you could do.  What she does need to understand though and what’s taken me ages to accept is that even the closest confidante can’t replace a therapist, and treating someone who isn’t qualified for the position as such not only won’t help, but also potentially harm them.  Perhaps talking it out would be a good idea, but I don’t know the nature of your position and I won’t say it’s foolproof. Just know that it isn’t your fault and you’re doing what you can, and ultimately it’s on her to get better.  By supporting her on that journey you’re doing so much, and I’d honestly be more than grateful for someone like you. [info] None [info] 1537959201
insane677 [info] Prozac, and increased sex drive? Possibly (Nsfw) (First post, about to break my r/depression cherry)I was diagnosed with depression about four months ago, and have been taking Prozac for about three months. I started at ten milligrams, and then I was bumped up to twenty. (I actually experience less side effects with twenty than I did with ten. Weird.) I've heard people mention decreased sex drive with Prozac, (being unable to 'perform' and such.) but I (M18) have actually experienced the opposite. Before my medication and talk therapy, I had little to no sexual interests. Sure, I've checked some girls out and watched porn and I masturbated and stuff like that, but I never had any crushes or made it anywhere sexually with a girl. Whenever a girl showed interest in me, I either ignored it, or it flew over my head entirely.But, ever since my medication, I had my first crush ever on a girl at work, and even asked her out. (She turned me down, but that's fine.) And I've started noticing girls more than I ever had before. I even had some light flirting with this cute Asian chick at Starbucks this morning.Anyone else experience this? Thoughts? [info] None [info] 1496500889
sandboxgamer16 [info] No. I was diagnosed with depression last year but i thought i might have finally ended that once and for all [info] None [info] 1533030504
violagirl317 [info] How do I stop being so unmotivated and lazy? I’m 16F and I can’t seem to muster up any motivation. All I do is lounge, sleep, and play on my phone. I don’t do homework and I just keep watching my grades slip, not being able to care. I was diagnosed with depression last year and have been taking medication but I don’t know. I so desperately want to have that motivation and care about things but I just can’t. And then I feel like a piece of shit because everyone else is doing so much better than me. I procrastinate on everything and can’t focus, which is probably from my ADD. What can I do? [info] None [info] 1582862993
throwaway983524 [info] * Born with [ADD](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Attention_deficit_hyperactivity_disorder_predominantly_inattentive), [Tetralogy of Fallot](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tetralogy_of_Fallot) and [Auditory Processing Disorder](http://www.ncld.org/types-learning-disabilities/adhd-related-issues/auditory-processing-disorders/auditory-processing-disorder-by-age-group).* Dysfunctional Family. My dad was an alcoholic. My sister abused drugs and alcohol. We did 'normal' things and appeared normal (my family tried to hide all of our issues from friends and relatives).* My ears grew outward and made me look really stupid (which caused me to be made fun of constantly, ruining my self esteem). I ended up having surgery to fix them in 6th grade.* I needed braces starting in Middle School till 10th grade. Not only did I hate smiling for the longest time but this also hurt my self esteem. They stayed in for so many years during a time period in which I should have been developing my social skills (especially talking to girls), that it set me back significantly.* Me and my dad blew my personal life savings/college fund on the stock market. I recently got E-Trade to return what was left of the $3,000 investment I put in. $26. The decision that lead to that was made while he was drunk (and it was my idea). I was too young to understand the stock market or that my dad was in no condition to be handling my money.* My dad's alcoholism got worse while I was in High School, causing me to hate alcohol and drugs.* I was diagnosed with depression.* [I wrote a diary entry in preparation to vent on the internet about my home life that, after found by my dad, caused my dad to go crazy, threaten my mom, get arrested, move to a hotel and ultimately die of a heart attack when I was 17.](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/2azral/what_trivial_thing_did_you_do_that_set_off_an/)* My issues at home made it difficult for me to feel confident with girls. My struggles continued.* I prepared to go to a private for-profit film school after High School, leading me to ignore the SATs and college-necessary classes.* My hatred for drugs and alcohol (as noble and healthy as it was) made me really anti-social. I wasn't fun to hang around with for a lot of people. I didn't have beer or a drink to mask my social awkwardness with women.* After 2 years of working regular jobs, I spent all my money and borrowed $70,000 to move to LA to go to film school for 1 year. Sallie Mae and the financial aid assistant mislead us and I had to start paying back the loan 6 months after I started school. I was paying back my loan with the loan money, cutting down the time I had in LA to get a job before I ran out of money.* I graduated from Film School in a year and was really mislead on the right course of action to take and the jobs to look for. I finally got on track with an internship 5 months after I graduated.* My car broke down and I didn't have the money to both pay rent, fix the car and pay my student loans. I had to cut my internship off (which was going really well and they probably would have found me a job within a few months of me leaving).* I spent 4 years languishing between jobs (mostly temp). My resume was ruined in this time period. I was depressed. I wasted a bunch of time probably.* My hatred of the bar scene and lack of any real college, left me with very little opportunities to meet women. My film school had 12 women in it to 50 men.* My dad's father died, leaving me with 25% of his estate (it wasn't much by that point but it was more money I ever had in my life). I paid off most of my student loans (my mom squeezed every penny to pay for the rest because it was in her name).* My mom suggested I keep some of the money I got to move back to LA to pursue my career. I kept $25,000.* I returned to LA eventually. Moved in with some friends from school with low rent. I worked a total of 8 weeks in 14 months (the job I had for the most of that is a whole story on it's own). The last 6 months I tried getting any regular jobs (all of which I was VERY qualified for).* I started June of 2014 with about $5,000 left. I quit. I moved home.* I am very depressed that I blew so much money and I couldn't find a simple regular job to even stay in LA. I applied everywhere I thought I could work and nobody would take me.* I'm working a seasonal part-time job right now that pays min wage and nets me about 100-150 a week.Now: I am 28, living with my mom, still a virgin, working a truly dead-end job, horrible resume and I have no idea how I am going to get my life on track. I am pretty depressed. I had high expectations of myself and I feel very delusional now. [info] None [info] 1412393183
clockwerkman [info] OP, I want to share with you a poem that has meant a lot to me throughout my life.  I was diagnosed with depression when I was 15, and I've struggles with that throughout my life.  This has helped me, and given me more strength than anything else, and I hope it helps you as well.  This is from memory, so it may be a little off.  Also, any emphasis is mine.G.K. Chesterton's The Last HeroThe wind blew out from Bergen, from the dawning to the dayThere was a wreck of trees, a fall of towers, a score of miles awayAnd drifted like the livid leaf blown before the tideSpewed out of house and stable, beggared of flag and brideThe heavens are bowed about my head, raging like seraph warsWith rains that might put out the sun and rid the sky of starsRains like the fall of ruined seas from secret worlds aboveThe roaring of the rains of god, none but the lonely loveOh feast in my halls oh foemen, oh eat and drink and drainFor you have never loved the sun in heaven, as I have loved the rain.. The tide of battle changes, so may it always beI stole my lady bride from them, they stole her back from meAs I wrenched her from her red roofed halls, I rose and saw ariseMore lovely than the living flowers, the hatred in her eyesShe never loved me, never wept, never was less divineFor sunset never knew us, her world was never mineWas it all for nothing, that she stood, imperial in duress?The sound of silence made softer, with the sweeping of her dressOh you who drain the cup of life, oh you who wear the crownYou've never loved a woman's smile, as I, have loved her frown.The wind blew out from Bergen from the dawning to the dayThey ride and race with fifty spears to break and bar my wayI shall not die aloneAlone, but kin to all the powersAs merry as the ancient sun, and fighting like the flowersHow white their steel, how bright their eyes, I love each laughing knaveCry high, and bid him welcome to the banquet of the braveYea, I will bless them where the bend, and love them as they lieWhen upon their skulls my sword falls, shat'ring from the skyAnd in that hour, when death is as a light, and blood is as a roseYou've never loved your friends my friends, as I, shall love my foes..Know you what you shall lose this night, what rich uncounted loansWhat heavy gold of tales untold you bury with my bonesMy loves in deep dim meadows, my ships that rode at easeRuffling the purple plumage, of strange and secret seasTo see this fair earth, as it stands, to me *alone* was givenThe blow that breaks my brow tonight, shall break the dome of heavenThe trees I saw, the skies I saw, after, no I shall seeTonight I die the death of god, the stars shall die with meOne sound shall sunder all the spears, and break the trumpets breathYou've never laughed in all your life, as I shall laugh in death. [info] None [info] 1441879295
faroffland [info] Hi OP,My sister and I had a childhood that has affected us badly into adulthood. It wasn’t as bad as the abuse you suffered but my dad is quite emotionally abusive, and we went through some rough life events.I was diagnosed with depression when I was 16 and tried to kill myself. My sister at the time didn’t really talk to me about it at all - she was 18 and I guess she found it really difficult to deal with which is totally understandable. We are VERY close but she would say things like ‘oh yeah when you had “depression”’ (air quotes) and ‘when you were pretending to be depressed.’ I think she also wondered why I couldn’t deal with it and needed so much help when she had been through the same things and was fine.Except she wasn’t fine. Her mental health issues have crept up on her in young adulthood and she’s actually just been diagnosed with borderline personality disorder. I genuinely think my dad also has BPD and his behaviour is part of the reason she find processing her emotions so hard.She had REALLY bad anger problems as a teen - she’s doing so much better now she’s had therapy and can regulate her moods a lot more, but she used to go from 0 to 100 in terms of emotions. Everything was either amazing or the worst and instead of getting sad she got angry (like screaming hysterically angry saying nobody loved her and everyone could fuck off etc etc).Basically what made her realise she needed help was that she realised her relationships were really suffering due to her symptoms, that she now realises were due to her personality disorder. The advice I have for you is to sit your brother down and have a clear conversation about how his behaviour is affecting his relationships, and give examples. This might sound like it will hurt him and damage him more but the only reason he will want to change, and hopefully engage with therapy, is if he himself can see the negative impact his behaviour is having on himself. My sisters relationships were always really rocky and she had problems with severe abandonment fears - she now has a long term girlfriend and deals with her emotions sooo much better.I really identify with you because I feel like I have been in your shoes (had mental health issues, sibling clearly has them too but is dismissive of treatment). The only reason my sister realised her issues was because she was self aware enough to see how much it hurt her relationships. You can help your brother do this by having a frank but kind and supportive discussion about how his anger affects his relationships. HOWEVER, it is up to him to take that information away and then engage with treatment - that is not for you to do so please don’t feel like that is your burden to bear. It is commendable you want to help your brother and I really, really understand because I have supported my sister through her treatment, but there is only so much you can do. He will probably not react well to the conversation at first but hopefully he will think about it and come round to the idea of therapy for his problems. [info] None [info] 1508959652
pmbasehore [info] This will probably get downvoted to oblivion, but whatever. You asked.First, know that I was never really suicidal (I had an interesting reaction to some medication that made me start thinking that way, but my dosage got changed pretty quickly after that).I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago, but when I look back I realize I really suffered from it for years (since high school, at least). I'm a volunteer youth pastor, so when I got diagnosed I spoke with my senior pastor about it. He didn't really give me any advice (he's not a trained medical professional, after all) but did reassure me that I'm not "broken". This helped a great deal.The first church service we had of the next new year, we held a prayer service -- praying for the new year, the new government (an election just ended, and President Obama was just about to start his second term), our city, church, etc. The meeting ended with anyone in the congregation getting prayed for, if they wanted. I went up and got prayer.It was amazing -- I've been a Christian all of my life and I haven't felt anything like that to that point. My pastor said things about how I was feeling that I've never shared with anyone -- not the doctor, not my wife; certainly not him. At the end of the prayer, I felt as if a physical weight had been lifted. I was no longer sad, and I no longer felt as if nothing mattered.Now, I no longer consider myself a "depressed" person. I still get in bad moods on occasion, but I know that I'm not a failure, and that I'm not a waste of space. I even quit taking my antidepressants cold-turkey (withdrawal was a real concern) with no side-effects whatsoever.EDIT: if you're a person of faith, and you suffer from depression, please don't be afraid to speak with your religious leadership. They will likely be much more understanding and supportive than you'd think. [info] None [info] 1440707356
Secret-Circus [info] Overall my parents are amazing, and there's so much that they've done better than any child could ever hope for. I do, however, wish they'd been more emotionally available. We never hugged much, they were flummoxed and not super supportive when (as a child) I showed symptoms of depression, and after I was diagnosed with depression as an adult and sought treatment, my mother could not hold back her discomfort and judgment about me taking medication for it. Another time when I opened up and tried to express to my dad how stressed I was feeling about career/life goals, he chastised me for "victimizing" myself. Now my mom jokingly calls me "The Vault" because, of all her children, I share the least with her, which isn't surprising. They really are fantastic people and they're supportive in a lot of ways, but they just do not deal well with depression or long-term emotional issues. They're very "I'll hug you for a few minutes but then you have to pull yourself up by your bootstraps alone" kind of people.  [info] None [info] 1477018191
therealmcbutters [info] So sorry about your wrong diagnosis. I was diagnosed with depression as well 9 years ago so the bp diagnosis was definitely hard to take. I’m on lithium and lamo right now and lithium is a life saver but sadly lamo doesn’t seem to do much for me. Thanks for your input. [info] None [info] 1568903191
_madlibs_ [info] Holy shit. This made me realize that that happened to me. I loved Instagram, I was always scrolling through the posts, it was my kind of unspoken rule to see every single post on my feed. In February (?) I was diagnosed with depression and put on anti-depressants. I’ve almost completely stopped going on Instagram, I look at it maybe every couple days for like 3 minutes. [info] None [info] 1556039358
Snorris2 [info] Hard to talk tonight Hi everyone. I'm new to this sub, but I think it's time to find a community that understands what I'm going through. I was diagnosed with depression around 11 years old, and now I'm 24. I remember when I was first diagnosed, my best/only friend said to me "what are you talking about? You laugh all the time. We're hanging out right now. Docs are idiots." The next year, he went to a different middle school. We lost touch.Anyway, moving up through middle school into high school, I fed my depression with greasy foods. I became dangerously overweight, and was bullied to the point of a suicide attempt. I wanted to stop feeling nothing when I could see everyone around me feeling *everything*. I was jealous, and in pain. The attempt was real. I could have died. But instead, I got checked into a clinic, where they reminded me exactly of what hell was. I used that experience in that hellhole to fuel myself to never go back. So I started exercising.High school and college were significantly better. I had friends, relationships, and was consistently medicated. Life seemed passable, even felt like I could excel. And now, I'm 24, working a temp marketing job, and I'm finding myself slipping back into feeling nothing. My girlfriend of 5 years still asks me "why are you sad, what's got you down?" My parents recommend me going back to therapy. My friends are slowly stopping texts, and I just don't know what to do. I even had an awesome theme party to go to tonight, but instead, I stayed home, because the thought of going out just... hurts. Like the rules say, I'm not looking for advice. But for any and all who thought they passed through depression, and "ended it," just to find themselves back off the wagon, I'd love to hear from you tonight. Comment or PM me if you'd like. Because right now, I'm the loneliest I've felt in a while. [info] None [info] 1410063757
NowWithMoreChocolate [info] Don't worry, my parents have truly stepped up since I was diagnosed with depression. They've both apologised and make sure I'm okay when I seem down. [info] None [info] 1494229108
angrybarry [info] Running on empty &amp;#x200B;Today I've been diagnosed with depression and have been prescribed sertraline. After years of not acknowledging the instablity in my mind that torments me, I feel an overwhelming sense of relief. I had a very turbulent relationship in the past and it left me an emotional wreck compared to what I was leading into that relationship. Since then I met the girl of my dreams, she made me the happy person I used to be. I felt invincible when I was with her, that nothing could hurt me anymore. However, just under a week ago she messaged me saying that she no longer knew what she wanted and she did not want to wait out these uncertain times. She went from staying up on the phone with me to all hours in the morning to barely talking to me in the space of 4 days.&amp;#x200B;I feel so alone and empty. I lie awake at night wishing she would just message me she changed her mind and she felt the same way I do. But I know that's not a reality really and I shouldn't be so fixated on it. I have no-one to turn to as I feel like an annoyance when I do, I am my own burden to carry afterall. I try to focus on my work that I have to complete and all the deadlines that are inpending but there is no longer a single motivational fibre in my body.&amp;#x200B;Most days are a struggle to get out of bed, I see the way my parents look at me and feel nothing but pity for me. I lie to them most days and tell them that I've completed my work just so I don't feel like a failure. They have both sacrificed so much for me and it eats away at me knowing that I will never be able to repay them for their sacrifices.&amp;#x200B;Many apologies for my rambling, I hope you are all doing a lot better than I am. [info] None [info] 1587209815
gscthinmints [info] Do antidepressants actually help? Hi all, I was diagnosed with depression in August 2017 and I've been taking zoloft since then. I felt a lot better - I started feeling more in control, and for the first time I felt like I was happy with who I was. That's an awesome feeling. However, I feel like antidepressants make me ignore my problems rather than facing it, and it makes me anxious. If depression was a big monster, I feel like antidepressants cage up that monster but the monster can still get out at times and control me. Whereas I feel consciously better, I feel like depression is still lurking around in my subconscious. I still have nightmares every night, which is kind of normal - but maybe that's linked somehow? I just shake it off though, waking up next to a puppy makes it go away. I feel like depression never go away, and I don't know whether or not I should ignore those thoughts that depression provides (not good enough, life is pointless, I'm stuck with my life forever), and let depression lurk in the shadows while feeling better consciously, or to face it somehow. Did anyone face something similar in the past? Does the 'locked up monster' ever go away completely? Tldr: I started taking antidepressants and my depressive thoughts seem suppressed rather than gone. [info] None [info] 1516289751
revolverlolicon [info] DAE become depressed from head rushes? Does anyone else get really depressing thoughts when you get rushes of blood to the head? Occasionally when I stand up and get a heavy head rush, I get an overwhelming feeling telling me that "life is pointless" or "you're a loser" and a flurry of thoughts supporting these feelings. As a side note, the same thing can usually happen when I get high, either on weed or psychedelics, I'll feel these intense waves of hopelessness that honestly hurts a lot. As another side note, I was diagnosed with depression a few years ago but thought I got over it. Does this happen to anyone else or am I possibly just depressed? Sorry for rambling. [info] None [info] 1489915625
VATSYAYU [info] Worst year of my life!! This year has been the worst year of my life tbh.I lost everyone single person I loved.It started when I moved to a new country with my family.. I had some friends back home and I believe I was too much dependent on them for my Happiness. Then my Girlfriend broke up with me this year because of distance..I don't know how to get out of this!!I'm completely stuck in this.I've been diagnosed with depression in here .Staying all alone in here all day. I don't have any friends in this new place. University seems to be a really bad place right now because I have noone with me in the university either. I just attend my lectures and walk back home. No friends to hangout with or talk to.I really miss my friends back home but there's no way back now. I'm completely stuck in this for an year and half.The loneliness sucks and staying all alone really hurts too!!I feel sick all day tbh!😔😔I really hate my LIFE at this point of time!I don't know what to do [info] None [info] 1568315477
MGsubbie [info] How do I handle friends and family? I apologize in advance as my post will probably be a bit of a rambling.I've been diagnosed with depression after my last internship in June when I completely broke down. I'm more of the silent type, and I certainly don't like bothering other people with my issues.I generally dislike talking through my issues with most people actually, as I often find talking about it brings it back to the front of my mind, making me far more susceptible to my depression taking me over in that moment.I usually do find 1 or 2 people to talk to, and I'm going into therapy soon (there was a waiting list.) I really think that for me, that does suffice.However, Christmas is coming in just over 3 months. Which means seeing all my family members. A lot of them can be very inquisitive. I've also been diagnosed with autism (high functioning.) My depression has a lot to do with the problems I face because of it. I haven't had a job since early 2014, the internship was through a program to help people with disabilities to find a job. A couple of people in my family knew that I was entering the program.Now I've had to quit it because of my depression... So when the time comes that they ask me about it, I don't know what to say. I don't want to share it with everyone. My main issue is with my step-dad, who is one of the main contributors to my depression. I just don't want him to butt in on anything. Which he feels is his duty, as my mom passed away and I barely see my father. Some of you might suggest not seeing him, but I do have a good relationship with his children, most of whom have kids, and I love kids. Not seeing them would be worse than seeing him I think.And there's also my bully of an uncle who doesn't understand boundaries and can sometimes act like the Spanish inquisition.Does anyone have some advice for me? [info] None [info] 1442350219
Flying_sky_bear [info] Something about the attitude of this post really rubs me the wrong way. I was diagnosed with depression in middle school as early as 2004, and the meds I was givin made me feel worse. Maybe therapy and medication is essential, but what if it doesn't work? Are you supposed to keep cycling therapists and medications until you land the sweet spot? That seems unhealthy to me. [info] None [info] 1544852635
ComeRound-Wilke [info] I know this is a difficult moment in the both of your lives. Mental illness comes with its challenges but it also has a hidden beauty not everyone sees. It brings you guys closer if you work together and remember to be kind to yourselves and to one another. I've been diagnosed with depression, and ocd. I've come to find stability in my flat has been my biggest help. Having a sanctuary and know there's love there. You can be part of that for him. Journaling is also extremely helpful in helping reduce stress when life feels overwhelming. I don't know what he's particularly dealing with but if you ever need an ear or some advice don't be shy. A quote that helps me personally is   "Every day may not be good, but there's something good in everyday."  Sending lovely vibes!  [info] None [info] 1546494273
bbschoes [info] Really late to the party but I've thought about what I could tell my younger self about now to get my hopes up then. I don't know exactly when my depression started but I remember being so sad that I started thinking about suicide in 5th grade. It wasn't until my senior year after a huge fiasco between my mom and I that I was diagnosed with depression. It was a tough several years being in that state of mind for majority of my childhood but occasionally I would tell myself "eventually this will be all over". About a year and a half after my mom kicked me out and my dad took me in, I started feeling better and even family I hadn't seen for years noticed what they called a glowing smile showing more often. It's been 5 years since the last time I've seen or spoken to my mom and I've never been happier. I graduated college, I am renting a house with someone I'm absolutely in love with and own so many loving fur babies, and work a decent job. If there's anything I could say to my teen self it would be "never stop believing that you will become a better person and will love yourself and the life you live surrounded by the people who love you most. The rain will past and the sun will shine upon you". [info] None [info] 1544156295
cemeteryandchill [info] Which anti-depressant has worked best for you?? I was diagnosed with depression, panic disorder, and GAD last year. Started taking Zoloft in January, and now I am on Prozac and Buspar.I've gained about 30 or 40 pounds, eating the way I normally eat (vegetarian) and even adding more vegetables in to my diet, like sneaking them in.I do at home work outs because I go to college and work 40 hours a week, as well as have a husband and an 8 year old daughter.I've told my doctor that it's depressing that I'm gaining weight and there has to be an antidepressant that doesn't cause this random weight gain.What have you guys found to work best for you? I'm just curious because my doctor is pretty open to suggestion when it comes to medications. [info] None [info] 1506312805
BrickSquadKiller [info] How do you deal with this feeling? I was diagnosed with depression in November of 2017. I know that I have been dealing with it since 2006. Since then I have gotten help and medication and I am better. I have made no attempts on taking own my life but have come close and I think about it almost every day. I work a lot at a few different jobs and even though I don't work out, I am on my feet and on the go a lot. I teach music in the Nashville area and I know that even though I don't get paid enough to live with just teaching, it's what I enjoy most and I'll work whatever other jobs I have to to be able to teach.That being said, I get this terrible feeling almost every week. I feel like there isn't anything I've thing that I would really dive so deep that I could become an expert and do great things. I do love teaching music but I when I have down time I don't want to study theory or practice my own music or write something or anything like that. I also really like cooking but I don't find myself ever really wanting to cook.There are plenty of other things that I feel the same way about.My question to you all is what can I do? I went from "Wanting to die every day" to "Wanting to die every day but making an effort to find a reason to stay". How do I make it to "Wanting to make an effort towards something at least enough to forget that I still want to die every day"?Thank you for your timeTL;DR How do you find meaning in singing enough to want to be better at that something? [info] None [info] 1527459514
ruvb00m [info] I realized that I've had such a pessimistic perspective for so long, that I genuinely feel repelled by happy things. I was diagnosed with depression in '08 and started medication, but I stopped after a few months. I should not have, but I did not want to become dependent upon it for the rest of my life-- not to mention the side effects. For years since then I've known that my depression still exists, but despite knowing that it is caused by imbalances in the brain I wanted to try and overcome it myself.As stated in my title, I realized that I've reached a point where happy things just repel me. They seem fake and they feel foreign. For instance, happy songs, people who are always smiling, friendly attitudes, and any idea of going out with a group of people to have fun. I often wonder how people can be so happy all the time. How is that possible, to wake up and just be happy for no reason at all?My significant other is the only one who makes me feel happy, but I feel that my negativity is subtly harming our relationship. I'm not cruel, but I'm certainly not a positive person to be around. I am often bitter or angry, and complain a lot about things in life that bother me.To counter my negativity I always remember to say a positive thing soon after or later on in the day. I would like more ideas on what I can do to progress myself. It's difficult to break myself out of the way I am now, because the thought of being any other way just doesn't seem normal to me anymore. [info] None [info] 1360734561
cmfhsu [info] I was diagnosed with depression in high school (never given any meds or anything) but I just haven't found the time or the ability to find somebody good to go to yet. My primary doctor (and anybody he can refer) is over 300 miles away, so I just haven't found any openings to do go see him. [info] None [info] 1389497820
RAndrewOhge [info] On Depression - Dec 19, 2016 - By Natalie B. (natalieslovelyblog)I’ve been trying to write something like this for a couple of years, but it has been difficult for me to find the right words. I am not sure if I have, even now, but I think it is important that I try.When I was diagnosed with depression, it was late summer in California, and I was wearing an itchy skirt, sweating slightly in an air-conditioned doctor’s office. The psychiatrist asked me a bunch of questions, wrote a couple things down, and then called in a prescription to the pharmacy. “You’re depressed,” she told me. And despite everything, despite expecting to hear her say it and knowing that it was the truth, it still confused me to hear it out loud. “I’m what,” I said.For weeks after, I could not shake the sense of alienation or the feeling that something was terribly wrong with me. When I was finally able to tell my best friend, she told me that she got sad, too, sometimes, which just made me feel worse. It wasn’t sadness that I had been dealing with. It was something else, something more much permanent. It was the most difficult thing in the world to explain, but it wasn’t just when things were hard that I got sad. There were ordinary moments, too, when unhappiness would spread through my thoughts. At the most mundane, unexpected times — coming up for air in a swimming pool, drinking a glass of water on the back porch, stringing up laundry — I would suddenly be overcome with hopelessness. This was something I had been experiencing since I was about fifteen.When things got really bad, I attempted to detach myself from reality. I hardly spoke to anybody, and when I did, my words were heavy and cruel. I drove spaces between myself and the people who cared about me and felt no remorse as I did. I grew my hair until it reached my hips, I stopped wearing shoes, and I scrubbed my hands nine, ten times a day. Somehow, they felt unclean no matter what I did. I only took cold showers, and I ran every morning until the only thing I felt was the ache of my body and a heartbeat in my left ear. I figured the more worn out I was, the easier it would be to sleep again.I hated how cynical I was about everything, but I also didn’t know how to change what I thought. I only listened to very soft or very loud songs. I recoiled into my music and my writing and my silence. There was a simultaneous rapidity and idleness to everything; months passed with a persistent sort of speed, but the days were long and tedious. People who did not understand the tenacity of depression told me to “just be happy,” as though being happy is a decision we make. Maybe it is, but I don’t know how it could be.Without getting into a lot of the things that lead to me actually going to a psychiatrist, because that’s really not the point of why I’m writing this, I will say that, generally, what a lot of it came down to was sticking around places and people that were not good for me. My problem is that I have such an incredible amount of fondness and love for all of the people in my life.And yet the most important thing I’ve learned over the past couple of years is that it is possible to love a place or a person, but also know that they aren’t the right fit in any sort of permanent way. I have also learned that it is possible to know a lot of different things about a person but nothing about what they are actually like. I do not know if I will ever get used to it — having to quietly get rid of someone, having to leave some place — but I do know that it is the only thing I can do to help myself sometimes. It is the most difficult and important thing to understand that just because you need something to end in order to move on, doesn’t mean it wasn’t once the most significant, beautiful part of your life.Another reason is that I have often found myself fixed in a horrible, temporary way of life, stuck between trying to start over where I am and being unable to forget what it was like somewhere else. It has taken me a long time to come to terms with the fact that so much of my happiness depends on how I perceive everything and everyone around me. And so I am learning to find the benevolence in everything and everyone.Today, I can honestly say that I am content with where I am and with the people that I have surrounded myself with, but that is not to say that I am not still depressed. I am, but I am also so much better at dealing with it. Today, I know that learning about happiness has made me so much sadder and I know that summer is the same as winter, only warmer, and I know that, above all, it is okay to get like this sometimes. This past spring and summer especially, I poured my focus into the world around me. It didn’t fix everything, but it made me feel less isolated from myself and from other people.I went to film viewings uptown and art galleries downtown. I bought a New York Times on my street corner every day and read it cover to cover. I read a lot ~ non-fiction pieces on grief, collections of french poetry, textbooks about the economy. But more than anything else, I wrote. I filled about a journal a week, and I spent the entire summer traveling and writing and writing. I finally finished my novel. And the day that I did was the only cold day of July but I was happy and impossibly full of love and empathy and care for everything and everyone.I guess that we can’t really account for each other’s unhappiness, just like we can’t account for our own unhappiness. For a long time, I thought it was the most important thing in the world that I understood the sadness in me and in him and in her, but the truth is, I can’t make sense of any of it. That’s not really the point. A long time ago, somebody told me to look at the world with a certain disinterest — without any sort of selfishness or innocence or anything and I am trying so hard and it is making everything so much easier.~ NatalieAdditionally, some songs, art, books, and films that have made things better:SongsNew Slang ~ The ShinsBlack Flies ~ Ben HowardRe: Stacks ~ Bon IverDo You Realize?? ~ The Flaming LipsDown By The Water ~ The DrumsRed Eyes ~ The War on DrugsApril Come She Will ~ Simon &amp; GarfunkelA Rush And A Push and the Land Is Ours ~ The SmithsArtTrust Me ~ Moyra DaveyAny of Nan Goldin’s photographsPorte-bouteilles ~ Marcel DuChamp12 Shoes For 12 Lovers ~ Sebastian ErrazurizThe Plum ~ ManetA Lot of Sorrow ~ The NationalBooksThe Year of Magical Thinking ~ Joan DidionSlouching Towards Bethelehem ~ Joan DidionThe Bluest Eye ~ Toni MorrisonThe Dharma Bums ~ Jack KerouacChanging My Mind ~ Zadie SmithSouth of the Border West of the Sun ~ Haruki MurakamiFilmsGoodwill HuntingAmerican BeautyAlmost FamousDriveSleeping GiantEternal Sunshine of the Spotless MindWhiplashLost in TranslationPalo AltoAn EducationArticle: https://natalieslovelyblog.com/2016/12/19/on-depression/ [info] None [info] 1482171187
Illumithottyy [info] Does anyone else feel aimless? Like you’re just drifting, with no real purpose? I apologize for the long post and mobile formatting. TL;DR at the bottom.I was diagnosed with depression about a year ago, after I went off to college. I always did well academically in high school, and got both scholastic and sports scholarships for my college. However, I had a lot of trouble going to class. Not because I didn’t want to, but sometimes I felt like I couldn’t. I would make up excuses, things about myself that prevented me from going. From there it progressed to me rarely leaving my dorm, and then hardly ever leaving bed. I quit the soccer team I went to the college to be on and over the course of the 9 months I was there I gained around 30-40 lbs. I broke up with a long term girlfriend of 4 years and subsequently flunked out due to awful attendance.Fast forward to today. I moved back home, and am going to a community college to try and earn enough credits to transfer out again. But I’m having the same problem with going to class, and feel like my life is headed in no real direction. I’m only 19. All my peers are doing big things, making strides towards meaningful careers and degrees. I feel like my life’s going no where. I’m having the same problems I did a year ago. I’m too embarrassed to talk to my teachers about it, and even if I did I feel like I’ve done too much damage for them to be able to do anything effective to help me. I feel like life is passing me by. I feel like I could wake up 1 or 5 or 10 years from now doing the same thing. I was always told I was gifted, told I was succeed. I feel like I’ll never live up to those expectations. I’ll be another sad story of someone with wasted potential. I know I’m in this rut, but I don’t know how to get myself out of it. I don’t have a job, I ghosted my friends, and I feel like I’m just leeching off my parents. I just want to feel normal again. To have motivation, to enjoy life. I just don’t know if there is any way out of this. TL;DR: I have depression, no purpose in life, struggle to attend classes, felt the same for a year and feel like it will never change. [info] None [info] 1539681958
for_tits_and_giggles [info] I'm not taking any meds right now. I was diagnosed with depression and for 5 years I tried different meds, but they never did shit. I finally just stopped taking them this summer. I'm not seeing a therapist right now because I went back to school, and I don't have a car or good insurance here. I mention the car part, because it's already close to impossible for me to force myself to get out of my room, much less bike 2 miles for an hour of therapy...I'm seriously considering going back home next semester and committing to some intensive therapy. I'm having trouble getting committed to that idea, though, because literally every story I've been told, heard, or read is exactly what you said: it took forever and a bajillion different combo of meds to figure out one that works. I instinctively resist the idea of meds now, probably because of my exclusively negative experiences so far. Also, I have to quit drugs to get the meds to work...at least that's what I'm told. I could do it if I knew the meds replacing drugs would actually work and make me feel better, but...That's fantastic that you found a combo that works for you, though! I'm jealous. I really do need meds. That was kind of the point of my post: eventually, I'm going to need to go through a bunch of therapy, psychiatry, etc.  and figure out a combo of meds that work, because I can't handle what I'm feeling right now and it's rendering me incapable of handling my life. I can't take care of myself...I can't *do* life like this lol. [info] heroin &amp; meth &lt;3 [info] 1415246027
QuinoaOddysey [info] Trying meds? I was just diagnosed with depression recently. I truthfully don’t have a lot of knowledge on this, I feel like I am dismissing meds as an option because I am coming from a  place of ignorance and I keep thinking that I’m just really lazy and not clinically depressed. My therapist suggested continuing to talk things out, group therapy, and trying meds. I’ve never taken anti-depressants before, does anyone have any advice on how they went about making the decision on what to do to treat their depression? I would like to give meds a fair shot but am also nervous about side effects and not being able to function without them. [info] None [info] 1554407633
flossyjae [info] Applying for a MA in Linguistics - realistic? Hi there, just wondering if there are any master students currently at McGill who could possibly help me with a few questions. Basically I've just finished my undergraduate degree in the UK (I am British) but am looking at McGill to complete my MA in Linguistics simply because of its reputation. On the McGill website I found the graduate admission fact sheet for the UK &amp; it says that unless the department says otherwise you only need a 2:1 (grade points of 3.0) in your degree so I was just wondering whether that's correct for the Linguistics department? &amp; if not, would they be willing to take someone who got slightly lower than a first due to health issues? (I was diagnosed with depression in first year &amp; it hindered my scores throughout first year &amp; the start of second year). Also, my undergraduate degree wasn't in Linguistics it was actually in English Language &amp; Journalism, would this mean that I'd be turned down straight away or would I still have a chance? Sorry for all the annoying questions &amp; thanks guys! [info] None [info] 1410890667
Slymsh [info] She left when I told her I was diagnosed with depression. Then she came back only to abuse me. She left for a job across the country when I told her we needed to support each other, then she started abusing me over the phone, and when I stopped answering her calls she came back to abuse me in person. I just told her not to contact me again and cancelled my proposal, then NC. [info] None [info] 1569059255
558931658 [info] Doubting enjoyment of things? I constantly doubt whether or not I enjoy something. When I had a girlfriend for a little bit I questioned whether I really liked her. I question whether I really enjoy watching TV, going to the gym, if a certain movie is good or not, whether I care about school or not, whether I still enjoy building and working with computers (something I was interested in back in middle school), I question whether I enjoy hanging out with my friends, whether I like sports or not, etc, etc. I've been diagnosed with depression but I'm not sure if that's what it is. I feel almost like the shell of a human being, with no real interests or passions. [info] None [info] 1555694715
fakeginga [info] I'm having a really tough time Hi folks. I'm currently in my first year at college in the middle of nowhere in central new york. I didnt realize when I applied, but this is a fat party school. Idk about you, but I have no desire to drink keystone light until i can't remember it the next day... I have found that the kids here are either niche kids or party kids, of which i am neither. I haven't made any friends, which is a huuuuuge change for me. I'm a total extravert and get so much energy from being around other people. ANywho, I was diagnosed with depression over christmas break and started taking Cymbalta, which worked while I was at home and at the beginning when I got back. However, I started feeling depressed and numb and suuuuper tired again after about a month of being back. Over winter break I also decided to apply to transfer schools. We upped my dosage to 60mg, but i had a rlly nasty reaction to it, so I had to go back to 30 until i got back from spring break and could look into another medication. I've been off cymbalta for the past 3 days and feel more like I did before christmas break. I'm super emotional, I don't feel much, and when I do feel, it's sad. I got rejected from my dream school last night and boy was I not prepared for it. I haven't felt that bad ever in my life. All I wanted to do was curl up in a ball and fade away. It's really scary not knowing where I'm going to be next semester. Idk how to deal with that. I have been going to therapy since september and I'm starting Zoloft tonight. &amp;#x200B;Idk I just wanted to vent a bit with ppl who might understand cause this past week has been really hard for me. Being off my meds, first week back since spring break, getting rejected from my dream school that my dad went to (this is my first rejection letter ever). All while not having anyone physically here to give me a hug and be with me.... Any advice about how to deal? [info] None [info] 1553384127
Ryanc98 [info] Is this normal? I'm diagnosed with depression, and lately I've been very depressed.   I was browsing Reddit and accidentally saw a .GIF of a man being shot in the head.  I felt nothing afterwards.  No sadness.  I just kept a straight face.  I feel horrible that I didn't feel anything after it.  Is this normal?? [info] None [info] 1447453864
Flamingomybingo [info] Confronted by my therapist AND couples counselor with the fact that I’m sabotaging my relationship, and I’m trying SO HARD to stop. Basically, I’ve been with my FP/partner for 8 years. We’ve been through a lot, basically because when I met him I stopped drinking/self medicating past trauma and problems with my Nmom, and started a pattern of depression/suicidal ideation spiraling out of control. 3 hospitalizations, 1 was a suicide attempt where we had a fight I instigated, he threatened to break up and I the next day overdosed. He discovered me and saved my life.  Got me treatment, but at the tine I was diagnosed with depression/PTSD and didn’t get BPD treatment. Now, after a lot of therapy, I’m back at work, doing better, but not GREAT. Basically very isolated from all my friends because I moved across the country for my partners job. We’re in couples counseling and the big takeaway from the first meeting is he’s traumatized from my suicide attempts and parenting me because I’m acting like a child (ignoring responsibilities, getting fees and things, smoking a lot of pot) and self sabotaging the relationship. I would blow this off as a quick rush to judgement... but my own therapist has been saying this for awhile. It just sucks. I have to start communicating my wants/needs, not being passive aggressive about it. I have to stop telling him all my dark thoughts, because it is emotionally traumatic to him. I have to have friends outside of him. I’m scared. [info] None [info] 1551551100
firefawkes23 [info] I've never taken any. I was diagnosed with depression about a year and a half ago, but I opted to try "aggressive lifestyle management" (as my therapist called it) and fish oil (recommended by my therapist as a good first step) before considering antidepressants. My father had a bad reaction to his, so I wanted to explore other options first, since it wasn't an emergency situation. Fish oil helps me *immensely*, as does the lifestyle management. But, I also finished engineering school during that time scale, so just the removal of that stress was surely a huge part of it! [info] ♀ [info] 1355203863
WhoNeedsRealLife [info] I was diagnosed with depression but I'm honestly not sure I'm depressed. I'm convinced there is something physically wrong with me but doctors can't be bothered to look for it. Or maybe I just don't understand depression. [info] None [info] 1436770042
OisinKaliszewski [info] Yeah I never really had emotions then. I was just bored with everything. After 4 years I was diagnosed with depression so I guess it stems from there. Essentially I'm just mentally ill. [info] None [info] 1427257183
Life-is-Apples [info] This is going to sound like a few others here that I've read but I need it.At the beginning of December I admitted myself into a mental hospital. My ex girlfriend (then girlfriend at the time of 4 years) was seriously considering leaving me and it had definitely set something off in my head that I haven't felt in a very long time. Before seeing her, of course. I was diagnosed with depression. I'm in disbelief that any of this happened.I grew up with a rough childhood witnessing all points in the triangle of abuse. This including marital infidelity with my parents, and my first girlfriend (the one before the one I just spoke about, she had cheated). It just stick with me. I wasn't supposed to make it this far. Now that I have, I feel like I've been punished for it ever since. I'm not me. I'm buried. I don't want to be around anymore. I live like this every single day making decisions with the flip of a coin. She made me promise her I'd search for help. That I would do whatever it takes. Even though she's me ex I know she cares. It tears me apart piece by piece every. Single. Night. Because I don't know if I'm moving forward or not. For fuck sake I drove 4 hours to the fucking beach just to see the ocean again in the middle of the night just to do it. Whatever it takes.I see a therapist every week. But I need something more in this life.I'm falling apart. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1518413532
IDuno1420 [info] I'm at the point of not caring My partner seems to avoid me during the week until I have a free weekend to myself, an only stays when it suits him, an seems to only stay for one thing as you can guess what that is, an hes all for only finishing himself in that department an many occasions I've spoke to him about this an to him hes the only person that matters because its I should want to please him,An when I have a free weekend to myself he wants me to spend it with him regardless if anyone else wants me to do something because I should want to spend all my free time with him an if I dont it's being spiteful an horrible an not wanting the relationship to work, I've been diagnosed with depression an to him it's nothing me over exaggerating an being dramatic, my uncle died he should be supporting me not using me whenever he wants to.And I dont want no sarky comments just advice [info] None [info] 1565537862
Wadls218 [info] That's actually my "friend", I said once that I was diagnosed with depression (I actually am, I'm getting the help so that's rad), and he went of on this whole tangent about having cuts on his arms and being like "YoU'Re nOT dEpREssed, YoU dOn'T cUt Yourself", it was just really fucking stupid. He isn't depressed btw, he actually lies about everything and ego problems. [info] None [info] 1556076117
Etimodnar [info] When I was diagnosed with depression resulting from workplace bullying, it was so ducking validating. I KNEW I had terrible coping. I KNEW it was a ducked up situation. I KNEW I needed helped. It gave me an empowering label to seek out solutions. I love what you're written, !redditsilver [info] None [info] 1511309875
ethhereal [info] This is how I felt when I was diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1485199832
blemishedcucumber [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 14 (I'm 25 now) but I missed so much school due to that, so maybe you're dealing with some sort of depression or something? Never hurts to get it checked out if you're able to. [info] None [info] 1555349630
bigmountain-littleme [info] Not at all! I've been diagnosed with depression and my gp is amazing about the whole thing we only talk about it when I bring it up and the focus is usually on whatever I came to see him for. It just takes finding the right doctor.  [info] None [info] 1542386418
benpro [info] I suppose I can speak a little bit to this. When I was about 15 (currently 19) I was diagnosed with depression and started treatment. I never really thought about the chance that it would preclude me from missionary service until I began working on my mission papers about a year ago. I had an evaluation by LDS family services and was apparently cleared for service, but after my papers were submitted, I got bad news from my stake president. I was told to wait 6 months and resubmit my papers. To me it was a huge blow which really hurt and honestly put me in a worse place than I had been for a long time. After the 6 mos was up, I tried again by talking to my SP and bishop, but my SP told me he would not recommend me after learning about how I was doing with my mental health issues (something he turned out to be VERY right about). Still possibly working towards it and getting treated for the underlying cause of my depression (untreated ADHD).So I do have some experiences with this whole thing. The best way to prepare him is to not drill into him that a mission is 100% absolute necessity. When growing up I was told that it was Eagle Scout Rank, Mission and then marriage. And it was implied that without the first two, marriage would never happen. Encourage him to find his own way to serve others, church service or not. Teach that a mission is not necessarily for everyone, there are some situations in which it is not in the best interest of the young man or church to send someone on a mission. Basically just try to help him to realize his potential to become somebody great without a mission. It can be very hard to see any potential in myself since I'm not an RM. If someone had a physical disability that precluded them from missionary service, you wouldn't think badly of them, so teach this person that a mental health issue is just the same. Also, prepare him for possible rejection, if someone had told me that I could have been rejected, I probably would have taken it better. Although be tactful with that one, it's a hard thing to discuss. I know it's overused, but every member a missionary, you can still do missionary work outside of a two year mission.  [info] None [info] 1503641211
zeboobalo94 [info] Forgot the password to my throwaway (I feel like an idiot... : /) so i might as well post from my normal account. Thanks everyone for the responses. Guess theres no better place to get things out than to random strangers on the internet. I'm trying to push forward, but I keep getting hindered by my feelings. Thanks for the encouragement. As for everyone whos suggested a therapist, I'm in the process of finding one. I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago (but have had it for about 6). Since I'm 4 hours away from my previous therapist, I can't really go talk to him but it would be easier cause he knows the full story with everything that led up to the break up and everything. But finding a therapist is a bitch when you want to find a long term one that you click with... Once again, thanks everyone.  [info] None [info] 1346627766
bailtail [info] What you’re describing is what I noticed in myself that got me to go to a psychiatrist where I was diagnosed with depression. I completely understand that medical bills may be difficult to absorb, but this is your happiness we’re talking about. I don’t know your situation, but I would encourage you to see a clinical therapist or psychiatrist if you can swing it. It’s tough to put a price on happiness, my friend. [info] None [info] 1571757778
Garbanian [info] I haven't been a teen in a long time but I have been diagnosed with depression and I was a teen, and haven't found a method to cope. Been thru wards upon wards with no luck, limited insurance to help with meds if I get any, and limited support lines outside of medical professionals. The saddest part to me is how little people care. How much people post reach out I'm always there but actually aren't. How many people say they care so much but never reached out after I was foun mid OD. Not everyone has people that care and I hate to say it but that shouldn't be a reason to stay either. I think both sides are selfish. One wants to end their life over whatever they can't escape. The others expect someone to suffer constantly just because death is hard.  [info] None [info] 1552811400
saddyodaddyo [info] Advice for explaining mental health to my family? I (f/17) am currently struggling with my mental health. I have been diagnosed with depression from my doctor and currently take prescribed mood stabilizers. These past few months have been very difficult for me and I really haven’t been myself. I’ve been struggling with my final year in high school and it shows through my grades. I really improve my grades but with my mental state it is impossible. I’m not sure what I should do. I would really like to get the help I need but my mother doesn’t take me seriously.Any advice is appreciated. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1550548192
szerim [info] Does anyone have experience being prescribed adderall while having an ED? I've just been diagnosed with moderate ADHD (god fucking finally) and the person who diagnosed me reccomended adderall/ritalin or SSRIs. I've kept my ED a secret and my parents and doctors don't know I have any eating issues, but I was diagnosed with depression a while back. Last time I went to the doctor for a checkup, my usual one couldn't see me so someone else did. She asked me a lot about my weight loss, because I lost about 25lbs in the past year after maintaining for years before that. I managed to convince her that I was totally fine and just ate healthier and wasn't trying to lose any more weight.I'm worried that my regular doctor will be apprehensive about prescribing me adderall, though, because of the weight loss and my history of depression. I feel like it would seem too risky considering it suppresses appetite so much. Plus, by the time I go for an appointment, I'm most likely going to be bordering underweight which will be almost 10lbs below where I was a month ago when I saw the other doctor. I won't have actually lost 10lbs, when they weighed me it was higher than usual because of some bloating and inaccuracy of their scale.But yeah. I'm really worried that the doctor won't prescribe it because of my weight, even though I haven't been diagnosed with an ED. I'd be lying if I said I'm not looking forward to the appetite suppressant effect, and that's why I'm pushing to get it as soon as possible tbh, but I do really need the intended effects as well of course.Does anyone have experience with this, or maybe with other meds that suppress appetite? Whether you've been diagnosed with an ED or not. I don't know if I'm overthinking this. [info] None [info] 1561937155
HanLeonSolo [info] Sometimes I feel like I'm not actually depressed To start this off, I have been diagnosed with depression, so I know that I do suffer from it. But I rarely feel like crying, I just lack emotion. I literally go days without thinking about anything except going back to bed or hurting myself. when I'm at work I can laugh and smile, but the second I get in the car to go home it's back to staring at the gun cabinet and wondering why I'm still forcing myself to suffer. It makes me feel even worse knowning there are people worse off than me who can't even make themselves function, and yet here I am, able to function and laugh in public. It makes me wonder if I'm actually depressed or if I'm making a mountain out of a molehill. [info] None [info] 1530344779
jbailey1991 [info] I’ve felt that way most of my life. I finally got up the courage and motivation to go and see a doctor about it. I was diagnosed with depression and put on a course of Fluoxetine, which is a fairly standard anti-depressant. Since the medication has kicked in, I’ve felt infinitely better, and it’s given me the break in the clouds I needed to be able to work on techniques and counseling so that I’ll be able to come off the meds one day. All this to say that it’s not a bad thing to see a doctor about this. I really wish you all the best and hope that there’ll be a break in the clouds for you too. [info] None [info] 1517239681
quintindt [info] AITA for asking my friend to smoke with me? I used to have this friend who was a girl that was my best friend for around 2 years. We hung out like 2-3 times a week and always were doing something together, and these were some of the best years of my life. I am diagnosed with depression and I find one of the best things for my depression is smoking weed, which I have since stopped because of how dissociative I get when i’m sober. She has ADHD and is often depressed so I suggested one day I bring my wax pen and we smoke a little bit and see if she liked it. At first she was saying yeah that would be great it’ll help a lot but soon she got paranoid thinking her neighbors would get all upset and get her in trouble, to which I said wax has no smell and we could just smoke in her backyard. She just kept saying no and I just said okay, and this apparently was a big mistake. We still hung out that day and had a lot of fun, she seemed unbothered by the conversation and was in a better mood than usual. After this day we didn’t hang out for a while, she stopped texting me and I never could tell why,  but I just kinda shrugged it off thinking she was just busy. Flash forward to another couple weeks when I finally thought to myself “she really must be mad at me” and she went on this long rant about how manipulative I am and how I can’t ever stay in my lane. Now mind you this is weeks after we hung out and she seemed fine, and all I wanted to do was try to help how she was feeling, and now she hates me. So am I the asshole?Edit: I texted her a paragraph asking why she was ghosting me, and then she proceeded to explain. [info] None [info] 1549214214
Superjukes2 [info] I started crying while reading this...It is the same cycle, except my parents love me.The batter me with insults, but they dont know it. This started in fourth grade when I started getting F's and missing homework and getting in trouble for petty things. I come home to them screaming at me. I cant get the image of their disappointed faces out of my head. I have been whipped with a belt, a heavy cup was thrown at my head, shattering on impact and blinding my right eye for a solid 7 hours, and I have been hit by a baseball bat due to my younger brother taking their side. A 10 year old beat  me up. He despises me too. He asks me to play with him, I say ok, I go to play Mario kart or some shit like that, and he fucking cries and calls my mom. She then hits me with all her might. 5 minutes later she's all sweet and like,"I love you,( UwU face), then is like, go get this for me." I'm sliding on thin ice and hoping I fall through so it all ends.Im too young to buy a gun, so I would steal one and shoot myself for commiting a crime. Hehe. I cant help but laugh at myself while typing this garbage. I'm an overall quiet but strong type, judging by the fact I snapped an iron rod by karate chopping it, and not very hard either... I dont see much to look forward to, and hope some freak accident kills me quickly so I am spared from this vicious cycle called life. But that wont happen, so I have been escaping to the digital worlds, playing games and crap like that. I dont know why, but roblox really takes up all my time. I know , that shitty ass game with lego characters and crap. But the diversity, and the possibilities are endless. You can be what ever you want, at anytime, and change it.Play different games, meet different people,etc. It's such a stress buster, it's like an alcohol addiction for me. Then my parents seized that too. I'm feeling trapped, and cant do much, as I dont go out often, and haven't been to a doctor. I asked my friend to check this teen lifeline packet from a presentation, and read off all the symptoms of depression. He specifically said I had them all. I was diagnosed with depression by my parents as well as my friend. They read the packet and just looked at me and said, "you need help," and they haven't done anything. They just told me to get to work... [info]  [info] 1575005989
staseyA [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was very young. I was told that was why I always had low ambition and the reason I was tired.For nearly 10 years my doctor was changing my daily dose of my antidepressants and changing it to different ones because nothing ever changed. As I got older I would just fall asleep all the time. I never wanted to do anything or go anywhere because I just wanted to lay in bed. I never really had close friends all through out school and even into my earlier years as an adult because I could never find the energy to form close relationships or memories with people. I started to feel isolated and alone. That lead to feeling sad and lost all the time. All the depression poster symptoms. I thought my depression was just getting far worse and came to the conclusion that it was who I was and how I'd have to feel for my life.&amp;#x200B;When I got into my twenties I went and saw a sleep specialist because I realized it was not normal to feel this way. I was diagnosed with Narcolepsy. I was put on new medication and realized that I was never depressed.  Within a a month, maybe even less, I was on a normal sleep schedule. Instead of sleeping 12+ hours straight with naps during the day, I was sleeping 7 hours a night and for the first time held a job because I had energy. I was able to experience having SO much time to accomplish so much that I just couldn't do before. I started working out, went back to school, arts and crafts, ect. Its been two years or so now. I'm married, hard working, became a wonderful cook, and have a life. Still don't have friends, decided that people aren't really a thing I enjoy a whole lot. [info] None [info] 1560341963
iAreMoot [info] Yep, still together. And I would say better off now. We’ve never ever talked about it however. My entire immediate family have been in therapy apart from me because I can’t afford it. The worst thing is I was diagnosed with depression and I told them this once. My mums first reaction was to say ‘good for you’, very sarcastically. A couple years later she’s having problems at work and is also diagnosed with depression, she called me up crying about it and it took every fibre in my body not to hang up on her. [info] None [info] 1556046353
alexia_muriel [info] You could always just try to do everything thing the same minus the weed for like a month and see how you feel. Could be a false relation like, you smoke alone and you also think more alone also.I have been diagnosed with depression and it doesn't seem to bother me, but all brains are a little different. [info] None [info] 1509325549
Vjernn [info] Today is my last day as an 18 year old, i'm 19 tomorrow. I'm old and alone. I've been diagnosed with depression when i was 13, since then i took antidepressants everyday for the past 5-6 years.This screwed all my chances of being a normal teenager. See, with antidepressants my life wasn't bad, but it wasn't any good either. I didn't cry, but i also didn't laugh; i wasn't sad, but i also wasn't happy. The medication just got me completely neutral, and i can't forgive myself for letting that happen. If i could go back in time i would just change one thing: i would've never taken antidepressants.With the medication on me I just turned 6 years into nothing, just pure dust that scratches the top of my head now and then. These years could be summarized as me looking at a computer screen just waiting to get out of school and start working endlessly until the day I die. And that was what the antidepressants did to me, i did not want to die anymore, but wanted to live my whole life as a rotting zombie.Now, all that i wish was that i could have enjoyed  something in my life before, because right now i got my teenager wish. I'm working a 8am to 5pm job in a "colourless" place with people that blame me for every single bad thing that happens.I wish i could go back, I wouldn't give the psychiatrist a chance to diagnose me with depression. I would, probably, have cried a big part of my teenage years without the medication, but once in a while a smile would take the tears's place.I don't  know where to go now that i'm old. And i'm old. I know that, from now on, all days will be the same for i have lost my teenage years, the years that should've given me good memories, good enough to make me carry on with a little less distress. I know that my 20's and 30's will be the same, at some point i'll get hit again and start wishing i could turn back time.The people i have studied with for all those years, from middle-school to high-school, can also only think about the past, but they think about it as if they had fullfilled all their dreams during that time. Whenever i see them, they talk about the past. They can actually look back and think of a time when they were happy, when they didn't have much responsabilities and could just do anything they wanted, except paying bills. I'm not a kissless virgin, but i'm a virgin. Still, i wish i had done more of that, just go out and find a girl that wanted to kiss me. Well, i had my first kiss when i was 17 and in my last year of high school. The one day i tried going out with my colleagues - that i called friends at the time - i actually had fun.  God, what a waste. Now i'm also wasting my time writing this and being concerned about things i can't actually change. But what's the difference now? It's all over and i have no one with me.Sorry for the wall of text and for butchering the english language, it's not my native idiom. [info] None [info] 1558566371
benson2880 [info] So today was the day I've been fearing... I've been fighting with psoriatic arthritis and other immune system problems for almost 10 years now. It has gotten to the point where it is in just about every major joint I have, shoulders, knees, hips, back, and in my chest. On top of the pain from this and the disgusting skin issues I am constantly sick, I take steroids to boost my immune system, but ultimately they do more harm than good and it continues to degrade. I have always done work that required a lot of heavy lifting, construction, loading dock, factory, stuff and finally last year my body couldn't take it anymore. I used up 60 days of FMLA leave in just over 3 months, and had to quit my job. I spent a few months trying to find something less stressful on my body and started driving a cab. After only 3 months of that I was in an accident, which made the insurance company not cover me anymore and therefore unable to drive anymore. On top of that I got a ticket that I couldn't pay because I lost my job and lost my license. I lost everything I had, my place, everything in it, my ex dumped me because I didn't have a job. I moved in with some family that had an extra room and agreed to pay rent when I could, but then applied for social security disability. I read up on it, and according to everything I read I should have qualified, I had multiple items on their list that were wrong with me, every one of them effect my ability to work, there was no way I was getting denied. About a month ago, I got a written notice from the family that I live with that since I haven't paid rent in about 6 months, I need to either get a job (which would immediately nullify my disability claim) or I have 60 days to get out. I knew my decision should be coming, so I waited, knowing that when it gets approved I will get almost 2 full years of back pay from it. Well, Today is the day, I checked the mail and got a denial letter. Apparently they see me as I have been treated even though none of the treatments have worked. So now I find myself with less than a month to get out, no place to go, no way of getting there, and no plan on what to do after that. I know that I can appeal it, and should even win, but it is a year long process according to everyone I have talked to. I can't be homeless for a year, and I have no idea what kind of job I can do where if I'm sick I can just miss a day. Who hires someone that says hey I might miss a month at any random moment? My family sees me very little, they all think it's an over reaction from me,"everyone lives with pain, deal with it" is the kind of shit I hear. When I was diagnosed with depression, I was laughed at "if anyone is depressed around here it's me, I've been supporting your lazy ass for months" pretty sure that's a direct quote... I'm just sick of everything, I have teenagers in the house that call me a lazy bum, hell even their friends talk shit to me, because I can't say anything about it...I know life can be better than this, I've had better, if I was approved it would instantly be better, but I just don't know how to survive until then. I take about 15 different medications every day (around 25-30 pills a day), with others that I have just for extra painful days, and I know I could just take them and go to sleep and never worry about any of this again, I've been trying to think my way out of it, but I really see nothing else besides suffering for at least a year living on the streets as my alternative... [info] None [info] 1450849075
axolotlsaffect [info] considering I have been diagnosed with depression and treat it well, endless empathy with that said, people who use their depression or other mental health challenges as an excuse to be insensitive dicks or manipulate people can fuck right off [info] None [info] 1569839467
Anonthrowawayx2017 [info] Yeah this is me currently right now. I had a bad year. Was diagnosed with cancer and had a testicle removed because of it...but I'm cancer free now. My gf of 6 years broke up with me a second time in the last 10 months last week , my work has grown very demanding and it's going nowhere...really need to get back into school as a returning 35 student/senior year. A coworker killed himself in late October. I just got a therapist for the first time in 15 years this week. I was diagnosed with depression, I have all the signs of it. Right now because of my situation the symptoms are just like yours and how I feel. When my ex gf is in the picture it's there but masked a little better...still fatigue, sleep issues but I hide it.I'm trying supplements and working out 30-1hr everyday which is a stretch for me. But im really trying this week to do it.  So yeah I dunno  [info] None [info] 1516510972
ALMOST_GHOST_19 [info] Well, what you described sounds like depression, and being diagnosed with it doesn't take much. I was diagnosed with depression by doctors and a therapist even though I can tell you with a 100% honesty, I've never felt or been depressed. So, you should definitely tell your parents. Inform them. Although they might be taken aback, or even react with hostility, reassure them that you want to improve your mental health for their sake. Because even though that video opened your eyes, your thoughts will return eventually. And as someone who has attempted and will eventually take myself out by suicide, I can tell you that in suicide, selfishness lies in both sides. And soon, you'll be asking who's happiness is more important. Yours? Or everyone around you? And it's hard living for others when all you want is to just leave. So seek help, because I can tell you want it. And suicide that can be prevented, should be.  [info] None [info] 1554111339
doritios_makeup [info] I can't do this anymore. Hello, apologizes for the wall of text that's about to be thrown at y'all. First time posting on here so I want to give a bit of backstory before I jump into my problems as of today. So I'm 19 years old, I live in one of the the most expensive cities in Canada(important, I swear) and I'm living with a fucking narcissist. My mother has been the worst parent for my entire life. Never has she once supported me; she wanted me to end up like her-- a lazy freeloader that gets handouts from the government. Growing up, we lived in a 1.5br (1 bedroom and a small den/office that was my room) that my dad bought for incredibly cheap. My dad would go out and work 12 hour days and my mom would spend her entire day at home doing absolutely nothing.. She wouldn't even walk to my school and get me. I'd have to walk home with my friends and their older siblings or hope that my dad had a break long enough to come get me. She was never there at my soccer games, wasn't there when I broke my first bone, wasn't at my piano recitals, wasn't there to take me skiing for the first time, when I was diagnosed with depression she wanted to start me on pills right away instead of sending me to a therapist. If I'm ever anxious, instead of leaving me alone she tries to give me a pill to get me to shut up. She never once supported me throughout anything; at my high school graduation she sat 2 rows away from the rest of my family and made a big deal about it AFTER the ceremony. My aunt was more like a mother than her. &amp;#x200B;My mother blames all of my mental health issues on my father. My father is a very stressed and tired man. He's 53, he's still young; but my mother stripped him of most of his youth. She's 10 years older than him (she was a golddigger, FYI; my dad was successful in his early 20's which is when they first met), she took most of his money when they first moved in together. She was emotionally and verbally abusive to him; and at one point she took a majority of his savings and gambled hardcore. Her brother gave my dad $15,000 to buy a garage for his business and she took the money and blamed it on my dad so that her side of the family hated him; but everyone knew the truth. They were just too tired of her to say anything. She was addicted to opium throughout my childhood, a vivid memory I have is her smoking out of her makeshift pipe in our kitchen and me thinking it was neat and trying to go smoke out of it.. She didn't even stop me. She would smoke cigarettes in the same room as me, and she'd refuse to wash my clothes once a week. It was usually once a month. So I'd have to go to school smelling like cigarettes.. The kids called me ashtray. My dad tried so hard to give me a better life, he'd work overtime to support me in the things I wanted to do, but he wasn't able to give me the one thing he tried his hardest to give me: a stable home without her. &amp;#x200B;She'd kick him out, leave him on the streets with no money.. Nothing except the clothes he was wearing and his shoes. Thank god he'd always keep $20 in his car. There were times where she'd take his car keys from him just to torture him, leaving him alone in the dead of winter. My dad endured so much pain because of her. The days she'd kick him out would be the days she'd be most abusive towards me. She didn't start hitting me until I turned 16 but still. The stuff she called me weren't things a 12 year old should be hearing. My dad got sick of her and decided to leave. He moved back in with my grandparents, and he's been saving up so he can buy an apartment for himself. My grandparents don't expect him to pay for anything; which is a good change from my mother. &amp;#x200B;The past year has been painful for me. I've come close to committing suicide twice. We live in government housing, and I know I should be thankful for a roof over my head, but I'm not. I'm disgusted that we live in government housing because there are people that need it more than her and I do. She has been abusing the welfare system for over 20 years, and she can work if she got off her lazy ass and worked. Occasionally she cleans houses, but then complains about it for an entire week. I work two jobs, 14 hour days, but if I complain I get hit. The day of my most important exam, I asked her for $10 because I had to pump gas after my exam and I had lent her $100 a week before. She lost her shit, and punched me in the jaw and pinched my bicep so hard that it left a bruise. It was right before our grad camping, so I was ashamed to wear a swimsuit or short sleeve because I didn't want anyone to ask me about it. I pushed her into the wall and slapped her as hard as I could because that was my initial reaction. She ended up crying and told her 1 friend (that is a complete enabler) that I hit her out of the blue. She called my dad and told him the same thing. My dad knew from the get-go that she was lying, but didn't say anything. I had to spend the first 2 weeks of summer wearing long sleeves/putting makeup on my bruise because it was so bad that it took 12 days for it to fully go away. &amp;#x200B;She has always told my family how much of a bad child I am.. Recently, she texted me and told me she was coming home at 4 am. I had been asleep since 11 at this point, and I assumed she was going to be out all night, so I locked both our normal lock and our deadbolt. I didn't see the message until I woke up at 6, and I called her and she didn't pick up, so I freaked out and drove around the city for 2 hours trying to find her, she finally calls me back and starts going off about how much of a shitty child I am for forgetting about my mother in the "freezing cold" and how she was walking around the neighborhood crying her eyes out before sitting in the bank until her friend (the enabler) picked her up and they went to the casino. At this point, I don't care. She can do whatever she wants with her life. Just recently, I got lip fillers because my lips have always been a big insecurity of mine; and it was my birthday recently so I decided to get it as a one-time only sort of thing for myself. I didn't plan on telling my dad because I was too scared to, and he has always preferred me to look natural (no makeup, normal wavy hair, basically like I'm still a kid) and she ended up telling him. She BACKED ME UP on getting lip injections. She told me she wanted to get them as well, and she supported me through the ENTIRE THING, and then tells my dad how disappointed she is in me and how she told me that I shouldn't because the hyaluronic acid (which your body naturally produces) is cancerous. I'm trying so hard to save up and move out, but my city is so expensive to live in, I feel uncomfortable living with people I don't know, and I can't live with my dad/grandparents because they live an hour away and I'm selling my car so I can't get to and from work.. And I can't just get new jobs either because I get paid really well at both.&amp;#x200B;I've been thinking about getting a third job, just to help a little more with moving out; I can't keep living with her; my depression has hit it's peak and if by this time next year I haven't moved out I am most likely going to kill myself. I told my entire family I haven't gone to university because I want to save up, but really it's because I don't want to go to school AND live with her. In grade 12, I got accepted into a school 4 provinces away from me (my dream school) and she threatened me and told me I had to stay, so I stayed.. I shouldn't have done that. I feel so alone in this world. I can't do anything about it either; I feel stuck in this life I live. I want to try and go back to school next, next summer (May 2020) and just work as often as I can. &amp;#x200B;I got her a gift for Christmas. The first, and last gift she'll ever be getting from me. It's a nice necklace. It's a sphere/ball inside of a cube. She'll think it's cute, and she'll wear it everyday; but really I only got it because it symbolizes me in our relationship. Trapped.&amp;#x200B;I feel like a loser. Everyone I grew up with has their life together except for me. I don't even have my life partially together. I dreamed of going off to university in high school, getting my life together, meeting new people. Now I can't even have a boyfriend without breaking up after 2 months because of my issues.I don't really know why I posted, I guess I just feel alone. I just need people to talk to. My best friend tries her best to motivate me.. But it only works so much. I guess if someone here can just talk to me and help me out.. I'd be much appreciative. &amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1543785010
PatrickBatemans [info] Well, it's odd. When I was in fifth grade, I was diagnosed with depression, which kind of sucked, since I didn't understand what it meant at the time. I didn't even know the implications.I, and my parents, sort of realized it on a vacation. I was playing with some friends and when my parents asked me if I was having fun I said no. I told them I had been feeling weird times of sadness for no reason, even when I was with friends or family. They took me to a doctor, they put me on Prozac.Granted, it's gotten worse, but that's because I'm not a scrawny little ten year old anymore. [info] None [info] 1453619824
akatsuki0rei [info] Somewhat trivial because I'm on vacation and supposed to be enjoying myself but everything is just kinda...there and I'm just flat. A friend told me to sing with more emotion at karaoke but I'm like "this is all I can squeeze out".I feel like a positive killjoy. No energy for anything except sitting around and staring at things. I was diagnosed with depression years ago and finally got round to being functional lately, but sometimes it's like it never really left, just moved in next door and pops in to say hi like that annoying neighbor you can't get rid of.  [info] None [info] 1520675862
Mcquiz [info] Hear hear, I was diagnosed with depression 10 months ago and ADHD 2 months ago. Dealing with these two at the same time can be quite a mindfuck. [info] None [info] 1565742336
Joey_unashamed116 [info] Yes they can be. I am diagnosed with depression because my brain does not produce enough serotonin or dopamine. I take medicine that boosts my production and I'm allowed to live life as I did before the disease was prevalent. I thank God for my medicine and Doctor every day.  [info] Christian (Cross) [info] 1464805304
Pharmacyrose [info] When I was 16 I was diagnosed with depression. I started seeing a therapist; my family was dysfunctional. When I started seeing my bf in college, I started seeing a therapist at school because all of the conflict with my parents and siblings.  [info] None [info] 1392606548
dammit_need_account [info] I always wanted to make money off writing.  After years of scribbling in journals and submitting stories to competitions, erotica is finally helping me realize the dream.I've also realized that I'm not suited for a regular job.  I have health issues that makes it hard to 'go to work' every day.  I've never actually loved a job before I wrote erotica.  Now I love what I do every single day.  That's worth riches in its ownThe fact that I'm making a living off this... I feel like I'm living the dream.  I'm driven because I don't want to lose that feeling.Just to say, I did have literary ambitions that extended beyond erotica.  I wanted to write books, make statements that others could read and relate to... then I was diagnosed with depression that altered my ability to write and had to drop those ambitions.  Maybe I'll come back to them one day but for now I'm glad I'm making money off my writing.  I'm also coming to terms with the fact that I'll not be another Hemingway.  C'est La Vie. [info] None [info] 1419382624
wannabewitch123 [info] Keeping it hush hush So I was diagnosed with depression a couple months ago and I'm fine with that diagnosis. In all honesty I kind of feel validated in feeling the way I do because of the diagnosis, like I'm not blowing everything I'm feeling out of proportion... If that makes any sense? However, whilst I am accepting of my diagnosis, I feel my mum isn't. She's being as supportive as she knows how to be, but at the same time she's reminding me to keep my depression a secret from my family and friends and she's almost trying to force me to suppress it. Like "I know you're always sad at the moment but we have family over, just smile for once" Stuff like that. Whilst I don't want to shout about it from the rooftops, I also don't want to lie to people as if having depression is a dirty little secret. The only person I can talk to about how I'm feeling is my mum and in all honesty, sometimes she just isn't comforting and she makes me feel worse. As if I'm choosing to feel how I do, as if I'm actively forcing myself to go out of my own way and make her life harder.  I really don't know what to do or how to approach her about the situation. Should I even approach her about it or what?? I really have no clue what to do anymore. [info] None [info] 1549235924
Maiekx [info] Holy moly, are you my long lost sibling? I got the same habit because of my school days and can't for the love of God, turn it off. It's so mentally exhausting that I was diagnosed with depression last week.Stay strong, someone will love you for who you really are someday [info] None [info] 1565202847
crissyrivera14 [info] I have been diagnosed with depression since I was 14. Do you think I would be one of the few who will suffer from some type of other metal illness or could it worsen or better what I have already?  [info] None [info] 1464282949
alluvicqueen [info] You're completely right and I'm trying but it's so difficult. But thankfully I live in Australia so getting into a university won't be too difficult I think? And I've been to a therapist once which ended terribly but I'm pretty sure I was diagnosed with depression (I know for a fact that I do + I'm suicidal) thank you for the motivation tbh I really just wanna talk and write my thoughts down  [info] New User [info] 1499926800
Sadamatographer [info] Sensitivity to noise with depression? I was diagnosed with depression about 3 years ago but I think I have had it longer than that. Anyway, for the last month I have been living at home on winter break from college. My younger brothers all still live here, so there are 6 people in the house. Holy hell this is a loud house. The TV is on from 10 am to midnight daily, my mom plays the radio in the kitchen when she is home, nobody has an indoor voice, people have conversations across the length of the house, etc. My bedroom is near the living room so I can't go there for quiet. It feel like an unwavering wall of sound just bearing down on me.When I am alone I listen to music and movies at a high-ish volume, so the total volume is not the problem. I have never noticed this problem before, but the constant noise is making me feel irritable and beaten down. Is this something to do with my depression or is this just something else? Luckily I get to move back to school in a few days so it will be over soon. [info] None [info] 1547089735
MirorBCipher [info] Nah, I was diagnosed with depression at about 12 due to issues with my family. I just decided to try and put my life back together and lo and behold I did.  [info] None [info] 1519798434
DarxusC [info] I guess I assumed everybody here did. I used to be kind of obsessive about it, so I try to steer clear of that.  I also try to make a point of really appreciating the advantages of civilization. This year, bug screens beat indoor plumbing for the top of my list. If you're ever really thinking about it, make a point of staying outside for a bit in your area's buggy season first.Yes I've been diagnosed with depression. And I've wondered if this impulse is an evolutionarily useful mechanism for getting you to take the risk of major life changes, when things clearly aren't working out. [info] None [info] 1573256115
ElegantHitler [info] Perhaps we need to find another word for it than tacking on the "emo" stigma. I've been diagnosed with depression for nearly two years now and of course the worst is over, I know what to expect. Every once in a while though you get into a short slump and those types of feelings come back even when they seem out of place. I was just making fun of my own tendencies.  [info] None [info] 1401942814
Synth_Palm [info] It took a lot of courage for me to tell my parents I was suicidal and felt really upset, and it turns out that I was diagnosed with depression. Thank Krishna I finally got help. I'm currently on medicine, and I'm feeling way better already! [info] None [info] 1570488422
Fezman92 [info] My ADHD led to my depression (I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago and have been diagnosed with ADHD for about 15ish years). [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1434763160
erumstead [info] As you know since you suffer from it yourself, depression affects people different ways and with different degrees of seriousness. Just because your girlfriend committed suicide does NOT mean your friend will do that, or even think about it.Also, don't worry too much about your depression being a handicap to helping him out. I have been diagnosed with depression as well, and when I'm feeling bad I often prefer to be around people who also struggle with depression and who understand how I feel and sympathize with it. In some ways, you are able to be a better support for him because you have a better understanding of what he's going through.You sound like a great friend. I hope things get better for your and for your friend soon. [info]  [info] 1426346325
Ewrong [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was a teenager because I was really angry and hated everyone, and I remember thinking to myself "I'm not depressed." but I went with it because I was too young to understand and too lost to figure it out. When they put me on Lithium, that's when I really sat down and thought "God damn, I am so depressed." but it wasn't because I had depression, it was because I was angry and all I wanted to do was lash out and talk to someone but I couldn't because I was so drugged up. Took me almost a year to convince my "doctor" that I just needed to see a therapist. If that's what I felt like on depression *medication* I just can't fathom how hard depression must hit people who are actually depressed if that is the solution. It just ruined my soul. [info] None [info] 1408260482
acceptabledna [info] First time going on meds So I've been diagnosed with depression and ptsd 4 months ago after 11 years of being unaware of my traumas.This year was pretty traumatic as well, got hit by a car, abortion, ending of a relationship etc...My psychiatrist tried to work towards a healing without any medication, however my situation got worse and today she's deciding to double our meetings and put me on medication.This is all very new to me since I've only been in therapy since August (this year) and I'm kind of scared I guess.How will the meds make me feel? What should I expect? Any other tips? [info] None [info] 1512492203
LunaGoddesses [info] Feeling like I was born in the wrong family. Hello, I recently discovered the subreddit a while ago and made me realized that I have CPTSD. I was diagnosed with depression when I was around 7 or 8 so for my whole life I thought I had depression yet it stopped manifesting itself like when I was a child.I was emotionally neglected by my parents as a child so I've been normal since then. In media I've seen how family members would talk to each other about their day or their problems. I didn't have that connection until past few years but for many years I didn't feel like my family is actually my family. I feel like I'm different from them too. Even my brothers who were dealing with the same thing. I feel like I was born in the wrong family. I guess I still do.Has anyone else felt the same way? I even had a dream once where I had a completely different family. [info] None [info] 1578079466
dustbinkid [info] I don't like change. Small things are fine, but growing up I've always had the same family and friends around me, in the same houses in the same town. I wouldn't say I'm sheltered though, not one bit. I've had an "aunt" (mother's close friend) die of cancer, but I guess I was too young to really understand, although I do miss her. In 2013, I had an uncle (biological) die suddenly during a dog walk, and was found in a field after his dog ran home and alerted the neighbours. His wife, my aunt, died 10 months later after minor surgery. I like to think it was from a broken heart and wanting to be back with my uncle (It makes me feel better). Summer 2016 was the death of my sister-in-law's mum. We're all incredibly close and live in the same street, so she was in my life every single day since I was born, even before my brother married her daughter. None of these people were really close enough that people considered I'd be upset by it and I've always just acted fine because, in my mind, there are other people who are more upset by it. I know this is really minor compared to the other things in this thread but not talking about it, and having a family that doesn't really believe in mental illness, has kind of fucked me up a bit. I was diagnosed with depression 3 years ago but nobody talks about it because "it doesn't exist if it isn't physical". Sorry if this entire post doesn't make sense. [info] None [info] 1488562388
pokemon_fetish [info] If I was diagnosed with depression, before treatment I would give it a year to try being an artist, musician, poet, stripper etc and if any of my troubled artist works took off, then I would avoid treatment because cash rules everything around me. Dolla Dolla bills yall. [info] Shitbird Hentai Fetishist/Gay Canadian Slut [info] 1512164524
Sullyvan77 [info] So I grew up in Canada and then moved to the States in my late teens so I'm kind of doing the reverse, but when I was younger I was diagnosed with depression and put on meds with no issue but when I came to the States I had to go off them because I couldn't afford them and my insurance wouldn't cover them because again 'preexisting condition' because of my age. Still not on them even now as an adult because mental health isn't taken as seriously down here [info] None [info] 1560295086
chernobyl169 [info] Nothing instigates childhood depression quite like religious oppression inflicted by parents. I would know; I've been diagnosed with depression and PTSD caused by emotional abuse from my religious family. [info] Strong Atheist [info] 1347727585
kfjdkr [info] I've been diagnosed with depression years ago. I take medication for it every day, which just recently got raised to 40mg. Without it, I'd be feeling like shit everyday, everywhere. Just because my life has gotten better doesn't mean my depression has gone away along with my past. I'm sure my depression will go away soon, or at least I hope.  [info] None [info] 1545589053
beatenangels [info] I mean I've been diagnosed with depression and gad and manage to cope fairly well myself. If anyone asks for advice I'm useless though because everyone copes differently and what works for me doesn't for others. [info] None [info] 1566438904
Nofap_Dutch [info] It is because as a kid, I was bullied because I was a weaker target (MM muscle disease) and I had high grades,I was diagnosed with depression and had no friends for a while, so ofcourse the outcasts later accepted me and they were feminists, who ofcourse had my opinion gradually change over time, to the point where I almost became an SJW and an anti-man (to the level of veganism and online activism, not further). I woke up when I found a MGTOW video on YT, which led me to TRP videos, which led me to the forums. [info] None [info] 1517661168
kev89 [info] Feeling numb? Hi everyone,I was diagnosed with depression about 5 years ago. I have had my ups and downs with it for sure. But now I don't really feel much of anything. And kinda hopeless, like, there is no future at all. Has this happened to any of you? If so, how did you get over it and start to really feel again?Thanks everyone. [info] None [info] 1351834444
darkjambi2 [info] Do I feel affected? Not physically, well, I got fat... thats the most I was affected physically. That was from the drinking. Mentally I was diagnosed with depression so that wasn't fun. I was appointed to therapy sessions, and was prescribed antidepressants which had led me to my recuperation. As for smoking, I did not do it a lot, well I did for a small time. Smoking did not affect me that much since I did it for a short period of time, mostly at parties, but something that I did notice was my poor performance when running. I would get tired very easily just by quickl going up the steps of my house, nothing serious just a small change. However since I stopped I have felt better so I believe I still have hope of escaping any type of cancer or alcohol withdrawal symptoms. [info] None [info] 1414465009
ruinedmaps [info] Dealing with the aftermaths of narcissistic abuse I have thought a long time about talking about this in public, yet, I never did. This is the first time I am doing it and it costs me a ton of emotional investment, yet, it's a thing I feel compelled to do, which I will explain in this text. I'll not fuzz around and will deliver as coldly and close to the facts as I can, maybe adding a bit of personal insight at the end of the paragraphs where I feel that they make sense. I am currently in the process of regaining trust into my gut, perceptions, and feelings, and for this initial post, I am trying to cling to facts as much as possible (which is why I will just outline key events and shifts) but will freely answer any question raised later, given it does not compromise anonymity. Here we go._______________________________________________A little more than one year ago, I cut contact with my best friend (Me: m/25, he: m/33) of five years, who was for the time being my best friend also my coworker and, additionally, superior, and I loved this man to bits, coming from a rather troubled upbringing - He took care of me and I was truly happy to be taken care of - By the time I met him, I was 19 and just moved out of my parents' house.Our friendship went smoothly for a long time (we lived around ~400 miles apart) until I relocated for work reasons - we wound up living in the same city then, working in a field which gave us both a fair share of (media) attention. We hung out every day, whenever possible, and we did both profit from each other. I went places, he went places, and there was no fight of competences as I did the creative work while my narc was doing administrative work, eventually being the head of the institution we worked for, and I got my promotion as well. As I was still the creative head, I got a lot more media and public attention naturally - I am not going to bore you with work details. Generally, I integrated REALLY WELL into my surrounding and had a lot of friends and acquaintances.During that time I started a pretty messy, intense, but beautiful relationship with a woman, which he eventually met as well before we were officially dating, and this was the breaking point. He tried his best to keep this from happening, by either planting doubts in me ("She's got a genius level intellect and she will go places, in five years she will probably make a lot of money in New York whereas you, well, are a musician and writer", or "Do you really feel that you can handle someone as smart and sensitive as her?"), or as I eventually found out, in her as well (he called me a notorious cheater, liar and egomaniac, all during the time we were still friends, as I was told eventually by the time I cut contact with him, while staying in touch with my ex). Nevertheless, the three of us hung out together most of the time.Eventually he talked her into sleeping with him. I still have no confirmation if this was consensual or not, as she never uttered a word about it after confessing and I am not going to question or make an assumption on her behalf, nevertheless, shortly after that, she broke up with me, describing this verbatim as "the worst thing that could have happened", which is very open to interpretation, and will play a core part later. Nevertheless, we stayed friends as the relationship was short, and the intensity just faded, nevertheless leading to occasional hookups.Occasionally, the three of us were seen together, with my ex and me spending more time together than with him as she seemed (to me) to avoid him, and eventually, he got word, or just suspected, that my ex and me were still hooking up, which left him incredibly jealous. I did not know anything about this at all and was oblivious to the situation as I had to deal with other things by that time, but he never uttered a word by that time.Tides turned after I ditched him for meeting up with her, and we ran into him at random. He clung to us and we sort of rolled with it but our "date night" was ruined and I spent the evening comforting my best friend. After this, my ex started avoiding him, and he started to get word of previously mentioned occasional hookups. Shortly after this, we had to go on a trip for work and shared a flat for the time, which he paid for me. On the first night - I arrived some time 7 am in the morning after performing in a different city - he confessed that he had sex with my ex, crying and hugging me, pleading for forgiveness. And I did, but something broke. After meeting someone on that event, I spent the rest of the time with her, rather than with him - It was nothing serious, though, and wasn't seen as a serious thing by me or the woman.Said woman lived on another continent and we got along really well, and my narc - who I still saw as my best friend despite his confession - tried to push me into a relationship with her, going as far as announcing that he would fly her over on his own expense so I could see her on my birthday. But as he was more and more aware that my ex and me were still hooking up (another friend accidentally dropped that info to him, as in, "Oh, is it true that X. and Y. are together again? I saw them making out!"), he kept pushing me into that relationship even more, but this time, it was used as a reward / punishment, along with insults ("Egomaniac", "narcissistic sociopath", "liar", just to name a few), and I avoided bringing that up altogether as I was scared. By that time - I briefly reported that my narc became the head of the institution we worked for - he also started inhibiting my work, by simply devaluing my ideas (he has, as he admitted before, "zero idea" about my field of work), or messing them up in post on purpose, which was then blamed on programming errors, or he flat out denied manipulation (I have proof that he indeed did).Eventually, we had a huge fight shortly after my birthday, after which I was removed from my job because I was a "sociopath" (He LOVES that word), we're mid summer 2016 now. I got along just fine and just stopped contacting him, being in deep shock, a situation in which I was VERY grateful that my ex was there to comfort me (we stopped hooking up by the time), and alongside me, she decided to cut contact with him as well, and I decided to make a career shift, away from writing to music. So, at first it faded, or so I thought, but I always had the urge to reach out to him and it still has not completely vanished, there was (relative) peace. I was, actually, sort of fine, shattered of course as I lost the person who probably meant the most in life to me.Over the end of the friendship, people started taking sides and apparently, he tried (and still tries) to convince people that I am awful.A couple weeks after, rape rumours were going around. I quoted my ex directly about the time they had sex, as she described it as "the worst thing that could have happened" a couple paragraphs above, and after she cut contact with him, we encountered him in clubs - and more than once, she left immediately and pleaded me to guide her to public transport or come with her as she was scared. I talked to a close friend about the possibility that this was indeed rape (and I will not make any claims), but nevertheless - These scenes were observed by others and eventually, people actually made that connection.Eventually, I was approached by him again (End 2016), and this was the first time I was assaulted by him. I kept a straight face since the friendship dissolved and just addressed that matter to very close friends who eventually pointed out the term "gaslighting" to me - But that is not exactly important, bottom line being that he had full control over me and my perception of myself, something I still struggle with. After the attack, while not being carried out completely as it was in public, I started cutting myself off from everyone as I started to get scared and extremely anxious that something like that may happen again - I have never been assaulted before and it was horrible.So I retreated from most social activities and dug myself in, and I noticed how I started to obsess, despite knowing how horrible this person is, I was still under his spell, and still too caught in his web of lies to see that this is how he tried to make me feel. I was, to say the least, DEAD SCARED. I was a rather popular person before but after this, I just retreated. I did not react. I educated myself enough, luckily, not to say anything in public, not on social media - I kept this mostly to my friends.March this year he started a smear campaign accusing me of date raping women frequently, providing "proof" in form of screenshots on which I repeated a rather tasteless joke from South Park ("Hot Cosby", if anyone's interested) and asked for Tylenol, of which you need a ton of to get someone unconscious, given you make the effort to get 40 pounds of that stuff in a bag and clubbing someone unconscious with that, and trying to accuse him of raping my ex, some were flat out fake. There was no single word of truth written in these statements, giving out my personal info (full name, address, current occupation, ...) and leaving me extremely vulnerable as he revealed a very private situation out to the open without giving me any opportunity to defend myself (which I did not do in other places either way as I firmly believed that no one would believe me), intensifying my paranoia. A police report because of slander led to nothing. I retreated even more, and because I was scared, I moved, but fell into a deep depressive hole as I felt that I could not do anything. The rumours spread and I felt extremely, extremely powerless, and the rumours took its toll on my reputation, and I stopped going out not knowing what is said about me, and what I would be confronted with - accusations or straight-up assault? I just retreated.After a 2nd attack, this time in presence of my mother in a supermarket (I left out a few smaller things like insults), I committed myself into psychiatry after breaking down while reporting the incident to the police. I was diagnosed with depressions, PTSD and severe adjustment disorder, except for depression all linked to this situation, my self-imposed isolation out of sheer fear making it a lot worse. After psychiatry, I retreated to my parent's place, way outside town and basically spent two weeks sleeping, recovering and enjoying a safe, and pressure free, environment that I desperately needed to come back to my senses and take control of my life again. I moved again, and moved in with two amazing people, and noticed how much of a hard time I have trusting people, so f*cking hooray, trust issues making my hard time rebuilding my circle again even harder (One of my flatmates is now one of my closest friends and the notion that I am not solely depending on the narc's views, which is therapeutic).The most recent attack, again, accompanied by a Facebook post, was carried out early November in a club, going as far as spitting in my face, pouring beer over my head, pushing me around. I was in emotional shell shock in this moment. I could not do anything, I could not move, I just stared blankly, eventually scrambling the last few remainders of my courage and telling him that I am done with this conversation and left, or escaped, to my friends. I left, shattered - He did not get kicked out despite we reported him to securities. Since then it got worse again. I keep re-living situations involuntarily, as I felt compelled to write this as an outlet, as I feel the need to isolate myself again and rather vomit it out than letting it eat me alive again.Since then: I was both scared to go to the police again, as much as I am scared to go out when not alone. But I am not as trapped as I was before.I found a strategy for myself. I started seeing myself as a survivor rather than being a victim. Survivors wear wounds, they naturally do, and they take time to recover, victims are by default passive. I still fall back into my habit of beating myself up over shit like this but not as much as I used to, it's going uphill.Making the turn back to the narc: I see, with some gratification, that he still obsesses over me and sh*t talks me at any possible opportunity, yet I see as well that he is losing it. He keeps feeding people lies, but as less and less people fall for it, he still does it, and that he is still onto it, I cannot understand it and I cannot cope. I like comparing him to the Joker (with me being a physically way less impressive Batman). He is unpredictable, erratic and I cannot do anything to end this once and for all for good._____________________________Feel free to share your comments and thoughts regarding this. I'm happy to ask any questions as this may really help me - This is the first time I share this story online. I do not exactly know where I am going with this post, and I am not quite sure about the morale of this story, if you come up with a better one than me, or advice, I am happy to hear from you. [info] None [info] 1512689682
HerrChunkel [info] Depression's worse than it's ever been. Half the time I want to fix it but I'm too intimidated, the other half I've just stopped caring This will be short as I have to go force myself to sleep for work tomorrow.I was diagnosed with depression back in middle school. I was on medication, things looked good. I even stopped taking my meds and I was fine for *years.*Then it started creeping back again, maybe a few months ago. Not so harsh this time, I thought I could handle it. But it's just been getting worse and worse. I have a hard time getting to sleep, I hardly eat anymore, I don't have the motivation to do *anything* I used to like doing. I go to my stressful job (I've no choice but to keep it, it's the best pay I've ever had and I'm trying to secure a place to live), come home and stare at my computer for a few hours until it's time to dope myself asleep. Rinse and repeat.I end up falling asleep hoping beyond hope I never wake up the next day. I want to die, but I don't want to put my family through the ordeal of me actually killing myself, so hoping for a freak accident is all I have at the moment. Even then, there are days where the boxcutters I use at work look pretty tempting.I've been losing friends one by one. They're all off graduating college, getting into relationships, moving, whatever. They're the only people I ever feel comfortable around, and by now I can't muster up the motivation to make new friends. I'm sick of being lonely day in and day out. I've even noticed I'll start talking to myself sometimes. Nothing like full fledged conversations, right now it almost just sounds like I'm talking to hear another voice, to break the silence. I'm not sure how long I can keep it up. I'm stuck at home after moving out twice, I'm isolated everywhere I go, and every day seems more miserable than the last. I can't afford medication on top of student loans, a car payment, and my finances for an apartment. At least not yet. Even then, I always shut myself off completely when I have to see a therapist so I'm not sure how much that would even help. [info] None [info] 1401256326
TheSaladLeaf [info] Weaning a toddler Hey everyone!I have been breastfeeding my 2.5 year old daughter and was hoping to let her wean herself off gradually but I've reached a point now where I'm going to have to give her a bit of guidance. I've been diagnosed with depression and I have been signed off work for a couple of weeks. The doctors has prescribed some breastfeeding friendly antidepressants with a view to wean my daughter in the next month so I can move on to a more suitable antidepressant.She nurses once before bed and usually once in the night. We have been talking about her future school and she is excited to be a big girl but she has made it clear that she wants to stay a baby if that means more mama milk. Any tips or recommendations???Thanks everyone xx [info] None [info] 1542307675
Fimbreathil [info] I was diagnosed with depression my senior year of college. The advice my therapist gave me was to let myself feel sad for a little bit. Ignoring the sad emotions just pushes them deeper until they explode out. So make a short list of all the things you have to do for the day, do them, and then take a break. Feel sad, then distract yourself with a movie or something. That's how I've been doing it, one day at a time.As far as meds and counseling, get in to see the counselor ASAP! If you feel like it's really important you see someone soon, there are resources on campus that can pull strings and get you in in a day instead of two weeks. You can get prescribed something for depression from a regular medical doctor so go and see one at the clinic on campus, if you have one. About a week after I started anti-depressants I started to feel better, and when you feel hope for feeling better again, it really helps.Basically, you need to take care of your body first, once the depression is better then you can focus on getting over the relationship, and it will be easier. [info] None [info] 1380780670
Gleegs [info] I've always been everyone's shoulder to lean on, but I feel like all this time I've needed that the most. All my life, since I was able to establish a stable relationship/friendship with someone, I've always been the one who was always there. The one always there to talk late at night, the one who was there and ready if they needed to be picked up -- taken out to escape whatever they're going through. To let them know clearly that someone's there, and always has their back... Things like that. Yet in hindsight, it's come to me that when it came to all of this, no one's ever been there for me.     I was diagnosed with depression nine years ago. Time before that, and since then life has been unbearably hard. There are days where it goes unnoticed, and I can live a quasi-friendly, healthy, social life among my peers and acquaintances. Granted, within the circle of individuals I have found myself in as anyone does over the course of years, going from circle to circle, I've always found myself to be the one who was always there. The dependable one. The one who, no matter what, didn't judge, loved you, and just wanted to help. I can proudly say I always have, and I'll be damned if I don't keep doing it.    Lately life hasn't been exactly ideal. My SO of two years left me for someone else out on a whim, but that fact alone isn't what has been causing so much distress. It's the fact that this last month or so, I've realized how alone I am/have been. I've been so distracted by my life with them, I was too busy to realize my significant lack of friends or anyone just to simply talk to, and it's dawned on me that I need someone more than ever.     I've tried reaching out -- calling, texting, visiting, anything, and no one seems to be responding with any care or understanding. I know, not everyone understands what another person goes through, naturally. Perhaps that's the reason why I was good at empathizing with others. That said, no one is here. I am alone, and no one seems to care for the person who has been there, thick and thin for years now. This isn't some passive-aggressive rant about an individual that I resent for not helping me, because I wish it was. Who I'm talking about, is an entire group of individuals that I have invested the time to know, understand, and care for. It breaks me to realize that no matter what I do or try, no one seems to want to expend the energy to do the same.I need some advice, what do I do, and how do I do it? I feel lost. [info] None [info] 1477439316
iveroi [info] I've been diagnosed with depression. [info] None [info] 1400093499
pastapizzamafia [info] I cant be happy, I have a good life. I have a quite good life. I have a loving family and friend circle that is so healthy, except small problems, everything is going so well. I know the things that people are going through and I can say that none of my problems are like these. I hate myself, my looks and my personality. sometimes I just wonder what is happening and what are we meant to do. I don’t really wanna live anymore, or feel. Everything seems so pointless and monotone. I was diagnosed with depression and taking medicines since. They are helping, just a little bit. I don’t remember the last time when I was genuinely happy. I really want to feel happy. [info] None [info] 1578430039
deathtobadpeople [info] What facts? I'm sorry, show me the certificate that says "I was diagnosed with depression" oh wait, you can't? Because most people self diagnose for a scapegoat due to fucking up their own lives? My bad!  [info] None [info] 1505255070
littleb50 [info] I was diagnosed with depression at age 16 after finally seeking help with self harming since age 11 I think people need to know that even though you may not show some of the physical symptoms you can still be clinically depressedmental illness doesn't discriminate it doesn't matter what your background or life story anyone can develop a mental illness  [info] None [info] 1467031979
honeybadger21 [info] Ok why not.1. M2. 233. 0.4. I've cried in front of my male friends plenty of times. Almost broke down in front of my male supervisor a few weeks ago.5. No. I never cry in front of my family. 6. I don't have a preference. Usually when I'm with others, it gets to the point where I can't fight it. 7. It depends. If I cry, it is usually pretty genuine.8. Girlfriends. It's always been about my feelings towards girls. Always over a breakup. It's been a good 3 years since I've cried. And that was over an ex cheating on me. 9. I've been diagnosed with depression, but the depression doesn't make me cry. It just makes me miserable. 10. Yup. The first girl I said "I love you" to made me break down in some serious tears when she said she loved me back. Thinking about her is actually starting to bring some back. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1367437429
MorrowindFan [info] I cant give you any bible-based advice, but what I found helpful (I've been diagnosed with depression) was channelling my feeling into poetry. You may want to try something similar; challenge your feelings into another medium [info] None [info] 1345606214
Trocki2000 [info] What can i do except playing computer games? I really struggle with finding other activities i can do in my spare time execpt playing on my pc.I gues i have to add that i really struggle with doing new stuff longer then 5 minutes and staying motivated.I am diagnosed with depression and i guess that is partly the reason for thisDoes anyone know how to change that?Thanks :) [info] None [info] 1566421235
JMekas [info] Dissociation with clinical depression Long before I was diagnosed with depression, I began experiencing dissociation when I was around six years old. I felt detached from my body, like my experience in the world was not real but that I was an observer who was placed into consciousness by mistake. These episodes happened randomly and infrequently, until I was 20 and diagnosed with major depression. The disassociation intensified with episodes of depression. During very down periods, I can suffer them at least daily for hours at a time. This has recently caused me to weep and throw tantrums out of the frustration of feeling trapped and wanting to escape. My mental health care professionals have recognized these episodes but have not helped me understand what they might be caused by or how to control them (grounding exercises have not worked). Does anyone know more about the experience of dissociation in conjunction with depression? [info] None [info] 1496729549
MuffDragon [info] My junior year of high school was when I was diagnosed with depression. While my doc and I were still trying to work out a good medicine/dosage based on a few other medications I'm on, I was still all over the place. During a major depressive episode, I had a dream that I took the barrel of my dad's pistol in my mouth and pulled the trigger. I woke up crying. That was when I realized I wanted to live. Thankfully, I didn't need a suicide attempt to show me that. [info] None [info] 1510522864
ADONISBPC [info] 19. For me at least, it's dealing with mental illness. I've been diagnosed with depression and panic disorder, and there's days where I just can't get away from them [info] None [info] 1379636940
juanbergur [info] The exact opposite happened to me.Two years ago, I got Chemical Engineering (the course of my dreams) in a reputed university. Took a turn for the worse, I was diagnosed with depression a year later. Several counselling sessions later, I left.I joined Electrical Engineering in a smaller, lesser-nown college - has kept me happy, and that is something I love. [info] None [info] 1563688775
Optimus_Pitts [info] I was diagnosed with depression over 10 years ago and even after this time it's still so difficult to explain how it feels. I think I finally was able to describe it enough to kind of explain pretty recently.When I'm going through it, it begins with me feeling sad about nothing for a day or two and then 100% void of feeling. At that point I don't feel sad. I'm not upset about anything. Nothing has me mad, or nervous, or upbeat. I'm just existing. I would be at work wishing for anything to happen to get ANY emotional response out of me. Happy, scared, sad, or just anything. Even if it's not a good feeling, it can't feel worse than not feeling anything. The longer it goes on, I start to feel like something is broken and I get too introspective and just can't block it out or shut it off. Just all day digging deeper at my own insecurities flaws to find out what broke me or why I'm like this. Eventually I'll get focused on one thing someone said to me in an argument or a thought that I have about myself and it's just there all day. Think about when you hear a catchy song on the way to work and you can't shake it all day. You try to drown it out with other songs, you try to talk to people, and you do almost whatever you can to lose it but it's still there. That's where my depression goes, but it's not Work Out by Chance that I'm hearing. It's some shit like "you don't deserve to feel loved" and "no matter what you're always going to be completely useless until you die alone". [info] None [info] 1537681034
ILoveBabyBats [info] I was just coming here to suggest getting a pair of rats... I got mine when I was diagnosed with depression and they were very sweet and loving pets. And fun to train! [info] Fernwood [info] 1481079988
raainly [info] Where/how do you start to get medical help? I'm a little lost on where to start to get help. I'm in high school; should I see my guidance counselor first? Should I see my doctor? Or should I go straight to a mental health professional? How would I go about bringing this up? "I've been feeling down for a while now..." And then what should I say next? I'm scared I might start crying while talking haha.. Would I have to tell my parents? If I am diagnosed with depression and put on medication, will they be informed of it? They're very supportive, but I'd like to keep it from them if it is possible. [info] None [info] 1543126184
kruton93 [info] May I ask how you became diagnosed as a schizoaffective person? I don't mean to sound rude, but this undoubtedly will sound very insensitive: I think every and all people to a degree have some disorder, and if doctors really wanted to, they could diagnose every single person on this planet based on a unique trait. Personally, I 'think' I have had more mental divergence than my peers, and it has been both equally positive and negative in my life. I hear voices in my head, but I've never clearly distinguished them as "outside" voices. They have always been my own voices, but they are mostly uncontrollable, no matter what I do. If I look in the mirror, my inner voice literally cannot be positive. It points out every flaw, and it's often to the point where it's better for my sanity to just not look in the mirror. The weird thing is is that I don't think I'm hideous or ugly than the average person when not looking in the mirror, but the voices are simply uncontrollable and negative. Same thing when I try to sleep without being extremely exhausted. Voices pop up in my head and I can't help  but think of only negative things like where my future is headed, why bad things happen to my friends, how can a god let things happen to good people, imagining the terror of being crushed in half by an elevator, etc. These thoughts make it impossible to sleep and the only way to get rid of the feeling that builds up is for me to twitch really quickly. A recent thought that I cant get over is based on a video I saw on Youtube where a dog on a leash walks out of an elevator, but then the person doesn't get out so the elevator closed and started to rise. The dog started to get lifted too, but then someone came along and at the LAST SECOND unclips the leash; but what if the guy didn't come? That dog would literally have been crushed by the body leash and the dog's insides would be squeezed out of the body. I cringe and twitch so much thinking about it and it hurts so much to even imagine the pain it would have gone through. Anyways, I digress...I believe if I went to any doctor and told them this (plus a lot of other mental differences I've noticed), they would easily diagnose me based on wording. Maybe I do have some form of a mental disorder, but again, I believe everyone does to some degree.Honestly I don't know exactly where I'm going with this, but my general thought when coming into this was: Are people too eager to let a doctor's diagnosis define the rest of their lives and how they live? I believe I'm a great functioning member of society. I have an accounting job, great girlfriend, lots of friends, but also a lot of problems. It's just a bit bizarre to me how people always mention their diagnosis when speaking of anything negative. My friend who was diagnosed with depression seems to always mention it when someone asks her to push herself further and be more social. I understand it's hard, but when you always hear "Dude, I was diagnosed with depression, you wouldn't understand what it's like and most people will never understand." It's frustrating to me that it seems more like a defense that shouldn't be questioned, rather than pushing one's own limits. The biggest thing about this is that it's only I know that have been actually diagnosed that do this. Just to clarify, I am not saying you do this or that you even implied it, but your post just had me thinking about it again. Also, there are definitely some extreme cases where the mental disorder is obvious to the point of no doubt.Another question out of pure curiosity: What is your schizophrenia like? (of course I 100% understand if you don't wish to discuss it). [info] Trick-or-Treat Zenyatta [info] 1489165061
aliceroyal [info] I was diagnosed with depression this year and I feel the burnout so bad. I see how mentally healthy folks burn out when working 80-100 hour weeks and I get it. I burn out working 40. Hopefully this becomes more commonly talked about so that when people try to explain that working AND keeping a home AND attempting a social life, even if in amounts deemed socially acceptable, can be exhausting for people. [info] None [info] 1558980102
Caril_The_XII [info] Help me I am 15 year old (usual age for depression and suicidal thoughts but I've been diagnosed with depression way before) and I need help. I've had depression for quite a while but it keeps getting worse. I've talked to my parents about it but they keep saying study for school and your life will brighten for you when you grow up. They don't provide me with any other form of support other than saying basically the same thing in different words. I've tried calling the hotline but what they said didn't really help. School is f*cking me up even more than it used to and teachers are the most unwilling people to help with psychological problems, so I thought it is a good idea to seek help from the people of reddit.I don't like this shit and I wish someone can help out of it [info] None [info] 1571589915
oflimiteduse [info] I was in a downward spiral that ended in a very ugly night in which I was arrested. Went to rehab to look for for the court not really to get clean. Something there clicked, almost three years sober. While I was in rehab I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed Lexapro. It helps.  [info] None [info] 1543543275
KovuLK [info] I don't have my bachelor's degree. On the second year I visited the school where I wanted to study animation and they did not asked for the degree, so I did not showed up for my finals. I'd just skipped classes with a friend.As of today my parents haven't found out yet. They just think I was among the top students as I actually worked really hard until the end for those two years.I dropped out because I wasn't really enjoying it at all and I was diagnosed with depression. But now I'm studying animation, which I really enjoy, without having finished my studies. [info] None [info] 1511915086
adelinamimi [info] NSFW: I Was Inside Out Depression is a mental illness. A chemical imbalance in the brain that makes you feel moody, low, suicidal. What if I told you that it can also be physical? I know first hand that it makes you tired and ache all over, but I’m talking about a different kind of physical. I now know that depression can be projected outwards and not just mental or internal, but a broken mind and soul can be as visible as a broken jaw.I have been taking a high dose of antidepressants for 3 years now. The doctor said I’m allowed no more than two years, but once they handed over the prescription they never really monitored my intake. Not that it helped. The crying never stopped, nor did the constant aches and pains. But what I’m trying to get to is how it became disease of body as well as mind. Now I can tell you’re thinking I cut myself or something. But that’s not it. What I’m saying is that my depression was more like the Black Plague in the way that it affected me. Somehow it materialized into visual symptoms, it was inside out. This account of the first physical symptoms happened two and a half years ago.About six months after I was diagnosed with depression I had my first heartbreak. Perfect timing. After he told me over a text that he didn't love me back I did was what instinctive and cried my heart out. I sat in my bed clutching at my heart as the tears scorched my cheeks, not bothering to wipe them away. I could feel the burn in my chest and in all honesty I nearly called an ambulance as I have a heart murmur and thought I had actually given myself a heart attack. As crippling as heartbreak is, when you gotta pee you still gotta pee, and I dragged myself to the bathroom. My bathroom, like most, has a mirror above the sink and you have to go past it to reach the toilet. Out of habit I checked my reflection and just kind of…melted. My insides liquefied as I saw the black oozing down my face. It felt like tears, but it looked like squid ink. The whites of my eyes were watery grey and the blackness was smudged and mingled into thick, slimy black snot running over my upper lip. The entirety of my skin was grey with black veins etched through and although I’m slightly chubby, my cheeks were hollow as if I had never eaten. Bones poked out everywhere and I was sallow like a walking cadaver. All the crying had made me numb so I just calmly picked up a wet wipe and started to remove it. I was makeup free that day and I just knew that this gunk had come from inside me. It came off as easily as wiping off tears, save for some murky streaks. I got closer to the mirror and saw beads of black growing out of my tear duct as well as black gunk clogging up my nose. I still had to pee so I pulled my knickers round my ankles. Clinging to the cotton were clots of goo, like when you have your period and get those mucous blood clot things. Instead of blood red these globs were the same pitch black as my tears. I was lucky to be sitting on the toilet because out of shock or fear my bladder let loose with the same inky results. I was inking like a squid but I didn't freak out as much as I guess would be normally. If it looked like meningitis or Ebola I would have freaked out but symptoms this unrecognizable made me doubt the seriousness. I just calmly showered and sat back on my bed. I picked up my phone, wondering whether to call an ambulance now or wait and see what happens tomorrow. That was when I saw the message he had sent me since I forgot to delete it. Sorry, I don’t love you, it was just a bit of fun. Once more my heart exploded and I thought that I was seriously dying this time. My heart felt like it had a stitch in it, as though it were beating so fast it was the heart equivalent of running a marathon. I clutched the middle of my chest and felt some kind of film peel off. Compared to this, my ink period was nothing. A grey blot of skin on my chest was running with black spidery veins and falling off in patches. My heart was rotting through right to my flesh like damp seeping through walls. The grey was slowly soaking across my body slowly, like when you put a felt tip on paper and it bleeds out in a circle. As the top layer of skin flaked the shiny, new skin peeked out in a darker grey. I had never smelled rotten meat before, but I knew that the stench radiating from me was what it was like. It was damp and hot and metallic and slightly like the time my new ear piercing had got infected. The more I looked at and smelt it, the more I panicked and cried. With every restricted breath the rot seemed to spread and as my tears ran down my neck they pooled into the wound and mingled with it. I could have sworn my tears melted the flesh like acid. I couldn't feel anything through the shooting pain of heartbreak but I knew the tears were sizzling into the rot. You’d think I’d at least have called someone by now. In my head I thought I should be calling the morgue as I was obviously already some kind of rotting corpse. I wasn't ready to be totally consumed with panic, and it’s amazing how one little trigger can pull you out of it and distract you. That trigger was the meow of my cat, Bronte. Bronte was the one thing that, in my six months of depression, had actually worked on my mood better than the pills the doctor gave me. I’m going to go off tangent for a while but this is very relevant to what happened. What had actually triggered my depression was some major corrective cosmetic surgery I had had on my face, which I had a month before I was diagnosed with depression. I don’t want to go into detail, but it was supposed to change my looks and health for the better, and had left me unable to identify with the stranger in the mirror. To me, the girl I had known for 18 years was gone, but my cat somehow still saw her and loved her just as much. A week after I cam home from hospital with a swollen face I covered up all of my mirrors, lay on my bed and cried from a mixture of self hatred and pain that the codeine couldn't quite cover up. I had heard a meow as Bronte jumped on my bed and pawed at my cheeks, licking the tears from under my eyes. She could always tell when I was ill or upset. For the first time in a week I had forgotten about my face and tried to smile at my sweet little girl. She had always made me feel better, but from then on she was the only source of happiness I had. Anyway, as I sat there with my rot, I kissed the air and called her over. Even the sight of her calmed me down and the chest pain subsided a little. She started purring before I even hugged her and the sound made me almost forget that I was decaying alive. Despite the smell she licked the rot the same way she has licked her paw the day she stepped on a thorn. Maybe I should have been concerned that she had probably licked her bum not long before licking my open wound, but my love for her had always been stronger than my sense of hygiene. The stitch in my heart faded with each little soft pink kiss and I buried my face into her little white bib of fur before I remembered my wet black tears. Pulling away I saw that her bib was still white as snow despite it being soaked slightly. I wiped my eyes but there was no black on my hands and the tears were tears again temporarily before they dried up with the now clear snot. Picking her up I made my way to the bathroom and set her down in the sink so that she could still rub her cheek against me as I looked in the mirror. My skin was pale but almost pink again, with some black smudges being the only evidence of the sickly tears. My body had filled out and my cheeks were plumping up again. Most of all the rotting circle on my chest was retreating slowly. Bronte nudged me with her little dome head and the flesh smoothed out with little blue veins happily flowing. Once I looked normal again I double checked by pulling my knickers down. The cotton was pristine and glorious, golden pee fell into the loo. I picked up my little Jesus cat and fell asleep with her resting her head on my heart. The next morning I felt like I might have imagined it all, and would have thought I did if it weren't for the crusty black wipes and knickers piled on the bathroom floor. I thought I was cured and that all the bile from the heartbreak had been released. It’s been two and a half years since but the blackness has never gone away. I don’t know if depression has stained my soul like an ink blot on paper, but I do know that is more than just a chemical imbalance. In some ways I have depression just like normal people, with the emptiness and fatigue and hopelessness. I still can’t get out of bed in the morning and cry myself to sleep. I still get the blackness too. Almost every day I wake up grey and thin looking. I think people have noticed a dark vein sneaking up my arm when my sleeves roll up or my cheeks suddenly go hollow. I had to quit uni because of the stress and because I think my tutor saw my eyes darken when he shouted at me for not turning in an essay. Thank god for makeup, black eyeliner does wonders for my stained tear ducts and a little blush goes a long way. I think the few friends I have think I have a weight problem, being almost skeletal one minute and then plump when I've cheered up a bit. I can cover up with clothes and perfume too when I've had a really awful day and the rot comes back. Sometimes the rot is on my scalp when I’m angry, but I’m a hat person anyway. I don’t know how much I get away with it, I think people can tell but they don’t say anything. It’s not easy to tell people. Nobody takes depression seriously anyway. [info] None [info] 1425250027
edwinbe [info] They both did that because of mental disorders obviously. I’m not a pathological liar, but can relate to season 6 Laganja a lot. That’s exactly how I acted when I was in a very bad place in my life; afterwards I was diagnosed with depression.  [info] Miz Cracker [info] 1524430394
MartinzPL [info] The final verse from *People II 2: Still Peoplin'* by AJJ, but really the whole message of the song could also count.&gt;You don't have it any better, you don't have it any worse&gt;You're an irreplaceable human soul with your own understanding of what it means to suffer&gt;And that's a huge bummerIt gave me a lot of perspective on my own life and other people's lives. About a year ago or so I was diagnosed with depression. Now I'd like to think I'm recovering, but I'm still not sure. Life felt miserable. I felt completely misunderstood by everyone around, felt like absolutely nobody could understand what I mean and what I'm talking about when I talk about my situation and how I feel. Then I stumbled upon this song, I don't even remember how... but something clicked in me when I heard those lyrics.I'm a unique being with my own definition of suffering - and so is everyone else. And that is perfectly okay. That is what makes us human.There is no single definition of pain. There is no scale on which suffering can be measured. There is no standard to which your misery can be compared. Every suffering is "viable". What I consider a minor inconvenience might be a real issue to someone else, and vice versa.We may not understand the pain other people go through, but that doesn't mean we can't try to help them. Telling someone that their suffering is not "real" or not justified is just about the worst thing that you can do to someone. And that's why I try to help others when they feel bad. I've felt alone before. It's not a fun experience. And if I can do something to help someone else not feel that way - even if it's just to listen to them, let them vent, try to give some advice - I'm going to do just that. [info] None [info] 1526042762
Landmark520 [info] Same. There needs to be a better definition of what "mentally ill" is before laws are placed on the issue. I'm diagnosed with depression and a friend of mine is on the autism spectrum, I imagine these blanketed laws would probably keep us from having guns despite having clean records and no signs of wanting to commit harm. [info] None [info] 1565354873
pony-boi [info] You have a point. However, nope, you’re wrong about the conversion therapy. It was awful and I wake up in a cold sweat to flashbacks every once a month or so.  I was diagnosed with depression at conversion therapy.I’ve told my general practice I wanted to come off Zoloft. They are aware and helping me, over what’s been 5 ish months. Will my gender change? Maybe. Probably not, but if I hadn’t started T, I’m near certain I wouldn’t be alive to find out.  [info] None [info] 1540048569
bummergirl [info] Lots of things have happened to me that were traumatic or just shitty, but I don't think that's what is making me feel this way. I should be feeling great compared to where I was a few years ago. Dropped out of school because of depression and mono, lived in a literal shack where you could see light from outside through the cracks in the walls (I live in the upper midwest, that winter it reached -17F), watched my best friend go from high functioning prized researcher to violent schizophrenic. Moved in with a jackass addict boyfriend and barely left the house for a year.I was homeless for a bit after my boyfriend threw me out of his place because he found someone else (honestly, I can't blame him). I finally caved and stayed with my crazy and sometimes abusive dad while working **3** minimum wage jobs trying to save up enough to move out. There was a 4 month stretch where I didn't have a single day off. Now I have a steady 9-5 job and can afford an apartment, and a solid boyfriend that cares about me. SO WHY THE FUCK DO I STILL FEEL JUST AS SHITTY? It doesn't make any damn sense.It's gotta be chemical, or a combination of chemical and my upbringing/young adulthood. I was diagnosed with depression over 15 years ago. 15 years. I've tried everything. Multiple psychiatrists, psychologists/therapists, CBT, group DBT, a million different kinds of drugs whose side effects just added another layer of shit to deal with. Nothing works for me. At best it's gone for a couple weeks or months. But then... It always come back. I always fuck up the progress I've made and crash again. I don't know what else to do. I'm so, so tired.Giving up is so tempting. [info] None [info] 1470170765
redvelvet418 [info] Not to get too personal, but have you considered talking to a therapist or your doctor? Maybe you have depression... I’m basing this on what you wrote (lack of motivation and sense of hopelessness) and my own experiences with depression.  I was diagnosed with depression at 24 and was prescribed anti depressants and it changed my life. I was so used to feeling bad that I didn’t even recognize it until a doctor told me it’s not normal to feel like I’m under a cloud all of the time.Anyway, it sounds like a great opportunity and I agree with the other poster’s advice.  Nobody has life figured out at 22.  I’m 37 and still flying by the seat of my pants.  Turns out just about everyone is. [info] Helper [2] [info] 1565139462
Avari_Darcie [info] July was a bad month. A month and a half ago, I was forced out of a decent high paying job in the city, and back into my low-paying low-respected job in my home town. I was forced to leave my SO behind while he tries looking for work, and forced into my parents home with my younger brother. The move left me almost financially unstable, because I took a 45% paycut. I was the main breadwinner in my relationship, now I can't really support my SO as much as he is accustomed to.4 weeks ago, my sister's house burnt down. She lost everything. My 6 neices and nephews made it out fine, so did my sister's SO and his brother. They've been living with us since. My sister's SO is a giant pain-in-the-arse know it all, who gets 95% of all 'facts' he knows wrong (for example, he was adamant that the autobahn was in France, just because his mate used to live in France), and on more than one occassion I've wanted to slap him so hard his jaw breaks. For those keeping track, thats 13 people under one roof. Plus three dogs (one is my parents' pet) and three cats (two are my parents' pets). I would post proof, but the story has my sister's name in it, and it's a small town so I would be easily identifiable.2 weeks ago, it was my birthday. Normally, because there are so many kids in my immediate family, birthdays are quite well celebrated. We have two calenders up in our home with all birthdays marked with pictures of balloons and cake. Everyone but my SO forgot. A week ago my Dad was involved in a fatal head-on collision between his truck and another one. His being a large road-train, the other being a light truck. My Dad was not at fault, the 23 year old French arsehole who was not wearing his seatbelt, who was swerving in and out of traffic, who hit a giant blue road sign and swerved out infront of my Dad, was to blame. Seriously, this douchebag has made me hate an entire country full of people (in all honesty it's not real hatred, it's grief-hatred and it will pass), because he was literally inches away from killing the patriarch of my family. [Proof](http://au.news.yahoo.com/thewest/regional/gascoyne/a/-/news/18274149/23yo-killed-in-crash-at-south-greenough/)I absolutely love my SO. I can't imagine a life without him. There have been talks of marriage and kids. Right now, he's more invested in a failing photography business than me and my well being. He has diagnosed depression. So you can imagine, when he hits his highs everything is great and everyone is worthy of caring text messages. When he hits his lows, I struggle to keep him emotionally and mentally pampered. When our lows coincide, I still have to pamper to him while I'm left fending off the depression-monsters by myself. Sometimes, being the emotionally stronger one in a relationship is hard work.I don't think I have ever felt this emotionally drained in my entire life, not even when I was diagnosed with depression and put on medication 18 months ago.Sorry to bring the mood down, I just felt the need to vent. Thankyou for reading. [info] None [info] 1375851250
EvilSubie21 [info] I'm really sorry about your grandfather. That's never an easy thing to deal with. As for the "becoming an adult" thing, yeah don't worry. I'm 20 and I felt exactly like you do. I was diagnosed with depression at 14, along with a laundry list of other things. The lack of confidence and self-esteem is something I deal with on a daily basis. I feel all of it, just like you say. The constant awareness of how I'm presenting myself. And boy, oh boy have a lot of my problems stemmed from my inability to change. I'm also overweight, because I overeat and I'm lazy. I go days without showering and/or brushing my teeth. Sometimes the days just blend together and I forget. I waste all my money on cigarettes, video games and random shit I don't need. I don't have a car. No friends. Really I feel your pain. I've been lucky to sleep 8 hours the past week. I've been unemployed for months, and im stuck at my parents house. broke as hell.But you do have two semesters of college under your belt, and while you might not think much of that, I think that's pretty awesome. Cause I haven't been able to do that. It will get easier, but you have to want it. Depression is hell my friend. But it can be conquered like anything. I see everyone I used to know in nice cars, their own apartments, etc. I'm jealous. But i know with hard work, I'll get there too. We will. We're gonna mess up. We're gonna make mistakes and do stupid shit. But thats all part of the experience. You just put one foot infront of the other and don't stop. We get stuck in our heads and an idle mind is the devils playground. You can lose that weight. You can get that job and you can keep that promise to your mother. I know you can. Your life is in your hands. It will only be shit if you let it. Dont let things keep you down and work, work, work. Do what you gotta do and eventually it'll all come together. Not immediately, but it will.   [info] None [info] 1497866115
junkykarma [info] I sat in one spot on my couch for so long that the back of my pajamas turned black from the color of the couch cushions rubbing off on me. It was absolutely pathetic, but I was so extremely depressed that it was basically all I could manage most days (disclaimer that I've been diagnosed with depression my entire adult life, my husband was also deployed at the time and I had just moved to the area shortly before taking the bar - so things were rough). Eventually I got myself in to therapy and on medication again and I took the initiative and found some temporary contract work (one of which actually lead to my permanent job), stated volunteering with a voluntary bar associations pro bono group, and forced myself to get up and out of the house more often. I worked out a lot, haha.  [info] Esq. [info] 1553643889
JohnTG4 [info] I've been diagnosed with depression, and I'm planning on hanging myself fucking *weekly*, and I constantly joke about it. If I swallowed 00 Buckshot right now, I'd bet that most of the people I know would say that I was suffering in silence and "if only he got help" and bullshit like that. [info] None [info] 1557282747
evenmyusernameisbad [info] I experienced the same thing (apart from the academic success or YouTube channel). It got worse and worse until I couldn't function and yes I was diagnosed with depression. (Not to scare you).My advice would be to assume it is burnout. But if it lasts more than a month (while taking a break) or it gets to the point where you find it hard to eat, get out of bed or talk to people then you should see someone (a professional) about it. [info] None [info] 1548374011
BeAPetRock [info] When you are about to be evaluated by a psychologist you have to answer questions and based of the answers the psychologist will mark off what you have. If you have a sudden number then you are depressed. I had a full score, I was diagnosed with depression and after 4 years I didn’t have depression anymore., I didn’t have a full score anymore but still some marks ticked off. The reason why I got depression (or what may have escalated my mental health) was because I isolated myself. Sometimes I find myself isolating myself again and I almost depressed again but luckily I have someone around me to help me. [info] None [info] 1547827178
undependent_1 [info] Finally going back to the doctor I was diagnosed with depression last year and was on meds for a couple months that worked great and then stopped working. I switched meds and they didn't help either. Due to scheduling conflicts I hadn't been able to get back in and then went two months without insurance. I finally got my insurance squared away and I see a doctor on the 17th. I'm really looking forward to getting a handle on things. I very much hope I'm able to find the right meds and get back on track. Just wanted to share with people who understand the struggle. [info] None [info] 1425611447
SweRacoon [info] Yeah, I've been diagnosed with depression as well. Funny that it came about in a time when my life was looking up. I had a great job with the best coworkers one could ask for, my own place, etc. Should've known that then, I'd never have been depressed! [info] None [info] 1571125502
DiamondSeal [info] I have the opposite problem. I'm diagnosed with depression and find it hard to feel any emotion at all over certain things. [info] None [info] 1397405328
Sm4cy [info] &gt; only a small percentage of people can't breastfeedI heard this so many times when I was pregnant and about to breastfeed. All the pamphlets were like, "Our lactation consultants will come see you before you leave the hospital, but in most cases, this is all that's needed!" BULLSHIT. I saw FOUR lactation consultants. The first two didn't help at all, the third helped make me feel better about pumping, and the last was a freaking FAMOUS lactation consultant, and I happen to live in a city where I could get an appointment with her. I'm one of the only mothers I know (or maybe the only one, actually) that successfully breastfed a baby and it makes me mad that they all felt so ashamed that they couldn't. It was the hardest thing I've ever done in my life and luckily I didn't suffer from PPD (ironically, considered I've been diagnosed with depression, so I assumed I'd get PPD). Honestly I haven't decided if I'll fuss with it if I have another kid. Yes, I'll try my damndest, but I'm not going to miss out on some of the best moments of my kid's newborn life because I'm stressing about breastfeeding. Sleep is FAR more important for new mothers than making sure their baby is exclusively breastfed, imo. I could go on forever about this but I'll shut up now. I should add that I ended up nursing my daughter until she was 2.5.TL;DR Breastfeeding is hard AF.  [info] None [info] 1549854158
AdorableLittleFuck [info] Thank you, that means a lot. And my parents have a history of making things about themselves. I was diagnosed with depression and they shipped me to grandma's house until they could "figure out how to deal with it." Turned out I had a gnarly vitamin D deficiency, went outside for a few hours a day and I was fine.  [info] Professional Lipstick Lesbian [info] 1497928849
NobleSic [info] "I have been diagnosed with depression" [info] None [info] 1403071491
TheRealJerome [info] I'm seeing a therapist, and I've been diagnosed with depression by a psychiatrist. It helps.  [info] None [info] 1442198507
MisanthropicUnicorn [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 10, and have been in therapy off and on in the 12 years since. During that time I was questioning my sexuality a lot, but I didn't really talk about it with any of my therapists because I just never opened up to any of them. Most of our conversations revolved around the weather, or what I was doing over the weekend, or school...we didn't get into any deep topics. Furthermore I had a lot of internalized homophobia, and I felt that acknowledging these feelings I was having would make them real, and I was scared of that.For most of this time I did not go on any medication to treat my depression because my father was deeply distrusting of psychiatrists and didn't believe that mental health problems warranted going on meds. It wasn't until about 2 years ago, when I had finally had enough and decided that I wanted to start helping myself, that I started seeing a psychiatrist and was diagnosed with manic depression. In that time I have also come out, I have started seeing a new therapist, and I have been acknowledging and working through some of the things I have been through in my life with the help of therapy and medication. It's been a really long road, but I'm happy that I took that first step and got the ball rolling after so much time. Who knows where I would be if I didn't. [info]  [info] 1520958118
xrelaht [info] The thing about the increase of suicidal tendencies is that that statement, while not inaccurate, is misleading. The problem is that one of the things antidepressants do is help increase your energy level. That means that if you were suicidal before but stopped from actually carrying it out by a lack of energy/motivation, you can suddenly find that you are still suicidal but have the energy to carry it out. After a while, most people find that their mood improves as well and the suicidal thoughts go away entirely.When I was diagnosed with depression, Sertraline (a different SSRI) did nothing for me. I was never suicidal, but I did have essentially zero energy, focus only on the bad parts of my life, couldn't sleep but was always tired, etc. What worked for me was getting an obscene amount of exercise. I was working out twice a day six days a week and once on the seventh day. [Exercise has been shown to help with depression in general,](http://www.webmd.com/depression/guide/exercise-depression) so if your lady friend is wary of pharmaceuticals, that's one way to go. Just don't let her overdo it and end up doing physical therapy for six months like I did! [info] None [info] 1378603317
dfigiel1 [info] I'm not buying into a myth - I'm diagnosed with depression and PTSD, dude. But I also don't think that people suddenly behave erratically after 7 years. Surely you know most abusive people have certain mile markers (engagement, marriage, pregnancy, whatever) and it's rarely "been together happily for seven years." [info] None [info] 1482937734
lerenard21 [info] Yeah. I know that drinking makes everything worse. At least I'm over a month sober. Thats a positive. I have been diagnosed with depression and I see a counselor and a psychiatrist through my school. My parents live really far away, and I've been avoiding them because I'm embarassed and ashamed. And I dont want them to be disappointed. Thanks :) [info] 48 days [info] 1426786998
BreakingBreakfast_ [info] I was diagnosed with depression at 10 and everyone when knew about it said "you're too young and you don't know what suffering even is!". I had a lot to be sad about but that wasn't an excuse then and now so it seems.Everyone here is a valid player for the game of life. Everyone is pending for some kind of suffering just for playing. Don't let anyone invalidate your feelings. They're wholly and truly yours and out hurt is personal. You can never compare or compete when you look at it this way. [info] None [info] 1469586877
whimsicalsteve [info] I'm an American citizen who's oversea's in Australia.  Here I was diagnosed with depression.  I wonder if that means I can't go home now?EDIT: but yes, I agree with you, my country has gone off its rocker long ago. [info] None [info] 1385683740
limeginger [info] I don't know about St John's Wort but I can testify to the power of Bach Flower Remedies.  I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD in 2007 and was prescribed SSRIs and some whatever med for panic attacks.  I ended up even more depressed, more panicky, completely forgetful, and suicidal because of those things.  I can't understand how they can kill your feelings but you're still left with so much pain.So I found those flower remedies somehow, because I most definitely didn't believe in such things at that point in my life.  My God how they work!  It was wonderful.  I became like an onion, peeling away the layers of my anxieties and traumas.  It took some time but was well worth it.  If you read some about Cognitive Behavioral Therapy and practice that (even on your own) and use those drops, you'll probably find yourself well on your way to wellness.   [info] None [info] 1453563287
16uselen16 [info] My Quest 4 Love 18 years ago i vas born in Bursa/Turkey. Maybe because im still too young but i remember most of my life since i was 3-4 years old. Most of my toddlerhood involved getting yelled at by people for not doing anything minor by the codes of etiquette. You don't want to sleep at the kindergarten? You get yelled at for being an incompetent brat because you can't go to sleep at 13.00 when tucked in. You can't even wipe your a** properly in a hygenic manner at age fecking 5. You just won a good long insulting session. Keep in mind this applies to literally everyone. Parents, teachers and all the people that can exist in a toddlers life.    Oh but the fun just starts. Imagine being left with a super religious (i hate zealots now probably because of her.) (I don't care if you are a mormon or wahhabi you are equally bad in my eyes. I can't stand religious extremism.) (parents didn't like her but she was willing to work for less) babysitter who is about to die for aprox 4-6 hours because parents constantly work or was just didn't want to contact me because they don't like "chores". Yes i was just a thing that required maintinance. Even then they paid someone else to do it.    When i started elementary school things took a 180 degree turn and now i was a gold bar that needed to be worked on so i can one day be presented as jewelery.    They were constantly inwolved in my education life but nothing else. He wants to go to a playdate. Hell no i didn't pay some crazy weirdo to raise my children so that they socilize. He must work MORE MORE MORE so he may be somewhat competent.   I was never loved as who i was or simply as a child. NO if i wanted to be loved i had to earn it by showing exemplary exam marks or any kind of nation wide talent showcase. I can't count the times i was told to go kill myself simply i wast the first in at least the class. Trough this abusive behaviour, neglect, social exile from other students i somehow got into a wery prestigious high school.    It was this time that the abuse went out of control. Everything i did/say/behaved was harshly critisized. Yet i persisted in my ways of earning respect. I studied 12-14 hours everyday for the senior year. Previously it was 10 or more. I totally was in belief that once i start uni i would earn the respect that i deserved and needed. Three months before the uni exam i was forced to enter the military uni exam. When the results came my world was utterly shattered. It was 34k out of 400k. I mean for a regular student it was ok but for me it was a massive disappointment (i expected 5k at most).     Then just one month  before the exam i was in my room. At 02.00 my parents burst into my room yelling and cursing at me for being an incompetent son. I just silently watched. And then with the added fury of my silence my dad yells at the top of his lungs YOU ARE NOT THE SON I DESERVE. It was an emotional rollercoaster. It was the moment i derailed. It was the moment i realised i didn't have a childhood. For the last 12 years i worked day and night to deserve love and atention. I didn't have anyone to love me no friends no family no nothing. The only thing i had was my work.    A white canvas with a single straigt line in the middle is the accurate representation of my life. The only thing i knew and believed in was working. The only things that kept me going was the hope that maybe someday someone would love me and my academic success unconditionally.     And yet my world was going to be broken once again. The day that the results were announced left a deep scar in everything i believed in. I was at 93k out of 2.5million. It wasn't bad it just was a mark of the end of my academic success. For the last 4 years i lost my friends,prestige,personality,self and/or any kind of respect,not to mention the countless hours. And now at last i lost the thing that kept me going. With that i believed in my self to some degree. But now its gone.    It has been a month. Every night for the past month i woke up with countless nightmares. I am afraid to sleep. Every time i start counting the sheeps. I remember everything like it was yesterday.    I have been diagnosed with depression for the last 2 years. Every day is torture. I often think about pulling the plug. But every time i remember everything i fought for. The humiliations i endured my whole life. If i leave now nobody would be sad for me or cry after me. If i leave i will prove everyone right because they knew i wast capable to keep going. I have a serious eating disorder. Im 125 kg (275 lbs) used to be 143 kg (315lbs) and im not exctly tall by any standarts just 188cm (6foot ish). Despite all this mass i feel like a sack of potatoes. I had 18 years and i have nothing to show for. Im not talking about skills or academics. I mean a single nice memory that hast been ruined by people arround me. Should i keep going? And if i do will anyone ever love ME just me no ac, no skills, no quirks? [info] None [info] 1565545542
phixyt [info] My dad is Kevin and I will always be trying to live up to his expectations.Don't get me wrong, I love him but he's messed my head up pretty badly whilst just trying to be a good dad. He's a property consultant and does a lot of development management and tender work.He is the first father in his family that has not been an alcoholic and he had his mind set on providing the best life possible for my sister and I. He succeeded and while we aren't rich, we are well off. Unfortunately he also tried to push me to be the best too much as a kid and as a result, I shut down. He has changed a lot since I was diagnosed with depression at 18. He realized what he did and he is a bit better now though I still have to remind him every now and then. The damage is done and at 26 I'm still trying to undo it. I'm a registered electrician and I'm about to finish my undergrad degree in finance and property but I still don't feel like I'm ever going to be good enough. [info] None [info] 1416787978
forgetfulfish [info] On mobile, so apologies for any typos. I'm not positively diagnosed with BPII; but there are hints.A series of traumatic events came up while I was in medical school and, compounded with an unforgiving school board, I had to leave for my own sake. I was diagnosed with depression and after a year and a half on antidepressants that never quite worked as intended, prescribed by my PCP. I had a bout of insomnia for nearly a week that wrecked two exams as I neared a finish line... And I broke after a particularly bad side effect of a medication I tried. I started to plan for my own death to solve a crippling student debt and to not deal with the administration at my school. I visited the PCP and scared the poor 4th year there, worried the resident, and my professor/the attending doctor virtually tried to shake me out of it; she'd been in that kind of place from postpartum. After counseling and visiting a pdoc, I'm far more stable, but am still rather resentful over the treatment by my school and the doctors who work there. They understood I failed due to a side effect from a medication that lasted two weeks; I was a strong participant in school activities, and generally advocated a great deal for our occupation. Then they tossed me like salad.A history of hypomanic events, though every few years at best, plus antidepressants causing bizarre side effects and a long-standing subclinical depression before the trauma/high stress environment basically hints at a dx. Sleepless nights invigorated by a high of achieving everything... That was my college greatness. Only sucks that I gave up a career that I could have thrived in, had I been able to take a medical leave for grief and trauma, rather than sticking to two and a half years with no break. Burnout, no matter how much a hypomanic episode last, is intense. I was able to cope for a year, but my body breaks when stressed and under the watch of "big brother" administration and being unable to make appointments for fear of punishment for missing class. After that experience, I no longer trust myself or anyone in power over me, despite knowing I'm pretty smart and empathetic when my stress is under control and not triggering big bad depressive/hypomanic states.Whew. That felt like a load off. I don't think I've been that honest in a while. Time to stop while I'm ahead.  [info] None [info] 1492722060
12345tommy [info] Hey man I saw that and I can totally relate. I was diagnosed with depression as well. Keep up the fight brother. There's at least this guy in Ohio pulling for you.  [info] None [info] 1449710978
tortaapf [info] Hey, I know exactly how you feel, I'm not here to tell you what to do because that would just be bullshit. I'm going through the same stuff, I'm 20 and I've been diagnosed with depression at 12, I tried to kill myself for 3 times (so you know I'm a failure even at suiciding lol) and thinking about how the world would be after my death like every single moment of my life. I've been on meds for over a year but it doesn't work for me either and I can't spend one entire day without cutting because of the addiction. Why am I saying this to you? I don't know exactly, but it seems like our situations are kinda similar and maybe there is a reason if you posted this thread and I clicked on it. I haven't been writing all this stuff just to feel like a good person or to say I might have saved a life, I don't give a shit about that bullshit. I really mean what I'm saying. You never know where you could find a friend.  [info] None [info] 1518743259
Guiltylemon88 [info] Dealing with anger towards a family member. Hey guys,I'm [28/ M] and today I hit an all time low, I shouted at my Grandmother and I can't shake my feeling of anger towards her. As awful as this sounds, please let me explain my situation.&amp;nbsp;So I've been living with my grandparents for nearly a year now. My granddad was diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease about 2 years ago and I've been staying here to help out with him and while I'm at university.  About 4 years ago I was diagnosed with depression and ultimately it led me to leaving my job and even failing a year at university. I was left in a position where I had debt to pay, child maintenance and some other utility bills that had yet to run their course.   My Nan is a generous person and she doesn't ask me for any rent or money for food (I don't have a job currently) and I try to be as helpful as I can around the house to show my gratitude to her, for making my current situation easier. However, she is not the sweet old lady that everyone assumes her to be, she has a huge gambling issue and has done for the past 45 years, any conversation we have about money or how much she spends every week gambling, puts her in a foul mood where she shouts and generally has a massive tantrum. She will even put her gambling needs above the care my Granddad needs for with his condition and/or anyone's birthdays or special occasions.  This is just one of the things that makes me angry at her.  &amp;nbsp;Now, this morning I went downstairs to have some breakfast and she was in the kitchen. For the past few months, my uncle and his kids have also been staying with us, due to a break up with his ex-partner. There isn't much room, as this is only a small house and tensions are running a little high, as there is no privacy, anywhere. He, has a full time job and takes him a considerable wage, yet he does not pay her any money as he so bluntly put it "If your grandson doesn't pay, I'm not paying".  &amp;nbsp;Anyway, he has recently met a woman (has known her for around 5 weeks now) and she now stays with us too. She has been kind and has lent my Nan some money to help her out, which was a lovely thing to do. However, this morning when I mentioned to my nan that it's getting a little crowded and I'm worried with all the people that my granddad is going to get more confused, she actually turned around and screamed at me. She went on to mention that I don't pay her anything and that I have nothing to say on the matter. It took me by surprise and I couldn't help but shout back, very loudly, making my poor granddad jump. I stormed upstairs and slammed my door and I've been shut in my room ever since.  I feel like I'm getting too angry to be around her, some of the things she says, the obvious disregard for my granddads health, amongst other issues, is really starting to get to me. I don't know who I am anymore, I'm always so angry and I snap at her so easily. I feel like I'm taking her for granted and I don't know what to do.  I have no where else to go, no job to support me anywhere and I really need to get through University and make my life better.  I just don't want to be this angry anymore, I feel like I'm starting to really hate her. What can I do? [info] None [info] 1477040336
acecatmom98 [info] This is so validating. As a kid I always said I was lazy and joked about it, then later I was diagnosed with depression! Wild! [info] None [info] 1572848173
Kiwi236 [info] I can’t agree enough. I was diagnosed with depression a few months ago and it’s been the worst experience I’ve ever had. I made a post complaining about people self-diagnosing themselves and someone was actually jealous that I had been diagnosed by a professional [info] None [info] 1545429890
girlyremi2121 [info] It was a girl the one I had an argument with. I was diagnosed with depression since I was 16. [info] None [info] 1569984099
CamperKuzey [info] I understand you want to make people feel better, by showing that they're not alone, but whenever I see a post like this, I get annoyed a bit.I've been diagnosed with depression a good 9 years ago, and this kind of stuff never helped me one bit, I got better by taking professional advice, people who spent their education life to help people like me.These posts always reek with pretentiousness for me. Why would you, a random stranger I've never met, would care how I feel, you're not my family, my friend or an aquintence.Please people, take professional help no matter what, social media doesn't help you. [info] None [info] 1567134495
EvilMenDie [info] When I was young I was diagnosed with depression and could only explain it as being depressed about being depressed. Mental loop. Occasionally my mind would wander and get distracted from the thought/feeling and then I would remember, and instantly I was depressed again. It reminds of me this procrastination in that you stress until you momentarily forget about the problem, then you remember and it starts again. This would cycle back and forth never escaping for much more than an hour before I "remembered" that I was depressed.TLDR: Mental loops are extremely hard to break out of. [info] None [info] 1482274080
RedFlagDay2 [info] When I was 12 I was diagnosed with depression and it manifested as rage and with OCD tendencies. Just like your daughter. As an adult the anger is gone and it's more listless and apathetic. But the OCD tendencies are still there. I'm a hand washer and germophobe. Meds help some. Therapy helps a lot.  [info] None [info] 1525759935
AshiKoneko [info] How far back does your inferiority complex go? If you're reading this I'm sure you're familiar with the persistent self-loathing, belittling of yourself or your achievements, or the general feeling you are inferior to others.My low self-esteem was very apparent when I was diagnosed with depression at 12, but the realization hit me like a train last night that I've had self-loathing and self-destructive tendencies as early as 7... I would cry by myself during recess because of how alienated I felt from others, and would further hurt myself by intentionally separating myself from peers. Bullying didn't work on me because they never got the reaction they wanted perhaps, I would just let them hit me and never hear from them again. I don't think it bothered me that much.What hurt more was my father encouraging me to get into a physical altercation with these "bullies," and my own realization that I was never, ever, capable of defending myself nor even PRETENDING I was able to. I always lose, why even bother trying? [info] None [info] 1586381375
Emmojojojo [info] Oh, I know. I am diagnosed with depression. Probably why I love very emotional music so much. It sort of conveys what I'm feeling in a way words can't. [info] None [info] 1394934564
N0bodiee [info] Hello, my names Angie, I’m 22 years old, and I was diagnosed with depression at 20. It’s been in my family forever and is something I’ve always known I had. However, this was the first time I was actually prescribed medicine. The pills weren’t my favorite, and my teeth took a hit in the beginning because of all the grinding. When I finally decided to stop taking the pills, I made a deal with myself to not become a victim to this illness. But a survivor. Did I CURE depression? No. I look at it as a fight, and like every fight you get stronger and stronger. Every time a wave of depression hits me, it passes as quickly as it comes. I’ve taken into account my bad habits though. Like, sleeping in, eating badly, getting out of character, being late for work, not drinking enough water, allowing myself to sit and sulk. See before I was just depressed. I’d sleep for a day, eat terribly, I wasn’t working out, I simply just wasn’t living my life. When you realize hey I’m not just depressed, I am a person who has depression. Dissociating what you are and what you have is key, and focusing on a goal and a person you want to become really changes everything. Is it hard? YES but nothing great in life comes easy. Yes my depression still hits at times but i recognize it for what it is. Depression exist within my mind but I don’t have to let it run me. I take control of my depression and it doesn’t control me. It takes time, so to whom ever may read this. Fight everyday. Be more than just happy, LIVE ! [info] None [info] 1572729112
Krono5_8666V8 [info] Well I've been diagnosed with depression, and the only person willing to jerk off in front of me is me, so I think we can close the book on this one [info] None [info] 1511309964
SAGNUTZ [info] I was diagnosed with depression when I was 15, it was never resolved and it doesn't just *go away*. I've tried 3 different meds during the 2-3 year time I was actively seeking and receiving treatment. None of them "fixed" me and they all had sometimes unpleasant side effects. My focus shifted though, from raw pain and contemplating suicide to more of a disturbingly emotionless numb feeling. The thoughts of suicide stopped and I was able to shift my awareness to trying to acclimate to these new states of mind. Theres a quote "When in the face of extinction, any alternative is preferable." I forget who said it and in this case its your personal life instead of extinction but the message holds true. Edit: see a doctor. Not being able to focus is a pittance in exchange for keeping your life. Its irrational and uncharacteristic to choose death over any possible side effects. The drugs are all different and do different things, its a process and it may take a wile to find whats right for you(I thought you said "Medication" and the previous statement is out of context but still relevant). I can say EVERYTHING right and give you all the answers but none of it will would matter if you lack the will power to work toward normalcy. I have said everything I can that is helpful without being dangerous, I will pray for you and if youre just trolling people with this, I will egg your house.  [info] None [info] 1480769265
madtriks [info] Sertraline Hello, I have been diagnosed with depression, The doctor gave me Sertraline. I took one this morning but now i feel like i am fully of my tits. I was just wondering if anyone else felt this. I cant concentrate, cant think, feel nauseous and above all I feel like I’m back at a festival off my face. [info] None [info] 1517827331
Lawbrosteve [info] That's true xD. But from knowing people that have been very privileged, you can buy temporary happiness, but that will ultimately fail you. I've met a lot of rich guys and girls whose only concern was when to get their new phone and they were some of the most miserable people I've met. Creating drama to get any sort of attention, a completely broken moral compass. They were mainly a mess and even when I was diagnosed with depression i could say I was happier than them [info] None [info] 1565745989
aidyfarman [info] You're spot on. I was diagnosed with depression and in addition to not believing the diagnosis, he would frequently ask if I'm 'over it yet'. [info] None [info] 1459122650
Bokonomy [info] Did Doctors Doubt You When You Thought You Had ADHD? So every so often I'll think that I should go to a psychiatrist and get my issues sorted out. I'm not quite sure what my deal is, exactly; I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD in high school, but I think I have ADHD that went unchecked along the way and got worse. I'm just worried that because I'm a female in college, they're going to automatically assume I'm faking. Anyway, what type of doctor first diagnosed you, and did you suggest you had ADHD or did they first do so? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1429658292
cartmanselection [info] A. I basically just told them what this post says. Yeah I'm diagnosed with depression and at least one of my teachers and my therapist know. I've had other problems (i.e., self-harm, drug abuse, homicidal thoughts, suicide attempts) which at least one of them knows about as she quizzed me about my pastB. Ok [info] None [info] 1511926727
wisebeardedman [info] Dude, I experienced exactly what you described for *years* before I was diagnosed with depression. Have you talked to a doctor/counselor/therapist about any of this? [info] None [info] 1428547079
imaginarydeathmuffin [info] I was going through a really rough time during my 7th grade year. I had three people very close to me pass away, and one of my best friends moved across the country for her father's new job. After this incident I was diagnosed with depression, and took medication for a year until things became better. It happened on a Tuesday in mid March. Now, the week and half before this I had unexpectedly found my grandmother's body in her house before school, so I was still shaken up and mourning. This girl, named "Alexis", knew what had happened and tried to use this to her advantage while bullying me. Alexis started off that morning with the name calling, fat shaming, etc, then escalated to pushing me against the wall and spitting in my face. During that time I mostly took it, not wanting to get in trouble with school and be yelled at by my already mourning and upset parents. I kept quiet and waited for her to finish, until she said... "I bet your grandma wanted to die, if I was your grandma I'd kill myself in disgust too."After she said that, my vision became red and I just lost control. I grabbed her long hair, wrapped it around my hand to get a good grip, pushed her up against the wall, then repeatedly slammed her face against it a good twenty or so times (not exaggerating). My ex Navy Seal principal had to break us up, and she was sent to the hospital with a dislocated/broken jaw. Thankfully, he listened to witnesses and knew what I going through, and never gave me any in or out of school suspension. Alexis, though, was sent to juvi for two weeks after getting out of the hospital fighting and bullying. TL;DR: Don't bullying someone who's close family member just died and try and taunt them with it. You're liable to get a broken jaw.  [info] None [info] 1436063590
_lollipoppins [info] I solo travel for many months at a time. When I feel depressed/lonely/aimless I do a meditation course/retreat like vipassana (available all over the world). It's tough. Like really, really tough. But you'll have an opportunity to examine your feelings and thoughts without distraction. And I guarantee that if you go through the full 10 days you will come out feeling calm, mindful, optimistic, and at peace with your place in the world. I was diagnosed with depression years ago and meditation (in various traditions) helped more than therapy ever did.  [info] None [info] 1465778966
SalemScout [info] My dog is registered as an emotional support dog because I'm diagnosed with depression and because he helps me get out of the house. Most of us have a couple reasons of how our dogs keep us healthy in our lives. Most doctors agree with this, so I try not to think of it as dishonest. But I can understand why some people would be hesitant.Being an emotional support dog doesn't let him go into stores or go on airplanes. So he doesn't get any of the benefits of an actual service dog, nor would I want him to. But he gets to stay with me because he makes me happy.That's pretty much it.Canine Good Citizenship is a good one though. You have to go through training and do a test to prove your dog can be really well behaved. These are the dogs who go to hospitals and libraries and stuff. But anyone can get it. If you offer to get it, maybe that's a stipulation they could put on your lease.  [info] None [info] 1474567851
Sunnystateofmind [info] Acute! As someone who has been 100% resistant to medication for the 2 years I've been diagnosed with depression, it's changed my life. If it's an option for you I would definitely consider it (: [info] None [info] 1455383372
btdubs5140 [info] I'm a minor that is going through alot of things. Can I move in with another family member legally without my koms permission? Nebraska:So, I was diagnosed with depression about 2 months ago. I had been struggling through it for about a year before that. I'm on meds for it now, combined with adhd meds. I have been bullied my whole school career and that was a factor in me getting depressed. My mom does not help me, she tells me that I need to suck it up. It's gotten to the point I'm considering suicide. Last night, my grandma and my mom both said that i'm not really depressed, just doing it for attention and a lot of other things that I won't go into detail about. She has said alot of things like that in the past but this was the final straw. I left and went to the river to think, then went home. I explained this all to my aunt when i was at the river, and she said that I could come live with her, but that my mom said no the last time she asked. I'm worried that if i run away to my aunt's. That my mom would call the cops. Is there any way that i can move out if my aunt signs a form or says i can live there? [info] None [info] 1492638659
KoalaniB [info] While I agree with the idea of mental health check, how do we decide which mental “illnesses” get put on the list? I see a few issues.1. The person’s privacy.  People have a right to privacy here. That’s why we have HIPAA laws. Do we violate those in order to keep them from buying guns? Perhaps one way around it is when they are diagnosed with an illness it goes on their background “Not fit for gun ownership” 2. How do we decide what illness don’t make the cut? Depression? I was diagnosed with depression as a teenager... so I can never by a gun because it may come back? I’m a decent person who would never do anything like that but just because that’s a mental illness I can’t purchase a gun to protect myself. I’m sure there are other illnesses that might have similar issues. I’m sure I’m missing an easy solution but that’s all I’ve got this early in the morning.  [info] None [info] 1518787042
StMcAwesome [info] No dude. Fuck you. I've been diagnosed with depression years ago, and I know this shit isn't easy. I also know that waiting for something to magically come along and make you better is completely asinine. I've worked to make myself happier. I'm not completely out of the woods yet, but everyday it's better because I make it better. I'm the master of I my own destiny. You could be too, if you choose to. All this "I don't know why would even bother to help me..." shit you've been spewing out to other people just pisses me off. You have someone offering to help you and you're throwing it in their face. Yes, some days will be harder than others. I've tried to commit suicide twice now, and both times was talked out of it. So do not act like I don't know what I'm talking about. I love you. You're better than this.  [info]  [info] 1404893409
bummer85 [info] You’re not screwed up, but it sounds like you are suffering from severe depression. I am diagnosed with depression and can understand these feelings you described. If the idea of taking medication feels extreme right now, seek out a reputable therapist first and take it one step at a time. Just know that you’re not alone and there are people out there who understand what you’re going through.  [info] None [info] 1522206256
dewhashish [info] I feel like I'm just a waste of air, even if others dont think that Back story: I've been diagnosed with depression twice before, and medicated once (zoloft). I stopped taking them myself cause I broke out in hives and hated the fake "happiness" it was giving me. I also stopped going to the therapist i was seeing both times: the first time i was around 7, but couldnt afford it. the second time, around 13, i said no and refused to go. I'm 23 now so its been a while since thenlately i've been feeling worthless, people would be better off not knowing me. i fake a good attitude sometimes so most dont notice a thing. 1. school sucks, and im probably going to fail out of college AGAIN. i was excited to get back and try to finish off my degree, but at some point i hit a low so bad that i just dont even care. i still try but i dont see a point any more.2. no love life whatsoever, and i dont even care, at least before i wouldve tried.3. my job is annoying at times, but its better than nothing. i'd like to just find a full time IT job, away from people fixing computers or something, but i dont know where to find a job like thatbut just so you know my parents are divorced, and i live with my mom. i do have a big family (at least 50 cousins total, 14 aunts and uncles), and we're all close. i feel like i let them all down, cause they expect a lot. i am fairly smart, and always helping out when i can. a lot of my younger cousins look up to mesometimes i think i should go back to therapy, get my life in order and try school again, other times i should say fuck it and just work, since ill be doing that for life anywaythanks [info] None [info] 1272994179
airdried [info] If I've been diagnosed with depression should I not work in mental health? [info] None [info] 1428871908
Noamias [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and it makes me feel a bit better knowing that someone as badass and awesome as Arthur also can have it. And that's it's not just poorly forced like in many cases or misrepresent. I see myself in Arthur a lot, at least I see myself the way I imagine he sees himself. I'm no muscular badass like him though, but I wish.Arthur is still laughing and having a good time sometimes, which definitely is possible even if you have depression. Though I'm not even sure that he has it, it could just be that he's going through a rough time. But all I know is that I've never been able to relate to a gaming character so much before. He's also a big inspiration for me, both to be a good person and also a workout motivation.  [info] :arthur_morgan: Arthur Morgan [info] 1545344542
lbguitarist [info] I'm so sorry. I was your age when a close friend of mine committed suicide as well and I was diagnosed with depression at about 19. Believe me when I say it does get better, even if you can't see the light at the end of the tunnel right now.Echoing what the other people have already said, please seek professional help. You're 16, I'm assuming you're still in high school, there should be a counselor there you can speak to. [info] None [info] 1539970838
Odinshanks [info] He left the part about the Zoloft out. His shitty advice should have started with "after I was diagnosed with depression and prescribed medication to treat my illness I found my attitude became..." [info] None [info] 1548467106
NinnaHori [info] I don't want to go through therapy, I want to die So recently I was diagnosed with depression and was prescribed both antidepressants and therapy. I stopped taking the pills because they made me sleepy, dull, and it took away the rest of joy in my life: alcohol and sex. Also I hate the idea of being intoxicated all the time.But therapy is not helping, I don't have the motivation to go through all that bullshit, the stupid mind exercises about how to stop negative thinking and all that. I just feel like I want to end it, die and stop all the pain and problems. My loved ones (who know about this) also suffer from everything I do, I don't want to be such a person. I don't even want to be any kind of person. [info] None [info] 1439932225
WillOnlyGoUp [info] Struggling with work. Sorry, long post. tl;dr Off sick from work due to tiredness. Off more than I'm in. No idea what to do, already work part time. I just don't know what to do. Hi guys. I'm a 26 year old female from the UK and I've been struggling with tiredness ever since I can remember. I was diagnosed with depression at 16 so now the doctors all say my tiredness is a symptom of depression. I'm adamant my depression is caused by the tiredness, since I can be in a good mood but still tired. I've had all the standard bloodwork done, including thyroid and vitamin D. I was vit D deficient but I'm on a high supplement and I think it's helped a little but it's like a drop in the ocean. Currently I'm pushing to see if I can get to a sleep clinic. But I keep being told I'm not in the risk group for sleep apnea. Also I don't score highly enough on their sleep quiz to really qualify for sleep testing. Mostly because I refuse to let myself fall asleep during the day. I'm stubborn, but also staring at a screen watching TV or redditing helps me stay awake. Mostly out of it though, but conscious. Other then sleep disturbance, it doesn't seem like there's anything left but cfs. Even though I'm not diagnosed, I'm looking at what changes people with cfs make to their lives. Your faq was very helpful! Anyhoo. On to the main problem. Work. I'm struggling with work. I graduated and started work in 2010 as a programmer. Since I started the amount of time I've had to have off has increased. Last year I went part time, doing 25 hours a week. I was off September to April last year with a phased return to work, but I soon as I was back up to 25 hours I struggled again. I've been off sick most of the last 2 months. I don't know what to do.I could reduce my hours again, but I can only do that once a year and there's no guarantee it would be enough. I could quit, but my fiancé's wage isn't enough to cover our bills at our house and we're tied in to a rental contract until next September. I'm trying my best to eat healthily. But it's hard because often I don't have the energy to cook and my fiancé really can't cook that well. He tries though but we often end up eating frozen pizza or other super easy food if I'm not up to cooking. I managed to cook last night and tonight, so yay that's something! I've looked at the UK's disability benefit and I'm pretty sure I don't qualify. May I ask what you did about work? Did you manage to make adjustments? Also, how many of you gave up driving? I'm starting to feel unsafe on the road. [info] None [info] 1414967853
Arc_12 [info] How do I work through depression/other mental illnesses? Bit of back story: I was diagnosed with depression when I was 14 and autism when I was 16 (before that I thought I just didn't get people).I met the love of my life when I was in college 2 years ago (UK), but kept pushing her away when things got tough, which I honestly hate myself for. I'm trying to get back with her for a second time, but things aren't looking good.I'm 18, I got a well-paid job straight out of college and my parents are allowing me to live with them for as long as I need to. I should he happy.But I'm not.I hate my life overall and I just feel like not getting up in the morning, every morning. I consider just getting it over with and jumping in front of a train daily, but I can't do that to my family and I know that my ex would entirely blame herself, which would ruin her.What do I do? How do I deal with this and move on?And please don't say 'get rid of the girl and work on yourself' because she's the only thing keeping me going.TL:DR I suffer from depression and don't want to keep going. How do I work through it? [info] None [info] 1543405921
dsguzbvjrhbv [info] I have ADHD and this is one of the most typical symptoms. One thing about many mental illnesses including ADHD is the point that it significally affects life quality. If it doesn't have a huge negative impact on your life it is just an oddity, not an illness.Few doctors really know about ADHD. They mass diagnose unruly children with it but real cases get misdiagnosed (I was diagnosed with depression several times and given medication that makes ADHD worse instead of better [info] None [info] 1546415846
Undisputedly [info] I've been doing quite a lot of drugs lately, just wanted to know how long till I'll feel normal? These past 4 days I've gone through 5g of coke, 4g of MDMA crystal, 2g of Ketamine, several pingers (they varied, some pure and only containing MDMA, whilst others also contained Amphetamines, Heroin and Speed), and softer shit such as nos and weed.Consequently, my concentration feels off. I've been diagnosed with depression and ADD prior to this so I imagine my brain chemistry has has only been made worse. I've got exams coming up and so I'm now going on a detox. I'm not addicted to anything so that's the easy part, but was just wondering if anyone has gone through any previous, similar scenarios and essentially if anyone had any tips or idea as to how long until my brain chemistry would be balanced out. [info] None [info] 1554818329
Yeahnofucks [info] I had very bad ppd with my first, eventually diagnosed at 4 months. No medication (personal choice), but I saw a therapist for a long time to manage it. I didn’t have it with my second, despite a traumatic birth and difficulty bonding in the first few weeks. I have been diagnosed with depression before having kids, so ppd was always a possibility but I think the difference was in the amount of support I had with each child. With my first, we had just moved 8 hours away from all family and friends, I lost my job as I didn’t get maternity leave, my husband had a new job (hence the move) and was working long hours (and no paternity leave). My son also had colic/reflux and didn’t sleep, screaming for hours on end.With my second, we had moved back nearer family, we had been living there years so felt settled, and my daughter was very healthy and slept well. Support, both medical and family/friends makes such a huge difference.  [info] None [info] 1546464837
Isaac0606 [info] I think I might have some disorder I'm absolutely aware no one here can diagnose me and I don't expect anyone to do it but I need some advice.I had problems with "fitting in" since forever, I always had problems, usually emotional or with school. As a child I had a lot of ticks or some sort of wierd habits but my family never actually took it as a sign of anything. I have difficulty staying focused on anything, I either am constantly overstimulated or almost dissociating. I either get so stressed I'm unable to manage one coherent thought or not care at all. People at school say that if they can't get started writing an essay in class they just look over at my paper bc I always the last one to start writing and they feel reassured. I have so much trouble processing emotions it makes it difficult to take myself seriously sometimes, I just don't know if anything I feel is rational. I also have difficulties with my family, they never care or take seriously when I tell them about my worries or sensitivities, they always talk about me behind my back and never tell me anything and I try to distance myself from them but they don't let me. They also can never stop telling me everything wrong with my behavior, "you care to much/little" "read something and stop being so lazy" "why don't you just just eat more/less" "you should study more"  I just never feel like I'm loved when I don't act absolutely normal or how they expect me to.So my question is should I get tested for some sort mental health issues ? (I have been diagnosed with depression abd sucidal tendencies already) [info] None [info] 1580065774
Ethost [info] Seriously. Fuck that guy. I was diagnosed with depression years ago, although now I have to wonder; am I depressed, or is my suffering a product of my own failures? I mean me too thanks [info] None [info] 1481094421
I_sniff_books [info] I now wish that when I was diagnosed with depression by a psychiatrist, that they would have written down "suicidal sadsack" in my records. [info] None [info] 1450646939
AshyDay [info] Similar situation has lead to a very rocky relationship with my parents now. It was aggravated by the fact that I was a straight A student but my grades temporarily dipped (to like Bs and Cs) when I was diagnosed with depression. They understood and tried to help me but have always had unreasonable expectations of “getting their old daughter back.” Take care of yourself OP. [info] None [info] 1569806489
moon_sticks [info] 16 personalities: first INTP, then ESTP Keys2cognition: INTJ Similarminds: ESTP When I first tested for INTP I was diagnosed with depression and ADHD if that helps.  [info] None [info] 1512372500
chloe-coats [info] My parents make my depression worse Long story short I have a toxic relationship with my parents my mom is a narcissist and my dad is always drunk when I was very young I was diagnosed with depression and to my parents it seems like I don’t matter because to them only their opinions matter there very stubborn and don’t even consider my opinion even when there in the wrong and my mom plays the victim everytime I get into a conversation with them it ends up in a huge fight like one time me aunt that I absolutely hate moved in and they didn’t care how I felt they only cared that she’s rich and brings money and she was always being such a jerk to me and her dog that you don’t even wanna know what I think of that dog or here decided to murder my cat and then when it happened my parents thunk up all the reasons on why it’s my fault that it happened and that the dog gets to stay because it did nothing wrong literally how is it my fault when my aunt brought that dog in the house how am I supposed to be able to completely protect the cat when that dog has free roam in the house? If it would’ve happened outside that would’ve been a completely different story and when I try to explain to my mom how she’s in the wrong she goes and plays the victim and it only makes my depression worse I wanna leave them and never return and ignore any calls or anything they give me because they don’t act like they love me so I’m not gonna love them as long as there treating me this way but I’m not 18 yet so I can’t legally leave them idk what to do if this keeps up eventually I’m gonna get suicidal I want my aunt and that dog kicked out of the house but no my parents don’t care how I feel they only care about the money and they’ll do anything to keep her here as long as she’s giving them money which is what infuriates me most about them taking money over there own daughter that’s not right on so many levels and tbh that cat that was killed was the only thing keeping me going he was the best boy I ever had and without him nothing in this world Is even worth living my parents have always been like this since the day I was born I wish I had different parents that actually care about me [info] None [info] 1563859773
agalix [info] I relate to what you're saying. My particular pattern is being down for a few to many days where I'm down and behaviorally stuck, and then a couple days where I am good. It's common for these days to be hypomania type things like you're saying. Lots of ideas, thinking is kinda fast, I try and do 3 things at once and often these days I have trouble sleeping.What matters is the treatments and tools you use. Cognitive behavioral stuff is great (Feeling good by David Burns) and group therapy does wonders (if you're lucky theres SMART Recovery in your area). That's what matters more than the diagnosis. I have been diagnosed with depression but my friends and family and professionals have questioned that, especially based on my reaction to SSRIs. Bipolar II or schizoaffective disorder.The biggest thing to be careful of is because you have this neurology, too high a dose of SSRIs may do harm. They can mean more frequent and more intense hypomania, and possibly mania. A good practicioner will up a dose only slowly. [info] None [info] 1571994666
littleseedling [info] Antidepressants horror stories are scaring me. What does it actually feel like to be on them? I scheduled an appointment with my GP for next week to figure out what's wrong with me, and I'm planning on trying antidepressants if I'm diagnosed with depression. But lately I've been hearing about people feeling like zombies on antidepressants. I don't want to feel nothingness, that's what I feel like most days.Can anyone relay to me how they felt after going on antidepressants? If they just numb your emotions, then it's really not worth it for me. I already feel like a shell, I don't want a harder shell, I want to feel whole again. [info] None [info] 1428875402
MEGATRONHASFALLEN [info] In the same week I was diagnosed with depression, my mother told me that I had nothing to be sad for, had a great life, and don't have any excuse not to get my act together. Naturally, I never told her.  [info] None [info] 1478444190
jennjenn09 [info] Not always. I have been diagnosed with depression and for a year or so I did not have a dog. In that time my depression got worse and worse.When we could finally afford to have a dog again, I noticed an insane amount of difference in my personality. I'm considering getting my dog the ESA status so he will be able to live with me next year when I go to college. I've been looking at the legality of it for a while now.   [info] None [info] 1361511534
f1rewhispers [info] I've been in your position before, I was diagnosed with depression though. I was fortunate enough to have a mother who speaks very encouragingly to me, usually without filters, so it's very real. It was those encouraging words that got me through my depression, and I was able to mostly better myself because I was able to speak to people the same way. Meaningful words and relating to one another is the epitome of living. You'll never know if a simple conversation could be the thing that changes someone's life. So just do it, the world will brighten up a lot more if you make an effort first.  [info] None [info] 1427313171
Sail3D_The_Default [info] I do not have mental issues, not anymore. In seventh grade I was diagnosed with depressionI was bullied almost every day, my school did nothing to fix it and the problem grew worse and worse.I was in a situation that just fucked me upHow do you think you can judge others when you have not experienced the same? Or have you? [info] None [info] 1572352784
mackerelsan [info] If anything that just makes it sounds like an awkward transition period, really, and I mean that can be a good thing if it means normalizing mental illness awareness.We just need to get past the point of people equating "I have been diagnosed with depression and medicate to alleviate it" with "I'm single so I might as well kill myself, am I right?" [info] None [info] 1510688477
toBrethO [info] An Open Letter. Hi Reddit, I don't post often, and this post will be a long one, so I might as well introduce myself. I am a 17-year-old nobody, living in a shitty town in Arizona. That's pretty much all I want to say about myself that is relevant so let us get started.I haven't been healthy Reddit, I am diagnosed with depression and Severe Generalized Anxiety Disorder. I recently lost a close relative and broke my arm (I am currently typing with 1 hand, had surgery on the broken arm but it is healing faster thanks to the magic of growing). I have been having a harder time than usual and I don't like talking to my family about my problems, and I'm pretty dull as a person. I aspire to be a comic or at least try it one day, I pull antics at my school and sometimes I am a jerk. I usually lay into some friends because they do the same to me, they are a mixed bag of somewhat good people and fucked up people who probably don't give a fuck about me. But I take what I can get these days, I'm a drifter so I have friends in some other places but I spend most of my time with them. But that is a different problem entirely. I have been leaning on some other friends for support with depression. Reaching out is good but the problem is they don't really help, and I wouldn't know what to say either, some don't even really seem to try because once they got me crying on their shoulder they realize the world of shit they're in helping a fucking mess like me. I have a therapist, and that is great but it doesn't always help because I bounce back feeling shittier than I did. I want answers but I'm looking in the wrong places. A friend who actually got rather upset with me once I said something insensitive (was trying to be funny, turned out I was a dick, that happens a lot, comedy is subjective.)  and I got paranoid, I thought She was angry and I went on this rant about how I am a dick and I am a different person than I was before my depression. She finally said I needed to learn to not impose myself on other people for this problem, and that I thought people were responsible for my problems. (I don't honestly, I am pretty cynical now and I probably said something fucking stupid. But I was always convinced I wasn't learning an important lesson or just not seeing something, or even that I was simply a piece of shit). She was right about the first part, the answers were not going to come from others, but at the same time, I feel justified. I always thought other people's perspectives were important and that everyone should be valued, and I can't help but feel like all this pain is so much to handle, I feel trapped and confused, I want to scream and for the nightmare to end so I get scared and get short-sighted, I don't want others to have to feel anything I feel. I don't want anybody to be bothered by me, this world doesn't want me like I want it back. I want the pain to end so badly and I'm scared of the person I look in the mirror every morning. The selfish, crude, and short-sighted boy who is too weak to face the music. I feel like I am too weak to fight on my own but I have to, and I don't think I am ready. I just wanted to put these thoughts out there, it makes me feel better knowing someone might read it, but maybe this is exactly the problem.SincerelyThe dude who wrote thisEDIT: some grammar and misspelling [info] None [info] 1517210091
haleyburnsred [info] Hi, I was diagnosed with depression at the age of 10, tried to commit suicide twice. I'm 24 and still depressed as fuck, when does it get better for me??? 12 years and it still isn't. Sometimes it's better to let people make their own choices, and if you hate cleaning up their mess then pick a new career path buddy.  [info] None [info] 1518123003
whattoucantfind [info] The summer before 7th grade. I discovered internet chat rooms (mostly mtv.com chat rooms) and I met a bunch of people who introduced me to music and the mentality of don't take shit from anyone. This in turn lead to me going on hot or not and meeting a guy who invited me out to a local teen night thing where i met a bunch of kids I'd eventually go to high school with and such (making THAT transition much easier)Before that summer of I was the loser kid desperately trying to fit in with the "cool" kids. Then my new internet friends helped me realize it really didn't matter and i just became myself. I wore what i wanted to wear. I listening to the music i wanted to listen to. And i started actually making friends that I'm still friends with 12 years later. That summer really changed me. Then the next year in 8th grade was when everything else really changed and taught me the value of  certain things(life, money, family). I was diagnosed with depression and found a great therapist.  My dad had a heart attack and 4 months later was laid off from IBM. My mom quit her job and started working retail. And i came down with mono and whooping cough within 4 months of each other and nearly died. I also nearly got held back for the 8th grade thanks to being sick a lot and trying to get my medication right.My entire life changed in two years. But I'm so much better for it. :) [info] None [info] 1400687749
Dragneel [info] The exact same thing for me. I was diagnosed with depression, later got the ADD diagnosis but I still had the depression.... because of problems caused by my previously undiagnosed ADD. [info] None [info] 1556130590
_kurfluffle_ [info] Dude I'm diagnosed with depression and I hate it when people do that, I'm all for talking about problems and I really hate the "you could have it so much worse" mindset but don't try to one up someone and create your own pity party [info] None [info] 1499149772
bgrekos [info] YES! YES! YES!I've been diagnosed with depression, and medicated for it for quite a while now, and I've never self harmed, it's not a big deal. [info] None [info] 1550250646
iamaatc [info] Struggling with NC; feeling alone and isolated, need support please Hi everyone, A little over a month ago I finally had enough and went NC with my Nmom.  I still think it was the right decision, as once I learned about BPD I realized just how unhealthy our relationship was and that it probably wasn't going to get better no matter what I did.  (Full, long story [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/parentlessbychoice/comments/2w0vtd/just_went_nc_in_need_of_support_please_long_story/).)  That being said, I still wanted to maintain contact with my Ndad, however talking to him has basically become a guilt trip about why I should talk to my Nmom, and tonight when I talked to him I said "I love you" at the end of our conversation and he didn't say it back.  That one really hurt.  I feel like I am putting my foot down with my mom for the first time in my life and now my dad is siding with her and I feel like I'm probably going to end up shunned like the rest of our family that I never really saw growing up because they were on Nmom's shit list.  Anyway, if that is the case then it obviously just proves to me that I am making the right decision.  However, what I am struggling with is feeling family-less.  I feel very alone.  I also find myself mourning over the loss of my mom, remembering the times she was really great and wondering if I am not just overreacting and if things were really that bad.  Then I realize I am just forgetting all the bad stuff and try to remind myself of that and then I feel like I am mourning the relationship we could have had, or could be having.  I've been feeling very depressed, I was diagnosed with depression a couple years ago when I first started going to see the counselor at my college and its been really bad since I went NC.  I have a couple people I consider good friends that I can talk to but they can't be around all the time, they have their own lives to worry about.  And I haven't been in a romantic relationship in over two years now, so basically I'm alone a lot when I'm not at work.  Also, this is all hitting at the same time as me deciding I hate my "successful" career and deciding at 26 to go back to school (working full time as college kitchen staff to get free tuition and taking 1-2 classes a semester) and feeling like I'm doing the right thing by choosing to not do a job I don't enjoy for the rest of my life, but combined with feeling very depressed right now I feel like an utter failure when I think about how much work I put into getting my degree and the huge student loan debt I have to deal with for the rest of my life now because of it and now I'm not using it.  TL;DR I went NC with Nmom and feeling depressed and family-less; I feel alone, unloved, and like I've totally fucked up my life.  I need an internet hug.EDIT:  Thanks everyone for your replies.  I really appreciate all the great people in this support group. [info] None [info] 1425351357
scnavi [info] I am genuinely happy because I changed my attitude on life.  I grew up very poor, my dad wasn't around, my mom manipulated me and my sisters, I was diagnosed with depression, I was in many horrible relationships including an abusive marriage etc.  I decided that I would no longer use these things as an excuse for how I feel, and I accepted that these thing had happened and there was nothing I could do to change them.  I wrote down the things I wanted.  I promised myself I would find a good man, someone I was genuinely interested in instead of settling.  I would work hard and save as much money as I can because Material things wouldn't make me happy.  If something was starting to get me down or I was starting to have that "my life sucks" feeling again, I would remind myself of all the good I have in my life, and I would talk to someone and ask for help (this was big)Once I changed my attitude, I found my boyfriend who treats me better than any human being I have ever met in my life.  We are having our first son VERY soon (he's due August 20th) We have a beautiful apartment, I have a job I enjoy doing with people I enjoy being around and I am satisfied with life.  This is a huge accomplishment I'm very proud of, I struggled with suicidal thoughts and getting past my hardships for a long long time.  I wrote down everything I wanted to change in my life, I changed my attitude about life and now I feel wonderful.   It takes hard work and really looking at yourself, but it's worth it.   [info] None [info] 1343317446
SamDrrl [info] I blatantly don't understand it? I'm diagnosed with depression, too, and it's 100% self inflicted.  [info] None [info] 1489965001
TejasNair [info] I completely understand. I have been diagnosed with depression before, which is when I joined a local co-working space to get my work done. Being around people (even if it does not mean talking to them) helped me a lot. Here are few more simple things that I do to further fight it off - 1. I give myself treats every day and look forward to getting that treat. It could be a movie, a hamburger, or maybe my favorite book2. I check my contacts and randomly connect with anyone that I haven't talked with in a while.3. I write down things when I am feeling low and then read them when I am in high spirits. This is really effective [info] None [info] 1534603785
Kombaticus [info] Well thank you, both for the effort to type it out and the risk of hearing the nay-saying.The reason I ask is because I'm at a bit of a crossroads with my burgeoning magical practice.  I was diagnosed with depression 2 years ago that is resistant to every treatment I've tried, including medication.  I was so desperate that even I, a pretty profound atheist and nihilist, took to studying Chaos magic in search of a cure.I've practiced daily meditation for the last 2 months, read some basic books and online texts, done a pretty decent job at suspending my disbelief and cast a few sigils.However, I haven't been able to manifest anything that couldn't be written off as coincidence or confirmation bias.  I'm just so desperate to feel better, and I understand that the desperation can interfere with my ability to manifest change...it's sort of a vicious cycle.If I could only just have a single awesome unexplainable experience, I feel like that would cement my belief and confidence that there is something I could do to heal myself. [info] None [info] 1542640090
ReginaPhalange1991 [info] Tomorrow is the day (long post) Tomorrow is my pinning ceremony and the end of a long journey to and through nursing school. I left high school not knowing what I wanted to do. I knew I wanted to help others, but that was it. I prayed to God to reveal to me my destiny every day of my freshman year. Over the summer between freshman and sophomore year, I had an epiphany. Within the same hour, I dropped all of my current major classes and enrolled in pre-nursing classes. I had never considered nursing before, but I just KNEW it was what I was meant to do. I studied very hard and did decently well the first two quarters of pre-reqs. I received the news I was one of 166 accepted into nursing school. My third semester, I found out that my mom was battling a severe addiction to opioids and benzos. I always suspected addiction, but it was finally confirmed as she was no longer a ''functional' addict.' She overdosed multiple times and ended up giving herself acute hepatitis. I have been diagnosed with depression since I was 13. The exacerbation from the stress paired with taking care of my mom and not my own intellectual health, I got straight C's the last semester, and my acceptance was revoked.I continued with my previous major with the intent of enrolling in an accelerated program. I continued to battle my own depression while my mom continued to use. I became resentful that I had always taken care of others and had never been irresponsible. I began drinking multiple times a week, skipping class, skipping work, and scraping by with the least amount of work to earn Bs. Eventually, I realize my destructive ways were not helping me nor my mother. I limited my own drinking and turned my mother into the state board of nursing for stealing narcotics. She was forced into rehab, random drug testing, and mandated weekly AA meetings. She is going on 3 years of sobriety.My senior year, I applied to a graduate-entry nurse practitioner program, and I was rejected. I drank an entire (large) bottle of wine, ate a large pizza, and smoked a bowl. The next day, I decided to brush myself off and prove to the world I am worthy of being a nurse. I got all As in my pre-reqs (which I retook to be a better candidate). I got a job as a patient care assistant at a psychiatric hospital, which actually helped me to work through my own issues by helping patients work through theirs. I took an STNA class. I graduated cum laude while working full time.I applied to 3 accelerated nursing programs. I was accepted to all 3, but I found out about 1 in October and immediately enrolled. I found out about the other 2 in January, which is when I started the other program. I moved 2 hours away from my home into a house I had never seen before the day I moved in with a roommate I met on Craigslist. I applied to any job healthcare related within 20 miles and took a job as a pharm tech. And, I killed it in nursing school. I will be graduating with a 3.5. The ATI predictor gave me a 98% chance of passing the NCLEX. I have a job offer at a large teaching hospital on a neuro step-down unit. I have finally done it. I have finally made it. I overcame so much to get this damn degree. And I have never been happier or prouder in my life. [info] None [info] 1463109187
casinoLF [info] DP Podcast 4/26/17 Podcast LW #1: Group ProjectsDP, I'm taking a night class to finish my bachelor's degree. One of my classmates, Kathryn, comes in with some new kind of personal drama every week. If you ask how she's doing, she, or someone in her family, is suffering from some deadly malady. Last week, she was motion sick from sitting too close to the screen at the movies, the week before her sister had cervical cancer. This week she is apparently suffering from residual pain from a car accident, so bad that she had to put some Icy Hot cream on during class. It stunk up the room so bad that the instructor had to open window and ask her to leave and wash it off. We ended up having to leave class early, because the smell in the room was so strong, it started to make people sick. How do you deal with a person like this? I spent good money taking this class and I chose night classes because I assumed it would be full of mature adults. I try my best to ignore her, but I can't anymore. We are partners in a group assignment, and I am forced to have contact with her. Please help.Podcast LW #2: LexiprofessionalDP, About a month and a half ago, I received that dreaded call into my head boss's office (K), where he and my direct boss (D) were waiting for me. My productivity at work has been suffering, in my opinion for years, and it finally came to the attention of management, although they only brought up one particular project. D very possibly saved my job, and I'm very appreciative. I believe this meeting was the kick in the rear that I needed, and I've since buckled down and improved both my organizational skills and efficiency. I don't doubt there will be a follow-up meeting with the head boss asking what happened, and why did things get so bad? Prudie, I've been diagnosed with depression, and it's been going on for so long, I don't even know when it began. I've recently started taking medication that has improved my mood and focus. My question is this: How do I address those follow-up questions in a way that doesn't disclose my medical situation? Should I admit that I was depressed and have recently gotten help? D did take responsibility for my poor performance, and possibly deserves the truth. I'm just afraid my mental health won't be taken seriously by K, maybe even D, and might also be seen as a cop out. Although my private situation adversely affected my work, I feel this is deeply personal, and I'd like to keep my professional and private life separate. Thank you for your consideration.Podcast LW3: I Blocked my Boyfriend on FacebookDP, My boyfriend of 7 years recently got on facebook. I have had one for years. He has started regularly waking me up in the middle of the night to yell at me about what's on my page. Comments between friends, male acquaintances commenting, nothing really inappropriate unless it's between my girlfriends and I in a joking manner. My photos aren't all that seductive either, mostly headshots, but I am an attractive woman, and even benign compliments send him into a rage. Me posting a new selfie is unacceptable, because it must be for another guy. We have children together, and his entire family is on my facebook. No one else has made mention of anything inappropriate, and I don't think there's anything work taking a second look at, either. We have both created trust issues years ago. Although I thought we had moved beyond that, he has been picking me apart, so I told him I deleted my facebook and blocked him instead. And I perhaps harshly told him that we should talk about where we stand. I realize this is wrong, but I keep in touch with my family across the country, my career relies on social media, and it's a frequent platform for my friends and I to talk. I've already done away with my instagram, twitter, and snapchat. Is there a better solution?Podcast LW4: Should I be More AmbitiousDP, about 2 years ago I left a demanding job which I abhorred, but which paid me very well. I worked 60-70 hours a week, was on call 24/7, and had horrible supervisors who frequently berated me and wanted constant updates on all my projects. I was miserable and finally decided that I had to leave for my own sanity. I took a position at another company that I was overqualifed for. It paid me much less but also gave me more free time. Now I can structure my day to my own liking and I'm no longer stressed. I find my work satisfying. In the past two years I've been able to get back to the things I love doing. I have time to write, read, have a normal sleep schedule, work out consistently, and be a better wife. In a weird twist, my husband's career has taken a huge upturn these past few years, and now he is seeing a lot of success in a very competitive field, and our income has improved greatly. He likes what he does, and plans on staying in the position. Recently, I got word that my supervisor may be moving on within my company. If this happens, I may be expected to interview for his position, since I've had the same position previously at two other companies and have great references. Since I found this out, I've been beyond stressed and have been having trouble sleeping. All I can think about are the reasons I left my last job. The long hours, the huge staff to manage, tons of meetings, being on call all the time in case of emergencies, etc. I feel like I have PTSD. Granted, my current company is different than that last one I worked for, with a much more laid-back attitude. The position would be pretty prestigious, it would look great on my resume, and offer considerably more money than I'm currently making. I'm 41 years old, and have no children. I'm enjoying my life so much right now. But, I wonder if I should be considering applying to the position, because my husband works so hard to provide so much to our household, and even though he says he doesn't mind, I feel guilty that I'm not making more money. How will it look in my current job if I don't display interest in advancing? Should I be more ambitious? I know at some point I'll have to leave my position because it's pretty obvious that I'm overqualified for the work that I'm doing, and it pays almost nothing. But when I picture my future, I see myself doing something satisfying and hopefully working for myself. A good friend and I who are in the same field are discussing opening our own business, but that's definitely a few years away. Can you help me sort this all out? [info] None [info] 1493239358
evilblackbunny [info] I tell people that I'm feeling pretty okay right now. The truth is I'm scared for my future,  and passively contemplate suicide on a daily basis. I've gotten help, I'm on medication,  I've been diagnosed with depression.I could hit the lottery tomorrow, get a book deal, meet the love of my life, but I'd still have these thoughts,  every day. Knowing that this is who I am bothers me. Telling people I'm okay is easier for everyone.  [info] None [info] 1415609324
MeerkatAttack [info] Yup...not "My dog took 10 minutes to poop this morning so now I'm diagnosed with depression" [info] None [info] 1365431561
mikeisanon154 [info] I'm okay at taking care of myself but I don't wanna be I've been diagnosed with depression for four years,  in treatment for three of those years, and on some form of medication for two. Nothing is helping. One of the things that I am pretty good at is taking care of myself. I can force myself to get out of bed and eat something and go to class and go to work. But I don't want to. Nothing I do makes me happy anymore. I don't even like being around my best friend. All I want to do is lay in bed all day and sleep. I've told my therapist about this and she suggested medication and that I keep on fighting to take care of myself. I'm supposed to go on a new medication soon and my psychiatrist thinks that might help. I'm so tired and I am almost out of hope. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1481261820
kimchihotpot [info] Lol. I have been diagnosed with depression and some of my friends know it. They dont treat me any differently. Youngsters nowadays are more open and will not judge. For bulk of the years, I kept it to myself till I was better.  [info] i live in yishun [info] 1484478264
Tariq2222 [info] I don't enjoy drawing but i still want to improve Not sure if this will make sense but I wanted to write it down since its been stuck in my head for months.Back in January I made the conscious decision that I want to be an artist.  I'm 21, never did art as a kid and I'm still learning.  Because I'm unemployed I spend pretty much all day practising; usually by just sitting here and doing gesture drawings while looking at reference photos.  (Took a photo for anyone who might want to see and provide feedback, although they're not particularly good:  http://i.imgur.com/rtS9xla.jpg)Recently I've been drawing away but I feel like crap when I do it.  I want to drop the pencil and walk away, but at the same time I feel like that wouldn't work either, since when I stop something I tend to fall of the bandwagon and lose all the momentum I had gained.Thing is, I've been diagnosed with depression.  I don't particularly enjoy anything.  So I practice art anyway because I'm aware that - no matter what I'd be doing - my feelings won't really change.  I hear people say that you should only be doing art if you enjoy it, but this seems like a cop-out in my case, since there's nothing else I'd rather be doing.I feel like if I could draw better, then I would enjoy it a lot more.  Does this seem realistic?  I've been practising out of discipline and reading all kinds of books trying my best to improve, but I can't tell if its working or not.  I feel like it saying it isn't, but I don't want to give up. [info] None [info] 1502384655
wiccedd [info] My boyfriend (we both are 22) have been showing a lot of passively aggressive behaviours. What should I do? I'm a bit emotional, reliving all that I'm typing... Furthermore, I'm on my phone so I'm sorry about spacing or typo issues.We started dating about 3 years go in our first year of university. Both of us are immigrants, he's from Asia but he lived most of his life in Middle East, I'm from Europe. He is a sweet and caring guy, but he can get very, very emotional. I have not experienced any issues with his behaviour up until 2nd year into our relationship. We moved in together and more and more I had to start doing the chores, such as cleaning the house, doing the dishes, laundry, etc. I was the one who was doing shopping and taking care of him. I didn't mind that at the time, but I was also in a relatively fresh (in my opinion) relationship.With time it started bothering me more and more, but I decided to blame it on the fact that our previous place was very small and crowded. People get irritated in small spaces. We were about to move to a bigger apartment with separate rooms for each other to keep our stuff sorted. The problem started when I moved in with him to the new place. His behaviour has not changed at all, what's more I got a burden of cleaning a bigger space. He dropped a lot on me and that just became so much I fell behind. That became an issue itself. There's also the problem of his emotions. He is a smart and capable person, but when he is stressed out or scared he is always reaching out for me to take care of him. He is not returning the favour, tho showing signs of irritation when I reach out to him. Many times I had to lift him up, which this year cost me in failing 3 modules during my final year and effectively ruining my chances for good masters and any prospects for PhD. He failed a year of uni and I had to crutch him through that. At the time I did not mind it or look at it that way, though. I honestly perceived it as help that was needed, so I was there when he wanted to talk or cry or vent. Then this year he failed again and I have to lift him up, which costs me a lot of nerves due to my own emotional strain caused by a family situation I would rather not discuss. That has led me to think if I want to break things off, but the problem is I already tried. Some time ago I broke things off with him, because I caught him messaging other girls. He then proceeded to cry to me for a long time, not giving me much space for myself, constantly entering my room. I finally gave in and went back together with him but nothing is the same anymore. He doesn't give me space, he calls me every hour or so. When I ask him to sleep alone after work (I work nights, hence I sleep in the morning. He works from afternoon) he just suddenly appears in my bed and wakes me up. I get grumpy and complain about it and he proceeds to call me a bitch for being nasty to him. He says I should wake up to spend time with him before he goes to work....I honestly want out, but I'm so scared to do it. I need help, I need a pep talk. I love this man, he's a great friend, we have a nice history and all, but we are so incompatible. We argue non stop. It's getting to much and I personally feel I need some time alone. Some time off... How do I do that? What do I do? I'm too scared to make a decisionEdit: I forgot to mention an incident that has been a big red flag to me and might add something into the story. So I have been diagnosed with depression and I'm on very mild medication, since I don't want to go with anything heavy. I had problems with grinding teeth at sleep and it bothered my boyfriend. He says that since I have been taking the pills I do it even more and louder. I told him it's not my fault and it's subconscious. I can't do anything about it. I already have a teeth protector for the night to prevent it, yet he still gives me shit for it. So a few days back he just came at me out of nowhere saying I need to stop taking pills because it's making him lose sleep and they are not helping. I proceeded to explain to him that it's insane, since I take them for only 2 months and it's barely any time to see any significant changes. He then started screaming at me and saying I'm wrong, pharmaceutical companies only want to make money off of me and pay off doctors and I shouldn't take any medication at all. Then he proceeded to do something that I just can't get over with. He took a slip of my pills and threw it out of the window. I am not mad about pills (there were only like 4 on the slip), but about the fact that he did it. I was dumbfounded, he kept yelling at me and I left. After about an hour he came to apologise and I said to leave me alone. Prompted by that he went to look for the pills and didn't find them. I'm still mad and very confused. I honestly don't know what to do anymore. I just keep thinking about this and about what can I do... [info] None [info] 1567284527
turtlenerdle [info] Welll, I experience this, but I'm diagnosed with depression so that's my issue.  [info] None [info] 1546749176
meep_moop [info] Are you seeing a therapist regularly for your depression? I was diagnosed with depression about a year before being diagnosed with diabetes, and over the years (14 here!) I have had times where I was more depressed, and times when I was less. I have currently been seeing the same therapist for 6 years and I have to say that it has probably made the biggest difference in my life and diabetes care. She really helped me see and internalize that my diabetes was not separate from anything else in my life, it's all interconnected. If I'm depressed, I don't want to take care of my diabetes, and then I feel shitty because I know I should be doing better with that, but I'm not so I'm more depressed. Likewise when I'm feeling good, and having good control, it's a positive feedback loop. Also things like stress, being sick, hormones, etc can all have an impact so therapy has helped me understand that sometimes I AM taking care of myself, and I STILL don't have the control I want, and that's okay. It doesn't make me a bad diabetic (or you) and you just have to do your best because it's fucking hard to control this thing.Good luck, OP, take care of yourself because you can do this, and life can be great! [info] T1 2001 6.1% [info] 1453914938
413x105 [info] It's coming back... Last week was fine, the week before was awesome and this week is also okay. I've got a cute and supportive boyfriend who is aware of my problems, a few friends I share a deep connection with and no financial problems. I was diagnosed with depression 2014 and somehow the whole year 2016 was depression-free(except for August) but now it started do come back and I am back at the point, where I get sad without something happening. Does anyone of you have any experience with this feeling? And if yes what do you do to fight against it? [info] None [info] 1477755093
drunkpharmacist [info] In the last four months I have been diagnosed with depression, gained 40 kg and lost it all again. Ask Me Anything. [info] None [info] 1476477215
The_Lord_Of_Mints [info] This is nothing depression related, but a question for the people who work with people with depression. Hi.I've been diagnosed with depression some 3-4 years ago. During that time I've had huge mental breakdowns suicidal thoughts, and many other things. I've also been sent to a mental health institute, where I stayed for several months being treated for depression and going through CBT. The nurses who helped me were the nicest people I've ever met, and have been my role models for the last 3-4 years of my life.They've been so much of a role model that I am seriously considering going into the mental health job area. My question to you qualified nurses/doctors here is what should I study in high school to get into this area? I'm in my sophomore year (or Year 11 for those fellow New Zealanders out there) so I can easily change out one of my subjects at the moment, so studying a subject is no problem for me. Plus, the nurses have done so much for me and I really want to give back to the community, and to my country and help people out who are in the horrible places that I was in. I'm also going to try and frequent this subreddit and /r/suicidewatch as much as possible and help out some people here. I think my experiences could help people. And if I make a difference to somebody's life, that would mean the world to me. (I feel like I'm having a mid life crisis at 15...) Also, another question; what is it like working in that area? And are there jobs specifically for helping depressed children/teenagers? Thanks for reading, and double thanks if you leave a comment answering one of my questions. [info] None [info] 1363587321
RogueDarkJedi [info] If just one person, believes in you [Just watch this. It helped me](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0Zzfdlxjx4Y)Hello everyone,Recently I was diagnosed with depression, and after talking to RainbowCrash, I feel like sharing.A couple of months ago (think around Parasprites celebration) I had lost my house. I had failed a class I could not fail and I had run out of money.I was in tears. I had no money. The government claimed that because of my parents credit ratings, I could not qualify for financial aid to continue my education.I had lost faith in myself. I fell into this spiral. I became obsessive. Being on the subreddit allowed me to escape. To run from my fears. To run from failure.But it never worked. As much as I tried to fight it, I kept failing. And finally, I had hit it. Someone said I should just leave. They didn't really mean it, but I couldn't interpret that. I took that as I was not wanted (I worked it out with this person later).So there I was on a Friday night sitting on the floor in my empty room in tears. No one wanted me. I was seriously considering deleting my reddit account. I don't know why. There were people on Reddit trying to help me. I don't know why.I don't know why.I was crying. I felt like I had nothing. Tears streamed down from my face. I hadn't slept in three days. The video I linked to was playing in the background.I was trying to escape. But I couldn't.Suddenly Illusion messaged me over Steam. I apologized for being such a self-righteous dick. I knew no one wanted me. He said that I was valued. I didn't feel valued.Then Crashy messaged me and told me everything would be alright.The mods made me feel welcome.Over time, I started working towards overcoming my depression, and while I still haven't done it, I'm getting there.I know this sounds corny, but if it weren't for this subreddit, my friends, Random_Acts_Of_Pizza, ReillyBoy, this TV show and my family I probably wouldn't be here.So I want to thank you all so much from the bottom of my heart.Thank you to:* Rollout and the other RAOP mods for providing me dinner on that night* Reillyboy and others for buying me new clothes, food and allowing me to keep my place for another week* Our mods* Illusion &amp; Opti for telling me I was valued* RainbowCrashy for sending me money to pay for food for 2.5 weeks* Pyrotix for trying to cheer me up* knocknix, Dorigard, TNF, kin, ovenmitt, Books, Emu, and everypony else from Synchtube* CrimsonBristle for always being there* Moon for being so damn positive* ILF for just being you* Fabricant for listening* timbaer for being willing to help at all times* Killbunny and Mcore for believing in me* Cookie for being awesome* Cheesemoo for being excited over all my little successes and cheering me on* Nom and Psychoduck for just being there* pariah1165 for teaching me to value others* TVF for inviting me to make stencil art* My teacher for giving me another chance and letting me pass the class* My friends* For all of you for believing in meThank you guys for being there for me. I don't know where I would be without you.*tears**I just don't know.*---EDIT: So it's been over 10 hours since I posted this. I've been reading all of your comments. And let me tell you, I was crying the entire time (both Psychoduck and ILF can attest to that).I'm going to try to reply to each one of you personally, and I know the majority of comments will be me saying thank you.Because I really truly mean it. Thank you all for being here. Thank you for listening.---[Reflection](http://www.reddit.com/r/mylittlepony/comments/lh9a9/this_too_shall_pass/) [info]  [info] 1318936166
h0b04lyfe [info] I have a question about daily life: the way you act externally and are perceived by others. I was diagnosed with borderline several years back.  After researching the disorder I was lead to believe it was something I had dealt with most of my life. Before knowing I had borderline (diagnosed at about 24-25 years old) I was diagnosed with depression starting at age 14. Many people see me in the world and think I am the happiest person they’ve ever met. They are always stunned to find out I live with/suffer with BPD. I am on mood stabilizers to help balance my every day life, but I was curious as to if this overtly happy, friendly act is something others experience as well. Could it be just me becoming the best actress, having hidden and masked my true feeling since 14?Sincerely,An insomniac:  awake at 1:24AM having prescribed sleeping pills in my system with a work alarm set at 4:15AMPS Thankful for the community of people to reach out to who truly understand my thoughts, struggles, and pain. 🖤 [info] None [info] 1538116017
alexandraFeddy [info] I somehow won the therapist lottery and found an amazing psychologist WHO GREW UP WITH A BPD MOTHER JUST LIKE ME. Like she understands on such a deep level and I'm sure you all know how priceless that is. So she basically "diagnosed" my mom as BPD on like our second therapy session. So I started researching it and I was like OMG IT ALL MAKES SENSE.  So I'm NC with my mom right now but one of the last times I did respond to one of her unwanted texts, I told her she was mentally ill and she needed to see a PSYCHOLOGIST and get diagnosed. She told me she has been seeing a counselor at a church (I'm a Christian but I'm sorry, i don't believe in the ability of a church counselor to diagnose, treat, or do anything to help someone like my mom) she also told me she's been diagnosed with depression and tried to use that as an excuse for all her problems and behavior and as a "feel bad for me, I'm depressed" game, which pissed me off because I'm like, sure you probably are depressed, but that's not what the problem is here. I was diagnosed with depression too and you don't see me destroying my relationships and abusing my kids. So all that to say, I hope my mom will get officially diagnosed and get some treatment, not sure if it help or not, lol, but maybe it would open her eyes a bit.😒 [info] None [info] 1506690443
Demeter_of_New [info] I may not have taken ADHD medication when I was in school, but looking back I really wish I had. I have been diagnosed and am currently taking medication for Adult ADD.For the longest time I had no idea I had ADD. I had terrible grades, terrible outlook on life, terrible relationship with my parents. We went to a psychologist and I was diagnosed with depression and they put me on a prozac off-brand. I took that for a short while and I felt happier. But my grades hardly moved. I'm not dumb, in fact, I'm knowledge hungry. I am always on the internet looking for cool bits of information, trying to learn new things. I dabbled in languages, and programming, and other things.  I felt happier but barely passed high school and got a job in IT. I work at a help desk and I pass off anything that takes more than a half an hour to the next level of technicians. This is nice, I don't have to concentrate for too long. But as time passed, I was getting more experienced and I was keeping problems that I would have normally passed on. But this wasn't an issue at first. I handled it, but as time passed, it was just harder and harder for me to concentrate on the work I was doing. Even the problems that take just a few minutes would take me over an hour to complete, just because I would get distracted and not remember what I was doing before, its bad.It's hard to explain it, because I've been told before, "Just concentrate! It's not that hard!" but ADD is like you are watching a movie. And out of the corner of your eye, you notice the wall outlet the lamp is plugged into next to the TV. It's just an outlet. But you can plug in ANYTHING with the approprate plug and BAM! it has power. You know, I read somewhere that the first form of the outlet socket was made before the turn on the 20th century! Can you imagine going back in time and talking to Edison and saying, "what you made, will forever.." and that just keeps going, 100 mph, until something else cathces my attention and the process repeats. And I CANNOT CONTROL THAT. I can't remember what people say either. Even if they tell me ten times and I am looking them in the eye. The moment something catches my attention, it's gone.But what's weird is I have the opposite ability for a few things. I can sit there and concentrate on learning a song on the guitar, or video games, or tasks that are similar. I need constant stimulation to stay focued. Reddit is amazing and there have been times that I've spent half a day on it without knowing. I went to another psychologist and they mentioned ADD. I sort of laughed, but I trusted him. So I was put on a low dosage of Adderal. It's been almost two months and I have gotten a promotion and a raise, I was asked by my boss to make a new position and take it over, and I moved in with my girlfriend. The medication makes it easy to not think about everything, all the time.Sure those aren't school grades, but god damnit if this was high school I am positive I would have not almost failed out. This medication has changed my life. It allows me to enjoy everything and not worry about remembering what someone said.  [info] None [info] 1373401485
Smallchild___ [info] I’m telling you. I was diagnosed with depression but i had to hide it from my mother for years.  [info] None [info] 1518325093
takaperoinen-miete [info] Yeah, I worded that wrong. Of course someone who's played the cello since she was 6 years old can play a cello for a living. The matter is, the competition in creative jobs is fierce and absolutely brutal and I can't compete with everyone who has already dedicated their entire existence to it, as a 25-year-old starting now. I can put myself and my mindset separately, but how do I separate expectation from experience? How am I expected to keep repeating the same action and expecting a different result, with an absolute and full faith that this time it'll happen?I've been diagnosed with depression since I was 14. By the success rates that these psychiatric professionals have had this far, it's likely it's just a permanent fixture of who I am as a person. [info] None [info] 1566887165
Eman9871 [info] Ya I know :/ I'm slowly getting over it. I have been diagnosed with depression for a while and I just happen to take give smallest of things and make them into a HUGE deal. I'll be alright though. Thank you for asking.  [info] None [info] 1518817964
optimumcliff [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and have been on medicine for 10+ years. Last year it was really bad for me because I weaned off medicine and everything was just hitting me. Too much stress that I couldn't handle. Had to quit my job. Had to hold off house buying. Etc. I'm just trying to take it easy and have an easy pregnancy although it's not when I'm nauseous all the time, but just want to say you're not alone!I'm going to to back to counseling soon. My doctor moved so I have to find someone new. :( [info] None [info] 1541485183
cake_mimic [info] You basically sound like you're in the same situation as my now-hubby and I were a few years ago.I was diagnosed with depression so long ago I don't even remember when it was, but it got really severe when I was very sick, living in Germany, while my now-hubby was in the USA. It was neither the first nor last time I had a major depressive episode, but it was the first I'd had since he met me. He was terrified and felt awful that he couldn't come see me, and I was entirely emotionally dependent on him.I can't say exactly what your girlfriend would want, because I'm not her. But I know that I would have felt like a horrible person if my depression had caused my now-hubby to sacrifice great opportunities to be with me while I wallowed. I am sure that just having the knowledge you are out there and you love her is a huge help. [info] None [info] 1366086867
owenkorzec [info] Yes I was diagnosed with depression in my teens, it actually went away but I still just feel like a unique person. I know that Ive got this difference in my brain where I don't see the world the way most people do and that's definitely a big part of why I love making music cause it really taps into that. [info] None [info] 1462733821
CS01 [info] IAmA person who has been on antidepres​sants for most of their life. AMA I was diagnosed with depression at the tender age of 4. However, Ididn't become dangerously depressed (suicidal) until I was 13, at which point, I started antidepressants.I've been on Paxil, Zoloft, Wellbutrin, and now Effexor. [info] None [info] 1374869957
Ishouldbedeactivated [info] I see a person in pain.  That's all.   You're not horrible or undeserving, just in pain.  I'm not going to diagnose you but the frustrations you are feeling are similar to mine and I have been diagnosed with depression.  Is it possible for you to discuss this with a doctor, your PCP or GP would be the first port of call, if you are able. [info]  [info] 1573583061
Duncan_Disorderly_ [info] My wife says the spark has gone. Hi all! My wife and myself have been going through a very difficult period in our lives. I was diagnosed with depression October 2018. Mainly due to my extremely stressful job... I dealt with suicide a lot! I was prescribed an antidepressant and kept this hidden from her. I was embarrassed as I was a psychiatric professional and allowed my own mental state to slip. She only discovered the truth when I had to take time off work to go to counselling. Now... I am in a better place. I have changed jobs and now work in a less stressful environment. Over 2 months ago she told me she was not physically attracted to me anymore, so I began making changes. This entire time (possibly 4/5 months) went by without any physical contact initiated by her (hugging, kissing, sex, comforting and supporting). I began giving 100% of my focus to our relationship and she acknowledged how much of a positive change she seen. Then, 4 nights ago she told me that she feels no different. No physical attraction. We have two beautiful children and I don't want to leave. However, I have become angry with myself and her. I find my mood has seriously dipped again this week and I'm almost at square one again. I suggested counselling a number of months ago, however she declined, explaining that she felt things were improving naturally. I've left it to her to organise counselling this time, as I had an appointment booked and had to cancel last time. I cannot live in a marriage where my emotional/physical/sexual needs are not being addressed at all. I am sleeping on the sofa, and can't continue doing this either. I did walk out one night and ended sleeping in my car outside the hospital in which I work. I only came back as she pleaded with me.Can anyone suggest how we can get over this crisis in our relationship? I almost feel hatred towards her at the moment... which is the last thing I've ever wanted to feel for my wife of 12 years. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1563260647
maplethrift [info] it's a stable job with base salary and monthly bonus, company paid expenses and such with 5 days/mth travelling needed so needless to say it's a sweet gig and of course it pays well just off of base... they went to visit YYC before and for sure they know it's much better than Winnipeg but it's just they been in Peg for 20+ years and don't wanna leave this shit hole of a city lol I have told them and they definitely see it, I don't wanna blow it outta proportion but I wouldn't be surprised if I was diagnosed with depression if I did stay here in Peg for the rest of my life [info] None [info] 1555088735
Low_notes_z06 [info] I’m a 29 year old male living with depression. Every time I’ve considered suicide, it’s never come from a desire to die so much as a lack of desire to go on living the life I have. If there was a third door, an option to go to sleep and never wake up, I’d go for that. I do not take medication, nor will I as it doesn’t help me and I’d rather just get my dopamine from working out.The harsh truth is that no matter how bad it gets, I’m no use to anyone dead. My life is only valuable to me because I choose to assign it value. I’m not gonna say it’s because life is sacred because I’ll be honest, I’ve traveled the world and experienced more than most people ever do. At the end of it I’ve found universal truths and more harsh facts. We’re all gonna die, life is finite, life after death is a hoax and a marketing strategy for every brand of afterlife insurance out there, things don’t happen for a reason, and we’re not here for a reason. Metaphysical sentience (god(s)) is/are bullshit, and religion is only useful as a social phenomenon.I may live in hell-lite every day as someone who was permanently disabled and disfigured at the age of 27 but I can still contribute to society. Every day is painful. Sometimes each hour is painful. (By the way, I was diagnosed with depression long before I was disabled.) People ask me if there is a point and I just chuckle, there is no point, but we are alive. We get this one opportunity, for better or worse, to live. When the lights go out, they don’t come back up after an intermission for an Act II, there is no encore, there is no Sunday matinee.Tyrion Lannister said it best, death is so boring whereas life is so full of possibility. I hope one day I am lucky enough to have a family of my own and that I will impact the world positively. Is there meaning in life? Sure, but only because we choose to assign meaning to it. If you’re looking for cosmic given purpose, keep drinking the religious kool-aid and burying your head in the sand, that seems to be doing the world a load of favors. (Hard eye-roll)If it sounds like I’m harping on religion a lot, it’s because I am. I truly believe that we have an unprecedented number of depressed individuals because we are coming into an age where religion no longer makes sense, but older generations are clinging to it desperately. The dichotomy and struggle of it all lands on the shoulders of the younger generations while at the same time there has never been a more unfair distribution of wealth and resources in history. A lot of people are shitty, especially people in positions of power. The world is a dark place and if you’re just hoping to sit by idly and wish for a pleasant experience to be handed to you, you’re going to be bored and disappointed.How I get through? My dog depends on me and I am fortunate enough to have family and friends who support me even though they know I spend most of my time alone and in silence. Most days I struggle to fight back the swirling clouds of shadow at the periphery of my field of vision. (I literally can’t close my eyes for too long or my brain goes all Snow-White-in-the-forest on me.)I’ve still not ruled it (suicide) out, but again, death is so boring.TL:DR There is no fate but what we make. Also, there is no god, rip that bandaid off. Life only has as much value as you assign to it. [info] None [info] 1573966126
Aergath [info] I don't use it to cure depression it's juste a great side effect I noticed. But even though I did it's nice to have something to pull you out of the darkness.  I've been diagnosed with depression for a few years now and I do my best to have a schedule, a nice balanced diet and so on... But sometimes the chemicals in your brain don't care if you do all this and still tell mess with you.  [info] None [info] 1480086473
Msbirdperson [info] I really don't know if I can do this. [0] I was diagnosed with depression a year ago, and started taking lexipro to combat that; but I never found anything as helpful as marijuana. I've often thought about applying for my medical card, but my constant changing life has prevented that. Recently I have an opprtunity for a job in Texas but I obviously will have to take a drug test. in preparation I've been clean all of 4 days, and I've been the most depressed I've ever been. Like I don't even give a shit about showering or basic cleanliness. I really don't know if I can be 3 weeks sober to get the shit out of my system, I think it's almost better for me to get stoned on my last two bowl packs tomorrow so I don't feel so shitty, after my interview for texas. I'm posting in r/leaves, I really am trying to have some support but at this point idk if it's worth it. [info] None [info] 1501440938
kyaluna [info] r/gatekeeping I was diagnosed with depression at age 13 so you never know if "moody" is more than it seems. [info] None [info] 1565321143
Punkassdog [info] Yes, I am diagnosed with depression for about a year now, I start triking after it started [info] None [info] 1368885007
Teekai [info] TIFU by lying to my coworkers about a case, and now I have to either switch position or lose my job. I've had a very bad year. I've been diagnosed with depression, fatigue-syndrome and was home from work for a short period of time this summer. Since then I've felt less and less motivated to do my work. I work as a social worker, specializing in mental disabilities. Meeting clients has Always been my joy, and it still is, but I've been getting less and less writing of journals done. I can only trace this back to when I started feeling depressed, and that was when i ended my connection to my mother (long story, not relevant to this one). I've managened to hide this from my coworkers until last friday, when I was home sick with a cold. My coworkers had to look into my cases in my abcense and found that I've been hiding a case that I haven't done anything in, despite me saying that I have been doing a lot of things in this perticular case. My pants have been set aflames a lot this fall.This is a big misconduct to say the least, and I faced my boss the very same day. She has been very understanding with my depression and lack of energy at work that I have been coping with lately, but she expressed that this situation is indefensible. I therefore was faced with a choice: Swith position to a more "caretaking" position, or get fired. I feel terrible, but at the same time I am relieved. I am concinved that this is because of my psyciatric problems, and working with something else will be a good thing in the long run. The problem for me has never been the clients, but the Writing- and administration part. One lie destroyed the little trust my coworkers had left in my ability to do my job, and now my stupid ass will have to pay the price.Don't lie. [info] None [info] 1481537483
ccm596 [info] I have no fucking idea what I'm gonna do then lol. Because it doesnt matter how many positive changes I make in my life, or how much I know that things have improved, I still feel like I'm fucking garbage :/ I just wanna stop wishing I was someone else, and I dont know how. Its like nothing I do matters, my life is objectively 10x as good as it was a year ago, but I'm just as miserable, if not more.Hahaha I live in the US, in a state that didnt expand Medicaid. Which means that my last therapist appointment was a couple weeks before I turned 18. (Maybe 19?) Yes, I was diagnosed with depression in high school. But like I said, since I'm not rich, it doesnt really matter, I just get to figure it out myself because I dont have God knows how much money to spend on either therapy out of pocket, or insurance that would cover it. And it's so hard to talk about this, because people always think I'm "woe is me"ing for pity, but I'm not. I just want to feel better, like I'm a person who's worthy of love and not a fucking weirdo freak. I need help, and I cant seem to find it, and it's getting harder to stay convinced that it's even worth it to keep trying. I would do anything to just be happy by myself, and to figure out what I need to do be deserving of a girl's attention. In that order. It breaks my heart every day that I have no outlet for the love that I know I'm capable of showing, and hope that I'm worthy of receiving, but it's clear to me that's gonna be a looooooong fucking time from now, so I just want to learn to be happy without it, so I'm not entering a relationship for the wrong reasons.Sorry for the wall of text [info] None [info] 1542895854
Toasty_my_roasty [info] I don't feel anything, I don't think I ever have. Ever since I was little, my emotions were very flat compared to others. I didn't really notice something was wrong untill I really started thinking about it. I once went over to my cousins house and saw a hole in her wall, she told me she had punched it because she was angry. I could never imagine doing that, the inconvenience of hurting myself seemed so much more previlant than releasing such a strong sense of emotion. Emotion that I would slowly learn from then on that I didn't really have. The more I noticed that I never found anyone attractive, I didn't really enjoy anything, nothing gave me satisfaction or emotional rewards, etc. I have impulsive thoughts and physical reactions, but nothing internal. I feel very flat and dull.I just didn't really feel anything, and I omly became more and more apathetic as the years went on. I'm not angry, I'm not happy, I'm not suicidal because I don't get sad. My days are just my work and my room, and when I try to go out and interact with others I only feel more out of place and "fake".In highschool I managed to bypass my apathy somewhat and thanks to a crisis was ablw to force myself to seek out outside help. Not too long after I was diagnosed with depression and was on meds for a year but nothing changed. I stopped going because it felt inconvenient and like a waste of time. I wasn't happy, so there was no point. I weened myself off the meds once I ran out and that was about 4 months ago...I'm 19, and I've been out of highschool for 2 years now, My family is getting on me about going to school and doing something with my life but I don't know what to do. Sure I'm "good at things" but nothing appeals to me, nothing matters enough to pursue it, and I sense that the second I try too, I'll only drop it for convenience sake. I never thought about my future because I wasn't ever able to see it. I had always assumed I'd somehow be dead by now. And I sort of feel like I am.My grandma says I'm getting comfortable, but I honestly believe even on the streets I wouldn't try to help myself. I just don't care enough. As it stands, I sleep alot and don't exercise or feed myself all that much. I know I'm depressed but it feels liks so much more than that. I've been like this for as long as I can remember, and I don't know if this is all life has in store for me. I guess I just want to hear thoughts from others. Thank you for your time. [info] None [info] 1551326418
expoweruser [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with depression but I'm on medicine for it now which helps a lot :) [info] 18 [info] 1500321336
MusicalMoon [info] My (21M) relationship with my girlfriend (20F) almost seems too perfect. Is that a bad sign? My gf and I have been together for a little over a year now. We've known each other for about 7 years as we were great friends in high school. During the time we were friends, I was in two other relationships (not at the same time, but nearly back-to-back). The first ended up ending pretty explosively after 3.5 years as I felt like as we grew up, we became much more different people than we were before. She didn't agree and proceeded to cast a smear campaign amongst my friends and deny that she did any of it. The next one was a doozy, it was just over a year in length and she was incredibly abusive. She would shame me for everything I did or said and basically forced me to show her attention every moment of every day, even when I was in class or working.Now, after over a year of being single, my current girlfriend and I began dating. Our friendship before was entirely platonic, I never saw any interest in her and I also don't feel like she had any interest in me. But, once we both started college, something clicked and we've been together for nearly a year and a half. It's been a near perfect experience, we've never had a true fight or argument even once, and we always see eye-to-eye on everything. Even when we disagree we always have a very civil conversation about it.My past experiences tell me that this just isn't possible. Is that true? Is there something wrong here? I am diagnosed with depression and often feel like things are going too well and there must be a catch. Is that what I'm experiencing? Thinking about this lately has me panicking.Thank you in advance for your responses.Tl;dr - I'm in a relationship that seems almost too perfect. Am I crazy? Or is this what they're supposed to feel like? [info] None [info] 1561960933
signifi_cunt [info] That it's harder to function than you think. If you don't have a disorder you can't imagine what it's like to have your brain think in circles that you can't stop. I was diagnosed with depression and ocd at 20, and my onset was probably 17. Prior, I couldn't have imagined it. I've had trichitillomania since I was young, but it's nothing compared to the way obsessive compulsive thoughts manifest. When I say "I can't leave my bed right now," it's not because I don't want to.. If I do I'll be in kind of a zombie like state because my mind won't be quiet about whatever negative thing it's focused on, and I can't focus on anything but those thoughts. I don't want to be with people because I'll come off as rude. Give your friends some time and some support. Getting help (via going to therapy) was the best decision I've made in a while, and I probably wouldn't have made it without supportive friends.TLDR; acting normal can be hard, acting weird comes off as rude/is embarrassing. Edit- luv 2 spell.  [info] None [info] 1439611028
spinachicken [info] As of now I believe it was thinking of my family, friends, and anyone who would fine me. I didn't want to end up scarring them for life when they found my body or for my close ones to worry about me until they get a call from the police saying my body was found and needed to be confirmed. I've thought about it numerous times and 3 times I was literally at deaths door waiting to knock. But,  every time thinking about my close ones manages to be enough to catch me. I've told my mother, which was the hardest thing to do in my life, and managed to build enough courage to tell a doctor. I have been diagnosed with depression and have scheduled an appointment with a therapist. I know that killing myself is not the right answer, yet, in the back of my mind I'm afraid. Afraid that my mind will somehow end up tricking me to do it. I don't know how but I'm afraid that somehow ill end up like my old high school friend who pretended to be happy and hung himself in our senior year. [info] None [info] 1510512988
iSamHamlin [info] I was diagnosed with depression about 15 years ago and have been on numerous medicines for it. I haven’t taken any for awhile and am actually happier than ever (after doing a lot of other work). I don’t talk about this for fear of offending people but I have major issues with anyone saying people who are depressed need meds because their brains don’t produce enough certain chemicals. No one ever physically tested my brain before prescribing me. They asked me questions but no one measured the chemicals in my brain. To reduce mental illness stigma, many people say that treating depression as a brain chemical deficiency is like treating somebody whose body doesn’t produce enough insulin, but that’s not a true analogy. They run tests to make sure your body doesn’t produce enough insulin before they prescribe anything for it. All I did was answer a survey. Where is the medical test proving a physical deficiency in brain chemicals?To clarify with an example: I’m not saying a serotonin deficiency doesn’t cause depression. That’s indisputable. I’m saying a good number of people are walking around under the belief they have a serotonin deficiency who may not actually be deficient because, to my knowledge, there’s no medical test for that. [info] None [info] 1556126086
GoRangers5 [info] Never mind I was diagnosed with depression and instead of taking the happy pills I decided to live my life differently and cure myself without drugs or expensive ass therapy appointments, but yup I’m making the huge judgments on things I don’t understand.  [info] None [info] 1509019925
anonymousannabel [info] Just ate some psilocybin mushrooms, and feeling very nauseous and physically ill, is this normal? Hi. First time shroom user.   My intention for trying this is based off studies coming from John-Hopkins, I have been diagnosed with depression. Not to trip at all but to microdose. As I type this out it feels silly that I’m defending my actions, but I cant help but feel embarrassed. I’m not a habitual drug user (besides alcohol). I only ate 1 (albino penis envy). It was around .56 grams. I have a sense of hyper-awareness. Colors seem much brighter.  And I can tangibly feel more.   I’m feeling pretty nauseous. During my yoga session and I nearly threw up. Very upset stomach. Acid reflux. Its essentially all I’ve eaten (besides coffee and a slice of cheese) I’ve looked up side effects and this doesn’t seem to be one. I just want assurance I guess that this is normal. Thank you so much for taking time out of your day and even reading this. [info] None [info] 1588017445
Windows_Iphone [info] I (30F) had a miscarriage and my step-daughter (21F) seems happy about it. Am I overreacting? 3 years ago, I got married to the most amazing man (53M). He has 5 children, out of which the oldest, Dan (23M) and Jay (21F) absolutely hate me. They accused me of being a gold digger, of trying to brainwash their siblings and of trying to make their father forget about them and his ex-wife. When I got pregnant, I was overjoyed because I always wanted children. When my husband sat my 5 step-children down to tell them about the baby, things didn't go as expected. I understood that Dan and Jay were gonna be furious, but I did not expect the others to react in the same manner.Lee (18M) and May (18F) claimed it was unfair for my husband to build another family while they were alive, that the baby basically meant he will abandon his other children. And even John (16M) which I kind of get along with stated that he will never love the baby to my face! My husband and the twins, Lee and May, started shouting at each other and soon, the other 3 joined. It was a difficult night for everyone, and I understand everyone said things they didn't mean; but I expected that by morning, things will be calmer. I was wrong. My husband and his children did not talk for almost 2 months before Jay decided to contact him and apologize. Not only was I surprised Jay, my biggest hater, would ever apologize to me, but she called a family meeting in which we all said how we feel about the baby and the situation and about that fight. I was thrilled to finally have a good, or at least neutral report with Jay and she seemed to open up to the idea of having a baby half-sister.But 4 months later, my worst fear became reality, I had a miscarriage... My beautiful baby girl was gone... I was devastated, I felt as the entire world collapsed in front of my eyes. I was diagnosed with depression and could barely get out of bed; but my loving husband never left my side and eventually I got a little better.During my recovery, I was visited by John, the twins and even Dan. They all apologized for saying terrible things about my late daughter behind my back and offered to pray for my daughter (they aren't religious but I am) which meant a lot to me.I should mention that during my recovery, Jay didn't visit me at all. She didn't even message me, it was like she vanished. She did not attend my daughter's funeral.I follow her on Instagram and Twitter, where she usually posts selfies and memes, but since my daughter's death, she kept posting inspirational quotes along the lines of:"Sometimes the best things in life are accidental.""Be happy because your prayers have been answered."Those are actually words she wrote and posted on her accounts. There are multiple posts about being happy on her account and they have all been posted AFTER she found out about my miscarriage...But what truly worried me is when she first visited after my baby's death, at a family gathering, she seemed happy. Everyone expressed their sorrows for my daughter, except Jay. When I went to talk to her, she asked me why am I sad about the passing of my daughter. She said it was God's will for my daughter to join him in Heaven (she might have been drunk).Looking back at it, I remember how many times Jay has made fun of me for believing in a "cruel" God (as she puts it). She might have been mocking me, but was subtle because she was afraid of hurting her father or being seen as the villain?I didn't wanna say anything about the Instagram posts or our interaction at the family gathering to my husband because I don't wanna seem paranoid or crazy nor do I want to worsen the already fragile relationship my husband has with Jay. I might be overreacting. Maybe she is sad about her sister's death and this is her way of coping?  What should I do? Tell my husband? Talk to Jay and try to make amends? Or do nothing because this is all in my head? [info] None [info] 1586252203
floppy3433 [info] How do you claim disability? Am I able to? I was diagnosed with depression in 2016 and I was recently diagnosed with ASD and PTSD. I’ve been struggling to keep a job and deal with my mental issues. Many days I’m trying to work while not having a breakdown at work. I feel like the best thing for me to do is claim disability and focus on my health. I don’t really know how to go about it. Most info is on work-related injuries and not much on mental health. What’s the process and what are the benefits that I could receive? I live in Ohio, USA. [info] None [info] 1566545131
mobilepopemobile [info] When I was a teenager, I was diagnosed with depression.  The medications they prescribed me caused me to become suicidal.  I stopped taking them.  My depression stayed.  Eventually, I found out that marijuana gave me instant bliss.  When I was 18, my tea-totaling mother found out and threw me out.  I lived in my car for almost two weeks before a friend's father let me stay with their family.    A few months later, my friend and I got our own place, but could not keep steady employment for an entire year.  When we got evicted, I spent a few more days in my car before finding another place to stay with friends.    I got another job and saved for long enough to get another apartment with a roommate.  Eventually, I lost that job, my roommate lost his, and we lost that apartment.  This time, I went to a homeless shelter for a few weeks (it was winter and too cold to sleep in my car) until another friend gave me a place to crash.  I got another job and moved into my own tiny rental house where I managed to stay in the same place for 18 whole months before I joined the Army.    I got out of homelessness through the generosity of friends, friends who managed to see the best in me when I was at my worst.   Some might say "look at that drug-using loser, of course he's homeless," but would not know that almost all of the weed I smoked before I was honorably discharged from the Army was shared with me by other people.  I would also point out that the legal drugs I was given made me actively suicidal while the illegal one made me happy.   [info] None [info] 1387672301
dogfightdog [info] Baseball rn. Most people play sports bc it’s fun but I play because I was diagnosed with depression when I was 16 and throughout that time, baseball was the only thing that I would get excited for bc on the field I can lose myself in the game for a bit. And I want to be great at the game. And to be great I have to hold myself to a high standard, I have to hold myself accountable so I don’t slip off my path. I have to stay focused to do that, so everything I do is to help with that. Time plays a major role. When I’m doing the things I need to do to improve as a player or student, that’s time of the day that is spent on a mission so I know I’m working TOWARDS something instead of standing still. [info] None [info] 1555915699
thegothickitty33 [info] Does anyone have an obsession with sorting I'm gonna start off here saying I dont think I have OCD or anything like that. I've been diagnosed with depression and ADD. Maybe it's part of my ADD. No clue. I just like to sort and organize things. Specifically multi colored candy (skittles, M&amp;Ms, Runts etc). I sort them by color and eat them buy color. I also sort my magic the gathering cards.  I have a system for those. (White, blue, black, red, green, land, other) I also have an urge to organize other people stuff. Specifically setting the time on coffee pots and microwaves and making all cans of beer and soda face the same way. It's not obsessive or anything. Just kinda a thing I do I guess. [info] None [info] 1545606599
